RonanIsRadioactive [info] Thank you very much! I am diagnosed with anxiety, so I definitely think you read that correctly lol. I will keep these priorities in mind.  [info] None [info] 1551756100 [info] test
Shadehz [info] Hi Andrea. I'm Nicole. I don't know if you remember me, but I opened for you at Ivywild in Colorado Springs.I just want to say that earlier this year, I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was around that time that I heard your poem Panic Button Collector for the first time. I'd always looked up to you as an artist and poet, and it meant so much to know that if you could break through that fear again and again, maybe I could too. I want to say I really appreciate everything you do, the way that you enrich the world with your words and make it a better place every time you perform. That's what poetry is for, and you embody that purpose so completely. Here are my questions. 1. What got you started with writing poetry? 2. And more importantly, what along the way encouraged you to keep moving forward? 3. What do you think is harder - getting the words out there, or editing them?  [info] None [info] 1407705449 [info] valid
gabez814 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I'm hoping to find a physician who agrees its "similar" to PTSD because like you said based on the wording it definitely sounds like its up to the physicians. [info] None [info] 1478738886 [info] train
PatronymicPenguin [info] It's too easy to give up after the first medication or two doesn't work well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a child and it took several months to find a medication which worked and didn't have unbearable side effects, but it was worth it. My life improved greatly and has continued to get better into adulthood. It can take time, but never give up. The right medicine, combined with therapy, can change your life. [info] None [info] 1485530761
clearglassofwater [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety NOS or GAD with OCD features years ago and it waxes and wanes, going from totally manageable to pretty bad. I'm sorry to hear about your form of anxiety, that sounds awful. I've tried risperdal and it made my brain basically go on vacation and just be numb :/ mindfulness could help me a lot I think. I think a benzo with a shorter half life like Xanax would be helpful but I'm afraid of asking my psych because I know people sell it and it will sound like I'm doctor shopping. [info] None [info] 1499074833 [info] train
-Perchta- [info] Ok thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so you are probably correct. I was only able to eat a small amount last night so I’m going to try again right now. [info] None [info] 1569324234 [info] train
abdane [info] Anxiety symptoms, anyone share this? okay so I have been diagnosed with anxiety since 2015 when I had a panic attack out of nowhere, i thought i was done for and this will be my life forever. I went to see a doctor and was saved by benzos (ativan at the time). Then i went on cipralex for about a year and stopped it because it made me very tired most of the time. I thought the panic attacks would reoccur, but they didnt thank god. Now, my daily life is as follow:&amp;#x200B;waking up fine, one hour later my anxiety starts to rise (not sure if its anxiety or what at this point), what I feel is a weird feeling that I cannot explain, ill try my best. i dont get any physical symptoms that the rest get (heavy breathing, sweating, etc...) all what i feel is this feeling in my brain of un-focusness and it is very uncomfortable to bare. I came across brain-fog but im not sure if that is what im experiencing or not. its like my brain is not mentally clear and I cannot focus, but i can if i want to but its hard. as i said, hard to explain. But during the evening (8pm or so for some weird reason) the effects subside and i fell a bit more normal.&amp;#x200B;then the cycle goes again on the next day. some days i do not experience this (which is rare, maybe once a month).&amp;#x200B;Anyone else with same experience? any advice? [info] None [info] 1555037746 [info] train
KatillacGirl [info] Thank you, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same age as you, and this feels very different.  I do know that anxiety can morph itself to latch on to you too though!  I am really glad that I finally have a doctor who takes my concerns seriously and checks for things now.  My initial doctor would literally tell me EVERYTHING was anxiety.  I am very thin, (in fact underweight), but I have never been a super active person, so sometimes I think I'm just very out of shape.  But then I see other people who are wayyy more out of shape than I am, and they can still do things MUCH more easily, without feeling like they are going to die. :/I've noticed for me, that I push myself too hard when I feel good, because I actually hate sitting still, and then I am tuckered out for days at times.   I need about 10 hours of sleep a night, any less = Pain.  Too much = Pain + Anxiety.  I don't know why that is.  I'm still feeling super skeptical about whether I have fibro or not.  I feel like I might almost doubt it if my doctor tells me I have it, even though I relate so so much to the condition. [info] None [info] 1528903029 [info] train
Caffeinated_DaVinic [info] Yeah same. I have access to it legally for real cheap though only temporarily. Asking everywhere I can for any info on it. I've had my fair share of bad trips and immediately thought to use it as a backup Benzo since my doctor won't prescribe me Xanax anymore after I told him I smoke. I mean I've been diagnosed with anxiety and sleep disorders since I was 9 but now the only med I've been prescribed my entire life that works is taken away just because I care about drug interactions... Gave me something else for anxiety but leaves me with HUGE memory gaps, like hours I just can't recall at all. [info] None [info] 1513901221 [info] train
LitteWing93 [info] She called me and I apologized because of using the word seriously. I agree I should have thought about it longer I felt I didnt have much time because i wanted her to get the message a.s.a.p before Kelly had the chance to see it. I was diagnosed with anxiety which Is why I'm seeking to see if maybe i over reacted. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1574628066 [info] train
WallFlower556 [info] Hands tingling? Hey guys, so today my landlord and her husband showed up to my apartment unannounced without and notice and began pounding on both my front door and back door at the same time, they began trying to get in, and looking through my windows to see if I had packed anything (I’m supposed to be out at the end of the month because of our agreement and me trying to leave because this isn’t the first time they have harassed me) their reason being because I haven’t answered their calls of her trying to see if I am all packed up because I was busy packing. Anyway I had heart palpitations galore as I called the police, and my hands started tingling. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of past trauma, but the hands tingling was a new one and I didn’t know if anyone else has experienced something like this before. I also have carpal tunnel, but it wasn’t the normal kind of flare up it happened when I started getting anxious, but I’m not sure if that’s a factor? Anyway thank you for taking the time to read this and I hope everyone is doing well. If you ever need someone to talk to and listen I am here for all of you! [info] None [info] 1577575637 [info] valid
phoenix464 [info] This. I was diagnosed with anxiety after about 7 years into my active duty time. I was required to go to appointments at mental health, and prescribed Zoloft. Aside from getting the help you need, it's important to get it in your medical records for disability claims with the VA after you separate. [info] None [info] 1433077890 [info] train
justhush1 [info] Hey, so I can’t respond to your original post, but i’m still trying to figure out if this was a personal attack or just an uneducated person trying to talk about mental health problems. I was diagnosed with anxiety from a super young age, and everyday it is going to be something that influences my life. For me instead of trying to find a way to “cure” or totally get rid of my anxiety, which is just not realistic, I instead focus on minimizing it. The missionaries told me often that the church would heal me. That’s just not how mental health works. I am successful in my life, and am truly happy. This is despite my mental health issues. So yes, I still have mental health problems, but everyday I see an improvement, and I’m pass a point in my life where they control me. [info] None [info] 1514570465 [info] test
NorthboundXVC [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and about a year ago I went to a treatment center. it helped a lot at first but my mental state has been declining this past year with no signs of stopping even when I have sought out help  [info] 17/M/Gay/OregonUS [info] 1508804298
Drew13 [info] Losing my friends because of anxiety It was only a couple of months ago that I was diagnosed with anxiety and every since I've been pulling away from my friends. Lately, however, the friends that I still have around seems to be getting annoyed every time I get a panic attack. I don't know what to do. [info] None [info] 1336329517 [info] train
weakandbroken [info] What are the odds of having a PE (or anything else for that matter) that doesn't show up on EKG? 20 year old male, 240 pounds, 6 foot 2. I've been having breathing problems and chest pain for the last 24 hours give or take a few. I don't drink and I only smoke once a year at the very most but I do get a lot of secondhand exposure.. No diagnosed medical conditions, and the only things I take for medication are lorazepam (rarely, as needed) and CoQ10 (OTC, not by recommendation or anything). I called the ambulance around 4 AM yesterday, they did a 4 lead EKG, and everything showed up fine so I went home. Symptoms persisted so I went to the walk-in clinic around 11 AM later that day, and they did a 12 lead and everything showed up fine. There must have been some sort of argument between the doctor I saw or someone else because he was really adamant that I go up to the ER to get bloodwork done, but then the other nurse came in and told me since the EKG was fine (save for low T-wave in V6 and sinus arrhythmia, but this was just what the machine automatically detected, not the technician). I got home and got in the shower and came *very* close to fainting, and symptoms got worse so I got up to the ER and because I already had an EKG done, they just took my vitals then discharged me. Around 5 this morning the symptoms were even worse, called the ambulance, they did another 4 lead, and everything showed up fine. Now I'm lying in bed and my symptoms are the worst they've ever been. I would go up to the ER again but chances are they won't believe me, since I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have had a few false alarms (even though I know for a fact it's not anxiety.) Anyway I am really concerned about PE. I have been fairly immobile for a whole week up until Tuesday, and for that whole week my diet was "lacking" to say the least.Sorry if I'm rambling at this point. But my question is whether or not PE can be ruled out by EKG alone, and if it can't, how do I go about them testing for troponin or whatever else? [info] None [info] 1530211538 [info] train
Rokelu [info] Possible sleep apnea. Yet to be tested Hello, I am a 23 year old male standing at 6’1 and weighing about 270 pounds. I have made a decision to make great changes to my lifestyle in order to lose weight and be healthier. I am from Ohio and I just recently graduated from college. During college, I gained about 60-65 pounds. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I take Zoloft (I haven’t in about a week due to running out and being on vacation.) recently, I have been having issues with sleep, and I don’t feel tired during the day, but I don’t feel well-rested either. Late last week, I woke up holding my breath(this was after drinking a bit too much wine, I haven’t drank since because I’m trying to cut alcohol out.) It was very subtle but it was odd; something I have never experienced before. I have been told I snore quite loudly by family, but no one has ever noted disruptions in breathing. I have also been having strange and vivid dreams at night. Nothing that wakes me up, but something I remember which could be attributed to my melatonin use as well. Last time I went to the doctor, I was pre hypertensive, but my doc decided not to do anything medication wise. I recently downloaded a sleep app and it recorded a 4 minute clip of my sleeping. I didn’t really hear any breath or snoring due to the noise of my fan, but I did hear myself make a sort of gasping noise 1-2 times during the clip. I also have very bad allergies and have trouble breathing clearly through my nose. My heart-rate according to my Apple Watch has been around 50 for me recently, which is somewhat low compared to my usual low to mid 60’s or even around 70bpm. I usually feel refreshed immediately after waking. I have also been feeling groggy early to mid afternoon, and I feel as if I get tired easily during physical exercise. This isn’t like an out of breath tired, but more like a sleepy tired. I don’t feel as if I have classic symptoms such as throat pain or headaches when waking up, but I do tend to have head pressure throughout the day. I also wear a mouthguard during sleep to prevent teeth grinding, which I do quite often. With all of this being said, I plan on seeing the doctor, but should I be very concerned given my age and plans to make changes to be much healthier? Any advice would be very helpful. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1578334039 [info] train
benjazio_xd [info] My anxiety and my girlfriend I've been on a relationship with this beautiful girl about a year ago, and it has truly been the best time of my life. I love her with all my heart and soul, she really cares for me when I'm down, and we've had really good moments together.I was diagnosed with anxiety about seven months ago, and for the most part it hasn't strained our relationship, she has anxiety too so she understands me really well when I'm feeling down. However, the past month has been really tough for me. If I start to panic, i start thinking that she does not love me anymore, pushing me further down the spiral. I know for a fact she does love me just as much as I do, but that thought sticks with me and I can't seem to be able to get rid of it. I don't want to end it, it's a beautiful relationship, but it's really starting to take a toll on me. [info] None [info] 1503198055 [info] test
mustafa80 [info] yeah being anxious doesnt excuse his actions. this is both blatant apologism and trivialization of that condition. I've been diagnosed with anxiety most of my life but I dont allow it to be an excuse for my shortcomings. stop trying to stick up for a man who already has a god complex anyways. [info] None [info] 1534370932 [info] train
bitchnumber24 [info] I didn't think disliking small talk was indicative of introversion. I was under the impression introversion was more like disliking meaningless smalltalk with no lead into more meaningful conversation. and needing to recharge with alone time after interactions with others. I used to think I was just shy and introverted because I abhorred small talk and the prospect of chatting with strangers. I couldn't even order a fucking happy meal on my own when I was a kid. Im pretty sure it was anxiety that kind of leeched to be some kind of social anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so that's just what I think. I also believe that I *am* an introvert but not because I hate small talk - more because after mingling with people, I need a quiet space to just "be" and collect myself before facing people again. let me assuage you thought, being an introvert is NOT WRONG. you are not a worse or wrong person for being an introvert. disliking small talk is understandable. I hated it because it felt so unpredictable. (maybe you've heard this before but) it gets better with practice. I started by observing my friends and other random take part in small talk. Walked around my town to buy things and listened to what people talk about. I practiced with my friends (they didn't know, I was just trying out some small talk lines lol) and it got easier. Don't let what that guy said get to you. those words he used are offensive, but I bet he just didn't know how to understand so he got scared. People tend to be silly like that and reject what they can't understand. you're okay. Okay? :) [info] None [info] 1401033699 [info] valid
azumatora [info] I didn't realize that drug testing had been implemented.So (and this is me trying to think out loud) if I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and changed doctors after getting out of the hospital, I would have to be drug tested before I could get an anxiety med? Wow. (Or rather "any future", since this would be after the mental hospital's prescription ran out.)***If your next response is, "Yes, if anxiety meds are controlled substances."Then I'll jump in with, "Most are. I know of one that isn't (buspar), but it made my heart pound." [info] Grand Ledge [info] 1526833008 [info] test
Servalpur [info] You're right, I didn't word that correctly at all. Where I said "sane", I should have said "capable". Generally when people hear the phrase mental illness, they automatically link to the capability of the person. I'm guilty of it too, even though I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, a form of mental illness.That said, my point was that if this witch was capable of producing a potion or spell which could bend the will of someone to fit her wishes, she was also capable of creating some kind of life for herself and her son. [info] None [info] 1478126828 [info] train
C-4 [info] Xanax, Lexapro and some questions about anxiety. Ok, so I was diagnosed with anxiety last month due to feeling like having a heart attack and went to the ER and got all sorts of tests done.  Now, I've never took a pill other than aspirin in my life but they described me a generix Xanax and i've researched it before I took it and I've seen its addictive and all that which is why my family doctor just didn't prescribe it to me and i'm upset.  I realize the medical reasons why some doctors don't like to prescribe it but it calms me down, and it makes my chest not feel like a heart attack. My doctor prescribed me Lexapro the other day and I hate the way it makes me feel, he said he won't prescribe Xanax.  How do I get to get a doctor to prescribe me either that or a generic form or at least a pill that does close to the same affects as that without sounding like a pill popper or something like that? Because my anxiety really sucks and I'm starting school in January and I really don't want to feel like having constant heart attacks.  BTW please don't suggest other things to help with anxiety or say buy these pills illegally, I do not want to do that, but just the way of getting them prescribed.  Thank you. [info] None [info] 1323806551 [info] valid
emheybug [info] Obsessive thoughts/ I've been diagnosed with anxiety pretty much my whole life. Back in February I had 3 days of the worst panic attacks of my life and then I started obsessively thinking that I was being spiritually attacked by the devil for about 12 days. I literally was getting sick, throwing up, not eating, etc. I had relief for about a month and then it started up again. It has gotten to the point where I was having intrusive thoughts about killing myself and feeling as if I am fighting my brain. I'm not sure if this is OCD or not. I see a doctor and she said it's possible, but there's no real clarification from her. (just my primary care doctor)She put me on Zoloft and I've been taking it for about a month. I upped to 50mg around 2 weeks ago. I see some improvement with my thoughts (no longer thinking about harming myself) but I'm still obsessing over the devil + God. Anyone here take Zoloft and does it help with your unwanted thoughts? [info] None [info] 1555697180 [info] train
coolsnail [info] Yeah, mine was right in the sternum. WebMD told me I was having a heart attack and red pop-up told me to go to the ER. lol.Also I told the ER doctors that I was diagnosed with anxiety so they instantly said "oh yeah then it's just your anxiety doing this". One doctor said I'd probably live with it for another 30-40 years.Finally I got some proper tests and an ultrasound done and they realized my gallbladder needed to be removed.Also, my mum had hers removed a few years before I did. She felt it in her back (I think she described it feeling like golf balls stuck under her ribs or something) [info] None [info] 1446692813 [info] train
OnshorePlaysYT [info] Like 2 or 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. But I got rid of it. Now it’s back and I haven’t been to the doctor yet to see. I go every 3 months. Last time was like 1 or 2 months ago. [info] None [info] 1567736442 [info] test
Elenorelore [info] I don't know if this helps any, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder every three years since the fourth grade (I'm a junior in college now). I've frequently had moments where I've heard phone rings, wake-up alarms, etcetera when nothing was going on. Heck, I used to always have my phone on vibrate and started getting phantom phone vibrations  that I could've sworn were real. When I got my first apartment, there was a couple of times throughout my lease that I felt as if someone was in my apartment. I'd get out of bed just to check everywhere. I'd even slept with all of the lights on so that I could see anyone if they were coming (not every time, but a few times). Schizophrenia is a common illness in my family so I've also became immensly worried that I was in the early stages-- but I think that's just what anxiety does to you. Sometimes I'd think that I was seeing things outta the corner of my eye, then I'd just psych myself out for the rest of the day because of it.Now that I'm on medication for anxiety, all of those feelings have gone away. [info] None [info] 1565492707 [info] test
apiaries [info] Exciting to see all of these new farms popping up! I haven’t been able to try a more “premium” CBD product and I would love to evaluate what a quality product does for me. I am diagnosed with anxiety due to some complex traumas and even low dose CBD helps with it, along with some chronic physical pain that I have from a wrist surgery and Lyme Disease hip injury (which I start PT for tomorrow!). It also helps settle things if my GERD kicks in. CBD allows me to stand for shifts at work, something that is agonizing if not impossible without, along with being able to enjoy my day. I’m not interested in opioids or pharmaceutical muscle relaxers, the former because of the side effects and ridiculous abuse potential and the latter because they don’t work for me. As far as anxiety goes, I would say that being able to control my disordered eating (binging) changed my entire life... I lost weight, am in less pain because I am now a healthy weight, feel more confident about my body, and am just living a healthier and better life. I’d love to try your product! I’m starting my senior year as a Mass Communication student in one week and I’m curious to see how my semester could be improved with less anxiety and more focus! [info] None [info] 1566233157 [info] train
k12314 [info] Oh yeah, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and antisocial personality disorder. Mental illness is a definite factor for me. [info] None [info] 1402685684 [info] valid
snowcroc [info] Medicine making symptoms better but causing excessive burping. So here is the story.It started when I was conscripted into the army, I lost a ton of weight and became fitter and then the constipation started. It was bad.At first I went to GPs but they just gave me probiotics and laxatives, none of which really worked. So I went to a specialist who after a round of medicines that did not work sent me to get a colonoscopy and a endoscopy. Both came out clean.He then put me on some probiotics and tirmebutine malate. This did improve the symptoms somewhat, although not perfect, I do tend to have more regular and easier to pass bowel movement. Although it still feels like an incomplete evacuation.However, it feels like this is causing me excessive gas. Sometimes I do feel bloated, but even if I am not, I am constantly burping. I have this uncomfortable feeling of trapped air below my sternum and keep burping. Like 5 time a minute for the whole day. I am not exaggerating at all.Some things you may want to know.I generally have lousy sleep because I am a guard in the army and have to do four hour shifts round the clock.I eat healthy and maintain an active lifestyle.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17, but had no symptoms then. This started when I was 19. I am 20 now. [info] None [info] 1417375315 [info] train
RetrogradeMe [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yes, I do.  [info] 2 days [info] 1519682168 [info] train
Dev_57 [info] yeah pretty safe to say it was no surprise when I was diagnosed with anxiety xD [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1559446624 [info] train
pigglesbaby [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. My doctor prescribed me .5mg of Xanax. I honestly don’t feel anything after taking it. I have to take 2 or 3 to actually calm down. I have general anxiety but I also have major panic attacks. I’m blowing through this prescription. [info] None [info] 1519571930 [info] train
NudePenguin69 [info] Mine is more of a personal one rather than song meaning specific.Twice's Fancy came out the day after my first ever panic attack sent me to the emergency room for 14 hours.  I got home at 4am from the hospital and was physically and emotionally exhausted but I stayed awake because I knew the new Twice song was about to drop.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder shortly after that, and for a while, I couldnt listen to Fancy because it triggered memories and feelings from that night that flared up my anxiety. Recently however, now that my anxiety is well regulated by medication and I am half a year removed from the incident, Fancy has become a song that reminds me of what I overcame.  My struggles with anxiety earlier in the year were the scariest thing I have personally endured in my life, and Fancy reminds me the no matter how shitty things seem, life goes on and it will soon pass. [info] Jihyo | Juri | Lua | AleXa | Yoohyeon | Lisa | Ryujin | Hani [info] 1575071798 [info] test
tOki_Sori [info] [20/F] and [20/M] First time experiencing long distance from my 3 year long boyfriend. Need some advice on how to focus on myself despite how uncomfortable I may feel. The relationship we have is very special. We are very close, we see each other almost every day and although number of times we fight and seem like we're not a good matching puzzle, end of the day and beginning of the day, we love each other and find each other. So far, the only distance I've had with him was when he had to go to fencing tournaments and the longest was about 10 days. Not a big deal right? But I have been diagnosed with anxiety problems this year...and many was caused by the last two years of dramatic events I've never been through in and out of relationship. A little background about my boyfriend: He is intellectual, but lives inside his head and can't seem to put many actions he wants to apply. He is not the most assertive person and he is always genuine and caring for others. However, ever since he started having relationship experiences since about 5-6 yrs ago, he never had a big space of independence -- he was either in a relationship long term and short terms and never had a real break for himself. He met me at a pretty rough time of his life....and at first it wasn't easy for me or him to stick around together but we were the ones who kept each other unbroken. He loved me for my liveliness and it was just what he needed to regain his focus on his life -- to be a better self. But that hasn't been working very well over the years we've been together... No matter my effort and help, and support, he always struggled and would fall back to where he was... Part because he wasn't over his past of the mistakes he made, part because he feels guilty of his life, part because he feels like he doesn't have the independence he wants and possibly more reasons to add on... i see so much potential in what he can do for himself and to the world. He haven't gone to a real vacation in 4 years. Four years ago he went to China for 2 months and lets just say it was the worst and somewhat good time because at the time he was in a relationship before we were together (and i was friends with him at the time when I wasn't really in love with him) and there was a ton of miscommunication.. she broke up with him before he went to China, but he didn't know until he came back and broke his heart even though he deserved it from her. Anyway, he got sick in China through emotional distress and even when he came back home, he lost a ton of weight by not eating and had a lot of mental breakdowns... When he met me though, that started to change very slowly, and he slowly started to accept his mistake and accept that that was what happened. He just went to China on Friday Aug 2nd at 6:15am for a good month. This is my first experience being far away from him and really just having ME TIME A LOT. I am not used to that...last time was all the years before I met him haha... We both don't want to feel like we are holding each other back from doing what we want to do for ourselves to be happy. He planned to re-invent himself in China hoping that he will change appearance and action wise when he comes back. So am I. We hope for a better relationship, a better life. However, what I fear is, what he may truly feel like in the end about me and this relationship... reason I say this is because, the night before he left, I was over at his house, we kind of fought and I started it due to feeling fearful of my own thoughts, and he felt kind of hurt by it and kept saying he didn't love me at all and that for the last year he has been trying to regain back that love he had for me... it hurt but it was also very nice to finally hear his honesty (bc he always had a tendency to not tell me things openly). Then he saw that I was falling apart and it wasn't quite fair on both ends... i want to give him that space and time for just himself and at the same time, I want to be with him. So does he, but he says when he's decided he is with me, he feels like he only have to focus on me which is not true. So instead of breaking up, we decided to try our best this month to become newer-better self. I am just anxious that when he comes back, if he realizes solidly that he doesn't love me anymore, or if he comes back loving me more than before. Because he said he doesn't know what love is, but what he feels for me is truly deep and truly cares about me more than anyone and hates seeing me hurt even by him. He also said that he can't let go of me even if he tries just for the sake of having his space because we are that comfortable with each other as well.  I just want some good advice on how to stay calm and not be anxious or worried that he may not communicate with me even though he said he will. It's almost 2nd day and I still haven't heard anything from him...I know google doesn't work in China. We rely on skype majority of the time to call and IM and we just started relying on Kakaotalk and not sure how that will go either...Please, any advice on how you guys worked it out would be really appreciated.P.S. I am sorry if I went off track somehow and that it is long but I hate leaving off questionable details :/ [info] None [info] 1375575746 [info] train
TyphlosionGirl [info] Rant about a liar You're probably going to see this, you're probably going to know this is about you, but you know what, it is what it is. Im tired of it and I've BEEN tired of it.You shouldn't have lied about your miscarriage. You saw a fetus in the toilet? You said you were pregnant for three weeks. THREE WEEKS. Did you really think I believed that?On top of that, then you suddenly had fertility problems? I don't think you understand how angry this comment of yours made me after I realized you were probably lying, because there is a good chance that I WILL. And suddenly: BREAST CANCER. Out of fucking no where. Are you getting treatment for it? No, of course you aren't.And then after breast cancer it's diabetes. And also heart attacks. Which someone calmed you down from. NEWSFLASH: YOU CANNOT BE CALMED DOWN FROM A HEART ATTACK. But it wasn't a heart attack right? It was an anxiety attack, yeah, an anxiety attack because that sounds more believable...until I mentioned that I have been diagnosed with anxiety problems, then you just drank too much caffeine.Then it's Asthma, water in your lungs, and ovarian cysts.You know what you have? MUNCHAUSEN SYNDROMEAS IN, YOU FAKE YOUR FUCKING DISEASES FOR ATTENTION.Y'know, with that many problems in one year with no treatment, YOU WOULD BE DEAD. But enough about your fifty fucking diseases, now we gotta talk about your love life.We both know your main crush. He knows it too. And you know what you did? YOU LIED ABOUT THAT TOO. I FUCKING ASKED HIM MYSELF BECAUSE IWASCONCERNEDFORYOUAND THEN I FOUND OUT YOU WERE LYING THROUGH YOUR FUCKING TEETHCan't forget that you tried to hit on every single guy friend of ours, and our girl friend (Friend who is a girl, not date/relationship, obviously). Oh, and THEN you told her that MY BOYFRIEND AND I WANTED TO HAVE A THREESOME WITH HER? WHAT THE FUCKING FUCK. WHY WOULD YOU MAKE UP THAT LIE? FOR WHAT PURPOSE IS THAT.Better yet, why lie about anything? Why hint that you're dating two guys who we both know you're not dating? Why do that and then get ANGRY when I call you out on it? Well you know what, if i'm on your dark side, fine, i'll deal with that. At least you won't be lying to me anymore. [info] None [info] 1414033603 [info] test
chilindrina7 [info] Job searching dilemma So I'm a part time college student and have been for a while. I've taken longer than some people to graduate school because of some past hospitalizations and now I'm in therapy trying to get a hold of my life back. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and a few other disorders but because I am a college student, I'd eventually like to take some more courses which would end up making me a full time student. Well it's been recommended to me by my therapist that I should get a job to get out of the house but I don't know what to do. I'd like to get a job where I work no more than 15 hours but most of the jobs that have that type of flexibility don't really suit me. They're mostly in tutoring, retail, or food places. I've read about bookstores or libraries being a good place to start too but there are no job openings for those type of jobs around me. I've read that some of the flexible jobs in terms of hours are Starbucks and Bestbuy. I always kind of knew that retail and food places pretty much give that flexibility but my anxiety makes me so scared to work at those places. I've already worked in retail and on the second day I almost threw up from anxiety because of the pressure and how many times I kept messing up. At some food places I've noticed that there are some places that aren't really busy but when I hear a store like Starbucks it makes me anxious too. They're not always busy but sometimes I see the long lines at drive thru and it makes me think of the pressure too. I've read about being an assistant at an art gallery or tutoring but I'm not tech savvy and I don't really have an area of expertise that I could teach for someone else to learn. I've read about catering and it sounds great but the openings that I've seen require me to own a car, which I don't own. Basically I feel fucked and I feel stuck. I have no idea what job would suit me and I've mostly have worked as a clerical assistant and at schools in the past. I've done well with those jobs but they mostly require at least 25 hours a week, which won't give me time to take more classes. I just need a job with flexible hours that would be no more than 15 hours and doesn't sound nerve-wracking for my anxiety. Any suggestions and help would be gladly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1564345435 [info] train
DirtpickuptruckNL [info] Music One of the biggest problems with Minecraft is that it doesn't play music the entire time. So I turn it off and listen to 10 hours versions of the music. The music calms me down so much that I've begun to listen to it when I'm on the bike or just doing something elsewhere. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for almost 2 years  so needless to say the music has really helped me exponentially. [info] None [info] 1566724669 [info] train
kelseylynne90 [info] Has he looked into IBS? I had issues similar before I was diagnosed with anxiety at 17 (I’m almost 29 now) and my stomach is still wonky as hell.  [info] None [info] 1548881392 [info] train
yaen [info] Exactly. I used it for anxiety pre-preg, but I quit when I got pregnant. When people hear 'I used it for anxiety,' I wonder if they think I got a little anxious now and then and used it as an excuse. No. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorder. It's terrifying and dibilitating when it's bad.Fortunately, I'm a lucky person for whom pregnancy hormones have helped me feel the least anxiety I've felt in years. But I fear for what will happen after the birth, with my hormones going crazy. It's still my goal to manage my anxiety with no drugs of any kind, but when it comes down to it, if I need something, I'd 100% choose smoking a tiny bit a couple times a week rather than starting a crazy SSRI regimen and having to quit breast feeding. That sounds both worse for me and the baby. I've been on almost every anti-depressant out there over my lifetime, and I'm never happy on them. I don't just feel numb with cannabis, I feel happy. That is to say, during the periods when Im not actually high, I find myself happier and more calm. I'm grateful for it. [info] Mama to Ev, 14 month, and pregnant with Baby September, 32 weeks [info] 1328624582 [info] train
Isrozzis [info] So I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. Really explains a lot of things that I've been struggling with for awhile. Panic attacks are absolutely terrifying. Going from chilling out to feeling like you're having a heart attack is 0/10. It doesn't help that I'm either a hypochondriac or real close, so I'll worry about small things in my health until they become a problem. I've seen some doctors and got some medication which has helped, but it takes time to fully get going. Of course life style changes are important too. The weirdest thing is that after a big panic attack normal things that I love will make me panic. Like I looked at a gochiusa gif and was just absolutely terrified for no reason. That's been a really weird experience, but I've been able to convince myself that the anime girls won't hurt me. The brain is a hell of a thing sometimes...It's been a rough week. I feel like a used rag that's been tossed aside.  [info] http://myanimelist.net/animelist/isrozzis [info] 1483774101 [info] valid
Mr_Belch [info] I used to get this a few years ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Never put two and two together now that it was probably caused by the anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1541344064 [info] train
spaghettithrower [info] Could I have a thyroid problem? Hey everyone, this is my first time posting here. For the past 25+ years I have been exhausted. I could easily sleep 15 or more hours a day. When I get up I am completely lethargic and just want to lie on the sofa. I have been desperate to find the cause of my tiredness. I've had a sleep disorder test ( no disorder found), had a doctor tell me I have adrenal fatigue, while another said it was chronic fatigue. I've been diagnosed with anxiety. My other symptoms are very cold hands and feet. Like I'm wearing fingerless gloves inside as I type this!I'm planning on getting a full thyroid blood panel this week.My question is: does what I'm experiencing sound like it could be thyroid related? I'm not asking for a diagnosis , I just know nothing about any of this and am at the end of my rope. I feel like I have no life due to my never-ending fatigue.Thank you for any insight, info. [info] None [info] 1486520415 [info] test
prider90 [info] I' m in the same boat mate. :( I've been diagnosed with anxiety.  Tried lots of supplements/meditation and no improvement.  Somehow I always remember music lyrics or gaming competition tasks/challenges but I forget simple things and having a hard time to remember things people told me.&amp;#x200B; [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1538668641
Possant [info] My Grandparents Have Been Frustrating Me A Little Too Much Disclaimer: My English is kinda bad, so sorry for any mistakes.So, I didn't know if I should post this here, because I'm very anxious and I was afraid of the answers, but here goes nothing.I've been living with my grandparents for more than a year, my mother lives in another city and I decided to live with them, because I love the city that they live.So the first thing is that my grandmother doesn't quite understand the problems that I have, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and Panic Syndrome, I have been going to a psychologist and lately I was getting some good results. But my grandmother is always asking about my problems, and I know she really wants to help, but her answers are always like “This is only happening in your head” or “People won't bite you”, whenever I'm discussing this with her is always a headache and I always get kind of frustrated, but I really don't want to give a rude answer, because I don't want to make her sad and my conscience gets really heavy.Another thing that bothers me a little too much is my grandfather, his always entering my room, and trying to be funny in a forced way and trying to make me laugh, sometimes I do laugh, but recently it has been frustrating me more and more. And sometimes I only want to be alone with my thoughts or read a book and I have to pass the stress of asking him politely to give me some space, but he is really persistent on doing it and sometimes he can't see that I want a time with only myself. I've been trying to be nicest person ever lately, and this kind of things have been making me really stressed, I don't want to discount on my parents or friends, I really want it to go away but I don't know how, and I’ve been really getting frustrated with this. I'm kinda young, I'm only 14 years old and I have to confess that I was a little spoiled. I really want to make things easy for me and for them. [info] None [info] 1539461551 [info] train
cdepatie4 [info] I have a question.. To start off I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's pretty bad. Just feel like that's important.Anyways, I was sitting in a bathroom stall when I heard people laughing and one person going  "haha dude stop". It sounded like it was coming through a vent and there was a vent above me. Also, when I plugged my ears it went away. Could this be a hallucination. This really through me for a loop and I'm freaking out. Am I overreacting? [info] None [info] 1473792579 [info] train
semmc720 [info] I feel like I’m honestly at my breaking point and I just need short term ways to cope I was diagnosed with anxiety in September and put on medication which helped for a while, but I feel like the effects aren’t good anymore. I’m constantly in a state of mild to moderate panic and this morning I had such bad heartburn and a fast heart rate that I felt like I was going to have a heart attack. I’m passively suicidal, I feel like a massive burden and it’s hard for the people in my life to understand how much I’m struggling, although they really are trying. I’m going to ring my doctor first thing tomorrow for an appointment to discuss upping my dosage or switching my meds, but I need something to help me cope until then. Just something that’ll make me feel like life is worth living :( [info] None [info] 1546562746 [info] train
flperson [info] 6 months is not excessive time to try out a new treatment for anxiety.I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a few different Dr.s over the years and trying CBD oil is the only time I have self treated with something that is not a prescription.I've talked to many doctors, I cannot afford one currently.We are having this conversation because you don't know what you're talking about and hopefully my explanations and experiences can help someone..."Get some medicaid/Medicare... It's pretty much free if he's actually broke."  I hope this comment is just you being silly or sarcastic or something... Getting useful coverage through the gov't is not easy in any way. My wife and I and one child had a household income last year of $24,000 before taxes. This gets me "medically necessary" coverage through medicare which is only good for emergency services above a certain amount. (I believe this is $5000, but am not sure ). That's it. There are county/state programs and income based fee services, which I have tried in the past, but they are another story in itself. Right now CBD is something that a bunch of people are having great results with and I thought I would try it out since I don't need a prescription and the possible side effects are negligible. That's pretty much it... [info] None [info] 1549300829 [info] train
jamison1325 [info] Hands down good, consistent supervision with your supervisor.Being able to keep work at work and not bring it home with you.Boundaries with work and personal life.Therapy! It’s great to vent to someone who isn’t part of your family and friends circle.Taking time away/off from work.Not to take away from your post, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t take medication, but I’m able to manage my anxiety from going into overload especially in this field of work. I actually switched jobs over the summer because my anxiety at my old organization was spinning out of control without a present supervisor, stagnant conditions, low morale, and stress everywhere. Without consistent supervision and a supportive supervisor/director, I started to question my decision to become a social worker. Since my switch, I feel completely supported with weekly supervision and a wonderful supervisor! [info] LGSW, Treatment Foster Care [info] 1543193043 [info] test
esmejones [info] A lot of college makes more sense now. I'd have episodes of that frequently, but couldn't really describe it without sounding like I was losing my mind- which I thought I was. Later on as an adult, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks (plus some other stuff), and since I've been medicated, that derealization sense has not happened. It's nice to know all that ties together. I'd wondered why that had stopped (didn't mind, just noticed it had stopped). [info] None [info] 1545358309 [info] train
mountainsprouts [info] I'm so glad you did that for her!When I told my friends I was diagnosed with anxiety they all said they thought I already knew I had it. Kinda funny now that I think about it. [info] None [info] 1482640041 [info] train
anniemalplanet [info] Yep.  And to add, I think people who get anxiety diagnoses later in life struggle with that more.  My SIL was diagnosed last year and she's now "disabled" and pops benzos all day to supposedly deal with it, and just sleeps and neglects her kids.  Meanwhile, her brother and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since we were children and had to learn to actually manage our disorders in order to live productive lives.  It takes some time to learn how to manage and I feel like when it comes later, you're so set in habits that it's hard to want to learn how to manage the disorder. [info] Jenelle's old hair feathers [info] 1568997682 [info] train
mmmgluten [info] For me a critical part of getting to that detachment point was therapy and medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety (imagine that!) and started taking medication for it just as needed. I also secretly went to therapy. Therapy taught me what to recognize and medication during arguments kept me level enough to actually see what was happening instead of getting caught up in the whirlwind of bluster and manipulation. Once I had that objective view of what was being done to me the detachment came naturally.  [info] None [info] 1550831722 [info] valid
Fauxdite [info] Knitting. I'm not even a little bit kidding. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, probably related to the fact that I was laid up with a chronic illness at the time and feeling penned in. I took up knitting, which is a way for me to redirect my nervous energy. It calms me down so much. I carry a small project in my purse and if I'm starting to feel it escalating, I can knit just about anywhere. On the bus, in a waiting room, in a restaurant while sipping a coffee, it's great. I did some cognitive behavioural therapy as well, which has taught me to recognize my anxiety and head it off at the pass before it escalates to the point where I have a panic attack.  [info] None [info] 1446471870 [info] valid
Nasserahmed094 [info] Bro I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD and was prescribed with anti-depressants. They made feel like I'm 10 years back without any worries and nothing that I have slept one of the best sleep in almost 10 years (I'm 22 btw and this was 2 years ago). I think the main cause of all this is PMO but the anti-depressant and supplements stopped having effect after 2 weeks of taking them and I decided not to take anymore. Now I'm on day 83 of NoFap and the anxiety is killing me. Do you think I should see a doctor or wait for a few more months? [info] 35 days [info] 1467567520 [info] train
meerkatmeow [info] Any suggestions on how I can make myself feel more “bridal”? I’ve typed this out a few times and haven’t been able to make it flow, so I apologize if it doesn’t make sense. I went wedding dress shopping over the weekend and have felt very down since. I had to go alone, as I currently live in South Carolina and my family and friends are in Massachusetts. What I always thought would be a magical experience left me exhausted and feeling pathetic. I found myself angry and envious of the other brides who were having a great time with their loved ones. I realized after my 10th dress that I only felt like some ugly loser playing dress up and not like a bride. On Monday I told my coworkers that I had gone dress shopping, hoping maybe they’d be excited, but they didn’t respond too well. Granted, I work with all dudes and shouldn’t have expected much excitement, but it still hurt a bit. I’ve also heard through my best friend who’s helping plan my bachelorette party that most of our friends are less than enthusiastic about attending. They all have a million excuses and two of them straight up didn’t respond to the invite. We even changed the location from Napa Valley where I want to go, to somewhere closer to home in hopes they’ll attend. I’m still excited, but it’s frustrating that they have such little interest in celebrating with me. I’ve also found it difficult being so far from our families while wedding planning. We only hear their excitement through the phone and text, but not hearing in person makes it feel less genuine. Of course they’re all excited, the distance just mutes it. We are moving back home in March, which should help ease my worries, but it’s currently adding another layer of stress to wedding planning. We have to find an apartment, I have to find a job, and moving is just super stressful. This turned more into a rant than a question. I guess I would ask - how do you all make yourselves feel bridal? When did you start feeling it? Are my feelings normal? I should also add that I was diagnosed with anxiety in August. My doctor suggested two therapists to speak with, however they never returned my calls. I know I should see someone, but it may have to wait until the move. If you made it this far, thank you. I appreciate it more than you know. TLDR: I’m stressed and anxious looking for advice on how to relax and start feeling like a bride. [info] None [info] 1548258726 [info] train
princessblueberry [info] Borderlands 2 is helping my anxiety! I’ve never really been one to get into games but when I got into a new relationship with yet another gamer, I knew I couldn’t go back to my old ways like I was with my ex. I took him away from his games and never attempted to try them myself, a massive mistake that I regret and I didn’t want to make again so, when my boyfriend asked if I wanted to try Borderlands 2 with him, I gave it a go. I should note that I’ve never really played Xbox before, so this was a first. I was diagnosed with anxiety 8 years ago and within the last 2 years I’ve been on a massive decline with it and the beginning to this game I was very rocky. Enemies jumping out and having no concept of how to work the controller or play in a first person shooter view shook me, sometimes even gave me small anxiety attacks, to which I had to stop playing to calm down, this went on for a while but 4 weeks later, I find that it’s helping me deal with last minute changes and just general small things in my life as well as helping me be less shit in the game! I got my tax return and the first thing I did was preorder Borderlands 3: Super Deluxe Edition for my boyfriend. Any other games, totally unrelated to Borderlands, that anyone thinks I should try? Again - I’ve never been big on games, but with Borderlands I still can’t play it alone. Looking for suggestions on games I can play some while my boyfriend is at work and I’m recovering a spinal injury! Thanks!** EDIT ** I just really really wanna thank everyone for being so nice! Not that I expected everyone to attack me, but the anxiety of being called names for knowing absolutely nothing about games did cross my mind but everyone’s comments so far have made me feel so welcomed into the world of gaming so thank you! [info] None [info] 1563141293 [info] train
hiding-identity [info] That's how my parents learned of my anxiety. Every few nights I would come out of my room and sit with my dad and watch tv and explain I'm afraid of him or someone else dying. It happened for a few years (with a few different worries) and then anxiety attacks started and soon I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1513950813 [info] test
MoiraVonTeese [info] Does this make me mentally unstable/ill? First of all, I'm pretty sure it does. I guess it's just kinda hard to admit it to myself, so, here's my question.I'm almost 16 years old. A week ago, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and anger issues.I didn't get any medication because my clinical psychologist said that she thinks it's not that bad, and I'm young so it would be bad for me to start with it so early (I do believe her, at least for the first part because I know people who have much more severe anxiety than me).I've been through a lot in my life. Don't come at me with "you're only 16 what do you know about life". You don't know stuff that happened so please consider that.I'd just like to know, does having these two diagnoses make me mentally ill? Unstable? Thanks [info] None [info] 1538683323 [info] train
The_wiZZard69 [info] Horrible with money is it possible to be financially sound. Here is a list of my income and expenses. I know this is stuff that I should be able to figure out myself but I am horrible at it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety that stems from finances. I can't go a day with out worrying about money I am coming here to hope some one or people can help me create a plan. My base pay without overtime comes out to 1550 bi weekly so about 3100 a month. I live with a child and fiancée and we rely only on my own income. Here is the list of our expenses. -rent 1250 a month (as of aug 1 it will be dropped to 1100. - truck payment is 316 bi weekly 632 a month -insurance is 125 a month -phone is 150$ a month if we stay in the plan and no overages. -internet cable is 150$ - utilities are 75$ a month.  That is the hard numbers. The rest goes to gas groceries and other spending. - I have a credit card that is at 7000$ My problem is I never pay bills on time I always am 2 months behind on phone bills and can never pay on time. I'm basically living pay to pay. I find we eat out a lot and have been slowing down on that. I never miss car or insurance payments. We do have our wedding coming up in two weeks and be able to pay off the credit card at the least and be able to start saving. - I am able to work overtime and possibly get 1 a week at 300$ per overtime but I cannot rely on that. So safe to say I can almost guarantee 2 a month. My goal is to build a 5000$ nest egg by next year alone and any extra if my fiancé is able to find a job. Is this possible how can I attain it? Thank you. [info] None [info] 1499039229 [info] test
IndividualSchedule [info] Good point. I wish people would recognize it more and don’t potentially and maybe unintentionally normalize social anxiety. Me being introvert, I was diagnosed with anxiety and symptoms of social phobia years ago (along some other mental illnesses).Now I really struggle to recognize if it’s me being introverted or me being symptomatic. And it’s so hard to live like this. Sometimes I know when it’s symptoms of social anxiety and when it’s being introverted.And I really wish more people with potential social anxiety would rather seek help than just say “oh I’m introvert, I’d rather stay alone.” it just deepens the social anxiety. In both cases it’s important to get out of our comfort zone, get nice doze of social interaction and then recharge and do it again. Of course social interactions with rather positive energy. [info] None [info] 1554677110 [info] train
blueberry_deuce [info] OP basically said that because of reddit she has come to fear and distrust all men, even going so far as to question as to whether her male friends are REALLY her friends and assuming that her mistreatment by her male boss is a "normal" thing and something she would experience everywhere she goes. I was just explaining that reddit demographics definitely don't reflect real world demographics and that she shouldn't be fearful of men.Of course you aren't the intended target of this post. Your positive voice is valuable and helps turn the tide of negativity. I hope it didn't sound like I was bashing those with social anxiety - I am diagnosed with anxiety myself, so that would be rather silly. Sorry if any of my word choices came off that way. :( [info] None [info] 1427051157 [info] valid
pkafan4lyfe [info] Does anyone have any experience with getting prescriptions via tele-health visits? As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and as I grew up I was able to find ways to cope and manage it all on my own. However, with this global pandemic going on I am starting to relapse it seems in terms of my anxiety. It’s getting to the point where the worry of what is going to happen to my loved ones consumes my mind for entire days. At this point I feel like it’s time to talk to my doctor about some sort of temporary treatment but my primary physicians office is shut down for non essential appointments until further notice? What are my next steps here? [info] None [info] 1586800408 [info] train
ilovjedi [info] I’m a 32 year old woman with a 10 year old son we both officially have ADHD. We’re going to get my son started on meds this year. I worry about him taking them because he seems so little but the impact of his hyperactivity at school is noticeable and it makes it hard for him to learn.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD both were diagnosed as an adult. Anxiety symptoms and ADHD symptoms can overlap so maybe it would make sense to talk to your daughters doctor about maybe treating her anxiety and seeing if that makes her school problems a little better too. You can also have both. And, would she benefit from talking with a counselor about the anxiety? They have play therapy for younger kids. Also, at school if you’re in the US have you asked for an IEP?I was taking 15 MG of XR Adderall before I became pregnant. I went down from 20 MG because it was too much and kept me from sleeping. [info] None [info] 1545626850 [info] train
allergic-to-life [info] From my grandfather "you know when I was diagnosed with anxiety at your age (17), I worked everyday that summer until I have enough to not be anxious." [info] None [info] 1566357650 [info] train
iMickeyx [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Social situations are a hard issue for me and any small flaw about myself makes me thing really down on myself. I studder and shake in conversation, as soon as I'm alone I'll start hating on my flaws which doesn't help. Being able to keep away from social situations helps me.  [info] None [info] 1484790743 [info] test
Rambo_One2 [info] A few years back I had a girlfriend, whom I ended up living with. Up till that point everything was fine, but when we moved in together everything went south within a few months. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and so I was not very happy at the time. As the manipulative jerk she was, she would try to pin it as my fault, saying stuff like "You've gone to bigger events, you can go to this one" and "well if you don't come, you're clearly not man enough for me."So I put myself through emotional torture, and whilst we were out somewhere (at a club or party), she'd leave me nervous and sweating in a corner, whilst she would go have fun (usually involving either talking to or dancing with other males.)Once she started getting the scent of my resentment of her, she started manipulating me even more, saying that she was the only reason I'd ever go out, and that she was too good for me, that I'd never find another one as understanding as her. I was terrified, since this was my first real girlfriend, and we'd been together for almost two years. What if she was right? Anyways, I started seeing a therapist, who told me that even though she had never physically assaulted me, she'd still consider this a very abusive relationship. So even though it was the one thing I feared the most (even despite my anxiety), I broke up with her and moved back in with my parents. I think she saw it coming, cause she took it pretty okay. Now I have the most understanding girlfriend I could ask for: she doesn't drag me along to events, and if we go, she doesn't just leave me, we keep each other company when the other person needs it, and we even live together (despite my obvious fear of moving in with yet another woman.) [info] None [info] 1502350847 [info] valid
RazorXXtreme [info] What do I do if I want to see a therapist but cant afford it? Also, what do I do if I "know" I have certain things based off the symptoms but havent gotten diagnosed? As of right now, I was diagnosed with anxiety and stress from my doctor, but I've realized that I've had all the symptoms of really bad OCD my whole life and I just brushed it off as anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1511135781 [info] test
RxWest [info] Can anxiety lower your IQ? Or does it just lower your test-taking abilities? Throughout my childhood, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and anxiety induced panic attacks. Heavily depressed, I was always in and out of psychologists’ offices. One day, when I was about 16, they had me take an IQ test. I scored a 108. I pretty much averaged a C grade average throughout school, except for math. In mathematics, I always had an F-D grade average.Anyways, I have been free of panic attacks for almost half a year now. I went back to my neuro-psych’s office and retook the test. I scored a 130. Note, this was not the exact same test, but it was of similar variety. Ever since my anxiety has gone away, I’ve been able to grasp concepts much easier than before.  I’m in 3x accelerated calc courses, and even have a 3.7 gpa majoring in Computer Science...I know that your IQ score can’t really increase. So, I’m puzzled as to why the big jump occurred.TL;DRHad anxiety. Scored low on IQ test. No more anxiety, excelling in school, and now scored a 130 IQ. [info] None [info] 1561089117 [info] train
istayzooted [info] So 200 UG is a good dose for next you guys think ? Gonna wait a while obviously.. I like this headspace it's chill.. and I'm diagnosed with anxiety haha if that's saying something  [info] None [info] 1521511999 [info] train
astarr14 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety once but I don’t think that’s it.  I think I got panic attacks because I was too tired to handle stress. Maybe I should pursue that more though.  [info] None [info] 1553798824 [info] train
dio_joestar77 [info] I feel like I'm going to die Ok, I don't know how to explain it. Recently, I'm feeling different.  Suddenly I don't feel nervous about the future at all, I don't struggle thinking about life and have calmed down a lot. But now I feel like I'm going to die soon for some reason. I'm really scared of going to sleep because I think I might not come back. I feel like I'm in a nightmare. I think I am going insane, and I can tell this will get worse. I'm feeling spaced out, like my head is empty. I'm posting in this subreddit because I was diagnosed with anxiety,  I take meds and all. But I really don't know what's happening. I'm scared. Please help. [info] None [info] 1514695963 [info] train
mwtruro [info] That's your fight or flight response kicking in without a trigger. I have generalized anxiety and a panic disorder. The slow-mo is from the panic disorder when my fight or flight goes off without a trigger. It's happened to me doing laundry, walking in to a room, all kinds of mundane stuff that does not justify the response. The first time it happened, I was 10 and it was accompanied by some auditory hallucinations (an overwhelming buzzing noise). I didn't know it was anything not normal and always just thought it was something cool my brain could do. Wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that we figured out what that was too. [info] None [info] 1566045075 [info] train
faithful_infidel [info] &gt;How hard is it to pick the right answers here?I mean, for a person on the autism spectrum, it could actually be quite difficult as they often struggle with how others percieve social situations and emotions.  I'm not autistic but, I do sometimes struggle with social reasoning.  And I don't  know the right answer to "Do you get angry at people you care about?"The first answer that comes to mind is yes.  Because literally everyone does. So answering no would indicate a dishonest person.  Overthinking it?  Probably.  But I am diagnosed with anxiety which is basically overthinking these things... [info] None [info] 1572125670 [info] train
bethestorm13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and depressive tendencies. Everything just feels really frustrating at the moment. [info] None [info] 1570281093 [info] train
Mattrockj [info] Really neither are any good for me, I was diagnosed with anxiety recently after I had a meltdown in class [info] 16 [info] 1558291911
sissyanxiityy [info] Weird cause I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a kid I just dont see how that could create this and how anxiety could potentially change ur sexual orientation [info] None [info] 1533159021 [info] valid
IsolaOw [info] For me it was when I was diagnosed with anxiety, nothings been the same since and I don’t know if it ever will be again. I hope though, but for anyone who’s just been diagnosed or in the early years, trust me, it does get better &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1549625315 [info] train
djunknownjunkie [info] Please help me . Ok so let's just get this out of the way I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I feel it's interfering with my musical making abilities. I can never seem to be able to be able to finish anything or i get frustrated with the smallest of things . Like today for example i found a nice vocal sample That i wanted to use and warped it on ableton . It sounded in time with the metronome but i felt it just didn't sound right and i even checked it on other programs like the Fl Studio demo or mixed in key  .It made me feel disheartend and just close ableton and stop trying to fix it  . I don't know, i even  try to force my self but i can't  do anything with my music , I set deadlines i don't reach them, I take breaks it dosn't work .  Making music is the only thing that makes me happy in my life and it kills me knowing i can't try to finish anything or do little things like warping samples or whatever . [info]  [info] 1447981108
alpacameat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. For a long while, even after been diagnosed with epilepsy I thought I only had anxiety and panic attacks. Funny thing is that I eventually developed an anxiety disorder cause by my epilepsy. [info] Vimpat 200 [info] 1566440086 [info] train
Shelbstill [info] I wouldn't try to self diagnose yourself. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year. There's a lot more that goes into it than just being afraid of the dark, for me.  [info] None [info] 1446640669 [info] train
tapstar2012 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Your doctor may try doing an anxiety med that’s everyday that helps with general anxiety and then maybe something for panic attacks, obviously everyone is different but I take Prozac (anti-anxiety/anti-depressant) and adderall daily in the morning and then if I have a panic attack or am doing something that I know will trigger one I’m prescribed Xanax as needed. The daily pill really helped with my overall day to day anxiety but I know people are different :) I hope your doctor can help you!!Edit: 1 25 mg adderall ER, 30mg Prozac, 10mg adderall IR if I have long days and then 0.25mg of Xanax for panic [info] None [info] 1572628102 [info] train
kaarrii [info] I'm more open with my mum now I've moved out, we get on 100% better. We've bonded more recently as I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago so I talk to her about it as she has the same.. kinda makes me think sometimes mental illness can be genetic. I see her every Friday after work for a few hours and we chat about everything really. I try to talk to my dad but he's quite self-absorbed and doesn't listen.. so I just talk to him about vapid stuff like games/tv/films etc. [info] None [info] 1571238493 [info] train
Pinklotus22 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and a panic disorder. I pass out when in extreme emotional/physical pain. I thought this as well. I really related to Kendra in this episode.  [info] None [info] 1531093973 [info] train
xerces717 [info] Fuck, that last line got me. I was diagnosed with anxiety 13 years ago. It's tough. You're not alone, there's other anxious wrecks out there like us. I hope you find peace and live well, friend.  [info] None [info] 1538174297 [info] valid
AnArgumentativeBox [info] Nice choice!Out of curiosity is one of those meds clonidine? I was diagnosed with anxiety/high stress and high blood pressure this past year and now mine has me on a couple of things. Im 36 and feel the same way but on the other hand, I do prefer feeling calmer...  That being said, were you a pretty calm person prior to having the surgery and diagnosis? [info] Verified Cardboard Box® [info] 1569842097 [info] valid
ouiserboudreauxxx [info] I hear you completely. I've been in therapy for awhile and realized how messed up my childhood was through that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on anti-depressants, and they just made me apathetic. I was on them in college for about a year as well and that was my absolute worst year academically. I got a new therapist last year and she is the one who finally suggested ADHD and then referred me to a new doctor.I agree with you that I too think my problems are greater than just ADHD(even though honestly I don't think anyone really understands 'adhd' very well) but for me the ADHD meds help me so much that I don't really care what label they want to put on it. Definitely don't give up on yourself! You're more proactive than I was back then. Aside from being on meds in college for a bit, I didn't pursue therapy or other treatment until I was 29. [info] None [info] 1564796243 [info] train
eisenkatze [info] Is this a panic attack? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and other stuff for ages but never experienced something like this. My grandmother died a month ago today, I watched her die which didn't seem to faze me. During the funeral, I kept feeling sick and nauseous, and in the viewing hall, suddenly started breathing very heavily and felt I was going to faint, my entire body went numb. I was ill for a long while afterwards, thinking it was pneumonia as I was short of breath and my heart wouldn't stop beating fast for days, but turned out to be psychosomatic after running some tests.Today I visited her grave for the first time since the funeral. Again, I couldn't help but start hyperventilating and stumbled down onto a bench, completely numb and nauseous. It felt like I didn't have any air at all. When my mom came to join me, I could function as normal, however.When I told a psychiatrist about the first instance, he said this was an "incomplete" panic attack. What makes it incomplete and what is a "normal" panic attack like? I've read up about them extensively for years but never had one, so no idea what it feels like. Is this a normal psychosomatic response to repressed emotions? I really don't want to visit her grave again, or go to the church service in her memory, in case this happens again. [info] None [info] 1447181653 [info] valid
FrequentEphedrine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2002, and mindfulness wasn’t a “thing yet”. Cognitive therapy is talk therapy that uses a ton of mindfulness techniques -  the anchoring method, Tibetan singing bowls, etc. Back then, I was told to just think of a phrase or a song that I could repeat to myself; my husband knows when I’m starting to freak out because I don’t even notice when I start humming it now. [info] None [info] 1562544805 [info] test
brokedollarsign [info] I'm not okay :( So some background:I'm Canadian and I'm about to graduate from a college ( american refer to as community college) and once this is done I'm moving away for university elsewhere. Well because of Covid, idk if in school will be a thing and i'm super anxious that i'll be in my room isolated for a year. I was diagnosed with anxiety about three years ago.However, I also don't want to sit around at my parents home for a year because my dad isn't the best person and he makes my anxiety worse.So, I plan to move and just have a room near campus and focus (as much as possible) on school. But rverything about my future and Covid scares me. I want to make friends but if campus is closed I don't see how i'll do that. But I also do not want to put off continuing my studies because I'm already going to be spending an additional 3 years ( i can make it two if i fast track) at University on top of the three at collegeHaving anxiety plus the uncertainty of Covid sucks :( [info] None [info] 1587084912
RenderingTheVoid [info] How would you convince someone with hypochondriasis that Keto is safe? Ever since I've been diagnosed with anxiety I worry about everything health related. I really want to lose weight but I have read there might be some health effects associated with this diet. Could anyone reassure me that there are no detrimental health effects? [info] None [info] 1428715684 [info] test
AntiSpedicey [info] My first panic attack (Mild trigger warning: if you are triggered by reading the experience of others please stop here)Today I had my first panic attack. I was diagnosed with anxiety over a year ago now and although I’ve had my fair share of anxiety attacks that have lasted an hour or so (even days in some cases) I’ve never experienced a full-on-struggling-to-breathe panic attack. Never have I felt such a lack of control over my own body. My breaths were short, frequent, and shallow. My air intake was at a minimum and the fast inhaling made me extremely light-headed. I was crying at the same time which made breathing even more difficult and there was a overwhelming silence in my ears accompanied by a strange white noise that seemed to hover in it. I expected my heart to be beating out of my chest. But it wasn’t. I could barely feel or hear it under my breathing but the beats were slow and irregular, some far apart and others closer together. It was as though it had given up; it was too exhausted to beat anymore. I tried my best to hold my breath to slow the rate of my breathing and eventually it faded back to its natural rhythm. But it wasn’t over yet. Every part of me was numb. It felt like there was a weight on my chest becoming heavier with each passing breath, daring me to hyperventilate again. I continued to breathe deeply until I had fully regained control of my own respiration but I was frozen. My body hadn’t moved since before the attack. I stared out of the windscreen at the blurry road in front of me but everything that passed by was just a shape; a blurry shape. No structure or form, just shapes. I couldn’t look around and I couldn’t move or speak. I was a in a state of paralysis inside my own mind. I couldn’t even think. Not a single thing went through my head. There was an odd tranquility to it. It took me a while to come out of this trancelike state. Once I did, my head hurt and my eyes were red and puffy from a hysterical crying.I new what it was like to panic, to be nervous or scared. But I have never felt so trapped inside myself. You can read about what panic attacks are like but until you truly experience one for yourself, you will never know how mentally exhausting and draining it is. [info]  [info] 1521917865 [info] train
A_Panda_ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it can be seen in my interactions. But so many people throw around the terms without knowing what is happening. [info] None [info] 1560048470 [info] train
Stat-Lord [info] AITA For snapping at my family over a joke A few days ago, I snapped at my mum and my sister. Not like, a small snide comment. I, for lack of a better term, erupted. It all started in 4th grade when I was diagnosed with anxiety, specifically, around the concept of death. I literally couldn't be in the dark because it would make me imagine how permanent death is and how immanent it is for everyone. Around this time my mum and sister had learned that a song they both really enjoyed, which was solely based around the inevitability of death, would send me into a meltdown. Looking back, it was actually causing me to have a panic attack. But my family kept playing it, because they KNEW it would upset me and they thought it was hilarious. They both knew I had anxiety but they didn't understand just how terrible it felt for me to be stuck in tears in the back of the car whilst they sung it out loud on purpose. Fast forward a couple of years and they both recall the song whilst cleaning through some old CD's in the garage. They bring the song up with me in a joking manner. Talking about how terrified I used to be of a little harmless song. I told them I didn't find it funny, that they knew I had anxiety. They scoffed and told me to toughen up. That's when I snapped, I flew off the handle and told them how much I still resent them both for putting me through that when I was just a child. It went back and forth for over an hour before mum called me some choice expletives and told me to fuck off. I'm writing this from my friends place and my family isn't letting me go home until I apologise, but I'll be damned before I apologise for anything that I said. [info] None [info] 1551523581 [info] train
atomickate [info] Just coming back from one of the worst migraines I've had in a long time... The only upside is that it didn't last *super* long. About 8 hours ago, I had to leave work early because I lost vision in my left eye. It was making me extremely nauseous. My fiance picked me up, and I came home, got sick, and took a dose of Maxalt (a triptan-seratonin agonist). This medication makes me feel really weird and I passed out for about 15 minutes. I wake up and begin getting sick again. I take a dose of excedrin as my doctor has told me I can do. I get sick again. I decide to get in the shower to relax and that helps a little. After two hours and no *real* progress, I take another dose of Maxalt. At this point, I'm hungry and very nauseous...so as I'm thinking about food, I'm also making myself feel even more sick. FINALLY after 4 hours, I pass out on the couch. After sleepng for another 4 hours, I feel almost perfect. I say almost because now its 2:30 am, I'm wide awake, and have nothing to do! (lol)The one thing I have taken away from the last 8 hours is that I now know that my body nearly hates that Maxalt. It obviously works (even a little), and that is good, but my body has not fought that hard against a medication in a long time. I could feel the medicine working - I felt very light and my legs felt really good, but my body almost felt heavy and very shakey. This has only ever happened when I've had to take laughing gas when my wisdom teeth were removed. Now, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm sure that it definitely has a part in this.Does anyone else have this issue - where your body fights against the helpful parts of your medicine? How do you tell your body to basically shut up and let the medicine work? [info] None [info] 1377325685 [info] train
oneeyedpete94 [info] My fiancé (F 23) doesn’t know if she wants us to be together or not despite loving me (M 23). Everything went downhill so fast. Yesterday she kissed someone else (M 21/2?) This is a little bit long, but I *really* need help.We’ve been together for almost 7 years, engaged for almost 3 years and are meant to be getting married in May.  Everything seemed okay, we weren’t behaving abnormally or anything - still talking, bickering, having sex, flirting, doing the cute little things that get overlooked.  Then a couple of weeks ago, we had an argument about nothing, and spent a good few hours jokingly arguing about breaking up.  The week after, she told me that she’s not been able to stop thinking about breaking up and needed some time, so I went to my family for the week to give it her.  I came back 2 days ago and she still has no idea, except now she won’t act like a couple with me.  We’re talking as normal, she’s saying I love you before she leaves for somewhere, but not cuddling, kissing and certainly so sign of sex so far.She doesn’t want to talk because she doesn’t know the answers. But I know one of the problems is us not doing things out of the house more. We do things, but the last few months we’ve mainly been inside, she had a fall out with her friends so it’s mainly just been me and her.  I know this is a problem, I was diagnosed with anxiety problems in 2013, and have “overcome” them pretty much now but they still effect me with new/bigger things so sometimes my old habits make me put off doing things.  I’ve told her I’d changed, gave her options of a place to start by going on holiday but she thinks it’s for the wrong reasons even though I’ve explicitly explained that I *want* to do these things, I want to experience life with her, just sometimes need a push.  I think she knows that, though, because she really gets my anxiety and me usually.She also said she thinks we’ve have no spark, although I disagree.  We make each other laugh a lot, when we’re flirting before sex it’s like we’re lighting a fire, and our conversation just clicks usually. Now I just feel like I’m on eggshells.There’s been a guy flirting with her since Christmas at work - like heavily flirting and she said he was just a flirty person and she likes attention so it didn’t bother me. However, then she said she liked him a little - crush level like -  but again, fine.  We’re human, liking/fancying people is natural.  However, the night I got home, he kissed her and she kissed back multiple times.  She refused sex with him and has said she doesn’t know what it means. I’m more bothered that she’s refusing to kiss or cuddle me. Albeit she was drunk that night.She also has no idea what to do with her life and she feels lost besides our relationship. I’m worried she’s doing all of this in the hope it’ll change life, when obviously our relationship doesn’t restrict that. But I don’t if she can see that.Finally, this is unlike her.  She’s not open with everyone, she’s very closed off with everyone but me.  But if I’ve ever been upset, she’s cared and comforted like you’d expect, however, I was talking about us and have cried, and I talked about my mental health issues and cried and she didn’t really flinch.  Normally, she’d be supportive.We’re graduating this year, we’ve got a wedding, we’ve both had big family issues in the past 2 months, she fell out with her friends and we’ve not done much. I feel like this is just a really bad rough patch merging from lots of little things.  We were happy 3 weeks ago, she said it wasn’t until that initial conversation she’d not even thought about it.  We were still buying wedding things, just before Christmas we were doing big organisation stuff - I don’t understand why doubts wouldn’t have rises then.  I’m lost on what to do because I think the only thing that will fix this is us behaving as normal (with extra effort and improvements) to show that’s we’re good and happy. But she said even if I offered her a 100% solution she doesn’t know if she’d take it.I’m not willing to just throw away 7 years over a kiss or anything. What do I do?  How do I approach this without pushing her further away?*edit* - If it wasn’t for the kiss , would you view it any differently?*edit #2* - The guy means more than she initially said.  We’ve solved every problem except for him. I’ve told her that she’s gotta have to get over one of us, and even if she hated my guts and didn’t love me, getting over 7 years is going to be harder than getting over 2 months [info] None [info] 1517306199 [info] valid
I_Am_Echo [info] Too Afraid To Talk To Friends. How Have Y'all Handled This? Hello everyone, quick about me, I guess. I was diagnosed with anxiety about two years ago and am on medication and working with a therapist. I have made lots of progress! But there are still some issues that I can't overcome just yet. For example, I have been living with my roommates for about two years now. We are all pretty close. And I am afraid of engaging with them socially one on one. I have had deep, meaningful conversations with them when we are in a group, but the idea of hanging out with them one on one scares the living hell out of me. My therapist and I are working on it. She has told me to try making myself more vulnerable and reminding myself that awkward won't kill me. So I've begun hanging out with them if they are playing video games to watch them and stuff like that. And it's slowly helping. But the main issue that I realized is affecting my life just happen ten minutes before I posted this. One of the people in our social group that see occasionally, not exactly a friend, but more than an acquaintance, just messaged me on social media making a playful and friendly joke about something I had just posted. I fucking froze at work. I typed a funny banter reply.And immediately closed out of the social media. With thoughts like, "Oh god, what do I do?" "I'll say something to make him feel uncomfortable." "Oh god, why is he messaging me??" It was like I was being interrogated for murder and not a casual friend making a joke. This is not normal. I literally cannot talk to friends. I am too afraid to reopen social media to check the reply.How do other people handle this issue? I will bring it up with my therapist, but I just want to not feel alone in my weird issue. [info] None [info] 1547666035 [info] valid
kiosk68 [info] Yes!! The same exact thing happened to me. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I told my doctor all of my symptoms and he suggested “meditation” which was bullshit. I later found out after going to a psychiatrist that i did have anxiety and all of my head aches, sleepless nights, etc. were due to that. It’s best when you have one of these head aches to be in a dark room if you can. Try getting peppermint oil and rub that on your temples. Aleve personally works somewhat better for me. To help the physical symptoms, it really does help eating as healthy as you can and exercising. [info] None [info] 1560150647 [info] train
Business-Socks [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety, boy got them freshman gitters! Within a few days I was being rushed into surgery for an appendectomy.Cleared it right up. [info] None [info] 1403526252 [info] train
ForgeFinder [info] Do you experience this too? First time posting here. March of 2018 I was diagnosed with anxiety, and have been taking a prescribed medication, lorazepam (.5 mg) a day for the past few months. Months before I was officially diagnosed with anxiety, there was many internal family issues going on, which included my parents ultimate divorce. My major problem with my anxiety is the excessive sweating in my hands and feet (hyperhydrosis). First my hands would get extremely dry and inflamed, then when I would touch certain textures or objects my hands would become hypersensitive and eventually my hands would begin to sweat profusely. For awhile, over summer break, my hands had stopped sweating and all the other symptoms had just stopped. I stopped seeing my therapist, but am still on the medication to this day. So my question is: do any of y'all experience this as well, and what are your ways of dealing with it? [info] None [info] 1546753600 [info] valid
TheRosesAndGuns [info] I tell small white lies when I think it'll protect people I love. I told my mum the other day that I'd slept good (when I hadn't) because she's worried after I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on medication for it. Other than that, I make a huge effort to make sure I don't lie. [info] ♀ [info] 1396983219 [info] train
PhasmaUrbomach [info] Same. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and I'm almost 50. I only have two streaks of grey at the temples. At this rate, I will still have dark hair by 60. My dad also had dark hair until he was quite old. So I think it's a lot to do with genetics. If stress were the primary factor, I'm sure I'd have a head of greys. [info] None [info] 1564803004 [info] train
toxicskiamachy [info] I am so sorry for all of your struggles.  I was diagnosed with anxiety at 15 and Fibro at 25 and I’m a 27F so I’ve been living with it for about two years.  I agree with you that you would understand how your anxiety manifests and trust me that you know your body and it’s NOT in your head.  Do not let anybody insult you in that manner by making assumptions like they know your body better than you do.My fibro started after I developed mononucleosis for the second time.  I was diagnosed within 6 months of onset which is a huge relief but now am getting neurological symptoms so I’m kind of on the same boat as you with ruling out an additional condition that pops up acutely about once a month.  I know what I felt like before fibro and it’s not in our heads.  I even lost weight and it has nothing to do with weight or being in/out of shape.  I have to really watch my activity level and get about 12 hours of sleep a night.  I mostly push through pain to be able to work and go back to school.  The crashes are becoming less frequent this way but they still happen and I’ve ended up in bed too.  I’ve been in bed where I literally have to have a cup of soup brought to me that I can drink and where I have to physically crawl to the restroom.  Fibro can be managed and just know you aren’t alone.  Feel free to DM me if you want to talk.  [info] None [info] 1528653212 [info] train
the-silencing [info] Anxiety, MDMA and the elusive Afterglow Hello all!I just want to write this somewhere to a group of people i feel will understand. I went out on Saturday night to my favourite place in the world, its a little hub of creative people that like to party together, i've been about four times, and this was my 5th/6th time trying MD. A big room of loved up people giving hugs and just opening up about their lives, also of course having a good dance to some decent psytrance ;-)I went solo this time as my mates couldn't come and I was shitting myself with anxiety beforehand, wondering if i'd have a good time etc. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and also suffer from PTSD symptoms (but haven't pursued a diagnosis for that). This was scaring the bajeesus outta me, But I bit the bullet and did it anyway!Let me tell you it was 100% worth it. It forced me to be social and meet a whole load of new people. I tested my shit, weighed out the right dosage, and just went with it. I opened up about my life and things i've gone through with complete strangers which was so liberating to not feel shamed and afraid. I danced without caring what people thought. I was complimented on my aura and kindness. I felt accepted and loved by all. I spent half the night receiving and giving hugs and massages, which to me was a big deal as i'm still learning to be ok with people i don't know touching me.The main thing was, that i felt 100% safe. No anxiety. Just - nice, content. Safe.I woke up today after not sleeping all weekend and feel like i've done 100 therapy sessions in a row. The pit of anxiety i feel is constantly lurking in the pit of my stomach is just....gone. I feel so relaxed, de-stressed, and at peace. I cannot believe how incredible and rejuvenated this feels. I have been walking around the streets near my home today just content, without that rushing, impending sense of doom i seem to have had in my for as long as I remember. It's just gone. I never realised how wound up I felt. I haven't felt like this in YEARS. The afterglow is unreal.This wonderful drug, if respected, is really a true medicine. Peace and love to you all &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1516656207 [info] train
Bad_Wulph [info] TL;DR I have the symptoms, I'm your age, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. Every test came back well and I'm healthy. My symptoms are caused by a combination of scoliosis and anxiety. You're probably okay, but if you have any doubt, see a general practitioner.Hey man, I'm 22, male, 5'5", 120 lbs, white, with no known medical conditions. I have chest pains and dizziness very often. As I'm typing this, I feel discomfort in my chest and I'm a little dizzy. Take this with a grain of salt, as we may not be quite the same, but I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. I've have bloodwork, xrays, multiple EKGs, two ultrasounds, a stress test, a 24 hour monitor, and a 30 day monitor. This has spanned across two different cardiologists, my family doctor, and a couple of ER visits. Everything came back perfect. They even went as far to say that my heart seems relatively fit, the complete opposite of unhealthy. The diagnosis I got was sinus tachycardia, which is not a problem with the heart itself, but my brain is telling my heart to speed up and act funny. They attributed that to me being a hypochondriac, which is indicative of anxiety. And they were right, I'm fine, but suffer from panic attacks frequently. If your cardiologists say your heart is healthy, they are probably right. Heart disease is usually decades in the making, and without a preexisting heart condition, it's almost impossible for you to have enough arterial plaque to cause a heart attack at your age, even if you did abuse your body as a teen. And as someone else said, if this has been going on a while and you aren't dead, it's probably not heart related.One reason for my chest pain is I have scoliosis (which was shown during one of my xrays), and it causes tension in my ribs, which pushes and pulls against the connective tissues holding my ribs to my sternum. That's why I have left-side chest pain, and it often causes me severe anxiety. Scoliosis and anxiety work in tandem to keep me worried about my health. I think you should see a general practitioner at this point, as they can likely determine if your pain is cardiac or musculoskeletal, and refer you to any needed specialists from there.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544915129 [info] train
keylimeallatime [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and tourette's. My heart attack, admittedly, was diagnosed a few days after. I did not have a medical professional monitor my detox, so that is just my interpretation honestly. I had fever-like symptoms. [info] None [info] 1398995140 [info] valid
6irlsix [info] It's been almost 10 years since I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I work in a private cancer lab. I'm lucky because I have an independent position that requires me to speak with a limited number of people each day.  To be honest,  even when i'm having an anxious day,  work allows me to focus on something other than the things in my head. I love doing histology,  I love the relationships I've been able to cultivate.  However it solidifies my belief that just because you work with someone, doesn't mean you know them.  I don't socialize with my coworkers often so they know nothing about my anxiety. I try to work through my anxiety because I find my idle mind is a playground for negative thoughts. I would love to do sales but I have a feeling that my anxiety would cause a drop in company sales.  Of course thinking like that definitely indicates that I should stay away from sales. But I agree with the reddit user who said that they create a 'character'.   [info] None [info] 1529363346
commevastu [info] Yeah, you're right it's a shame that it's not compelling. I don't understand why mental health issues (I am diagnosed with anxiety) are not considered as serious as ADHD etc. what about the lower t14, Cornell-Vanderbilt with medians of 167? [info] None [info] 1510238036
Seeeab [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so whatever man. I put plenty of caveats and expanded in other posts to make clear I have no real advice. I also added caveats that there are many factors (including genetic and biologic).But fuck off lol. Anxiety can for sure be learned. If someone is raped as a child and it makes them anxious around certain dudes when they're an adult that's not a genetic issue. And sure enviornmental scenarios can trigger biologic changes too. So idk what you're doing except having upvote envy and trying to be the dude being a random sense of reason on a popular post Edit: happy cake day tho [info] None [info] 1498869495 [info] train
Redsebir [info] I wasn't diagnosed with PTSD. I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1443206009 [info] train
gxm95 [info] My arms feel heavy and "burning". Both my index fingers are stiff. Hello people, I'm new to this sub.I'm 21M and I've had psychological problems since I was a child. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and I've had all kinds of weird symptoms, such as depersonalization, brain fog, random pains/needles in my body, sleepiness, dizziness, short breathe, bad short term memory, lack of concentration, etc. But lately I started to feel something I never had before, it started about six months ago with a weird feeling in my hands, like if they don't belong to my body and I had to be constantly checking if I was still able to move them, they always moved, but I kept feeling like they would stop moving at any moment. A couple months ago the same feeling extended to my arms, now they feel heavy, and my muscles and skin seem to burn, and a couple weeks ago both my index fingers became stiff, they kinda snap when I move them.The thing is, according to these links: http://www.anxietycentre.com/anxiety/symptoms/muscle-weakness-anxiety.shtml http://www.anxietycentre.com/anxiety-symptoms/burning_skin_sensation.shtml http://www.calmclinic.com/anxiety/symptoms/finger they can all be caused by anxiety...but I'm really afraid I have some degenerative disease, I'm even planning a way to quickly kill myself if I find out I have it...have any of you had this symptoms? I want to go see a doctor but I've already gone to so many doctors, did so many exams fearing other things, I'm also not working right now,  so my parents have to pay for my appointments... it's terrible to feel all these things but having all exams come out fine. I just did a blood/urine/feces test and it was all normal...I don't even know what I expect from this post, I think just want to talk to people I can relate to... [info] None [info] 1479500026 [info] train
generalamitt [info] I think something may be wrong with my heart. I'm a 23 years old male, diagnosed with crohn's-colitis and ankylosing spondylitis.  I've been on Cimzia for about a year now which works great for my AS but does nothing for my colon inflammation.Roughly 10-7 days ago, I started feeling uncomfortable in my chest area. I am not sure how to describe it. It doesn't hurt, it feels almost like my heart is "missing beats" if that makes sense. I am restless and get the urge to move my legs. It is more noticeable during the evening hours. Yesterday I went for a run and had minor chest pain and nausea and had to stop short of my usual route.  I am feeling a bit nauseous right now actually,I never had any heart problems, and my family doesn't have any history of heart disease.  Could it be psychosomatic?  Side effect of Cimzia?   Getting tested right now would be a pain with how things are, should I wait a few more days or do you think I need to get checked today?&amp;#x200B;Edit: My ECG turned out normal. I was diagnosed with anxiety and was sent home. [info] None [info] 1585159413 [info] train
Mmjnewengland [info] I was the same way in school when I hit the 6th grade. Kids growing up, becoming clicky, and puberty was awkward af. I'd have morning panic attacks and have crying fits over going to school, but my mother made me go. Later on in life, around the age of 16 [I'm 32 now) I was diagnosed with anxiety and overactive anxiety disorder. In my later years (now looking back) I showed the signes very early, but my parents only though I was nervous all the time, turned out to be a major untreated mental illness. Could you possibly get a doctors appointment to talk with a doctor about this? Therapy and medication has helped me out so much. I just don't want someone to have to figure this out 16 years down the road.  I wish you the best of luck. Listen to music and maybe use some breathing exercises to clam yourself, it helps a little. [info] None [info] 1479790103 [info] valid
camohorse [info] Can I legally own a firearm in Colorado if I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder? [info] None [info] 1569666247 [info] train
PumpkinSpiceAngel [info] So sorry that you had to go through. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since High School, so this transition has not been the smoothest for me. I've mostly made peace with the fact that I don't know about a god, but I'm still worried about telling people. Best of luck during this time in your life. [info] Ex-Protestant [info] 1565616364 [info] train
dpefi [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and went through continuous treatment for two years, for that, before I finally found a therapist who asked about/saw my trauma. Being in therapy for anxiety was mildly helpful and gave me some helpful coping mechanisms, but it always felt like dealing with the surface-level of my problems. [info] None [info] 1543424507 [info] valid
pink_mango [info] Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I used to go to the dr quite often for issues. Back aches, stomach aches, random pains. I would get stomach pains every single night before sleep. Aside from an actual back issue I had, everything else came back normal. And typically as soon as I went to get it checked out, I would feel better. This sure made me feel sane...Then I had an anxiety attack due to a very stressful job (quit shortly after), and went to my dr. He gave me this form to fill out to evaluate my anxiety, and looked at it after like "you've been dealing with this and didn't tell me?". Well I didn't know what it was, it just slowly got worse and worse over time and it felt normal to me. I went on medication, and within a few weeks I was feeling SO MUCH better, both mentally and physically. No more random pains, no more stomach pains, sleeping was so much easier.  [info] None [info] 1495812202 [info] train
HarukaDxD [info] I got denied life insurance, what next? Im not sure if this is the right place to post this but ive seen similar things posted here. My fiance and I recently applied for life insurance since we just had our firstborn. The Insurance company denied me because i have been diagnosed with anxiety, which according to them make me mentally unstable and a suicide risk. I was diagnosed with anxiety when i was 13(currently 20, almost 21) and ive never been even close to suicide and there's no evidence to suggest I was or am. Im also on Medication for it and have only progressed out of my anxiety. As far as im aware all insurance company's have virtually the same requirements for life insurance so what do i do now? [info] None [info] 1552952095 [info] test
PetrichorPrints [info] Girls vs. Boys Memes Hi teenagers! I hope everyone's having a good day. I wanted to make a post about a certain type of meme that I've been seeing a lot, especially on this subreddit. I'd really like it if you read my post completely, but I'll put the three main points in a TL;DR at the end! So, I've been seeing lots of memes that are sort of stereotyping women, especially teenage girls. Before you comment, could you let me explain? These memes are painting teenage girls as overdramatic, boring, and vain. (I'm talking about like the 14 year old girl who listens to Billie Eilish and the Boys vs. Girls locker room memes) Also, even though I don't personally listen to Billie Eilish, it kind of sucks to see people attacked for liking things that resonate with them.Also, this isn't pardoning rude or "fake deep" girls. Trust me,I've met some real snakes. This is just asking you to reconsider your thoughts on boys and girls as a whole!I think that the point of those memes is to make the guys seem better than girls, but it doesn't really accomplish that. All it does is reinforce stereotypes (for guys and girls), and makes the poster seem insecure. Like, for example, a little boy refusing to wear pink because he doesn't want to look like a girl. That stereotype is awful! It demeans the very real emotional experiences that women and girls go through. I'm sure you dudes have faced the same thing, with the stereotype that all men are aggressive and emotionless. Both those stereotypes harm us, because they refuse to acknowledge the depth and variety of the experiences that everyone goes through! For example: I've been having problems with my mental health for a while, and I'm diagnosed with anxiety. It took me ages to get help, because I thought I was just being over-dramatic, and that girls don't have *true* mental health problems. So, I think you can get the point of what I'm trying to say. Anyways, this isn't an ask for you to stop posting that meme. It'd be like asking a river to change course. All I want is for you to be a little more conscious about stuff like this. Girls, we're *so much more* a set up. Boys, you are *so much more* than a punch line. TL;DR\-You shouldn't attack people for liking things that resonate with them, even if you don't feel it yourself. \-Stereotypes for men and women (Especially portrayed in the memes I mentioned) demean and oversimplify the real emotions we face, and the experiences we feel. \-Girls are more than a setup to an insecure meme. Boys are more than a shallow joke. Have a good day everyone! Make sure to drink water and eat a good breakfast this morning. [info] None [info] 1579538487 [info] valid
BelgianBoris [info] I started bodyweight fitness earlier this year. I was diagnosed with anxiety in November 2018, since then I've learnt loads about myself, through work on my body and on my mind. My anxiety would manifest itself as panic attacks about the smallest things (getting to work late, insignificant thoughts, anticipating distressing symptoms from another thing I have), at the worst of times I would straight be depressed and not wash or leave the house. At The best of times I always have constant worry. The only time I'm free from this monkey on my back is when I'm exercising. I play field hockey (currently 3-4 hours a week at least) and have done for about 20 years. Despite this I have always struggled with my weight and never been really happy with my flabby gut and noodle arms.I would obsess about finding the best ways to lose weight, forever pour over articles on what exercises to do in the gym, but I never actually took the plunge and used my meticulously crafted workout plans. why? fear of judgement, lack of confidence. Bare in mind the only sport thing I'm good at is hockey and I love it because I'm good at it, I've got a big ego but it's super fragile.Then I discover this sub. This incredible community, and one of the most rewarding physical things I have ever done.The first time I did the RR I was totally fucking hooked. The "crawl, walk, run" ethos is so satisfying and moving through the progressions is like crack. I love having control over how I can move my body; functional muscles, it feels primal. Some other person may have to prove their strength with a squat rack, but I'm in the outdoor gym doing shrimp squats, no equipment, usually alone, endorphins coursing.Everybody has noticed my weight loss, and how much bigger my arms and chest have become. I went from about 84kg last summer to 69kg a few months ago. Now I'm about 73kg, my hockey has improved massively, so has my control over my anxiety symptoms. I genuinely believe this is down to doing the RR 2-3 times a week, its so so rewarding (I can't stress this enough), and obviously eating better.This may get lost but I just wanted to take this opportunity to say thank you to everyone that has helped contribute to this sub from moderators to members answering questions in comment sections.Looking forward, I can't wait to find out what my body is capable of doing and how far I can push it. [info] None [info] 1558197706 [info] train
greenbeencasserole [info] I have a lot of the same tics that OP posted. I’m so relieved to see that someone else experiences the same ones, nose twitches, throat clearing, interesting breathing techniques... I also flex my stomach and *other* muscles... wish there was more insight into what all of this is.... I was diagnosed with anxiety but medication didn’t seem to help my tics and I feel like it made me complacent... like I didn’t care about anything. [info] None [info] 1532283959 [info] train
runny6play [info] Depressed and in stress Hi all, I'm 24 years old who still lives with their parents and failing out of collage again for the second time. I have ADHD and I thought where my problems lie (with executive control) but I found out this year I was diagnosed with anxiety as a child, as well, and treatment was never pursued. I don't have terrible social anxiety, and in the past it wasn't a huge issue for me high school,except maybe English,was fairly easy for me was but as soon as I get below a B in a class in collage all my grades tank and I just avoid my problems, when I attempt to deal with them i end up internally freaking out and very frustrated so then I avoid them more. I want to be a successful software developer someday, I am very anxious and depressed about where I am now. As I'm typing this I should be studying for a math class that if I pull it together and study for I could get a C but because I'm scared of getting kicked out because I'm on probation and failed a class. I've started smoking on and off as it greatly downplays an attack. It really sucks to have an executive function disorder on top of anxiety as I always had a problem of scope mentally. Not being able to focus on the big picture is a problem when you have pessimistic anxiety. [info] None [info] 1524848958 [info] train
JimmyDThing [info] I am in no way saying that you do not have these things.  But I have to say... these thigns are over-diagnosed by doctors who don't really have the authority on the subject to do this diagnosing.I've been "diagnosed" with things that are utter bullshit.  I was diagnosed with anxiety caused by slight OCD for a little while, and was given pills.  I didn't need them... those are just normal human feelings that you get once in a while and they went away with time.  I never took the pills, I am fine.  I really think that your general physician should be directing you to a specialist, not giving you pills that are for a specific disorder.  That could definitely be the way things went for you, but if the SAME doctor is diagnosing you with all of these problems, I'd go see a specialist to see what they have to say.EDIT: I accidentally a word and spelling/grammar. [info] None [info] 1314793021 [info] test
unknowncm [info] Thanks for the reply, a long time ago I was diagnosed with anxiety but since then I’ve learned how to cope with it and I wouldn’t say I’m an anxious person In fact I’m confident most of the time. Thanks for the advice and reply I will try what you’ve said. [info] None [info] 1573597294 [info] valid
2SP00KY4ME [info] Having constant gut-drop pangs like if you got a phone call and heard "There's been an accident".. physically painful, like getting stabbed. I hate it. Anyone else have this? I'm sorry if this has been asked before, I searched around a while but couldn't find anything that fit what I was talking about specifically.I get these pains / pangs randomly sometimes that are like the feeling when you find out something terrible happened. Like I said, picking up the phone and hearing a police officer say "There's been an accident", or when your girlfriend of years says "I'm leaving you". It's that sort of gut-drop horrible stabbing anxiety-pain, but it never has a good reason. I can just be surfing the internet or reading or whatever and it happens.For reference, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's been steadily getting worse the past few months / year. Does anyone else deal with this? Thanks.Edit: Also, does anyone know a good way to reduce the severity or frequency of them? [info] None [info] 1452200223 [info] valid
SinLives [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and agoraphobia but I gotta say I agree with you 100%. I can't take any anxiety medication like benzos cause I am on other meds they would interact with. So I don't have a fast acting pill I can pop to just make everything OK. There are plenty of breathing exercises and pre planning things you can do. If I'm nervous about something I have to NOT overthink it. That is the basis for a lot of people's problems. I just make up my mind if something has to be done then I'm gonna do it. I'm not gonna let a diagnosis hold me back or make me prisoner in my own home. And as far as the lady pushing cop she should be charged with assault. There are laws in place for a reason. Do you excuse people for rape because their feelings made them do it? I'm sure people won't like my opinion but people with anxiety need to actively take steps to work thru it. Medications can help, therapy can help, but ultimately it comes down to that person working on it not hiding behind it. I understand it's different for everyone but it can't be used as an excuse for everything.  [info] None [info] 1547059068 [info] train
Bluewall1 [info] First time smoking high CBD weed Hey Trees ! Little story :I have smoked weed like 20 times but it never felt right. I never felt really good after. I was more of a drinker.Few years later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and it all made sense. Weed was making my anxiety worst. I had to take Xanax for a few months and went to therapy for like a year. I felt better but anxiety never leave. Always in my mind. all the time. For everything.So what have I been doing ? Not much, learnt to deal with it and maybe drink a bit more or more often than I should.Recently weed with low THC (less than 1%) and high CBD was made legal in Switzerland.I've bought some Colorado Indoor with a 15% CBD in it.And let me tell you, I've never felt this good during this evening. Well I actually did, when I was taking Xanax. So I guess I'm part of the family now ? If someone is in the same situation, please try it. I feel like my life will improve.Blaze it! [info] None [info] 1490907725 [info] train
mahimahi86 [info] How I am beating anxiety daily Hi everyone, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and have had few panic attacks, mind racing, feeling like my heart will explode, terrified of flying, diseases, get nervous alot etc typical symptoms. I realized this at a point that I felt I could still change the course. I have few things that I do now every day and I am getting better every day.1. Try to be a better version of the yesterday you. This is actually really easy, doesn't feel too overwhelming and gives your mind a goal to focus on instead of dwelling in the negative feelings. This technique is suggested by Jordan Peterson and I suggest to listening his other thoughts about self-improvement also.2. Cut off activities that increase anxiety (gambling, video games, etc) and increase activities that decrease anxiety (reading, meditating, stretching, deep-breathing). When reading, start from easy books that dont feel overwhelming to finish. In the beginning your mind will be racing like hell but as you start to focus on the book, at least for me the anxiety started to go away.3. Eat healthy, exrecise and make sure you prepare yourself for a good night sleep. 1-2 hours before going to bed, stop using aby gadgets.4. Stop googling different diseases, scary scenarios etc. This is not something you cannot stop doing. You can stop it. Whenever you have this urge, breathe deep in your nose and hold the breath for awhile and then let it out, repeat this as many timea as you have to.5. You will need to develop alot of discipline because anxiety loves it when you lose your control, it's just waiting for that moment. Make it your enemy that you are going to beat by taking control of your life.I will never let anxiety control my life anymore, I am not taking any medication and I am getting better everyday. I know that  some of you are in very deep waters with this but hopefully someone found some help from this. [info] None [info] 1531775753 [info] test
MysteriousNomad [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but as they later found out, it was me knowing that i wasn’t going to get XYZ done which was giving me anxiety...gotta attack the issue at the root!! [info] None [info] 1570375584 [info] test
zitjohnson [info] Same. I drove myself to the ER when I was 20 because I felt palpitations and have a history of heart disease in my family. While 20 is super young, I had never felt that before and the worry only exacerbated the rapid heart rate. Turns out my ECG was fine for the most part, only one abnormal wave but the doctors said that happens to most people time to time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a professional and while I rarely talk about it, the times I feel like an attack is coming on, the people around me dismiss it as general paranoia/attention seeking. Tbh, before I experienced real panic and anxiety attacks I may have thought the same way, so I don't take it to heart, but I try to inform them it's not as simple as feeling nervous. I don't even need the person around me to do anything, simply a presence is enough to get me through. [info] None [info] 1534734849 [info] train
I_Cry_myself_to_die [info] Can you re-enlist with minor ADHD? I want to go to ROTC and eventually reserves after college. What I'm worrying about is that I have recently been tested for ADHD and I don't have the results back yet. If it comes back as a positive for it, would that prevent me from joining or would I need a waiver? For reference l, I'm prior military that was medically separated for scoliosis, but was told I can join again by my 1st SGT that all I would need is a waiver. I have been diagnosed with anxiety after service as well, but I haven't taken medication for it in a while. [info] None [info] 1565981711 [info] train
yacula [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety prior and handed the doctor a form typed by my therapist. There were people there who got diagnosed by the on site doc which made their visit with her just a tad longer. [info] None [info] 1573494692 [info] test
hdbaker009 [info] I seriously need help with my mental health. I feel my self declining with chronic worry and debilitating anxiety every other day. I can’t go on like this but I’m so broke and have awful health insurance. I was diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) a couple years ago. I was seeking counseling for it and benefited from it, when I had great insurance. Fast forward to now, husband got a new job and the insurance is shit. Utter shit. Not only that, but I called about three therapists in my area and none of them accepted my insurance. Each session is about $90 here and I simply cannot afford that. I would ask family for help, but we’ve already had to have help and am paying some family members back monthly, so I’m not doing that. I’m 26F but I worry chronically. It’s now become where I worry myself sick. Especially over health related issues, some that any normal person wouldn’t bat an eye at. I’m over sensitive to any “symptom” and not just in myself but my families, too. It’s not just occasionally that I worry, but about every other day. I’ll start to think about something, find one sign that it could be awful and I can’t for the love of Pete get my mind off of it. It’s affecting my mood, which effects my relationship with my family, and I’m afraid I’m going to lose control. I need help. I don’t know where to turn. I don’t like to burden friends with my problems and even if we was just talking about it lightly, that’s all I would ever talk about because there is always something weighing very heavy on my mind. [info] None [info] 1568686083 [info] valid
Clob [info] Well. Just remember your doc works for you. If you have symptoms then you should be treated if it makes sense. Find a doc that can work with you, understand your symptoms, and not just treat a number. Always go for injections. Don't do gel or implants. Injections should be done weekly or twice a week. Every 2 or 4 weeks and the doc is clueless.  If you're in Dallas , Texas I can recommend to you a good clinic that keeps up on the latest data on this stuff. Basically, gains were slow or none. Issues with keeping it up sometimes, though I could have sex. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and my TRT has helped with that tremendously. Sice I've been on it, Iv'e been happier, stronger, confident, and generally feeling and performing better in every aspect of life.I would average low 3's.  My low was in the mid 2's on a 250 to 1100 scale. My low is now a 750 on my worst test and about 1000 on my best. Free test is above 25. I feel like a beast. No other side efects.  [info] None [info] 1447384938 [info] train
deplorablewhitey [info] No, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and you just triggered it [info] None [info] 1563672572 [info] train
guppy89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD after having a particularly toxic person in my chain of command. [info] None [info] 1555102969 [info] train
twx37o [info] Thanks for posting OP, I had the same question.  This July will be exactly one year since I was diagnosed with anxiety so I’m hoping that’s all I need to get into the new program. Good luck to you, and I hope you feel better soon. [info] None [info] 1559750187 [info] train
the_gift_of_g2j [info] Nothing too crazy compared to some of the other responses, but how many times I've written something relating to my anxiety and fear of dating again.   I wrote about how I gave a girl my number and I was embarrassed and stressed for the day and a half it took for her to respond.  I'm still a bit nervous and anxiety is trying to make me think she's still not interested or I'm not good enough.  To my family and friends, they think that even though I'm diagnosed with anxiety, I am very composed and happy.   [info] None [info] 1504552638 [info] train
Lizardkitty2 [info] [tenant - CA] Can I complain about a loud child? Edit: for clarification, the child is now about 2 years old My husband and I have been in out apartment for about 2.5 years now. Our landlord has hardly raised our rent citing that we are model tenants. When we moved in, it was mentioned that there was a pregnant woman in the small complex. I didn't realize it was above and one apartment over. She gave birth about 4 months after we moved in. The child is extremely loud and it has gotten progressively worse as it's gotten older: screaming, crying, and probably what bothers me most, running around so much/hard that my walls  shake. I've taken down my artwork thinking that would help but it hasn't. I work a stressful job and coming home to a screaming kid is starting to really get to me that I'm considering breaking my lease to move to get away from it (and to be able to get a cat to help with my stress/anxiety and she has told me pets are not allowed even after I said I could get a doctors note since I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder). Most people that visit me comment on it. If it was a dog I would be able to complain, but since it's a kid am I just out of luck? If I can complain - any suggestions on how to do it? There is one slight complication though I got a noise complaint for music on a Monday afternoon a month or so back (it was my house cleaners and I have resolved that issue by firing them) and I'm pretty sure it came from her so I'm worried it's going to look like I'm retaliating. [info] None [info] 1534238632 [info] valid
cy3n [info] Don't do that It will literally cripple you internally Like what my physics teacher has said "any questions isn't stupid" don't fear the "embarrassment of not knowing" Honestly take heart and just ask At the end of the day you will be the one on the top I relate to cou,as in the fact I calculated all of my actions:tried my hardest at PE (2nd in class),Joined Guitar ensemble without any knowledge of it in J2,Tried my hardest to excel in my subjects for CT :ABD/ES But inside I was broken(had family issues,mental breaking inside to the present where I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder) I tired my hardest to hide my imperfect life by being another person. Please live yourself [info] JC [info] 1573917373 [info] train
allofthebeards [info] I should add that I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and have taken anxiety medication in the past but have been very successful with my therapy and meditation this past year, and I'm happy not to be on the drugs while pregnant :) the drug I was on is not safe for babies  [info] Aug 22 [info] 1455050862 [info] train
Tam3DK1LL3R [info] My parents noticed I was caring different a couple months ago and I went to a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and I really felt like lying on some of the tests lol. [info] None [info] 1561870436 [info] valid
YourBoinLoins [info] Yeah it started as getting turnt once in a while, then I started selling, then it turned into self medicating because I was diagnosed with anxiety but the Lexapro they put me on didn't help at all. Now I stopped selling and just mostly self medicate but I still get pretty fucked up off them once in a while. It's a slippery slope but I think I'm ok for the most part right now. It hasn't effected my job or education so far.Edit: I just realized typing out a paragraph trynna explain and rationalize my use is kinda fiendish... [info] None [info] 1463545599 [info] train
alpaponycat [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I read Susan Jeffers "Feel the fear and do it anyway". I wouldn't say it was life-changing or that it solved all my problems but it was a good starting point [info] None [info] 1568184156
microwavedcatfood [info] My family insults me because of a mental illness. Okay, so some backstory. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2012~2013 and I am absolutely terrified of getting sick. I stopped taking meds a while ago because I was doing better, but that’s not really the point. Anyways, so today my dad was baking some pizza from Papa Murphys. I was sitting at the kitchen table on my phone just messing around, and when it was ready, he poked it with his finger. Yes, that may have seemed insignificant, but to me he just spread millions of germs onto something I was about to eat.Because of that, I chose not to eat the pizza. I don’t want to get sick. I already refused eating it, and decided to just not eat anything so I just sat at the kitchen table still drinking my soda. My dad asked me several times if I wanted any, and of course I said no.What really made was what my uncle was saying. He was talking about how “I’m such a baby, it’s not that big of a deal, it’s all my fault...” and on and on. My dad was agreeing with him, and it sucked. I wasn’t choosing to eat it because I was being picky or stuck-up, but because I don’t want to get sick. I didn’t say anything though, because I knew I would just start crying. What was worse was that when I got up to get some more soda was that my six year old sister told me that I can’t drink it because ‘daddy touched it’, before running away giggling. Needless to say, I left shortly after.Similar things have been happening like that. The day before, I was eating a granola bar when my mom came and hugged me. Her sleeve touched my granola bar, so naturally I didn’t want to eat it. I offered it to her, and when she asked why, I explained. She then got angry at me because apparently I thought she was ‘dirty’, which wasn’t what I meant at all. She didn’t accept my apology.The day before, we had a pizza party for our choir. We could each get two slices, but when I tried to grab one with a napkin (I couldn’t watch my hands beforehand) it broke and I ended up touching it. I didn’t say anything and just tried to grab the second one, so I could only eat that one, but my finger slipped. My friend from behind me said, “What, MicrowavedCatFood, are you like a germaphobe or something?” When I put down my pizza saying I didn’t want it anymore. I don’t think she meant for it to be mean, but it just sucked. My eyes started selling up with tears and I went to leave the room when one of my friends stopped me and asked me what was wrong. I started crying and choked out, “I’m gonna get sick [friend], I’m gonna get sick.” She seemed confused so just hugged me and told me I’d be fine before leaving.I have more stories but I don’t want this to be so long. I’m so angry with my uncle and parents for acting like I’m faking it, or can control it or something. I don’t know how to explain that I can’t control it, and now it’s affecting me social life. Sorry for the rant, but I don’t have anyone to talk too.Tl:dr I am terrified of getting sick and my parents and siblings degrade me because of it, and it’s affecting my social life [info] None [info] 1557026534 [info] train
NateGrey [info] &gt;  I have been diagnosed with anxietyAlways love this gem.  [info] None [info] 1501701424 [info] train
Texan1786 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am medicated for it.  I haven't taken my medication in several days tho.  Could that be it? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1478653823 [info] train
Happypumkin [info] yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on the road to recovery atm but I'm doing a lot better thanks! [info] Louie [info] 1483470157 [info] train
ieffinghatemayo [info] Wish that when I was diagnosed with anxiety they would have understood it better. Not coddled me per-say, but maybe understand how  scared I always was and maybe been more compassionate. [info] None [info] 1562995191 [info] train
carrotocn [info] Unable to sleep again. Hey guys. First time in this sub. Thought i may try typing some of my thoughts as i lay here as a possible avenue of alleviating some of my stress.It is currently 2:18 AM. I begin my work week at 7:00 AM. This is a familiar situation for me, to be lying awake in bed, trying not to make noise or be too restless as to not wake my girlfriend next to me. The stress of work never allows me to relax. It makes me stay awake even when im tired, avoid eating when im hungry, and at least once a month ends with me having an awful breakdown.I was diagnosed with anxiety in November of last year, though it has been an issue dating back to my childhood. Since that time i have been taking medication, now at my maximum allowed dosage. When i started, the medication felt like it was having a positive effect. I could go out in large crowds and not feel as if everyone was staring daggers at me, i could relax on days off. Now, i dont have a moment to breathe. I constantly feel as if im about to burst.My employer is aware of my issues, but obviously missing frequent time for my severe anxiety isnt something they can just deal with. The possibility of losing my job or upsetting my employers only puts more weight on my shoulders. I dont know how in the hell im going to pull myself out of bed and get dressed for work in a few short hours.Any advice reddit? Anything you do to relax when things get this bad? What do I do when im at work and start to get crushed by anxiety?I apologize for being so all over the place. Posting while having a minor panic attack is never a good idea. [info] None [info] 1433143668 [info] train
veggie-berger [info] Struggling with symptoms, any advice? TW: medical anxiety&amp;#x200B;20/FHello! So, I have been suffering over the last three days with shortness of breath. I have been diagnosed with anxiety about 5 years ago but never followed up with much treatment(the therapist I saw was way too expensive for my family to afford, much less the psychiatrist who was going to prescribe meds). Now, I do not FEEL anxious right now.. besides worrying about why I am short of breath..but overall I do not feel anxious. Though, I have had a lot going on in my personal life as well as starting school again. I called the doctor and the nurse told me it sounds like anxiety.. but I do not feel anxious at all! So, I guess my question is: do I have to feel anxious to be having anxiety symptoms? If so, then any tips to help me cope with this before my appointment with my doctor on Monday?  Thanks [info] None [info] 1578619643 [info] test
SympatheticStranger [info] Tunnel vision. Yes, I agree with that. That is an apt description. Narcissism is general looked at as a bad word, it's a bad thing, a wrong thing. I hate that. She loves people, she cares for people, she has a compassionate heart. It's all there, and her narcissism isn't bad or wrong or immoral, It just doesn't show because of that tunnel vision. Worse... *sigh* I know... and I'm scared I'm not going to be good enough for her (insert personal anxiety issues). I hope she knows that she can always trust me, and I hope that I can hide the pain she might cause me and only see that I will love her always and that even if it hurts in the moment, I  understand and it's ok. Life is fucked up for everyone, I think, mental illness or not. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD (long story), so I understand mental illness, but I struggle to understand illogical behavior. Call me spock, I can't grasp not wrapping my mind around logic and holding on for life, but I'm trying to accept it and work with it. I've accepted it as far as it's uncontrollable and there is a chemical misfire in the brain that blocks logic, but I can't feel it, so I can't understand the feeling of accepting illogic as logic. It's hard to be on the outside, maybe even as hard for the outsider trying to understand the insider.  [info] None [info] 1400037783 [info] train
IPickedTheWrongMajor [info] Love your observation.  I just often wish I had picked a totally different path in life. I have had a successful career, but I find my work often very stressful, and I found something else I love to do later in life. But I was quite successful after freshman year, and I was actually quite passionate about my chosen field.  Without that, I don't know how I would have succeeded. I was diagnosed at age 50, and I wonder how my life would have been different if I had been diagnosed with ADHD as a young person and prescribed the appropriate treatment.  Instead, when I was an emotional wreck, and thinking I had to drop out of college, I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed anti-anxiety meds.  That helped me calm down enough to get my act together. Then, I was fortunate enough to have a short, helpful course of psychotherapy.  That treatment helped me with my lack of confidence.  For the problems with focus, concentration and concentration?  I am pretty sure that's why I used tobacco. I found places to study with no distractions. My friends were good students, so we probably supported each other in doing well. I was physically very active. I guess I was just smart enough to figure out strategies that worked.   [info] None [info] 1452439972 [info] train
Stevienines [info] bro I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I have a history of it in my family. Please don't assume you know me [info]  [info] 1542222896 [info] train
frcrobert [info] I'm really starting to feel that, especially since 2 years ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1552240947 [info] train
sazken [info] Studying / Working with Kava? Hello, r/kava:I hope this finds you all well!I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD a while back, and I have been searching for a natural way to help focus while working. I ordered a couple of strains from Kalm With Kava (amazing company, by the way!) and tried their Pouni Ono one night before sleeping. I had been using kava to sleep better for about 6 months at this point, and I was shocked that the Pouni Ono actually woke me up instead of putting me to sleep! A month or so later, I tried knocking back a shell of the Pouni Ono before a work day. I found that it helped me focus far better than anything else I had ever tried. A few shells of it throughout the day kept me awake, relaxed, and 'in the zone,' especially with a few puffs of an e-cig along the way. Has anybody else experienced anything else like this? I think heady strains of kava might be a wonderful 'nootropic' and am interested in looking more into kava as a study/work aid.I'd love to hear any of your thoughts.I also notice, however, that kava does not mix well with coffee (for me). Blending the two almost always leaves me a little sleepy. [info] None [info] 1498074117 [info] train
Anonymous3687 [info] Everyone gets anxious at one point, wether it’s graduation, getting on stage, presenting, etc. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I bite my nails a lot and I feel like I can’t breathe. I would talk to a therapist about looking into it. There’s a lot of free in home therapists, they help you a lot. Therapy is eh with society but it doesn’t mean you’re “special” it helps your social skills and is basically counseling. [info] None [info] 1560652182 [info] train
amkmaker1754 [info] I Was an Anxious Child Hello, citizens of r/NoSleep, I am usually just a lurker here but tonight I wanted to share with you all, my own personal story. Edit: grammar.When I was six, I was diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia nervosa. I found that every time I tried to eat, or felt the slightest pang of hunger, I’d clam up. Refuse to put anything in my mouth. Why? Fear of choking on anything. I sometimes wouldn’t swallow my own saliva. When you’re six years old and suffering from something that seems so silly, so unbelievably childish, it begins to wear down your family. Puts strain on your parents, as they fight to keep you fed, let alone keep themselves sane. My mother and father would take me for walks. It started out casual. We’d dress my baby brother and go to McDonald’s. They’d order my favourite happy meal. Each time I’d cause such a fuss about taking a bite and choking on the nuggets that we’d always leave with the attention of every other customer in the restaurant. It got to the point where my mother couldn’t look at me without bursting into tears because I’d lost enough weight that you could so faintly see the dark shadows of my liver. Seems impossible, right? I’d show you all pictures as proof but we got rid of all the photos and memories of such a dark time so I could forget and move on. Looking back, it’s hard to recall why I’d developed such a fear. Why it crippled me and nearly drove my parents to insanity. Why all of a sudden policemen were showing up at my house out of the blue and questioning my mom and dad about why they were starving me. Surely my teachers at school had something to say. A six year old weighing under thirty five pounds wouldn’t necessarily go unnoticed. I didn’t know why I’d all of a sudden picked up this idea that I couldn’t eat or drink anything. Years passed by. I eventually broke through. After months and months of intense therapy with child shrinks, I defeated anorexia nervosa. Then they readjusted my diagnosis and told me I was plain old anxious. A constant over-thinker. My parents convinced them not to put me on medication. I could suppress it for some time. Eventually I found lots of coping mechanisms that helped when I started feeling the waves of panic flow through my body. At first I’d start going completely rigid on the living room carpet, eyes clenched, and my hands balled up into fists so strong my knuckles were white and my nails would pierce the soft skin of my palms. My nose would bleed. I’d be sent home from school because it would scare the other kids. Then gradually the attacks came on less strong. I would just excuse myself to go to the bathroom, practice my breathing as my shrink would tell me to do. Then after a while I’d find a way to think of other things. Distract my own conscience from itself. Not only was I grateful that there was finally some improvement, but my mom and dad could finally sleep at night. After my seventh birthday, the nightmares and night terrors started. That was a whole new level of torment. It was horrendous; I’d wake up soaking wet from sweating. I never wet the bed, however I did stress myself out so much that several times I vomited and wouldn’t stop until I passed out again. When my mom or dad, even my shrink, would ask me about them, I could never remember a single detail.But there was one thing that always stood out in the corner of my eye. I’d wake up some nights, unable to move, panicking after a particularly scary nightmare. I’d turn my head after struggling awhile to see the same little black thing hiding by the door. It had a sheep’s build—a thick, woolly body with knobbly legs. But it had no discernible face. I guessed at first that it was just so black that I couldn’t adjust my eyes enough before burying my head under the sheets as anyone would do. After all, aren’t sheets the one thing that would save you from the most malevolent of evils?At first I’d only wake up from a nightmare or night terrors once or twice a week. Then it started to get worse. As if it was bad enough that I didn’t eat for months at a time, I didn’t sleep. At all. It really reflected on my grades. To the point where, again, the police would question my parents about possible abuse or neglect. In school kids would avoid me. As if I had some terrible thing hanging over my shoulder. I didn’t understand it back then, but as I grew older, it began to dawn on me. See, this black thing…it would always get closer. I’d see it far clearer in my dreams than I could when I woke up. It was exactly as I previously described it…sheep-like. Jet black, with no face. Only in my dreams it had a face. Of a goat. And it would stand on two hooves rather than four like I originally assumed. It had little curly horns coming from its head. To top it all off, it would whisper things to me I wished I never heard. One day, out of the blue, I stopped having the nightmares. The terrors, waking up in the dead of night, pulling the covers over my head in hopes to drown out the repetitive whisper, “They can’t help you…they can’t help you…they don’t love you…they don’t love you…” Oh, god. I can still hear the voice, clear as day. My hands are shaking so bad right now, writing this. Excuse my rambling, but I’m bringing back years and years of torment and terror. I never expected for it to be this hard.I moved just after the nightmares stopped. I was in grade two. About seven or eight years old. After settling into my new home I stopped all the nightmare bullshit. It was a fucking miracle. I was eight when I finally got a good night’s rest without waking up. My parents, too, were more than pleased. My efforts in school blossomed. I was on cloud nine. And it stayed that way for a year or two. And one day, without having any sort of anxiety at all, it found me again. Only it had grown in size. And its features had become far more distinguished. I want to emphasize day, because that’s when I saw it. Broad fucking daylight, staring at me from down the hall in the doorway of my parents’ room. I darted into my room, slammed the door behind me, and held my dog. She whimpered and barked at the door, but there was no fucking way I was leaving my room. I should have mentioned that my brother and mom were across town at a soccer game. My dad was home but he was in the garage. He wouldn’t have heard my screams. When my mom got home she found me in my closet hiding under a bunch of clothes. At that point she finally started to understand that this wasn’t just some imaginary thing when my dog kept whining at the furnace grate in the hallway. It was nice to know that finally, after all the suffering I’d endured accompanied by the frustration of mom and dad never believing what I “thought I saw”, my mom knew. She wouldn’t tell my dad. He didn’t have an open mind about this stuff. We eventually deduced that it might have been linked to my anxiety. A physical manifestation of the panic inside my mind. Funny thing was that after a while my brother began seeing it too. Except he believed it was an imaginary friend. He’d play with it and I’d watch in horror as this fucking black thing that used to torture me while I slept would frolic around my brother’s room. Eventually I stopped fearing it. I started taking to my brother’s way of looking at it. Thought of it as a friend rather than a foe. Scared the shit out of my mom, honestly. I felt bad for her too, seeing as my dad couldn’t handle all the crazy and took a job overseas to escape it all. We moved again when I was in the middle of the seventh grade. By then I’d gotten my anxiety completely under control. I started to feel like a normal kid again, even though I missed the majority of my memorable childhood. We moved cross-country and I prayed to god that no matter how friendly it became, (we took to calling it “Teddy” and I guess it didn’t seem to mind) I wanted it to stay behind. I got my wish for almost eight years. My brother eventually grew too old to believe in imaginary friends. We both played lots of video games around that time. My parents started making lots more money so we could afford luxuries like that. My dad quit his job overseas, thankfully, so all in all my family had grown whole again, much less sane. In a way, I sort of missed all the attention. It was because of my childhood that I lived a very antisocial teenage-hood. I chose to pass on a lot of opportunities because I felt like I didn’t belong, like I was a freak in my own imaginary world. I mean, for all I knew, out of my whole life so far I was this weird girl who had meltdowns in class, and who would mutter to herself for hours about the things that “Teddy” whispered in my ear while I tried to sleep but couldn’t. I had no one I could relate to. Eventually I let this all go. I grew past all the anger, the built-up emotions. I graduated at the top of my class (since I had all that time to study rather than hanging with friends all the time like my brother did) and won a prestigious scholarship for a university I wanted so badly to attend. When the time came that I finally moved out and went to university, at first it was a bit of a shock. I’d be away from my mum. I didn’t know anyone. And for someone who, throughout their high school years struggled to make friends, I didn’t exactly have it easy. I soon met a boy (we’ll call him Jack) and fell head over heels for him. I started living my teenage years. School became less and less of an importance and more of a hobby. Unfortunately at the time, to my lack of knowledge, falling for this boy would have a disturbing outcome.“Teddy” found me. And boy, was he jealous. I thought at first that it might have been the dorm I was living in. The old building shifting and creaking with all the weight, since I was on the first floor. Then I heard the all-too-familiar whispering. Then the scratching at the door. The small scratches on Jack’s arms and back. They’d always be deeper and bloodier after we made love. Jack wasn't completely oblivious. Soon he became scared out of his mind. He stopped coming around the university, since he had his own apartment anyway. I spent all my time there instead. Stopped attending classes more and more. I’ll admit, it was all going downhill. A year goes by with little to no incidence. Jack and I decided it was time to move in together, as I quit university. I wasn’t prepared for the stresses of university. And I suppose the idea of living with a boy who’d look after me was more appealing anyways, so that’s what I did. I gave up my dream.So here I am, telling you this story. Sitting on my couch at home. Jack is away at work. I’ve no problems being home alone now. My apartment isn’t scary. Sometimes the odd shadow will catch my attention, but I could usually debunk it as my upstairs neighbours crossing the lawn. No worry at all, right? Well, I wish I could say I didn’t have to worry. Because I know he’s here. I know Teddy’s behind me. All I can hear is the whispers. "Jack is dead. Jack is dead. Jack is burning. Jack is burning." [info] None [info] 1426833006 [info] valid
meagicano [info] Yes - definitely! Time estimation is one of the big areas where I struggle, especially because I know what I can get done on a tight deadline. I'll reply to the OP first, then add some details.I also want to say that it's important that people realize they don't have to take on the battle of reducing the stigma of ADHD. It's a noble intention, but sometimes you have to look out for #1. This is something I've only learned through experience - I influence what I can directly, and I've had to let some things lie because I can't keep fighting. It takes up a lot of energy."Patience" isn't really an accommodation for work because there are often reasons why things need to be done on a certain timeline. Deadlines are often set for a reason - you could need to get something to a client, you could be part of a process and someone is depending on you to do your part so the next can go, you might need to have the response in time for payment processing, etc etc. It's hard to tell without knowing what the OP's job is, but an accommodation should be something that can help you get things out by an agreed upon deadline.If the deadline is completely arbitrary - that's hard from a mental perspective. I always try to figure out WHY a deadline has been set if I'm struggling with it. I don't ask my boss, but I look to the bigger picture. Like "ok, it has to be done by Tuesday noon so that X person can review it, then they can turn it around to me by the end of the day, so when I come in on Wednesday morning I can work on their comments..." An accommodation for "patience," based on how the OP described things, could be flex hours where the OP works for her agreed-upon eight hours a day, but with more flexibility. Instead of 8-5, she could work 8:15-5:15pm or something similar, depending on when she gets in each morning. I used to work for a company that had a "core hours" policy of 9:30-3, but outside of that you could work however you wanted.If the five minutes thing is for meetings, etc., OP should take a look at that. Why are they late? Are there Outlook reminders? I have Outlook reminders at 15 minutes, then I snooze until 5 minutes before, and then I snooze that until the meeting itself starts, which is when I join. I make those alerts pop up right in front of me. Anytime I leave my desk, I check my calendar. I live and die by my Outlook calendar and usually I've been really lucky. I'll set other reminders and timers as necessary.Taking on new projects - are you putting your hand up to volunteer? Is this at work or in your outside life? An accommodation associated with this would be that you're not overscheduled. You could ask to put any new projects on hold for the time being. Part of the challenge in this is the ADHDer's quest for novelty... doing the same thing over and over again, or being stuck on a project for a long time can be the worst. Depending on the work you do, you could ask to just be support on projects, so that you're not doing it from start to finish, or seek one project (instead of three) that lets you challenge yourself so that you're constantly learning from that instead of jumping from thing to thing.As for me....I was diagnosed at 33, in 2017. My aunt suspected I had ADHD when I was in my early 20s, since her kids had been diagnosed, but there wasn't a lot of information out there about women and ADHD and I just always kept it tucked in the back of my head. Babysitters would call me "hyper" and teachers always told me to be more ladylike, since the boys would be able to run in the mud, etc. and apparently it was the wrong way for girls to burn off energy. I never paid attention in class... I had years upon years of teachers complaining to my parents that I was reading books under the desk. I never really put a lot of time into homework, and while there are some massive gaps in my education, I was smart enough at the time to slide by without having to put in the work. I struggled with Calculus in high school, but dropped the class with 30+ people and took it in summer school instead with five others and got an A.The fact I got good marks was enough. I struggled in my jobs, especially when things became repetitive and boring, but never put 2 and 2 together. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was leaving the military, and the psychologist said that all of my past experience was likely due to anxiety, but a social worker I saw said she didn't think that was a fair assessment. I did fine in my MBA program, and at work, until things started to get overwhelming. During my MBA I had randomly read about women and ADHD, and how the symptoms are different for women than men. I went into a research rabbit hole and tried to get diagnosed, but my only option was paying out of pocket or spending years on a waitlist. I pushed it aside until things at work were really challenging for me. It all came to a head after something happened at work and I was thrown off my groove, and I just couldn't focus or get anything done that I wanted to do. I was in a different financial position with difference insurance, so I did a multiday assessment that ended with the psychiatrist being like "yeah... you definitely have ADHD and you've gotten where you are because you're smart".SO. Long backstory, but the overview is important (I think).Time estimation is HARD and it's something that I really struggle with. I have a VP I work with who makes promises to clients and I've started having to disagree with him in front of the clients to come up with a reasonable timeline.If I've done the work before, or something very similar, the time estimates are a bit easier. I always add in ADHD time - a buffer in case I can't focus, or in case something else comes up - that gives me a bit of breathing room. We've also updated our branding guidelines, so I've been adding in a buffer to account for updating to the current standards. If I don't have time, I'll send very plain content out so that I can get feedback on the "meat" of what's been presented. The challenge is that sometimes I don't know just how much work will go into something. I developed a two hour workshop for a client over the weekend - I had thought I'd be able to get it done in a few hours, but I didn't realize how much research and tweaking I would have to do. I ended up cancelling a ski day to get it done. I should have started working on it first thing in the morning on the Saturday instead of around lunchtime... but even that might not have been enough time. The partner saw it and thought I put in about 30-36 hours of work - which is definitely more than I did - but it shows how experience can help with time estimation.When I come up with a workplan, I try to break things down into details so I can better estimate my time. I don't always share this with leadership because I don't want to be held to it. But it lets me plan my time and I'll know that if I have an hour or two I can knock off something with a shorter time frame than deciding to tackle a bigger piece.I also struggle with things like, taking a shower and getting ready and knowing how much time it takes. Or how long it takes to get to work (our office location changed and it has doubled my commute - and made it so much harder for me). I have the timing estimates down perfectly on some things, like my commute to the airport, but the day to day stuff is a lot harder. I add buffers to almost everything. I also set alarms at weird times to everything. Like, 8:28am instead of 8:30, since it makes me think a bit when the alarm goes off in the morning. If I think something will take me two hours to turn around, I tell whoever is waiting I'll have to them in three. I've been trying to overestimate, especially if it's a deadline negotiation, because it's better for me to under-promise.OH and I use trello all the time (for me). I have colour coding for current projects, upcoming, personal things to do, other work things to do, etc. and I use that to set priorities. Traditional to-do lists don't work for me.Did that help? [info] None [info] 1563303346 [info] train
jacob_v [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so i had to go and do some psychology test then have a doctor say i was clear and then just recently i had to get a waiver because of my concussions from playing football [info] None [info] 1543941196 [info] train
bananas_cake [info] I told my friend I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they told me just not to think about it and I won’t be anxious anymore  [info] None [info] 1544765214 [info] test
sunnys1deups1dedown [info] If a woman smiles repeatedly, looks at you with interest, or strikes up a conversation, then you probably aren’t going to bother her but please don’t do a cold approach. I live in a big city and walk most places, so I end up being approached by men fairly often. I’ve been physically cornered, creepily leered at, and followed (among other unsettling experiences), so now I don’t want to talk to anyone on the street — like, ever. When someone approaches, my first instinct is “God, please no, leave me alone,” followed by “please ignore me, please ignore me, please ignore me.” Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety so maybe my reactions are more negative than others would have, but I don’t see why it’s necessary to insert yourself into someone else’s day just because you find them physically attractive. I always feel gross and objectified (and sometimes scared) when this happens, and I’ve never once enjoyed the experience or handed over my number. TL;DR: Only approach women who seem interested in you or who make contact first. Otherwise, just go about your day. [info] None [info] 1563770446 [info] train
theelvenguard [info] man, I was diagnosed with anxiety at 19. if anyone had said that after telling me that's what it was, I can't even imagine what I wouldve done..  [info] None [info] 1549423526 [info] train
kmw920 [info] There are several causes, including my family. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in last May. Looking back I actually had a panic attack (couldn't breathe well) on the plane in June in 2017. I think these two years or so have intensified my anxiety. When more and more physical discomfort got accumulated in my body, I couldn't bear it anymore. Last May one night I had breathing difficulty (this problem emerged significantly in last April). I couldn't stand up. My limbs got so numb and cold and purple. Heart rate was fast. My family called the emergency line and I was sent to a hospital. I get worried and nervous easily since I was a kid. Also since primary school, I've been underweight. My BMI now is around 14.6.  [info] None [info] 1549642306 [info] train
littlelamb0814 [info] When I was in high school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took medication for a while, but went off of it when I was a senior. I wanted to go to college without meds. And I did! But I also sorta thought I was "done" with anxiety. I thought, "I don't want that to be part of my life anymore", so I thought it wasn't.Sometimes that works. But sometimes it doesn't. I definitely have problems with it again. I sort of wish I paid more attention to that anxiety earlier on so that I could deal with it better now. I don't like the feeling of having been "beaten" by it, and going back to a counselor to pick up some better strategies and just have someone to talk with about it who understands is also stable themselves. I mean, I look forward to finding ways to cope, but I just wish I had done the leg work earlier.I get super obsessed over little social things that I feel I did "wrong". Ruminate on lots of things, even things out  of my control. I have these unrealistic expectations for myself and don't even realize it most of the time. And I feel super guilty about the possibility of doing the wrong thing or making someone feel bad or worried about them thinking bad things about me. I wish I could just not give a fuck but I do not know how. [info] None [info] 1492738233 [info] test
kapone3047 [info] I avoided getting my license for years because of anxiety, and even after getting it continued to find excuses to have my wife do the driving (this is back before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder).The trick to improving this situation was two fold:* Do as much driving as possible in situations where I would be more comfortable (quiet country drives, driving on Sundays, short drives going only a few blocks)* Give yourself some more challenging drives, but have another person in the car who can take over if it becomes too much. By putting yourself in a situation that is confronting, you're also going to prove to yourself that you can do this. Over time this will increase your confidence.To be honest, nine years of driving later, and I still freak out at the thought of driving in busy traffic and will avoid it, however I can now take drives that would in the past have brought on severe anxiety, and can even find some drives to be enjoyable and relaxing.Full disclosure - I moved to the country two years ago and as a result have been forced to spend considerable amounts of time driving, however on extremely quite roads. This has helped me immensely. [info] GAD &amp; Depression [info] 1416671281 [info] train
TheOriginalDormdude [info] Disqualification Question I'm confused by one of the disqualifications on the JET website and it has me worried that I might not be eligible. The disqualification is " **When an individual has committed an inappropriate act or there is substantial reason to believe that an individual is likely to commit an inappropriate act**." It's fairly vaguely worded and I've spent several days trying to find an answer to my question or more information on this disqualification, but I just can't. So my question is, I have an attempted suicide on my record from when I was younger. Is that considered a disqualification as far as anyone knows? It was 5 years ago and by the time I finish getting a degree it will be 8 or 9 years in my past. I really hope it's not a disqualification because after learning about the program it's help to give me a lot more direction and motivation in life.Edit:I just thought of another somewhat related question that I haven't really been able to find an answer to. I was diagnosed with anxiety and mild Asperger as a child. Problems that I more than have a handle on as an adult. would either of these be disqualifications or be negatives in my application? [info] None [info] 1587881868 [info] train
remorse2 [info] You have quoted the verse.   That is good advice.  I was constantly anxious until I was diagnosed with anxiety by my doctor.   I am now taking antianxiety medications.  I expect to be off the medication in a year.   So go see your doctor is my advice. [info] None [info] 1572831818 [info] train
MysticTacoDeer [info] I'm not sure how it started but I think it was because my father is a loud, continuous talker. He doesn't get the hint to stop talking and I've always seen him as the opposite of the person I want to be. Now I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm constantly afraid that I'll mess up and say something that I shouldn't and everyone will hate me. I also just suck at conversation but it's something you can't improve on unless you practise, but I avoid it so it's a vicious cycle. [info] None [info] 1559021892 [info] train
lnologram [info] I only interact with my sister when it’s unavoidable (like when I go home for Christmas). She’s older than me and made my childhood a fucking hell. It got to the point where I could barely be in the same room as her without her screaming at me for something innocuous (like sitting too close to the tv, or humming along to the radio). She’s a major reason I was diagnosed with anxiety and eventually PTSD.I don’t regret avoiding her, even now that we’re both adults, she’ll snap at me for the smallest things (I accidentally misgendered her cat, to which she misgendered me in response). Having her out of my life is one of the best things I’ve ever done for my stress levels lol [info] None [info] 1563254712 [info] test
TheKatsMeow0_0 [info] Severe anxiety attack...,, Monday I was riding Bart and had anxiety attack. I couldn’t walk and requested emt. I ended up walking the stairs because the elevator wasn’t working. I feel so stupid in doing so as some don’t see it as a condition. It just happened out of nowhere and I fainted against the bike rack and got transported to kasier. I have taken a week off work to get my medication adjusted or prescribed a new one. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2016 and ptsd in 2017. Things stemming from my past that I never dealt with came out. Im on 30mg of Celexa I went up a dose in Oct. I’m not sure what else I should be doing. I have enrolled in anxiety classes and have started working out. As well as meditating.....I’m dealing with my past issues it’s like what needs to be done so I can be myself and medication free.  Is it always going to be like this? I accepted my disorders.....I hate feeling this way. [info] None [info] 1552549698 [info] train
megawalelord [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid, but through a lot of practice I have it pretty much 100% under control. I would say I am genuinely happy and content with my life around 80% of the time which I think is really good. It's all about balance. I pick an area of my life that I would like to work on and focus on that. This year I am focusing on extracurricular involvement and actually joining things that interest me or I am passionate about. I'm also really careful of not falling into the trap that I need to be constantly working on myself from the moment I wake up to the moment I fall asleep every day. You need time to do the things that make you happy, because those things are making you a more whole person too. It's pretty much about finding things that make you happy and balance them with things that help you grow as a person. [info] Female [info] 1474049329 [info] test
SakuraGirl88 [info] Cruise in a month and I'm terrified! Hello. I think this is my first time posting, but here goes. I'm going on a cruise in December. A three-week cruise at that. This is not the first cruise I've been on and this is not the first overseas cruise I've been on either. But this is the first cruise I've been on with anxiety and emetophobia. The last time a v* was in 2013. It was on Thanksgiving of all holidays. I had eaten some popcorn from Target that Monday. My mom had eaten more of it than I did and was v* that Tuesday and Wednesday. It didn't hit me until Thanksgiving day. I woke up at about 5 AM and my stomach was burning and gurgling. I actually was thinking that it was just my acid reflux acting up not FP.So, I got up and ate some oatmeal. I was ok. I rode to my aunt's house with my mom. It was the longest hour drive ever. When we got to my aunt's house, the floodgates opened. After that, I was laying in front of the bathroom for hours until we went home. When we got home, I V* again and was ok. But having that experience terrified me. Before the Thanksgiving incident, I hadn't v* since 2004. For almost 10 years, I ate whatever I wanted. I know I ate some questionable food and being in college, I know I was around people with noro. So when it happened in 2013, when I graduated, I went into a fearful spiral.But I was doing ok until September 2015. I had a panic attack in the mall, which began as me feeling like I had to v*. I was diagnosed with anxiety and the anxiety messed up my acid reflux. I've been on medication for the anxiety, but I do still have episodes. And it got worse when I turned 26 and had to get my own health insurance. In December of 2016, I was diagnosed with IBS, but I was still having stomach problems. In the beginning of this year, I was going through a very stressful time, and my stomach was bothering me so bad to the point where I couldn't eat from January to April. In April, I was diagnosed with gastritis. And I often get nauseated from that too. I have medicine for nausea, but I still have episodesI just wish my stomach would be normal. Now, I'm going on this cruise in December. I'm so worried about my stomach and anxiety. I know worry will only make it worse, but I can't help it. And if being on a ship for 3 weeks was bad enough. I'm worried about the 11-hour flight to South America that we have to take. I'm so worried about catching noro or fp and being so far away from home. TL;DR: Going on a 3-week South American cruise and scared of catching noro or having fp [info] None [info] 1509682179 [info] train
Mushubeans [info] I just had my first full-blown breakdown I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while but I've never had what I would call an "attack". I get sick to my stomach and nauseous a lot but I've never hyperventilated. Earlier tonight I was laying in bed watching Netflix and I thought about going to class in the morning. I have absolutely nothing to worry about, no assignments due, nothing. But yet I broke down completely for no reason. My heart was racing and I was pouring actually beads of sweat. I ran to the kitchen to look in the med cabinet for anything and that's when I started throwing up. I then collapsed crying and stayed there crying and hyperventilating for another hour or so before regaining some control. I'm lying here typing this now because I'm still shaking in fear from what just happened. I don't see myself getting any sleep tonight and I really need some advice on how to cope with this.. I'm going to my therapist tomorrow but as for now, how can I calm myself? [info] None [info] 1367389211 [info] train
Good_day_sunshine [info] So after my first child was born, I started in this same anxiety cycle as you are now.  I was so worried about me dying and leaving my kid without a mother.   I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year later. Do you think maybe you are struggling with anxiety in some other area in your life, and projecting it into this?  That was the case for me. I still worry about death, but getting a better control in my anxiety overall has helped the negative thoughts.  [info] None [info] 1519355475 [info] test
SpatialJoinz [info] Checking my 2 day old's breathing constantly Hi Daddit, we had our little bundle of joy day before yesterday and it was a pretty smooth delivery. First child.  I was hoping to get some words of advice on anxiety.  I just spent 9 months worrying about the pregnancy and labor, now that it's over I've moved on to worrying about  him directly.  He was just on my tummy for awhile hanging out sleeping after feeding, all swaddled up and his breathing became so light I thought it stopped. Called my wife in, properly freaked her out, lifted him up and he was so sleepy he was limp at first, scared the ever living shit out of us.  He's fine, he is absolutely fine, but that freaked me out bad.Any advice?  Has anyone else experienced this.  I should also mention I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but on a very good treatment plan and typically don't worry to this detail anymore.  I'm sure this breathing anxiety is common.  Thanks Daddit and I look forward to being part of the community! [info]  [info] 1485155877 [info] train
wheremybagobeans [info] Lol that’s crazy man. I was tripping balls a couple weeks ago with a couple friends. Probably around 300ug but I get drug tested every week so I can’t smoke. 3 of my friends were drinking. And 2 of my other friends were tripping with me. One of my friends who was drinking decided it would be a good idea to take 8mg of Xanax and drink half a bottle of Jose Cuervo while ripping a dab pen and smoking blunts non stop. As this was happening my friend who was also tripping started having a bad Trip and physically could not open his hands. When we would try to open his hands they were extremely tensed up and almost impossible to open. After giving my friend a Xanax he started to calm down and Started feeling better. Then I noticed my other friend who took the Xanax and Tequilla was completely overdosing. Long story short I took the alcohol away and sat next to my friend who was overdosed and made sure he was breathing for around 4 hours straight. After he threw up multiple times he started coming to his senses but was nowhere near sober.(I know I should have called a ambulance but I am trained in basic cpr and first aid so i felt comfortable enough to watch over him) Overall it was a crazy experience while tripping but somehow even though I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder I managed to keep my cool while completely tripping balls. This was a extremely scary experience and really opened my eyes to the dangers of things like that. Ever since then I trip either alone or with 1 other friend in a comfortable environment. [info] None [info] 1565075181 [info] valid
darkcooger [info] I have anxiety which manifests as stomach and intestinal pain, and it's just like you describe: I get anxious, my stomach goes wonky, I get more anxious because of my stomach, my stomach gets wonkier, and so on. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and starting learning how to deal with it, I was certain I was physically sick and couldn't eat due to nausea, even to the point of losing about 50 pounds.It's amazing how our brains work. Keep that stress managed! [info] None [info] 1414496733 [info] train
mark983 [info] Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety, with IBS and with migraine.Their not exactly hard things to identify.I will ask Doctor for IBS diagnosis.None of these supplements are bad anyway they will do more good than harm I think. [info] None [info] 1514766737
lady_fire [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before fibro. The fibro symptoms started a couple years after the anxiety. I used therapy and meds to help with the anxiety and have been able to stop both successfully. Now I use yoga and walk to help manage both.  [info] None [info] 1517788554
lilwoodzey2013 [info] IWTL how to stop grinding my teeth and clenching my jaw when I sleep!! I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I know that’s probably the main issue. It’s causing me to grind my teeth down and even a bit of receding gum lines. I have a mouth guard I wear at night, but does anyone else have experience with this and have any tips?Thank you :) [info] None [info] 1511356894 [info] test
AlienLoser [info] Yea, that could definitely be how it helps you! Anxiety for sure can cause migraines, at least for me anyways. I've come to my own little diagnosis that my stomach problems root from stress and things of that nature, because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago. So, marijuana could possibly be helping my stomach because I feel no stress or anxiety whatsoever when I smoke. All I know is shit would suck for me and my overall health without my lovely, lovely bud. Haha. [info]  [info] 1418951290 [info] test
Mollinator5 [info] I’ve been typed mostly INTJ, ISTJ and INTP.How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am 17 years old and female. I am quiet and never talk to strangers unless online or they happen to have the same interests as me somehow or know of an assignment I missed. When I am with my friends, I am extremely obnoxious, loud, sometimes rude (like swearing and calling them ‘dumbass,’ but I don’t actually think they are...usually).Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I possibly have excoriation disorder (literally go to a therapist for it).Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised barely Catholic (we only prayed on holidays). I responded by saying how Jesus can’t be born. Because the Holy Spirit doesn’t have semen and therefore can’t procreate with Mary. I am one for modernism in the Scoped Trials.What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I am unemployed as a high schooler. If I were to do a career, it would be something medical without massive blood (opposite of trauma surgery).If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be kind of both. Like I would want to be refreshed in the morning and afternoon, but then during the evening I would like to chat a little. If I were given a single player game, I would not care if I was alone for a weekend if it meant I could play the game.What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I love video games (First Person Shooters, RPG, and strategy). I also draw and study anatomy or history for fun. I am not good at sports but made 2nd for my table tennis championship. It was teams, so I was carried. I hate the outdoors since I am allergic to bug bites and they will bite me anywhere...I mean anywhere. Probably TMI.How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?I am very curious about the future and kind of pessimistic. I honestly think the future will be like Wall-E where it is a trash planet in less than 10,000 years. Literally. But I like to think for fun about futuristic cars, technology and how it could work. And I have no clue if it is environmental or conceptual. I think conceptual? I don’t daydream much but when I do, if it isn’t about my science fiction character, it’s about how the world will end and hypothetical scenarios like zombies, epidemic, etc..Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?Nope, nope, and nope. I would be meh. I would expect everyone to do the task I assigned them and if they don’t, well, I will be pissed as fuck. I will show it like Gordon Ramsey bashing dishes LOL. If it is acquaintances, probably would keep it to myself but be passive aggressive and ask them if they could do this part of what I assigned.Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I have no clue what that question is asking. And I do, love clay and pottery. It’s satisfying, soothes my skin (sensitive skin, red and itchy when many materials touch it) and is fun to do.Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I do draw time from time of humans. I still haven’t decided on a style. I like Marvel Comics art style though! Kind of cartoony but mainly realistic lineart.What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I groan whenever I see political stuff like racism or sexism. It is bad but if I see it, I will just be angry, so I avoid it whenever I can, one reason I hate the past (yet like history class) and despise the present in terms of news. Although that black hole photo made me extremely excited for once! So cool. And the future I think will be crap, but at least I will be dead by the time it explodes, sun eats it, nuclear explosion occurs, etcHow do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I will help them. I secretly want a reward but also want to look nice. Usually I don’t get a reward and I won’t be bothered.Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. No evidence, I won’t believe it. Also I hate saying 100% because most of the time that is literally impossible. It could be 99.9%. That’s why the personality tests make me a bit mad. They say definitely agree. Does that mean like 99.9% agree? I think nothing is definite, so I rarely answer the far left or right.How important is efficiency and productivity to you?Keep work consistent and I am fine. Efficiency is how everything is produced and cycled smoothly.Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I don’t. I may criticize them for doing something, but not control.What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?Video games because I go at my pace and I get power and control. And I can do things that you can’t in real life like parkour, kill people with a motorcycle, hack appliances, etc..What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I am both audio and visual. I struggle with stupidity. By that, I mean people who CONSTANTLY talk during class. They make me want to rip my hair out. And I do literally sometimes (I know it’s bad). Also people who lack common sense. I also hate pushover teachers. I prefer classes that aren’t math. My favorite class would probably be biology. I am taking Anatomy soon and bet that will be number one. It is memorization, but partially logic in knowing how human parts connect. I hate numbers.How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am okay. And yes, I think I can easily do that. I sometimes wing projects, but it is less compared to me planning ahead.What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to have a job I like that pays okay, find a best friend who shares every single thing I would want, and I guess other clichés like romance.What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?Those CGI bacteria animations scare the shit out of me. Spiders, lobsters, crabs, deep marine creatures like that toothless looking shark with a huge mouth and tardigrades scare me to hell. I hate clowns and also when someone is framed in a show and everyone doesn’t believe them.What do the "highs" in your life look like?Seeing huge discoveries on the news that are science related, being praised, winning a game, being with my dog and watching YouTube videos about video game companies being greedy or lazy.What do the "lows" in your life look like?Meltdowns, getting a B or lower on any assignment or test, my excessive skin and hair picking (literally my scalp hurts a lot because there are two large torn off scabs on my scalp), and my 17 surgeries were lows.How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am pretty attached. I obsess over staring at live action actors or actresses to see how awkward them acting is and I am usually not engaged emotionally in shows or movies. The few that made me actually cry were Violet Evergarden (anime drama about love), A Silent Voice (some anime of a dead girl), and that one Shiba Inu or something that stayed at a station waiting for his master then at the end he dies, finally leaving the station. I daydream a quarter of the time. And I am aware usually.Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?I am alone. Well, it depends. Why am I there? Captured? I would yell and then get tired and look for a way out. If for fun, I would think about our ending of humanity, video game news, my fictional character and then go to sleep to be let out of the room (time going quicker).How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?It takes forever if important. If like a food order, I’ll be a little shy but mainly because of my appearance. And I change my mind half of the time then back and fourth.How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?Not long. If I am pissed, I am pissed. If I am sad, I will know. If I am elated, I will be just bouncing around literally yelling out loud.Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Nope. Fuck that. If you are stupid to me, lack common sense, just have an opinion about a flavor of ice cream or politics, I will disagree. Sometimes I even disagree even though I agree inside just so I can socialize for once (since not many do to me at school).Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?I don’t besides skipping mass at my school LMAO. And nah, they should know better. I don’t really mind them since they haven’t been a part of my life much.Ask me anything else you need to help type me. [info] None [info] 1555726235 [info] train
MannyOmega [info] Got diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago. For me, it's more like my ego and pride can be very big. Thus, I tend to project a reckless bravado, so that I won't be hurt due to rejection or feel that I'm a burden on others. This bravado, a result of my ego, makes me a bit of a dickhead, even though I'm well liked. I'm trying to change who I am, but it's very hard. It's like a defense mechanism for me. Without it, I feel vulnerable. With it, most people I know carry an affection for me. Habits that are constantly positively reinforced are hard to break. I might be different than others in that I know how to socialize, and am quite good at it. I have my moments of awkwardness, but for the most part I am socially competent. My father, due to the nature of his job, put me into a lot of social situations that I dreaded when I was younger. Thanks to it, though, I've developed many social skills. My social anxiety manifests in that it makes me nervous to be around my closer friends. Small talk with strangers or an idle chat with an acquaintance is no problem. but I struggle to consistently interact with close friends because I feel that at any moment I could make a mistake that ruins the friendship. I'm afraid that they wouldn't really like my true self (if I even have one anymore, the bravado has blurred the lines) so I often pull away in fear. I was diagnosed with anxiety in general though, not specifically social anxiety. I have no idea if you can even be diagnosed with specifically social anxiety, and in my case I was simply told to continue meeting with my therapist for my anxiety. I simply know that social anxiety is a big part of the anxiety I can feel. Thus, all that I have written has not been scientifically tested, but rather the findings I've seen based on the result of my own introspection.Take what I say with a grain of salt, as my experiences do not reflect all who have anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1549039645 [info] valid
alexthegeologist [info] Help? Anxiety vs Dysautonomia I just got out of seeing a cardiologist who told me all or most of my symptoms are anxiety related. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years, but I am realizing that some of the symptoms I attributed to my anxiety might not have been anxiety. Like when I feel chest pains and heart beating too quickly but I'm not anxious about anything mentally. There have definitely been times when I was anxious mentally and physically or just mentally. I was also recently diagnosed with EDS. The cardiologist said she thinks it's all adrenaline/anxiety. But she completely disregarded all the other symptoms I've been having, like temperature disregulation, frequent near syncope, exhaustion, GI problems, sleep problems, tremors, dizziness, Raynaud's.  I just don't know where to go with this, because my heart rate is too low for any sort of beta blocker and her only recommendation was anti anxiety medication, which I've been on for years (various ones). I can't take my ADHD medication because it feels like my heart beats too quickly. And I can't be medicated with Xanax all the time because I'd become a bezo dependent zombie. I just don't know what to do now. When I brought up how I was still having problems despite her saying it was just anxiety, she said it wasn't her area (aka psychiatry). [info] None [info] 1571151199 [info] valid
eduardamenezesc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder earlier this year and most times I don't know what's going with my body, I just wanna lay down and sleep till I feel better. [info] None [info] 1563199660 [info] train
rabidhamster87 [info] I feel like a lot of people who suffer from anxiety think that they're the only ones who do.  I can't tell you how many people I've met who define themselves by their anxiety and act like I wouldn't understand... But I've been diagnosed with anxiety too... I just don't like to announce my diagnoses like that.  It's very annoying to encounter these people.   [info] None [info] 1479751332 [info] train
yellowdayzzx [info] Saying Goodbye to my Therapy Dog as I’m off to Uni. I was diagnosed with anxiety this year and he has been there through every bad day and even worse night. I’m so grateful for Ollie and as a gift my parents got me a pillow with his face on!!!! As everyone knows I shall miss him more than anyone. [info] None [info] 1568239217 [info] train
soapyspooks [info] How would you want to be approached about this issue? This might sound silly, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and autism, so I tend to have trouble communicating (especially with authority figures), hence why I'm asking here . I'm in tenth grade and we're doing a pottery unit in my art class. I'm absolutely horrible with it and have no prior experience (Note that we had zero lessons teaching us the basics, we were just told to make something fitting into a theme). I love my teacher, I think she's really skilled but she constantly lectures me and calls me out in front of my class for not doing it right. Now, I get it but I just want her to show me what I actually have to do? I'm not doing the wrong thing because I'm lazy, and I sit alone in class off my phone. I'm genuinely trying so hard but every time I ask her for help I just get told to hurry up (it doesn't help that I'm pathetically sensitive, and tear up after almost every time she talks to me). If you were a teacher who thought they weren't doing anything wrong, what'd be the most respectful way I could approach you about this? [info] None [info] 1580216613 [info] valid
NitretGaming [info] This doesn't help for everyone but I just simply smile and I taught myself not to care about the simple things. If I lost 50 bucks I would be so stressed 2 years ago but I've learned money isn't everything and that I care more about being happy than worrying about money. I know that stressing WILL NOT HELP AT ALL.  For anxiety I just smile and think positive. Whenever I'm in a large group I try to just smile it out and "act cool." This somehow brings my anxiety down + I've listed to common phrases that "good speakers" have used and used them myself in a conversation to act like I know what I'm doing even though I don't and I'm really nervous.  If it's social anxiety we're talking about this one helps A LOT. Learn to not be embarrassed. Even if you did the stupidest thing just laugh it off. (It's no big deal when you look at the bigger picture.) For example singing the wrong lyric to a song out loud and then on top of that, being called out for it. I just say "oh shit what is it then" and laugh it off. Even if I'm internally crying. (BTW if you have any friends that shit on you for getting a song lyric wrong don't be friends w/ them please)  Just try your best to learn to overcome it, kinda like a fear. Just smile and remember in the end, fuck it, just be happy.  (Note: I've been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety)  GOOD LUCK I BELIEVE IN YOU :D [info] None [info] 1551669465
treefarmercharlie [info] I have the same issue.  I was diagnosed with anxiety issues about 15 years ago but cannabis didn't make it worse until recently.  I honestly don't know if cannabis is just amplifying my anxiety, or if it is creating more, but I have cut my consumption back to only two days a week (Friday and Saturday) and that has helped me a lot. [info] None [info] 1573153121 [info] test
mariel_j [info] At 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety and dysthymia. Worked very well with Prozac and Ativan for about 15 more years. CBT therapy is still very helpful. Don't get discouraged! [info] None [info] 1484146566 [info] train
couerdepirate [info] just a thought, and maybe i'm overstepping here, but do you have any, even minor, issues with anxiety? whether it be about school itself or just in general?I only ask because for a couple years in high school, I COULD NOT eat breakfast. I would feel so sick, but like you be famished by lunch. Once I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and realized I was subconsciously anxious about school, I was able to eat breakfast. Now I love getting up and having a big breakfast before I start my day!  [info] None [info] 1380329385 [info] train
MoosesMom7 [info] I had no idea that it wasn't just me. I've been a lurker for a while now, and I didn't realize just how many people had similar stories to my own. I could probably write a book about the crap I had to deal with growing up. I think it's important to share stories, and see commonalities, so here's mine. &amp;#x200B;My Mother is a narcissist. As a little girl, I was her baby doll, being dressed up in the cutest dresses and being constantly doted on. Once I started talking, that's when everything went down hill. I would be yelled at, hit, called every name in the book, and was basically her slave. If she wasn't giving me a verbal beatdown, she was ordering me around, "take out the trash", "make me food", &amp; and so many others. She went so far as to encourage me to commit suicide, and had I actually been suicidal at the time, I can't say that I wouldn't have followed through with it. There were a few times in high school when she didn't allow me to shower because it would, "raise the light bill".  My aunts and uncle, were always her sisters and brother, she never spoke of them in relation to me. No matter what happened, it was never her fault. She got arrested once, and it was the cop's fault. My dad was a bastard, in her mind, when he gave me stuff and not her. &amp;#x200B;When I was 14, I was hit by a car and taken to the hospital with a dislocated knee. Rather than ask me if I was alright, she got into the room, waited until the doctors and nurses were gone, and told me I was going to get so much money from this. Yep, you read that right. I was just hit by a car, and she was looking forward to the settlement money that I would eventually get. I did get a pretty decent settlement from the accident though, about $9500. Thankfully, my dad was smart and got me a lawyer, and I set up a meeting with her to ask her to hold on to the check until I turned 18. I picked up the check shortly after my 18th birthday, and opened a savings account in my name. Boy was she pissed that she wasn't on the account, she needed the money "to raise me". She conned me out of $4000 dollars, which she used to pay off her credit cards, and told me she would pay back... that was over five years ago and I still haven't seen a penny. &amp;#x200B;Sometimes, I'd lose things, like any normal person would. When I'd ask her if she'd seen it, she would say that I was accusing her of stealing it. One time, she swiped a five dollar bill out of my pants and I asked her if she had seen it, as I thought I may have left it on a counter or something, again, I was the bitch for accusing her of stealing. Yet, after I took the dog out to cool off, she called me into my room, lifted a pillow, and lo and behold, there was my money. All nice and flat underneath the pillow. It's kind of hard to believe that she didn't put it there, considering it was crumpled up in my pocket the day before. &amp;#x200B;About a month before I graduated high school, she kicked me out for going to the bathroom before getting ready for school, because it "went against routine". I was a "backwards ass", which angered me and things escalated to the point where she said, "your 18, you're on your own, get the fuck out of my house". I was so upset that when my dad picked me up, I was sitting on the front porch crying. I called off from school that day, I was 18, so I could excuse myself. She got a call saying that I wasn't in class, and reported me skipping. This would have barred me from walking at graduation, and I told her as much. So she got to call the attendance office and excuse the absence so I could walk. Thankfully, she was willing to let me spend the weekend at my father's house, like she did unless she was pissed at him for some stupid reason, and I stuffed my duffel bag as full as I could get it and didn't come home after the weekend. The following Monday, I went to the school counselor and changed my address to my dad's and explained what happened. She was beyond kind and understanding and told me exactly what I had to do. &amp;#x200B;Of course, there were complications, she wouldn't let me have my things or my dog. For about two years, I had to steal from myself just so I could have clothes. She let her crackhead friends sleep in my room, do drugs in there (I once found a makeshift pipe) and take whatever clothes and jewelry they wanted. I was furious when I found my class ring missing, and she got pissed when I confronted her and told her I had reported it stolen, and given the police her friend's names and contact info. &amp;#x200B;It took nearly two years for me to get my dog back, and when I did he was skin and bones, with wounds from a fight with another dog. It took me three days to get him to eat, and he was just barely beginning to gain weight when my mother brought the cops to my house after I refused to give him back to her. She wanted to take him back to the same house, where the dog that attacked him lived, and out of concern for his safety, I said no. Unfortunately, because everything pertaining to him was in her name, I was forced to give him back to her. I told her to never speak to me again. She called me the same damn day and told me to come get him because he'd been hurt again. I was livid. My dad and I were sharing a car at the time, so I didn't have the car until the following monday, and when I went to get him, I was infuriated. She had left him in his kennel the entire weekend, not even letting him out to go to the bathroom. His kennel was soaked in urine, and he was bonier than before, as if he hadn't eaten. I took him home, gave him a bath, fed him, washed out his kennel, set up an appointment with a vet I knew, and got him registered in our county. My baby ate like he was starved. He cleaned the bowl in less than 10 minutes. I would be damned if she took him from me again, as she clearly demonstrated that she wasn't capable of taking care of him. She tried again about six months later, and failed. My Moose has been living with me for about three years now, although he's still got some trust issues surrounding women, he knows that I'll do anything to make sure he has what he needs. He doesn't get hit, he doesn't get yelled at (unless he's doing the yelling), and he doesn't get locked in the kennel unless we have to leave for more than a couple hours (he gets bored and destroys the apartment).&amp;#x200B;My mother has more recently convinced my family that I'm nothing but a liar and a thief. None of my maternal family members speak to me, especially after I cut my mother out of my life a couple years ago. I only have one cousin who talks to me because he's lived with her. He knows what she's like, and he saw the way she treated me. He's the only one who believed me. &amp;#x200B;One of her favorite abuse techniques is telephone harassment. She used to call me upwards of 40 times a day, calling me every name in the book, detailing how she was going to get me fired, making threats on my life, things like that. Eventually, she got my work phone number, and started harassing me at work. So, my boss got involved, and called a couple friends of his at the local police department (he had retired from there several years earlier). I spoke to an officer, and explained what was happening, let her listen to the voicemails that she left. And she said that she would tell her to cut it out, but, if she did that, I couldn't reach out to her. This was because, if I wanted to press telephone harassment charges, the DA wouldn't take the case if I'd reached out and contacted her. I agreed not to contact her. Little did I know, I had just made the best decision of my life. &amp;#x200B;About a year after she threw me out, I was diagnosed with anxiety, likely caused by the abuse from my mother. It took over a year of therapy, and daily SSRI's, but I'm doing really well. Cutting her out of my life was one of the best things I ever did, and I don't regret it in the slightest. I have a wonderful Fiance, a nice apartment, Moose is spoiled rotten, and things are looking great for me. It's possible to overcome the lifetimes of abuse we all suffer. It's not easy, but it's doable. No contact has been a great thing for me, and I have no reason or desire to make contact with her. And I'm determined to not raise my children the way she raised me. I refuse to be that kind of mother. Our family's cycle of abuse stops with me. [info] None [info] 1536052407 [info] train
SariaLon [info] Paradoxical Thoughts and Fear of Impermanence: What To do? Hi. A quick background: As a child I was always quiet and looked sad and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at a really young age. I was put on paxil at around the age of 8. I quit paxil at 22, but then a year later when on zoloft. Then this year I went off zoloft. This is because I have never liked the side effects of these medications (and the withdrawal symptoms are really scary), and also I don't like being dependent on it. So I've been without medication for around 6 months now, and I would like suggestions on how to deal with my anxiety. The past two weeks have been really bad. I can't go a day without thinking about so many things: Death, the past, the future, regrets, am I doing enough, my identity, etc. I'm basically freaking out about every single thing someone can freak out about, and it happens every moment of every day. I struggle with paradoxical thoughts: I want to be with my boyfriend, but I also don't. I want to be extroverted and do many things, but I also don't. I want to move out, but I also don't. It's driving me crazy. Constant thoughts of impermanence, death, what to do with life, racing in my mind every day, I can't catch a break and I can't slow down. I also dissociate a lot and I panic a lot. I don't want to do this to myself or my boyfriend (we've broken up because I couldn't make up my mind). We're both going crazy!I know this is life and it's my fault for going off medication, but is there any way to try to deal with this without medication? I'm not sure what I need. Psychotherapy? Regular therapy? I'm determined to gain control over my thoughts again, and to feel "normal". I've tried regular therapy sessions before and honestly they never helped. It was just "positive thinking", etc. but I want something that will help me get to the root of why I'm having these thoughts?Any suggestions or comments will be appreciated. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1502415161 [info] valid
TogaMcrightousFace [info] It was motivation. But I didn't feel the urgency until closer to time. Believe me, I understand that it was irresponsible.Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, including PTSD.  [info] None [info] 1529617726 [info] train
intergalaxy9 [info] my immediate supervisor thinks i stole something of hers. its causing me so much emotional distress. i’m in a tight spot at work because my immediate supervisor (NOT my boss) had her vape stolen last week. and i’ve been feeling her disposition towards me change which makes me feel like she thinks i did since i vape as well. but i pushed those thoughts aside thinking that she might just be tired or busy that week.however, today i was summoned by the admin representative of my department and questioned about the lost vape. i felt it was an insult but i was polite and i answered their questions truthfully.but now i am sad cause now i know that my coworker REALLY thinks i did it. and now i’m pretty sure the admin believes her since they questioned me.its really upsetting because its just my 3rd week on the job and i’m 23 and this is my first job. and she’s 50 and doing what i feel are very childish things like ignoring my “good morning”s and such.i am sad that our relationship turned out like this because i really respect her. now she doesnt even meet my eyes. and its awkward because her work bay is right next to mine. i cant work properly. i am diagnosed with anxiety and the creeping feeling that people hate you or are talking about you behind your back is the worst thing to me.i want to tell my boss what i’m feeling but will i seem like a tattle tale? i dont want to tattle. i just want someone to talk to. its my first ever job and i’m such an outlander here. i just want this to be cleared up and over with so that i can work comfortably again. and also for the sake of my integrity, especially in the eyes of any future employers i might have.TL;DR: I’m pretty sure my immediate supervisor hates me because she thinks I stole her vape. I was summoned by the admin and questioned about the stolen vape. I feel insulted and i am very upset because its only my 3rd week at my first job ever. What should i do? [info] None [info] 1549278746 [info] train
BloodcityWa [info] I like the maybe comment so basically you have no idea?  I was diagnosed with anxiety and then checked to find out my brain wasen’t making any serotonin I am an introvert and at many stages before social events I would feel physically sick and  tired beforeI even got to those events uncomfortable quiet and irritable when at the events because I did not wish to be there and the moment I got home instantly relived and happy again , there’s more going on then just being an introvert here which is why I believe they should go see there gp and discuss what they are feeling and how it’s affecting them may very well have other issues then just being an introvert  [info] ♂ [info] 1547429675 [info] train
Eeyoreandpiglet [info] For me, I have the life that most people would envy.  I had not a care in the world.  You know that feeling you get when someone runs out in front of your car and you just miss them by a hair?  I had this feeling all the time.  That's when I found out they were panic attacks.  They came out of nowhere and for no reason.  Then the digestive issues....for no reason.  Then the crushing chest pain, shoulder pain, and left sided tingling for no reason. I was at the hospital numerous times for heart attack symptoms. I had all the tests imaginable.  Nothing serious ever showed up.  I hated this!!!!  I was diagnosed with anxiety.  My body produces anxiety for no reason.  So yes, in most cases, it is after you get checked out for numerous other serious ailments that anxiety came to the forefront. So I take anti anxiety medication to keep it under control.  This has been a long struggle.  Thanks for venting. [info] None [info] 1516215417 [info] train
ikerevobsession [info] I have a weird bump on my eyelid and I'm not sure what it is First of all:Age: 19Sex: technically female but I identify as male Race: White (British)Height: around 160cm (5'3-ish) Weight: I haven't checked it in a long timeExisting medical issues: none, but I was diagnosed with anxiety recently Medication: Propranolol (40mg, for said anxiety) Drug use: noneSmoking status: never have smoked never will smokeSo, this bump on my eyelid. I was doing a test in my French class yesterday (29th November) when suddenly, my left eye started to hurt when I blinked. I kept it closed for the remainder of the test so I could concentrate on it. Before, it was just painful on the outer corner of my eyelid and it wasn't swollen. My test started at 12pm, by about 7pm, there was a small, pimple-like bump on the area that was painful, so I thought it was just acne on my eyelid which I didn't rule out bc I have really oily eyelids despite the skin on my face being dryer than the Sahara Desert. Anyway, fastforward to this morning and it's way more swollen that it was the night before. It was literally like I got filler in that one area of my eyelid. It's now almost 4pm and it's less swollen but it still hurts to blink. It doesn't look like a stye or anything similar so I'm very confused as to what it is. Anyone have any ideas? And how would I treat it? Should I just let it do its thing? Pictures can be provided if needed. [info] User Not Verified [info] 1575129816 [info] train
kirby__000 [info] What's your story?&amp;#x200B;I'm a business student but I'm very curious about studying computer security and reading good books, not to mention that I can't see my life without studying.&amp;#x200B;What is your dream?&amp;#x200B;my import business is finally certain, i am working to keep it on track i have always had a dream to have my own business and be against all kinds of status quo&amp;#x200B;What's your biggest challenge?&amp;#x200B;at the end of last year I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was one of the worst recent phases of my life, I hadn't realized that I myself was, breaking up with me I didn't have a base of physical activity, I didn't socialize, my import business hadn't been created yet, that time was where I studied the most, very heavy things, and I was finishing my business school, being so all attention was turned to these independent study that I liked, and learned a lot of things, but also left me very anxious yet, I did not return to my college, to finish today some people say to me that my business will not work but I know how to filter that negative opinion in positive is only so that your business will have exodus never give up. [info] None [info] 1566063460 [info] train
PerceptualModality [info] How do I talk to my Dr about possibly having ADHD? I recently saw a thread on twitter that was very popular about living with ADHD and I've never felt anything describe my life more accurately. I then got googling about ADHD and found this subreddit and there are tears in my eyes reading these posts because I relate so deeply to the content. I can't believe how similar so many of the experiences are on here.For some background I'm a 25 y/o female and I've been pretty successful academically but since starting law school I've really been struggling with managing what I now think are symptoms of ADHD, though I think I've had these symptoms as long as I can remember. I've been diagnosed with anxiety before and taken psych meds but I didn't really feel like they were very helpful to me. Counselling has helped me a lot with learning coping skills and emotion regulation but I still struggle. I'm thinking of saying something to my Dr but I don't want to come across as drug seeking or like I've done my WebMD research and I know what I'm talking about. I just have related so deeply to these posts and I want to see if maybe talking to a Dr about this might help me find a better treatment plan. Did anyone have a similar experience? What made you finally speak to someone about your symptoms? [info] None [info] 1551793793 [info] valid
wildgreengirl [info] I was just thinking. ...is it bad I feel I fit all but the last of these...I'm diagnosed with anxiety and am on an SNRI I thought has "helped" but I also think it might have intensified some things like irritability and making me more reckless (like driving) [info] None [info] 1407734063 [info] train
Inpalethis21 [info] Speaking from personal experience, I knew I liked the feeling of being high but I never knew why it made me feel the way I did. A couple of months later I was diagnosed with anxiety and the doctor explained that it is normal for people with anxiety to experience a feeling of impending doom, which is exactly what I felt when I haven't smoked in about 3 days.For people who don't know they have a disorder which can be treated with marijuana, it is easy to say they are addicted but don't have the knowledge as to why it is addicting.People like to call it addiction, I like to call it medicine because it relaxes my nerves from jumping around and calms my heart race down.  [info] None [info] 1447252565 [info] train
Amykazaam [info] Hey! I’m also a third semester BSN student. I highly recommend therapy if you are noticing exacerbations regarding your trichotillomania.Not only can therapy assist with preventing bald spots, it can help address the cause— stress. Stress is interesting because (as you might already know) it can be broken down in two general subdivisions— distress and eustress. It sounds to me that’s you’re currently enduring distress.This is important because sustained levels of stress have been correlated with an overall decrease in your ability to actively and efficiently learn and retain information the first time you are exposed to it. In turn, you end up needing to spend more time to studying, partially due to the reduction in active classroom learning. So seek out therapy, yes it will take time, and yes I understand how little time you have. However, it can actually end up saving you time in the long run! It can also help foster better nurse-patient relationships and decrease the likeliness of you experiencing nurse burnout! Also, what works for me (I am diagnosed with anxiety) the app Headspace. It has free little mindfulness therapy exercises and you can choose how much (or how little) time you want to put aside for mindfulness, which can be as short as 5 minutes. There’s such a need at my school, they provide free therapy for nursing students. You are not alone with this and there’s nothing wrong with seeking help.I’m really glad that you do already practice self-care. That’s huge, a lot of people don’t engage in proper self-care, and I’m really proud of you for doing so. Here are some links you might find interesting: https://www.headspace.com/blog/2017/05/31/a-day-with-trichotillomania/(Headspace article about mindfulness and trichotillomania— it’s totally subjective, but I thought you might be able to relate to it)https://www.americannursetoday.com/mindful-nurse/(Article from the ANA about mindfulness and nursing) https://www.nature.com/articles/npjscilearn201611(Research article that demonstrates the impact of stress on learning and memory, centered around educational and academic environment and exposure) http://www.apa.org/helpcenter/stress-kinds.aspx(American Psychological Association article regarding different types of stress, it might be a good read if you aren’t already familiar with the different categories of stress!) [info] None [info] 1536216726 [info] train
youjustwaitandsee [info] November by Tyler the Creator. The song came out months before my mother passed away, in November the same year. 2 years prior, I was diagnosed with anxiety, also in November. I broke up with a beard that I really liked and was left quite heartbroken in November, the year Over the Garden wall released.  Not to mention my dad also died in November 2012. Flowerboy is my part of gaming soundtracks. It relaxes me. I had to make a new playlist and exclude the song from the album. [info] None [info] 1557364141 [info] train
Plagman39339 [info] Grandma's old and not dying perse but everyone in the family has heart disease. My uncle's ex-wife got diagnosed with terminal breast cancer.I'm diagnosed with anxiety and took my medication but I haven't been doing the breathing techniques. [info] None [info] 1545779422 [info] train
Lcarre02 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. Thank you [info] None [info] 1558952306 [info] train
hdaigre47 [info] Thanks for the suggestion, but I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 6 and have seen a psychiatrist and therapists ever since. Received a few other diagnoses along the way as well. It’s been fun. [info] LSU Tigers / Team Chaos [info] 1515607218
ibrasamovic [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders aswell. Just realise that each day is a new chance to kick its ass. Keep at it, the day where you do will eventually happen. Best of luck brothers  [info] None [info] 1500677195 [info] train
beevibe [info] I scraped through high school, sleeping in every single class every day and maintained an B average. I got to college and holy shit, you cannot do that shit any more. I never used to study and now I have to and I’m struggling. I’m in the process of being diagnosed at the moment because I’ve never needed help until now and I just assumed I was lazy and stupid. I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school and my psychiatrist told me that I could have ADHD without me ever even mentioning it and at first I was like nah because I hadn’t ever considered it, but it definitely made me think and now I’m fairly confident I do. Also since my sister has it and my dad thinks he has it but doesn’t see the reason to get it medicated since he’s learned to cope without it. [info] ADHD [info] 1566178585 [info] train
Williusthegreat [info] Damn this resonates with me a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I can relate to so many of those stories in there. Anxiety often gets overlooked when people discuss mental health. Thanks for sharing. It's great that these types of stories are being told.  [info] None [info] 1476346555 [info] valid
Sherlockiana [info] I have tons of loving family members and I struggle with anxiety every day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Therapy helped a lot. So did medication. Anxiety is a treatable disease that can be helped through therapy. I encourage you to talk to a counselor and deal with it directly. Don't let it eat your life. [info] None [info] 1413488732 [info] train
MrIngress [info] I need help, I have no idea what is wrong with me So around 8 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety, which has got significantly worse over that time span, I’ve got into this strange routine where I’ll shower more and more everyday, I went from not showering much at all to feeling irritated if I didn’t have one in the past 4-6 hours or so, I’ll start feeling extremely itchy, infuriated, even angry and then smelling really badly, however I don’t smell at all according to my family, I’m not sure what’s happening but it’s constantly getting worse with me getting up to 6 showers a day at times, if anyone could try to enlighten me to what may be happening that would be nice, thanks in advance. [info] None [info] 1575299548 [info] train
ScreamYouFreak [info] No and no.The doctors will advise against taking any medication or eating anything before the surgery because it could cause issues during the surgery. You don’t want to choke on your own vomit because you got hungry before surgery. You don’t want to have a heart attack during the surgery because you had anxiety and decided to pop pills beforehand (I am diagnosed with anxiety too, so I know where you’re coming from). The doctors and nurses should make everything just fine for you, but make sure to listen to them.Furthermore, you can ride your bike to them, but won’t be able to drive it back. After going under anesthesia, they’re legally required to wheel you or borderline carry you to a vehicle that you will not and cannot operate. This is due to liability reasons and they will check that everything is in place beforehand.Get an uber/lift or a friend to take you. Don’t be dumb.  [info] None [info] 1540216467 [info] test
speedhating [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and do work a high stress type job so... that would make sense... [info] None [info] 1493330387 [info] train
thumpitythump [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety after a 12+ hrs panic attack with those same waves you describe, she said panic attacks are similar to a jack-in-the-box.  They're harder to recover from once one has popped out.  Medication made all the difference for me.  Be kind to yourself.  Adrenaline and cortisol are very hard on you. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1537483785 [info] valid
Costume_fairy [info] I wouldn’t call it teenage angst since I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was a teen but okay. The rest of your point stands [info] None [info] 1559699771 [info] train
camerer_marsh [info] I have this exact problem but I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back. So...I just got lucky? [info] None [info] 1546146914 [info] valid
FindingAmberMae [info] I literally admitted to being emotionally weak and suffering from debilitating mental illnesses. Fun Personal fact about me, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorders after I had suffered severe bullying in elementary school by students AND teachers for the sole reasons beinf 1, I refused to show an illustrated explanation of how I would come to a conclusion with critical thinkinng (Id always just know the math questions, numbers just made sense to me... They corrected the fuck out of this so I wasn't "picked on for being ahead and bored", and sure as shit my mental illnesses grew worse and worse the longer that had to deal with school, up until dropping out junior year.You see, simply because someone expresses their own personal experience with mental disorders or recognized medical conditions, doesn't mean that they are weak.If said person allows themselves to be the roll model we all need, and stay visible through all that torture and misdirected hate, I'd say we are pretty fucking strongly rooted, and will hold out much longer than your "need to be right" "need to be cookie cutter normie" to be important or lack of respect for people that come from backgrounds that you havenMt experienced firsthand. [info] None [info] 1486309420 [info] train
NoMasGnomos [info] So true. I used to have anxiety back in high school. If I got nervous or stressed, my body would overreact and feel so tense until I got physically sick. Not knowing why this was happening only added to my stress, which made me more tense, and you can see how this spirals downhill.Until I was diagnosed with anxiety. Just knowing that, I was able to focus on mentally relaxing, telling myself it's gonna be okay, your body is just silly. No reason to fear, it'll pass. It helped tremendously. About ten years later, I mostly outgrew it. As they say, knowing is half the battle.Just prepare positive things to tell yourself, whether you believe them in the moment or not. Your future self will appreciate it. [info] None [info] 1509807325
ronnwell10 [info] My mother is a narcissist; I need help! Hello r/raisedbynarcissists!I am 17 years old (I turn 18 in September) and I have been diagnosed with anxiety which was the factor of me ultimately leaving the 8th grade. I have obtained my high school equivalency however but "family" matters have gotten even worse.My mother has been narcissistic ever since I've been aware of what a narcissist is. She calls me volatile names and has even said that my grandfather, who passed away in November, "only saw the potential in her and not me." I live with my grandmother at the moment but in a week, we'll all be moving in together at my mother's 1 bedroom apartment. My mother lost her job due to budget cuts and she's unable to get one now b/c Children Protective Services has found her guilty of child abuse; she worked in human resources.Sometimes, I get caught up in the hell that I'm in and I reciprocate the name-calling towards my mother. My grandmother is also verbally abusive but from a legal standpoint, she's not particularly involved. My father is deadbeat and I have no other part of the family that I can move in with. We are in the midst of starting a Family Preventive Service and I've made it known that all I want from her is to sign the FAFSA. My mother ends up getting mad b/c I don't like her even though she treats me like s***.I deal with yelling, cursing, and condescending comments every day and I can't take much more. Any advice would be greatly appreciated. Thanks.TL;DR: Mother is extremely controlling and verbally abusive, Grandmother is verbally abusive; 17 y/o needs help on what to do. [info] None [info] 1529875160 [info] train
ihateapplepie [info] I have never felt important to my parents. I've sadly come to the conclusions recently that my dad who I thought used to be on my side is an enabler and kinda bad himselfMy dad and I used to sit and cry in the car with how NMom treated us. We would vent to eachother, we would talk things out. He would listen to me scream my frustrations and I would do the same for him. Then one day I was venting and he just says "I think you should stop saying these things about your mother." And I felt i had the air sucked out of my lungsI feel like my parents never took me seriously or cared about me. I've literally never, not once, been to a dentist and I thought that was normal. I broke my ankle once and they took me to the doctor and then hid it from me, acted like everything was fine. I control my doctor stuff now and saw the after visit summary from all those years ago indicating a break. My ankle has serious damage from not getting that break taken care of. I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd in middle school. They literally refused to take me to any doctors. My mom is a fucking nurse. They both had a lot of meds. All of my brothers had meds. Just not me. I begged them because I had nightly panic attacks. My dad always said "okay I'll do it" and then when it came to me they would never schedule. When I was finally brought in and given a medication, he never took me to the follow up and my meds ran out. Then he wouldn't take me because next time we went he would have to pay a fee for missing it with no notice or something. My brothers were fully medicated and regulated. Due to my adhd and other problems I seriously struggled in school. My parents never cared and just blamed me for being lazy. My teacher sat me down and was like you are struggling why are you not in an IEP or something. I told him it was because my parents wouldnt allow it. He was shocked. (Considering my brother was in 3 IEP classes) They had the IEP teacher secretly take me to her math class and he would just give me the grades for how I did on that work instead. He was a fantastic teacher.I don't really know where this is going. I guess its a vent? [info] None [info] 1540126478 [info] test
threeyearwarranty [info] People always talk about doing something you fear so that you can conquer it so why is this being viewed as a bad thing? Dyeing your hair is a concious choice.. and for some, it's a choice to be more confident.. or at least the chance to pretend to be...Also, sometimes people just want to change their appearance for *themselves* and they dont necessarily take the time to think/care about the effect it will have on how others would view them.PS. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I actually do want to dye my hair somehing bright. (Am a straight guy) I just havent been able to yet. I've spent a lot of time thinking about the attention it will draw (which terrifies me, like you said) and honestly I still want it bcs I still think it's hella cute. I'll probably regret it afterwards bcs my self confidence will still be shit but honestly I'm kind proud of myself of actually wanting to try. I dont know what else to tell you. [info] None [info] 1556197729 [info] train
Tictacjo [info] I hope your dog helps you! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and it's actually grown to be getting a bit worse as I've gotten older. (I almost had a panic attack in the movie theater the other day.) But I recently adopted a cat, and she's been perfect. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1447095852 [info] train
Mei_me [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and depersonalization/derealization (emotional numbness, brain fog, detached from reality, very bad memory to name a few).Apart from that: being unable to make friends, depressed, very litle trust in people, afraid that everyone hates me. [info] None [info] 1530807410 [info] valid
quiet156 [info] I’m actually far more cautious about dating now. I don’t worry about myself getting hurt, but I often find myself worrying about if I date someone, will they abuse or kill my bunny if they turn out to be abusive? What are the warning signs of someone like that? I have this tiny creature I love and want to protect, and you just never know what’s going on in someone else’s mind. It’s made me leery of online dating, or really dating much at all.All that said, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid, as I have a distinct tendency to worry about and expect the absolute worst things that could happen. But I’m in therapy, and have been since before I got into true crime. I think reading all this has simply given me actual situations to stress over. It’s why I do my best to avoid any and all stories with animals getting hurt, especially rabbits. I don’t need those thoughts and images in my brain. I make up enough on my own. [info] None [info] 1512200369 [info] train
dna12453 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year. I’ve improved a lot, but initially i did have a lot of problems and before I knew it was anxiety i mostly j took a shot before or something. I saw a therapist for a few weeks and that helped. Pretty close to normal now. [info] None [info] 1545064737 [info] valid
DannyDerulo [info] Diagnosed with ADD on Saturday,... what now? Title says it. 20f, junior in college, was having a phone call with my psychiatrist (haven't been able to function studying from home so he was writing me a letter to give to my Dean of Students Office to request accommodations). I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a good while so that's what the convo was about at first.When I was talking about what it was like trying to study, he stopped me to ask if I thought had ADD. My brother has ADD and has always had trouble in school; I've always done well academically so I had never considered that.He asked me a lot of questions about how I study, get work done, function, all in the context of BEFORE quarantine and it waas honestly kinda freaky. He was essentially listing in detail a whole bunch of things I do that I've written off as quirks for ~~years~~ most of my life (starting major projects/essays 1-2 days before its due, remaining acutely aware of everything else going on around me while in a conversation, frequently forgetting about deadlines/meetings, etc. etc.)He (jokingly) said that I "passed" the test with "flying colors" and added ADD to my diagnosis.He says I have the option to go on meds, but I'm still thinking about it. Part of me wants to try to continue functioning the way I always have, but part of me recognizes that I've always had trouble being efficient in an academic environment and that being stuck at home (with 4 younger siblings between the ages of 10 and 18) has caused my ability to focus on schoolwork to take a nosedive. I literally haven't turned in a single assignment since I moved out of my dorm, not even the ones I had half-finished before quarantine.I'm wondering if anyone else has found themselves in this situation before? I don't really know how to deal with the diagnosis and I don't know what sort of lifestyle changes to make. What has helped you? [info] None [info] 1586204464 [info] train
Guitarguy0393 [info] You're right! I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Problem is, the main thing I overanalyze is what she is saying or doing; not necessarily what I am doing. For example a girl said something to me and the whole weekend I was trying to figure out whether it secretly meant something else, and if she was giving me subtle cues. [info] None [info] 1443799047 [info] train
IAmASpy [info] Confirmed, before I was diagnosed with anxiety issues I'd use cigs every time I got really anxious. I started smoking a lot when I first started and whenever I got upset I'd at the very least stick my hand in my pocket and touch the filter of a cigarette. [info] None [info] 1302129114 [info] valid
HondaGirlMN [info] I have agoraphobia. I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about 5 years ago. Since then I've been taking Zoloft. It helps take the edge off a little bit, but by no means has cured it. I tried going to a psychologist but I panicked too much and would just not show up to my appointments. Now, years later, my anxiety is the worst it's ever been. I discovered the books by Dr. Claire weekes and holy shit, this lady knows what she is talking about. One of the best books I've ever read..seriously. I've been following the steps in her book and pushing myself. It's hard. Really hard. But totally worth it. [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/15YFVGGE3DLZH  [info] 1412282623 [info] train
bananabatm4n [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd.  When i started taking my adhd pills i started eating a lot more and got much fatter.  Now i am really self conscious and i am always worrying about people view me.  Now obviously i don't suffer as bad as your gf but i really can't do anything that is remotely weird in public or else i will start to freak out.  I was gonna write more but i forgot and i hope your gf gets better with her interactions with people [info] None [info] 1560320503 [info] train
MommyDrinks [info] They have an obligation to accommodate you if you have something from your doctor in writing saying "butterandsage is under my care and requires a stool in order to properly and efficiently perform their job. butterandsage is currently being treated for XYZ and is capable of completing their job duties under these accommodations.  If you have any further questions please contact my office at..." and then make a shitload of copies. One for your boss, HR and yourself.I just quit my job today because of the awful and toxic behavior I've been subjected to. I was diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor wrote a note asking my workload be reduced until April 15th. HR gave me the run around. My boss demeaned me in a meeting on Friday. I'm aldo 7 months pregnant so I'm HORRIFIED about how the transition of my medical benefits to my husband's plan will be handled. Thankfully I have a family member that is a lawyer (and vicious one too) that is willing to speak for me.Anyway, I'd get a hold of my doctor and explain your boss is being a real asshole and you'd like something to that affect. [info] None [info] 1521508778 [info] train
chromakeydreamc0at [info] I recently got a weighted blanket and it has really started to help my quality of sleep. It holds you down firmly in the bed and just feels safe and calming. Other than that, I would suggest seeing a doctor. Do you ever feel anxious? I was diagnosed with anxiety later in life and realized how it affected my sleep as well. A doctor could look into that or any other possible sleep disorders.  [info] None [info] 1545967227 [info] valid
dunechka [info] The presumptions again, son. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, hence my personal stake on the subject and why I'm very comfortable letting you know that your language is harmful. [info] Legs n. thighs. No biscuits  [info] 1475592163 [info] train
NikaVika [info] Wow, my story is basically the same. I have been picking at my face (mostly) for a looong time and only this year I realized I did it when I was feeling anxious or I had a panic attack (I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder). At that very moment it feels so good but then the realization hits and I feel horrible, which makes me anxious....which makes me want to scratch and pick. I discovered this reddit just recently but it really helped me to finally feel like I'm not alone and that something can be done about this. So, you can do it! It won't be easy, there will be relapse or two on the way, but we can do it! Great thing that I started using are the pimple patches. Put it over and bye. But of course I cannot put one giant patch all over my face, but at least this helps me with the worst areas. [info] None [info] 1565185775 [info] train
CaptainBudLight [info] No more anxiety attacks! I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was a kid and have dealt with high anxiety and anxiety attacks throughout my life. My mom didnt want to to put me on anxiety  meds as a kid. However as an adult I've been on medication but it still wasn't helping much. In the last 2 years my anxiety seemed to keep getting worse until I tried CBD oil and vape! I've been taking CBD oil for a month now and I have not had an anxiety attack! Not only that but my anxiety overall has been low to none! Anyways, just thought I would share [info] None [info] 1555046860 [info] train
jazz4 [info] Anxiety is horrible in the morning. I coped really well as a kid and teenager - got up for school absolutely fine, but I remember dreading every single day I had to go to University and work and it's when it started. This was before I was diagnosed with anxiety and knew what it really was. Anxiety keeps me up all night, especially if I know I have to get up early or have a tough day.Cognitive Behavioural Therapy has helped a lot with that. Trying to live more in the "now" and identifying triggers, but these physical symptoms are brutal. I might try meds.  [info] None [info] 1454366361 [info] train
ApprehensivePickle2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Had a Xanax scrip, the whole nine. My first psych doc thought it was odd that Wellbutrin made me less anxious, but we just went with it. Second psych doc (after first one moved away) diagnosed me with ADHD, put me on Adderall (still with Wellbutrin tho) and now I have no more anxiety pretty much. I mean, I get the occasional panic attack every six months or so, but that's only when something triggers it. My day-to-day dread and feeling of restlessness is gone now; I am a cool cucumber. Huzzah for the paradoxical reaction to amphetamines! [info] None [info] 1553372282 [info] train
mollysdollys [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety last year.It was all downhill from there. (Somewhat literally- I weighed a healthy 120 when I was diagnosed and now I’m 98 pounds) [info] None [info] 1526686515 [info] train
triplexpac [info] It’s funny, I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds, which helped a lot. Now I have been diagnosed with severe sleep apnea as well. Very curious to see how things change as I get my CPAP [info] None [info] 1570638880 [info] train
misfortunas [info] Afraid of becoming schizophrenic. Can it come true? Hi! My Name is Tom im 16 years old. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 2 months ago. I suffer from derealisation and hypochondria. If you don't know. Hypochondria is the fear of getting a disease. Currently it is schizophrenia. I used to read SO much about this disease because I tried to self diagnose myself. (Didn't know I had anxiety at that point) like a lot! I watched videos, documentaries, read about every symptom etc. Right now I feel like developing it. Because I have weird paranoid thoughts lately. For example: if I am outside I feel like people are against me (planning something). Or they laugh about me. My mum told me these thoughts appear because I read too much about them and I focus too much around them. I believe she is right, but at the same time, it doesn't FEEL like that. I want to believe that the world is perfectly fine. But it doesn't feel that way. Please tell me it's all ok. My biggest fear is developing schizophrenia. (Nothing against schizos, everybody has different fears) [info] None [info] 1442053996 [info] train
JinxedAndFading [info] I think I understand a bit where you're coming from, I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and although praying and listening to Heavenly Father's and our Savior's words do not make this worry go away, it can definately help relax you and realize that there is always someone on your side :) [info] None [info] 1551303259 [info] train
throwy09 [info] &gt; anxiety and adhd are often confused for one another, particularly in womenCan you give me more details about this? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and Xanax doesn't really work I think.  [info] None [info] 1546622989 [info] test
Scaredistka [info] We are 20,and 19 we are together for 3 years .i have ROCD for 1 year almost and I am diagnosed with anxiety disroder and ocd [info] None [info] 1556489353 [info] train
spookyartskeleton [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and while it's gotten better than it used to be, I still get the occasional anxiety attack. One night I was laying in bed trying to sleep. I usually don't have problems laying alone in bed but for some reason unbeknownst to me I couldn't rest. I turned onto my side, and I felt someone breathing on me, as if they were inches from my face. I opened my eyes and there was no one. I listened to see if I heard the A/C turn on, but heard nothing. I swear to this day I felt distinct breath on my face. I turned over onto my other side and tried to forget about it. After a few minutes again I felt someone's breath inches from my face. I looked around my room. I have posters on my walls, and while I looked at them trying to calm down they seemed to morph and twist, like I was hallucinating. I thought I was dreaming so I checked my clock and pulled out my phone to try and confirm I was awake. This is when I got the sickest, most paranoid impending doom feeling I've ever felt. I felt like something extremely horrible was about to happen. My stomach did flips, I was sweating and shaking but I couldn't find the energy to move or get out of bed. I've never felt unsafe in my room, and I've had anxiety attacks before but this was by far the worst. It might not be paranormal but Jesus did it scare me. Eventually I just noped straight out of my room and slept in a different room that night. The following nights I took melatonin to help me sleep and I was fine. I'm still not sure what happened and why I got that feeling, because nothing did end up happening that night. [info] None [info] 1559493220 [info] train
Tho3v [info] Am I stupid? I will start with a background of myself and explain myself as a person. -I grew up as a foreigner in Saudi Arabia, and graduated from an American school there. My father paid lots of money for me to graduate from here, but I chose to go study in Russia despite his wishes for me to study in a rich Anglophone country, because I wanted to experience something different. I also did not want my dad to spend so much money on me, because university in countries like USA and Canada are damn expensive and I am not sure my dad can cover the tuition fees without me going into debt. -My father was not very encouragung and I grew up being afraid of looking stupid in front of him, and this makes me unconsciously do very stupid things. I can forget where I put things very fast and have a habit of losing things.  -I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD but I dont believe that ADD is real. I do have focus issues but it can be resolved by studying in a quiet library. The only real issue is that I think slow and process information slowly. I make the stupidest mistakes. I cannot function properly when someone is being imperative and asks me to do something. For example, my dad gave me his glasses and said something like "wear it on your neck" and I was literally so confused that I was putting it on my neck like how someone puts their glasses on, it took me a couple seconds to realise he meant that I should hang it upon my shirt. Of course my dad cusses me out for stupidity every chance he gets. This has made me so insecure that I do act like a complete dumbass when meeting his friends when they come over. I am 19 and am terrible at socializing. I have a bad sense of humor too. I have long term goals and I do work on them. Just a year ago I felt I was smart, but with every passing day I feel like a dumbass. -I sometimes believe in God and sometimes I don't.-I have already completed a year of uni in a Russia, and right now I am spending the summer with my parents in my home country. I had friends in Russia but I have no one here. It is too hot and dirty to go outside and I spend my days learning Russian at home. -The only thing I am talented in is biology, languages and art. I speak 4 languages, but so can many people. I suck at maths and am bad at socializing but I do have a girlfriend who is a lot like me. So please tell me honestly, am I stupid?Update: Thank you for your beautiful replies. It has been a big help and I am going to take my diagnosis more seriously. I have spoken with my dad and he is being supportive. [info] None [info] 1564254208 [info] train
WayfaringWarrior [info] No feedback but I scrolled back because I love ludovico. Fun fact, I was diagnosed with anxiety and I stumbled across drawing as a way to cope. Whenever I’m really stressed out, I’ll pair ludovico’s Divenire album and my sketch book to create some space or take a mental break. I think it’s helped me more than most things [info] None [info] 1551269154 [info] train
pokemaniacems [info] Transition: Confidence Issues and Anxiety So I've been on HRT for 13 months now and from what I can tell and what everyone else tells me I'm passing flawlessly. Sometimes I feel ugly and manly though. People tell me that I sound crazy or say I'm prettier then them or etc... I've only been full time for about six months now. It's been really hard for me to feel confident about myself despite all of the affirming interactions and compliments. I see something I don't like about myself and I can't go out for the day. Someone glances at me in the grocery store and it makes me nervous.   I know people can't tell but I often find myself wondering whether or not they could, looking for every little sign I can. I don't find any signs that they do but my brain tells me otherwise. It tells me everyone is just being nice to me because there's no way anyone looks at what I've seen in my mirror and thinks woman... Sometimes I don't feel that way or see it at all... but lately I have more then usual.I try to remind myself that I have nothing to worry about but it's so hard from me. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder years before transitioning.My friend thinks it's just because I haven't been full\-time very long and she's probably right. I just moved to a new town and I'm trying to be more confident now that I'm away from those who treated me badly in my hometown and I am doing a bit better but I still want to be more confident.I'm wondering if anyone else has felt this way. If so, how did you cope with it and what can I do to make myself realize that I'm able to just be a woman now??? Is this something that just goes away over time? Any advice would be appreciated.  Thanks\~Emmy [info] None [info] 1528686313 [info] valid
throwaway231918 [info] Can't bring myself to gain weight. Trigger warning for weight issues.Full disclosure, I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I do not have an issue with an eating disorder or BDD. I'm very controlling about my weight. Weight gain has been a huge trigger for me over the last few months. I try and keep my weight at 45kgs which I can acknowledge is underweight. The problem is I have a job interview requiring healthy BMI and I get extremely anxious everytime my weight even gets close to the 50kg mark and I have to skip a few meals to reach a weight I'm okay with. I just need to hit that mark so my BMI is stable and normal but it feels insurmountable at this point. I have my next appointment with my doctor on the 29th, my interview is on the 28th. Any advice would be great [info] None [info] 1560790043 [info] test
Godecapitator [info] It does help! I do know that but I value your response, thank u.  I *just* replied to a post in this sub advising to take their own time w telling a therapist their trauma. I realize now, maybe some background might help this post. I am also a victim of physical &amp; sexual abuse (not rape) I'm 38 &amp; a proud father of a 15 year old daughter &amp; 7 yr old son. I've been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; mood disorders. I've struggled w addiction most of my life but I've been sober for over a year :) I could not have done it w out the help of others, mostly my therapist &amp; now I hope to help others.  I realize now, the gist of my post, is that even though I've been victimized myself, I'm male &amp; want to be very sensitive to the female situation. Yes, I know men are raped also, but I know women are the majority of victims by male predators &amp; I'm hyper aware that I'm the same sex as most abusers. I don't want my sex to be a..trigger, so what can I do to neutralize that?..if that makes sense, any responses would be highly appreciated.Edit for clarity. [info] None [info] 1452372480 [info] train
camaro91087 [info] Chiari malformation or pinched nerve ?? So I’m a 29m and I have been diagnosed with anxiety last year. I started having headaches and I thought I had a brain tumor. So Last year I went to ER and had a ct scan on my head. The ER doctor said I might possibly have a Chiari malformation and to see a neurologist. So I seen a neurologist and he basically dismissed the whole thing with out doing a mri. He said I have a pinched nerve, just from looking at the ct scan. I constantly have headaches, stiff neck, and brain zaps( a random shooting pain) always on the right side of my head. The pain in my head is always on the back right side right above my neck. What do y’all think this could be? Should I have another ct scan? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1510675961 [info] valid
MOproblems614 [info] I'm scared they won't be around when I'm old when I was 17 I was with a girl that was 23 she have a script of 120 hydros and 90 blue/purple Xanax I'm 27 now and have never got a constant supply of opioids with back and knee problems and I have been diagnosed with anxiety could not get better than a script of .5 Klonopin I had for 3 years then jerked off of them gave only 2 months to taper down so I'm scared by the time I'm 40 opioids might be a drug of the past [info] None [info] 1561063784 [info] train
Iridaeth [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. It just seemed so different than other forms anxiety has taken with me. I will be going to a psychiatrist as soon as I possibly can. Just trying to figure some stuff out beforehand. Thank you for the reply. [info] None [info] 1554664413 [info] train
Verifiedvenuz [info] Is it possible to have a panic attack without a pain in your chest? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have had things that seemed like panic attacks but no chest pain. [info] None [info] 1549350509 [info] train
Empress618 [info] Freaking out, possibly pregnant I wanted to post somewhere. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on 20mg fluoxetine in September.  Since January i have felt pregnant. But every test has been negetive. [info] None [info] 1519866266 [info] valid
BunnySpice113333 [info] Struggling with my mental health during quarantine I feel like I'm loosing control. I was barely keeping it together before all this covid19 stuff but now I have lost all hope for my mental sanity. Even my suicidal thoughts have gotten worse. Soemtimes all i think about is how to die and what's the best way to go. Its gotten so bad that I even have dreams about jumping in front of a speeding bus or car. I also keep having outbursts of anger randomly throughout the day that are putting a strain on my relationships. Some days I have weird fantasies about beating up people and even animals with a baseball bat. It feels like everything triggers me, either the lights are too bright or too dim or the water is too warm or too cold. Things that were normal before are now triggering me into outbursts.  I talked to a psychologist who told me that everything I'm feeling is normal and that half of the world is experiencing what I'm experiencing so I don't have to worry and just find a hobby to do to get my mind off whatever triggers me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that's about it. Is this a form of anxiety? How do I control it? Is anyone feeling the same? [info] None [info] 1587928504 [info] train
Terradoe [info] I couldn't agree with this more. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have always had (undiagnosed) stomach issues. Because of life getting in the way, I have missed 2 weeks of my normal gym routine. I am having diarrhea and mind boggling cramps every day and my anxiety is so through the roof that I'm in a constant state of over stimulation, panic, and feeling like I'm going to throw up. Please note, I do not feel ANY of the above symptoms  (minus very occasional over stimulation and panic) when I work out regularly. Exercise really does make mental health problems significantly easier to manage.  [info] None [info] 1531618875
InkblotDoggo [info] My service dog. I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty early on, and in High School, I was assigned a service dog. His name was Baxter, and he was a German Shepherd. I was legally allowed to bring him to every class, though I remember I got weird looks from every teacher and staff member for the first few weeks that I had Baxter. Most of the upper staff, like the Principal and Superintendent, knew about my service animal and had cleared it, but I'll never forget my history teacher's expression the first time I brought Baxter into their class. [info] None [info] 1555688750 [info] test
youtbuddcody [info] I actually did have my head examined a month ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety and somitazitaion disorder... [info] Oh my God... You can talk! [info] 1398866118 [info] train
staringspace [info] Ultrarunning tips and tricks for long run anxiety Hi all,My background: Been running road for 5 years (half marathons, etc.), until I moved back home to the countryside. Ever since, I've been slowly building up my distances on trail and about 3 weeks ago I took part in my first trail race over half marathon distance (17 miles). It was hard (hilly and boggy, took longer than I wanted!) but I'm incredibly glad I did it, and it's opened me up to a lot of ideas regarding some ultras/multi-day adventures. I really want to do some crazy adventures like running Hadrian's Wall/running the length of some national parks in the UK.However, the one thing that's always held me back is the anxiety I get on long runs. No matter how much I prepare the night before, my GI system hates me the morning of a long run. As soon as I start, I normally feel okay, but then towards the end (normally when running distances that are unknown territory), my brain takes over and I keep worrying about if I'll faint/throw up/pass out and no one will find me. During the trail race, I started feeling pretty sick in the last 10km and even though I pulled through it without any consequences, the anxiety of keeling over in the middle of nowhere definitely slowed me down and made me lose time.For those who are seasoned at longer distances - what tricks do you use to try and keep your brain in the best shape possible on long runs (training or races)? How often do you rely on others to pull you out of any slumps you get?***TL;DR: Get anxious on long runs. What advice do you have for getting through those thoughts that you're going to pass out and die with no one to find you?*****Edit: Thank you so much for everyone’s responses so far, some stellar advice! Just so people know and something I didn’t disclose originally - I have been diagnosed with anxiety and running really helps with managing this. I also have no underlying conditions bar IBS, which has also been diagnosed and I’m under the impression this is also stress/anxiety related!** [info] None [info] 1572358003 [info] train
_Classic_Rando_ [info] Good for you OP! I was diagnosed with anxiety for ages before ADHD even came into my radar.After starting treatment, my anxiety got way better, but I still feel that general dread/snowballing thing now and then. I still want to get re-evaluated but I think my diagnosis of ADHD and generalised anxiety is more or less right. I'd say my brain's tomfoolery is 80% ADHD and 20% anxiety... But my suffering/ shitty life quality was definitely 80% down to anxiety. I felt so lost when I became so much more productive and functional, but still couldn't be happy... Anxiety is a thief of joy, for real. Only now, a year after diagnosis, am I learning ways to cope with life from the inside out. Onward and upward! [info] ADHD &amp; SO [info] 1509994537 [info] train
smolbeanlydia [info] Just fyi if this is for Psych I’m assuming this is about how social media impacts your mental health, so I think it should take into consideration people with already diagnosed conditions. I was diagnosed with anxiety wayyyyy before I found social media but in your data it could be used as a point that social media use and anxiety levels correlate when my disorder has nothing to do with it. Just want you to be aware people with previously diagnosed conditions may skew the results.  [info] 16 [info] 1553483016 [info] train
PM_ME_4_COKE_HOOKUP [info] I'm 24 and I've never had a seizure. Could I still have epilepsy?I know I have anxiety.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder (under control mostly), ADHD. [info] None [info] 1440417662 [info] train
kjm7 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I infrequently have panic attacks. When I do have one though it's generally right when I wake up. Pretty shitty way to start the day.  [info] None [info] 1423861688 [info] train
innerguide27 [info] Strange neurological symptoms - Clean Bloodwork, Brain MRI, EMG  Age: 26  Sex: Female Height: 5’2” Weight: 135lbs. Don't smoke, no drugs, no medication, occasional drinker. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I've had ongoing tendinitis and bursitis on my left shoulder (rotator cuff) for 3 years. So about a year ago (last November) I developed a sudden onset on myoclonus. My limbs jerked frantically (there was jerking at least every 20 seconds, 24/7, for 3 months straight). My hand would open and close by itself, my abdominal muscles would jerk my body one direction while my upper back muscles would tighten forcefully, only to release after 20 seconds or so while I gasped for air. Sometimes my throat muscles would twitch (I thought I would choke to death), my blood pressure would drop, I would get hot flashes, burning sensations, and pins &amp; needles all over my body.  I would feel myself go faint (but never did faint). I've been to the ER I believe 3 times over the last year. They would run tests, everything would come back normal, and they would dismiss my symptoms and tell me to go home. I consulted a neurologist, they've run test but the only thing they found "wrong" with me, was low ferratin levels so they prescribed me ferratin supplements and sent me on my way last December.  My neurologist did mention that my MRI showed some very small lesions on my spinal cord that could be caused by 3 years of chronic inflammation of my bad shoulder (I'm going to an orthopedic and physical therapist for this issue). However, it seems that they were so insignificant that he didn't even note them on my chart because my primary care provider said he didn't even mention them...The symptoms lessened in February of this year, but I still have ongoing myoclonus (My muscles jerk about 20-30 times a day now and my hand doesn't open and close often, still get abdominal muscle jerking and shoulder tightness). I still get occasional hot flashes/ burning sensations, and frequent pins &amp; needles. In July of this year,  I had sudden right calf pain and tightness while lying down, my heart sped up suddenly although I was calm moments prior due to the pain (I was lying down in bed) I felt faint as if my blood pressure went down, my limbs felt a tingling sensation and the left side of my face went numb. The episode lasted about 10 minutes. As the days went on I've developed a constant numb, and tingling sensation from my right knee to right toe. Went to the doctor, got dismissed, and to this day some nerve in my right toe feels weird and sensitive to the touch. I've gone on to develop stiffness in my arms, legs, and fingers.  Sometimes my right leg drags behind me. Got blood work done for arthritis and autoimmune diseases in September, and tested negative. Today, I was on public transport on the way home from work and my left arm, my jaw, tongue, and cheeks went numb. I was sitting straight and relaxed. The episode lasted about 10 minutes. I cried out of frustration of never having any answers. My doctors have all dismissed me, because I got diagnosed with anxiety when I was 18. It was situational, I'm 26 now. Anyways, any suggestions on what I should be testing for next?  Thank you to anyone who can help. [info] Patient [info] 1573617213 [info] train
Zale2160 [info] Just some of my concerns about switching to console from PC I’m switching from console to PC (obviously) I’ve made many post before asking if builds are good, and other questions I have about building, these are some concerns I still have, take note, most of these are very stupid and just me being anxious, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, i know they sound dumb1. How do I overclock my RAM to the 300mhz that is adveratised? 2. Wiring parts seems kinda confusing3. What drivers to i need to install4. Afraid I’ll somehow bend the pins on my Ryzen 26005. How will I know if temps of any of my parts are high, how do i know if they’re about to burnout, break the PC, catch of fire, and burn down my house (by far my dumbest concern on this list, yet the one im most concerned about)6. Last but not least. DOA parts, I know they aren’t common. But i have terrible luck. I bet there isn’t a worse feeling than putting your PC together, and the damn thing doesn’t even turn on. This kind of relates to the wiring, how will i know if a part is DOA, or I wired wrong, how will i know which wire i did wrong, or which part is DOA?Thanks for reading this, and thanks for anything you could say to maybe make me feel better [info] None [info] 1531716557 [info] train
xLordValx [info] My anxiety is interfering with my sleep. I take medication for anxiety and it ignores everything. Help? So here’s my main problem, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and take medications that I’m balancing out right now. Any time I attempt to sleep from the times of 9 AM to 8PM I’m jolted awake with a panic attack. Usually I can take my anxiety meds and just chill, but it ignores them completely during the day. I’m not anxious lately at all and haven’t no reason to be. This entire nocturnal anxiety started after my cat died in 2016 and I have had time to grieve and accept, so I don’t understand why this happens. I’m absolutely frightened to sleep and can’t nap at all if I haven’t slept due to being terrorized by these jolts of anxiety. [info] None [info] 1565801055 [info] train
katiebuggc [info] GAD Pals: How often does it bother you? Hello! So in November-ish, I was diagnosed with anxiety, particularly Generalized Anxiety Disorder (GAD). My psychiatrist mentioned the definition, and how it was characterized by a general sense of anxiety, doom, paranoia, etc. for more than however many weeks, blah blah blah.My question is: How often are my fellow GAD-ers (I'm non-medicated, but both medicated and non-medicated friends are welcome to give input!) bothered by their GAD symptoms? What feelings bother you the most?For example, over the past 9-12 months that I've exhibited symptoms, there's been maybe three or four days that I've felt "normal" (no weird symptoms, no overthinking, no cyclical thinking/worrying, the good stuff), and every day other than those I'm plagued most heavily by dread, irritability, and anxiety. Some nights I'll get very paranoid about some things. Edit: For clarification [info] None [info] 1522207051 [info] train
TheySayImZack [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, correct.  Yeah it did take some time for me.  I started to feel, well, different about 5 or 6 days in, but I couldn't put a finger on it.  I just rolled with it, kept going with the daily doses, and where I am at now definitely feels like a ramp upwards toward something so much better than where I was at a month ago.I'm glad to hear it's helped you.  It gave me a clarity that I didn't know I was struggling to achieve. [info] None [info] 1537136455 [info] valid
thesweetbabyg [info] That I was diagnosed with anxiety several months ago [info] None [info] 1561491219 [info] train
exscapegoat [info] At most places, technically no.  You either lie or give a vague "not feeling well" reason for not coming in.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild to moderate PTSD.  A few times a year, I may need an unscheduled day off (have never used up all of my sick days, btw).  I just say I'm not feeling well usually.  I have disclosed to my recent and current bosses that I have anxiety.  But I didn't go into the details of why.  I wish things were different, but there's a good chance I'm going to be judged negatively if I go into the details of why I'm missing work.  This is a news story about a woman who had a pretty understanding boss who rewarded her honesty.  This is the way it should be, but it's often not that way.http://www.cnn.com/2017/07/12/health/mental-health-response-from-company-ceo-trnd/index.html [info] None [info] 1510335793 [info] train
justatwister [info] I also went through a similar thing as a kid with the burglar stuff. It occurred during my tween years. I would check the doors and windows in the house several times before bed, and I slept with a bat next to my bed. I was in a constant panic that someone was going to break into our house in the night for some reason. I would often seek reassurance from others during conversations just to hear them tell me my intense fear of this was unlikely to turn into a reality. As an adult, I was diagnosed with anxiety, so a lot of things from childhood started to make sense in regards to my thought process.  [info] None [info] 1550989189 [info] test
Help_Me_Reddit01 [info] If I don’t stop, I’m going to allow my anxiety to ruin my relationship. Hi everyone! I’m a 24 year old female. I am diagnosed with anxiety and take Wellbutrin for it. I don’t have the best dating history, I’ve been screwed over more times than I can count and I’m now extremely guarded. This now just leads me to overthink every little thing and say what it to every single situation. Within the last week or so, I reconnected with a 27 year old male who I went to college with. He’s always tried to pursue something with me but we wanted different things at the time. He texted me this week asking me to just give him a chance after we had a brief conversation on Snapchat. We went back and forth for TWO days about possibly trying something out. He lives two hours away right now and really it’s not ideal. He asked me to meet him halfway to grab dinner, which we did last night. We now text just about 24/7 some of its sexual but for the most part it isn’t. We ate dinner and it was fine. Afterwards, we sat in my car for over two hours talking about everything. He explained how he’s 27 now and really just needs to get it together and settle down. He admitted he has feelings and such. I overthink things so I was skeptical of everything. He basically told me I’m in a huge emotional hole that I really need to start climbing out of because it’s just going to push people away. I brought up the idea that maybe he’s just putting on a front to get into my pants and honestly he wasn’t too happy that I said that and basically said if I wanted you for sex, I wouldn’t have driven over and hour for dinner and then sit here talking about a relationship with you for a couple hours. Overall the talk was good and now I just have thinking to do. Ultimately after hearing me ramble for over an hour he flat out asked me if I was even ready or could handle a relationship?I really said I don’t know more than I could count. I’m pretty sure that’s all I could say. I told him I really just needed to think about things and seemed a little confused/disappointed because he was putting it all out on the table and the only thing I could say was “I don’t know”.  We did kiss, he played with my hair and kissed my forehead. It was all fine. He asked to see me again today but, I’m leaving for vacation tomorrow morning for a week so I needed to pack and so on. So I’m supposed to see him when I get back from my trip. He asked which part of Florida I’ll be in, which is Miami. He’s concerned I’ll find a guy in Florida and that Miami is completely unsafe (he’s a cop). I’m constantly thinking everything he’s saying and doing are all a front but I have nothing to support that other than he was only into casual relationships in 2015, which I did also address yesterday. How in the hell do I allow myself to chill the hell out without reading into or overthinking every single thing he does or says. I’m driving myself nuts and I really don’t know how long he’s going to remain patient with me. [info] None [info] 1563224902 [info] train
hashtaggaysfortrump [info] How is that “transphobic” exactly? He removed an executive order made by Obama that let people who never were mentally fit to serve into our millitary. I’m gay and support trans people but if I got denied because I was diagnosed with anxiety why should they qualify when they have a mental disorder and a 40% attempted suicide rate?  [info] None [info] 1511161313 [info] test
Speed0c [info] I have had the pleasure of trying this strain. I’m not exactly an introvert, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I remember this strain being one of the better ones. Cheers! [info]  [info] 1560720998
Williampram23 [info] Push through and feel normal once more I’m mostly talking to drinkers and smokers here. It’s been almost a month since my last smoke and half a year since my last drink and I feel absolutely amazing. The driving for me to quit alcohol was my performance in university had gone down significantly and as a result I failed and had to start all over again, not only that I felt my body getting weaker and weaker and my skin looking disgusting every morning. As for cigarettes, I could easily smoke a pack a day. Cigarette was a huge part of my life, so much so that I started bumming them off people, picking them up from the ground, and rolling up old tobacco from cigarette butts, it was embarrassing. Every night when I sleep I had to sit up straight to breathe properly and it got so bad that my entire body would go numb and tingly.I was the extreme example of addiction I guess you could say, I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD which made the quit even harder, but I made it in the end. It was shocking how amazing I felt even after a couple days. It was like I was living a new, healthier life. This wasn’t because of Jesus, muhammad, moses, buddha or vishnu, it was my own decision to quit and my own dedication to the quit which made it happen.How did I do it? Avoid smokers, meditate, exercise, jacking off, having sex, playing games, focusing on your hobbies. These are the things which got me through this.Good luck everyone. [info] None [info] 1557710524 [info] test
amoz2k12 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I only really stress out when I'm driving if it snows or if it's thunderstorming at night. I'm really light sensitive and for some reason lightning in a night sky gives me horrible headaches. Other than that driving daily is just boring. I've driven 1000 miles alone before and that really sucked. [info] https://amzn.com/w/332121UEHWAN1 [info] 1452195874 [info] test
venhedis [info] I'm never sure if I have "real" panic attacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and everything, but so far the worse I've ever gotten is sobbing while feeling like I'm going to throw up.My usual panic state is basically being very very uncomfortable while trying to bottle the above. [info] Shitlord [info] 1452397304 [info] train
piclemaniscool [info] That's very important. I was diagnosed with anxiety partly because of my obsession for perfectionism. When I took a summer class in order to raise my GPA (I needed a C to make it an acceptable level) I didn't do one assignment. Even after all the talks about accepting all of this my dad kept asking why I refused to do that particular assignment when I *could*. I showed him my current average and how even if I got terrible grades for all future projects my final grade would be a B. He reluctantly accepted. Point of my story is that it is deeply ingrained in people through generations and it takes some serious introspection to reverse much of the damage it causes. We live in a world where well supported kids are living in fear because they genuinely believe that if they fail it is literally the end of the world. Teaching someone how to lose is twice as important as how to win, I'd say.  [info] None [info] 1382378999 [info] train
HollisFenner [info] Entering* Thank you so much for doing this giveaway! I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and have had trouble finding a job that doesn't make me extremely uneasy and it has been rather hard to leave my house as of late. Again, thank you so much for you kindness, it is greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1399074132 [info] test
woundedbearhair [info] ADD/ADHD can be misdiagnosed as having anxiety and that tends to be alleviated by the medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago by a doctor who had no real clue how to test for ADD/ADHD since it was pretty common for people to think that it went away as you got older. Shocker! It doesn't! [info] None [info] 1556135829 [info] train
Micropod104326 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety but I can't say that I have it anymore.If you have Clinical Depression, then it could be a result of different physical reactions in your brain. There is a theory called Determinism which I think states that every action and thought is merely a result or reactions between particles in your brain.So that might explain a lot of mental illnesses and other things. [info] None [info] 1498039427 [info] train
foofooonyou [info] I have the same problem.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. Have you been through any traumatic events that would cause your paranoia?  Another awesome release on reddit is RAOA for positive friends and random discussion.  Also,  giving/receiving gifts from friends brings an awesome feeling. Also, as someone who suffers and battles these things, you can PM me anytime if you need to talk.  Sticking together as a team to motivate each other I feel is the best thing we can do,  for only we can truly understand those crazy feelings. Best of luck to you my friend. [info] None [info] 1364146762 [info] train
douchebag_tom [info] I get dizzy, but it goes away when driving or playing a musical instrument. What's wrong with me? As I said in the title, I get dizzy for no reason that I can detect. Sometimes I get nauseous, but never to the point I'm going to throw up. Going for a walk, driving, and playing bass/drums makes it go away. It doesn't make any sense to me. I'm overweight and am terrified that I might get diabetes, so I try to eat earthy and exercise. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I don't feel anxious or stressed anymore. I tend to get indigestion a lot and I am fighting off a sinus infection.i know both of these things can cause dizziness, but why would playing music help? [info] None [info] 1358126141 [info] valid
cudger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last summer and it was almost terrifying how easily the doctor prescribed me with pills instead of offering other solutions.  [info]  [info] 1400782978 [info] train
AshPaws [info] This type of behaviour during me growing up is what made me spite my mother. Nothing was enough, and enough was nothing to her. No wonder I was diagnosed with anxiety after my teen years shortly before moving out. Took me a while to realise that caring about petty things only gave a more negative impact than a positive one in regards of trying to be better (e.g "Oh finally you come out of your cave! HAHAHA") [info] None [info] 1561022552 [info] valid
bigangryhobbit [info] I am no stranger to mental illness, and I know what its like to not be able to finish school because of it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder with agoraphobia 20 years ago.  It was tough.  I went to college 3 times and never could keep it together becuase of classroom anxiety/panic.  I tried every medication imaginable during those 20 years.  I have been self employed for half of that time.  I could never work a physically demanding job unfortuantely.  Somehow, I continue to push on.  Its nice to have come into contact with you.  Its hard to find people that truly understand what living with a mental disability is like, and how much of an obstacle it is.  We aren't lunatics, we just have a health disorder like anybody else that may have something wrong with them.  Good luck to you!  Always have hope that things can change for the better, no matter how bleak it may seem.  I have been off of all medications for 4 years and live a better life than I ever have. I can't even remember when my last panic attack was.  Namaste [info] None [info] 1557256950 [info] train
boom_pow [info] My marijuana manifesto (why not?) I have smoked pot since I was a freshman in collage. 3 years now. It started small and became that which consumed me, everyday. I smoked myself silly, throwing down so hard it hurt. I Essentially failed out of college while still being enrolled. I have taken time off. When I did , I took pot along for the ride and it as possibly the most unmotivated time in my life. I started caring more when I ran out. I found more and fell back into my old pattern, even buying more devices and such. Having stopped smoking voluntarily ( cigarettes and pot) and exercising, I have noticed I care more. It's still a chore to leave bed in the morning, but it's not in a pot haze. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and medicate with alcohol in social situations. ( figure its the same as benzodiazepines which I half-want my therapist to prescribe but I still want to be me') alcohol ftw I guess. I'm not an alcoholic, but it sure helps me talk to people, it removes my anxiety filter that makes me think forever about everything.Anyway I'm returning to school, and I finally have an ideas about who I want to be when I am my parents age. I feel like I grew up. I hope this feeling lasts. It has to; I want it to; I need it to.Thanks r leaves for being here to hear me. [info] None [info] 1304234348 [info] valid
justademonindisguise [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety (specified, unspecified) because of the fact that a lot of it stems from my schizophrenia. I was told it's very common in people on the schizo spectrum. I was prescribed anti-anxiety meds for it but I try to do other stuff to ease my anxiety before I take them. I find that the more anxious I am the more psychotic I am which leads to more anxiety and it's a never ending cycle so it's good to get it treated if you can.  [info] None [info] 1502762800 [info] train
antiqueguy19001 [info] Thanks for the very helpful post! It helped a lot reading this, thanks for typing it all out. Anxiety has plagued me my whole life, even at age 5 I didn't leave my house for weeks, scared that the planets would fall! I don't get as many all-out panic attacks anymore (though still some small ones more often), but the constant anxiety that I get about most things is very bad. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and want to see a therapist for it, but am scared that they will find a whole new problem with me. My parents told me that I should definitely see one anyway though, because it will make me feel a lot better to deal with my anxiety.As for my lymphoma worry, in the year that I didn't pay any attention to any larger nodes, I didn't worry once, or even feel any swollen nodes. It seems like my anxiety seems to get worse towards the end of the year anyway though, as the days get shorter and colder. I was a little relieved today when I read in many places that follicular lymphoma (the type I have been the most scared about), doesn't occur in it's normal form in people under 20 or 30, only a pediatric version (which is highly curable in almost all cases, unlike the normal follicular lymphoma, which occurs almost only in age 50 or older and is tougher to treat), and even then is only diagnosed around 25 times a year (which I said before). When my anxiety really gets bad though, I will be completely convinced I am one of those people. Luckily my dad made me feel better by showing my a rather large neck node he has had for decades that has been fine, and before he gained a lot of weight, says that he also could feel plenty of groin nodes too. My mom also has some rather large lymph nodes on her armpit which aren't cancer either.I am generally always at my happiest when I don't think about all the things I can't control that could go wrong, such as getting randomly killed by a murderer or drunk driver while walking on the street, or in this case cancer. Most of the time though I am forgetting about all the things that could go wrong, and enjoying myself biking, hiking and overall doing fun activities. It seems like it is late a night when I have most of my worst anxiety. I have never smoked or drank alcohol (or any other drug for that matter), not wanting to risk my health in a preventable way, a more positive side effect of anxiety I guess.Thanks again for the great reply!&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1542253010
Legolas170 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yeah, I know what I'm talking about. Fortunately social interactions don't causes them to trigger generally, I imagine that's hell for those people. Nice burn tho  [info] None [info] 1542350198 [info] valid
flightoftheswan [info] Dream's about being back at high school I have reoccurring dreams of being back at my high school (Private, read context below). I always ask myself the question while I'm in those dreams; "Didn't I already finish high school Already?." Does anyone have an idea of the meaning behind these dreams? It always seems to be set in the first high school I attended and not the second one.  So a little context. So I'm 23 now and I went to 2 different high schools. I went to a private school for about 4 years and had trouble with my grades and didn't really pay attention in class, I ended up changing to a public school for 2 years and completed it. I did not do well but at least I passed with very low marks. This was 5 years ago and since then I have not attended University or anything and feel as though I have wasted the last 5 years partying and achieving little. I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a therapist and quite stressed with where I am in life at the moment [info] None [info] 1580215547 [info] train
givemeaholler2 [info] Hmm maybe you’re right. I have no gotten a teeth cleaning in god knows how long (American health care amirite). I have been diagnosed with anxiety (emotional issues) and perhaps I over reacted. [info] None [info] 1568491597 [info] test
lildoxie [info] Quitting a job... I was diagnosed with anxiety last summer, and it’s through the roof this week as I am quitting my job soon. Does anyone have advice or tips for quitting and how to reduce my anxiety about it? [info] None [info] 1528606569 [info] train
SeaBeeDecodesLife [info] You’re absolutely not over-thinking it. She wants you to handle your child’s aggression and control issues by aggressively shoving him in the shower and showing him that you can overpower him. It just makes me sad that people act like children that young have no feelings, and the only way to get through to them is by physically overpowering them and proving that you’re the boss. But in reality, whatever your son’s dealing with is an emotional issue, and he’s throwing tantrums because he’s unable to verbally express what he’s going through and he’s frustrated. If there was an adult who started crying because they were in the middle of an argument and they were unable to express their feelings accurately, would we presume they were just trying to be difficult and grab them and shove them in the shower? No. Kids have feelings too, and deserve to be emotionally validated and have time to learn how to express what’s going on inside of them, not be physically overpowered. God, I’m sorry. You’re a wonderful mother though, and she shouldn’t have tried to target you like that in a vulnerable time. In all reality, she might’ve genuinely thought she was being helpful, but you just *don’t* handle a child that way when they’re struggling emotionally.Hell, I remember throwing tons of tantrums when I was four just because I was so frustrated. I was witnessing things kids shouldn’t have had to witness, and I didn’t know how to verbally express what was happening or what I was feeling, so I just cried and screamed to get the anger and frustration and grief out whenever something triggered me. I was diagnosed with anxiety that same year, when everyone else had been telling my mother to whoop my ass. I can’t imagine how horrifically traumatised id be if she really had done that, or shoved me in a cold shower, when I was struggling like that—because I *remember* what I was feeling. Anyway, I’m rambling, but I hope I gave you another perspective so you feel a tad more valid in your response. [info] None [info] 1548311486 [info] train
Jokerlolcat [info] Say, I'm not 100% sure but I do have ADHD but I was diagnosed with anxiety before. My anxiety can get pretty bad and even kept me put of work for a bit. Is there any way that could help? I need to find out who would help diagnose me lol [info] None [info] 1562915035 [info] train
emmysobes [info] Ugh, slight would be an understatement. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/ocd for over 20 years. Have had PTSD since I was a teenager. It’s ALL gotten worse since having my daughter. I didn’t realize how much of a delicate balance I had going before I had her. We tried for a baby because I felt great, normal even! But then once morning sickness hit...bye bye. I saw other posters mention rage; yeah, hello🙋🏻‍♀️ [info] None [info] 1560301110 [info] train
-thebritishempire- [info] Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1426532675 [info] test
Mollyu [info] 1. I go to therapy twice a month for the anxiety but that's about it since that's all my insurance wants to cover.2. I was diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety at ten and the other ones at 12 and I'm 14 1/2 now. [info] None [info] 1476284341 [info] train
boop_attack [info] How do I keep myself from getting really anxious during a nosebleed? I feel really, really silly asking this. Backstory: Every winter, due to a combination of dry air, allergies, blowing my nose, medication, and sometimes the flu or a cold, I tend to get nosebleeds. Most of the time they're no big deal and stop after a few minutes. Sometimes they're bad and don't stop for 10-20 minutes. I know how to handle them, but I can't help becoming extremely anxious - heart pounding, shortness of breath, dry mouth, shaking, stomach and bowels twisting up and feeling like they're about to evacuate their contents - almost building up to a panic attack. I try to tell myself it will be ok, I've handled nosebleeds before, I can deal with this too and it'll all be fine. But just when I start to calm down something will trigger the anxiety again - the blood, fear that it won't stop bleeding, etc. An explanation of that latter fear: A few years ago I became really sick. I was prescribed Advil, a blood thinner, and because of the dry air and illness and bad luck, ended up having nose hemorrhages several times and had to go to the hospital to get my nose packed. So when I see blood gushing out, I'm terrified that my nose is hemorrhaging again and won't stop, though it hasn't happened since and I'm careful that none of the meds I take are blood thinners or have that side effect.Also, I'm not digging for gold in my nose, I promise haha! The nosebleeds can start if I sniff or blow my nose or get very hot or get out of bed in the morning If I can't seem to calm down after a nosebleed, I'll take an anti-anxiety medication (I have been diagnosed with anxiety but have gotten better at managing it without medication, which I now use if other techniques aren't working.)Please be gentle... I feel massively pathetic asking this question. But I just want to know if I'm not alone or if anyone has helpful advice. Thank you a bunch :)PS: before anyone asks, yes I do get my flu vaccination every year :) but still may catch it once a year.EDIT: forgot to mention that I do use a humidifier and lubricating nose sprays and petroleum jelly. Also, sorry for this being so long. [info] None [info] 1547443821 [info] train
Ankaaan [info] Anxiety of taking meds Hey buds,I have been diagnosed with anxiety for many years now and gone through several years of different therapies. I have apart from panic attacks, severe health anxiety. I get really anxious about taking all kind of meds, because of how it changes how I feel. I have been adamantly against being prescribed anything due to this, but I was recently prescribed Atarax anyways and I haven't stepped up and had the balls to take it yet. I feel horrible today and I know I should take it, but I just can't force myself to it. Did anyone experience the same thing? How did you get past it?Thanks. [info] None [info] 1474217012 [info] train
thepinklemur [info] This sub feels like a guardian angel right now. Thank you I had no idea this sub existed. I'm crying right now because of how supportive and beautiful this community seems. I love the top posts, I relate to the resent posts, I think I've upvoted almost everything!!I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and I've been getting pretty good at dealing with it. I don't have social anxiety like a lot of you guys seem to but I have chronic panic attacks that can be triggered by issues or by things that are as simple as being in a room with too many people or being in a room where things are too loud. Been on lexapro, Xanax, some other less common SSRIs...I'm sure this is not unfamiliar to most of you. I decided a few years ago to deal with this issue medication free and it's hard but I've gotten okay at calming myself down. Anyway. I had a panic attack today and I'm overseas and I felt so alone- I couldn't handle it by myself. I felt Like no one could help me. Hadn't been on Reddit for a while and just decided I should since I couldn't sleep... I'm so glad I did. Now I'm crying again but in a good way! Lil cheesy but Thank you for helping me feel a little less alone [info] None [info] 1578547985 [info] train
Ginger29 [info] Yeah, I'm sure it's different.  It's always made me uncomfortable, too, way before I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I really didn't socialize with other kids and didn't learn how to behave "properly."  So now I'm trying to learn how to do all that stuff everyone knows how to do and it makes my anxiety insane.  But yeah, I'm basically uncomfortable with eye contact, which my loved ones know and allow, or I'm staring at strangers like a crazy robot.  It's awesome. [info] None [info] 1544423382 [info] train
havoc_unit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before and have already gotten treatment for it, which works pretty well. This feels more like I need to learn coping mechanisms for this type of situation. I'll certainly bring it up to my doctor again. [info] INTJ [info] 1454837615 [info] train
imnotpants [info] I’m interesting in applying for the air force but I just found out that when I went to therapy a few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I went back to therapy and I was diagnosed with multiple other mental disorders. Do these factors keep me from being eligible for the Air Force? What have you experienced with mental health confidentiality when joining the Air Force? Am I allowed to keep these things a secret? Thanks for any answers! [info] None [info] 1540422404 [info] train
misterbecca [info] Given I'm not as old as you are (I was just diagnosed at age 25), I never really considered that I could be on the spectrum until my most recent therapist suggested it. My brother was diagnosed in high school and I work with children with autism for my job, but they all seem so different from me that I didn't think I was also autistic. Similar to you, I was diagnosed with anxiety and always just assumed that I had social anxiety because I was awkward and that was that. I have sensory issues but always just told myself I was being too sensitive. I stim, but learned to primarily do it in "socially acceptable" ways like knee bouncing, and always told myself that was just my anxiety. I have other compulsive behaviors (I was also diagnosed with OCD on top of the ASD so who knows what the root of that is, but point is, it was all chalked up to general anxiety until recently). Basically, I blamed all of my "quirks" on my anxiety and didn't think I could be on the spectrum like the other autistic people I knew because it presented differently in all of them. I'm also struggling with taking the news in, and feel like I'm going back and analyzing every experience I've had and thinking about how it's been affected by my ASD. I also am paranoid now that other people see me as really awkward--up until now, I've felt like I've masked the awkwardness pretty well, and as awkward as I've felt, I've had some confidence that others can't see it. But now I don't know. I like to think I'm self-aware and decent at reading other people's emotions, but now that I've been diagnosed with ASD, I don't know if that's possible. It's hard not to keep internalizing the generalizations about ASD that I've heard about all of the other autistic people in my life. [info] Recently Diagnosed [info] 1555532809 [info] train
Google24 [info] Full on grown-up style that I'm not ready for. I absolutely can't deal with stress because I was diagnosed with anxiety. It's frustrating because I would like to date someone. [info] None [info] 1386388631 [info] train
mad_zamboni [info] I'm curious, do you take medication to help? An ex-GF was agoraphobic and it took therapy to help her come out of it. I was diagnosed with anxiety late in life and managed it for a while with counseling, but ended up going on a low dose of medicine that helps dramatically.Mad props for coming here to socialize, it's a step in the right direction. Isolation can be bad if done too much.  [info] http://a.co/csI3Ii3 [info] 1489154414 [info] train
BlueReflection0 [info] Enneagram 3 or 6? I'm glad I've found a group for 6s :) henlo!! For those who know enneagram well (I dont tbh) could you help me work this out?I'm not interested in success much. But I've always had a really strong pull towards needing to stand out and needing to be seen for someone unique and special, sometimes it stresses me out because this feeling gets me on everything, even organising folders I'm just like I need to be the best at organising! I'm not a 4, I've checked a lot. I like a bit of sadness, but I'm afraid of going too deep into melancholy, I find it easier to be positive most of the time. I've always had a built in need to be true to myself, except it's running in the background behind my other wants, like wanting to be liked and accepted, and admired. Sometimes i get into inner conflict between these two things :0. I'm not ambitious either tbh, and I'm more idealistic/romantic than pragmatic.I'm diagnosed with anxiety so I often show up on tests as a 6w5/6w7. Whats confusing is that, yes, I definitely have the need for safety and security somewhere inside of me, but I feel like the most important thing to me is being liked by people and loved, and standing out as someone unique, special and admirable. That FEELS more important than safety. but my actions never show it much. Also, I'm a loner. I prefer to be by myself than with others, yet i want to stand out and i want to belong at the same time. Confusing, I know. I'm a loner just out of choice - I dont have distrust in people at all, i just prefer my own company most of the time. [info] None [info] 1572974554 [info] valid
bluerbythesecond [info] You are right, but I don't think I can. My parents don't really believe in mental illnesses of any sort, or even talking to counselors or psychologists. Like they'd just force me to eat if I did tell them about this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, a month later they decided theres no such thing as needing medication for anxiety and I just need to grow out of it  [info] None [info] 1522430484 [info] train
cola_pop [info] Thank you! I really want to try! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was separated from my twin sister in school. It really affected me to the point where I developed OCD and kept on washing my hands over and over. I was always a shy quiet kid so I believe ive always had it. Another issue I have with it is kinda embarrassing but I also suffer from IBS which is triggered by my anxiety! Why must I be human :| lol [info] None [info] 1515780052 [info] train
cas18khash [info] I used to go a lot but usually a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues and late adhd and the medication I took completely changed my life. If it wasn't for that psychiatrist, I would be living very differently now! I always encourage people to visit a psychologist or a psychiatrist and talk about their problems. Sometimes they're easily dealt with using some professional guidance.  [info] 19 [info] 1362989462 [info] valid
TripleGenesis [info] I’m going through that right now with my ADHD. My medicine has slowly been less and less effective since 7th grade. That’s when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was put on Prozac and it made me (what I think is) high. So I disregarded his diagnosis. Just yesterday my doctor told me that Anxiety can effect ADHD and make it worse, and I was diagnosed again. Hopefully when the medicine starts to work, I can focus again. [info] None [info] 1548781952 [info] test
BurntCalorie [info] I was diagnosed ADHD at the age of 25. But when I visited another psychiatrist,  she said she didnt think I had it. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 12.I know for sure I have anxiety issues. Not sure about the ADHD because some of the symptoms, I don't suffer from. And they do say anxiety can share similar traits to adhd [info] None [info] 1572789115 [info] valid
pbwarren2001 [info] Well, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so it makes sense to me that alcohol would make it worse, and that it would continue throughout my drinking. If I was not constantly in a state of fear about what other people think of me in the moment then I would probably be blackout drunk at that point. [info] :nato: NATO [info] 1558981931 [info] train
MeganIsACat [info] I agree... kinda. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I know what it is like. I think people without a diagnosis should not be using it as an excuse at all, therefore I agree with you about that. I do not however agree with your opinion if a person is diagnosed. If they are, I think the person has a right to be able to say that they can't get something done because of it. [info] None [info] 1538264502 [info] train
stillhavehope99 [info] I still have love for my abusive father (Trigger Warning: abuse, violence, suicide threat)&amp;#x200B;I'm a 20-year-old woman who grew up in an abusive household. My father was physically and emotionally abusive, mostly to my mother but sometimes to me and my sister too. He put his hands around my mother's neck, threatened her with all manner of horrible things (including a knife, which my mother no longer remembers), threw her to the ground and repeatedly kicked her in the back, punched her hard enough to give her a concussion, would threaten to kill himself as a way of controlling her, threatened to crash the car with all of us in and would drive dangerously...Once he held me at the top of a very tall ladder leading into the attic and threatened to drop me. I was six.&amp;#x200B;I would list all the bad things my father did, but it could fill a book. Suffice to say it, he was not the best father. My mother and father are now in the process of getting divorced, and they live on opposite ends of the country. My dad doesn't take responsibility for anything he did - he believes that mum "made him that way" and would "turn him into a monster", and whenever I see him he badmouths my mother and tries to turn me against her. Sometimes he gaslights me and tries to convince me that things I remember happening didn't happen, or happened very differently. &amp;#x200B;My mother, my sister, and me have been deeply effected by it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, CPTSD, and OCD (the OCD being a coping mechanism I developed to deal with growing up in that house). My sister also struggles with mental health issues and has been vulnerable to similar relationships with similar men. My mother's self esteem was completely broken down by the violence, and she believed for a long time that she was worthless, because my father treated her like she was. &amp;#x200B;I still love my father.&amp;#x200B;For a long time I did not. From the age of 12 to about 18 I hated him with the passion of a thousand suns, and planned to never speak to him again after I left home. But hating him took so much energy, and I was too tired to be mad at the way he treated me or my family anymore. I broke. Now we're in contact and sometimes we have a good time together, though it's usually tempered by his outbursts or gaslighting. I know he isn't a good person. I know he's done irreparable damage to me and the people I love. I know he'll never accept responsibility for it, or apologise, or change. I know it hurts my mother that I'm still in contact with him and she feels personally betrayed. And yet, I still have love for my father. Sometimes I feel sorry for him because he was himself abused as a child, even though I know that is never an excuse. &amp;#x200B;Is being in contact with him enabling him? Betraying my mother and sister? Should I cut him off? [info] None [info] 1563709099 [info] train
rubncto [info] Drank a Rockstar, and subsequently had dream paralysis and LD happened. I had not heard of this subreddit before, but I have been able to LD since I was about 8 years old. I never track when I get them, but last night I had a Rockstar(vitamin b-12), not to LD but to study, before I slept and I had intense paralysis and subsequent entering into the dream world where I flew and was running away from something evil the LD was not pleasant. I guess this is a thank you to you guys for helping me to understand why and how LDs happen. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and was wondering if this is common with LDers. [info] None [info] 1382614689 [info] train
HideInTheHouse [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I would go to the silent kitchen and make me something to eat when I got home from school, or the silence of the bathroom to refresh my brain. Bask in the nothingness.  [info] None [info] 1553819034 [info] train
TorradaTorradinha [info] What do you mean by dissociated? I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was like 4 years old but I'm 19 now and idk if it might have gone away or evolved into something else, I don't wanna say I have a condition without proper diagnosis [info] None [info] 1570675701 [info] train
CrowWithARose [info] Depression, Anxiety, Bipolar? 24 Year Old  Caucasion Female, 5'2, 150 lbsDuration  ~ 2 monthsCurrently taking birth control and thyroid medication (levothyroxine 50MG)WAS taking anxiety medication (Zoloft 50MG) (Not anymore because my doctor left, didn't tell me and no one knows where she now works)I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was around 14. I've been anxious since I was around 5, or at least that's my earliest memory of it. I was always just labeled as shy until I actually brought it up at an appointment when I was 14 (er, well, my mom did)I'm going to the doctor again, but I'm not really sure what I should say or ask.I'm afraid of getting a wrong diagnosis. I'm NOT using this as a diagnosis, I just want to have an idea before I go.Ok, I've been feeling...bad? Not all the time, just about 60% of the time I'd say.It did start somewhat before I had to stop taking my anxiety medication. It has gotten significantly worse thought. I stopped taking it about a month ago. My symptoms include:*Aching-  (kinda like I'm sore) all over*Fatigue - (I could sleep 12 hours and still be exhausted)*Distracted - I start on one thing and get bored or just start doing something else without even really thinking about it*I get a depressed feeling - I don't want to do anything, I feel bad about myself, I feel like I'm not doing enough, Wonder why I'm even trying, Don't want to get up, Hopless *Easily irritated - It's like small things can make me annoyed but things that should make me angry don't bother me as much*Anxiety - Usually a "shaking" feeling inside (I'm not sure how to describe it), trouble breathing, heart racing, racing thoughts, fidgiting *OCD type patters - Counting to 3 before I allow myself to do things, touching random things as I pass, moving objects - all so something "bad" doesn't happen.I feel shitty now that I've actually typed everything and I see all the things wrong with me. I have a very stressful job and I feel like it may have brought this on.Please help. I'd really appreciate it. I haven't told anyone so I'd like anonymous input, as weird as that is. I just don't want my loved ones to know how bad I am mentally right now. I also want to know what to expect. I'm obviously very nervous and don't want to get hit hard by what the doctor may say. [info] None [info] 1542176372 [info] train
chriswha [info] I‘m abroad and can‘t deal with it. Hi r/helpme, so my problem isn‘t as big as many here but I don‘t know what to do.So I just moved to Barcelona for two semester abroad and I was really excited for it. However now I‘m here and I hate everything about it. I‘m scared to go outside alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety and after about a year of therapy everything seemed Fine and I haven‘t been in therapy for 6 months. As soon as I landed in Barcelona it kicked in again.My best Friend came today to visit me and I thozght it would help since I won’t feel alone but thats not the case. I like being alone usually. Today I even thought if there was an accident I could go home without looking like a pussy.Has anyone felt like this before?Thank you ❤️ [info] None [info] 1567550900 [info] train
wuverul [info] Welbutrin for 5-6 months, Buspar for 1 month, feeling kind of messed up, not sure what to do.. So.. Idk what's going on at this point. Things just don't feel right. I hate just hopping into forums just to ask questions without really being able to do much in return, but.. I wanted to ask someone about this before I call the doctor tomorrow. TLDR of what's been going on. I was diagnosed with anxiety in late '14. Went without medically treating it up until Jan 2016 when I was sick of constant pains, especially chest pains. Doc prescribed me prozac, was suicidal within weeks, so I was pulled off of that. I was then put on Welbrutrin. Felt like I was in a better mood overall but always tense and easily startled/worked up still.. So he added Buspar. I've been on it for a month. First few days I didn't feel too different, but then my chest felt kind of.. odd when I was going to bed. Freaked me out, and the feeling lessened when I was freaked out. 2-3 days later I kinda felt various muscles when that happened and everything else was actually not tense for once so I figured the feeling was me being unused to muscles being relaxed. This went away a couple of weeks in... until 4-5 days ago when it came back. I was confused, and intended to call the doc but then got caught up in stuff and got way too busy. I intended to call tomorrow, and still do, but today has been an adventure. I woke up and went to the restroom.. and almost fell sideways off the toilet. I had JUST woken up (and I stopped feeling like I should just lay in bed for an extra hour or two after waking up) and felt that the fact that I'm out of bed sooner contributed to it because I wasn't awake enough to have good balance. 4-5 hours later I went to the restroom again. Felt kind of lightheaded while looking down. Was confused about it and started getting worried... Feeling went away though. Not long ago, though, I was just making myself some dinner and kneeled down to grab a lid to the pan I was using and almost toppled over when I started looking down into the place we store 'em. It's starting to scare the living hell out of me. I just started a refill of the Buspar last night, but the pills are identical. I have no idea what to think, what to do, etc, and now that I'm getting worked up about it I can't stay still, I'm tense, my throat feels tight-ish, and scared to death that it's my heart although my pulse seems completely steady, albeit at a high bpm because of stress.While I've been feeling mildly anxious still, there ARE reasons for me to feel anxious for once right now... A math professor has practically vanished on me and her grades for my course are now 3 days overdue, plus my boyfriend is coming over in a few days to stay for a week, only our second time actually being together in person in a 4 year long distance relationship. Plus finances are a wreck and always are. Even so, that shouldn't make me light headed and mess up my balance I'd imagine.. [info] None [info] 1466988349 [info] test
Christ_on_a_Crakker [info] I have only taken it before I go to sleep so I wouldn’t know. I should try it for anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a long time.  I have just learned to cope with it.   [info] None [info] 1545598109 [info] train
CornOnTheKobGuy [info] Dude you aren't alone in that looping. The second time I smoked I hit it hard, didn't realize I had anxiety and then I lost touch with reality only to come back to it which was, in a sense, even more terrifying because I knew that it was actually happening. Since then I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Turns out my mom suffers from it too. I don't really smoke any more.  [info] None [info] 1371277396
AbsentMindedArtist [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety but none of those. However, my mind is constantly going and I often have to redirect. I also remember as a kid if I did something to one side of my body, I had to make things even and do it fo the other. However I never thought much of it and slowly phased it out. This is interesting though because during the last two intense episodes, my body began turning in a circle, repeatedly waving a hand gesture in each direction (NESW). I don’t know much about OCD. Is this a combination of an OCD ritual and my ts?  [info] None [info] 1543113960 [info] train
another30yovirgin [info] I've seen maybe 5 different therapists over the years, and yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and they were trying to work on that with me. I haven't been hitting on tons of girls over and over, because uh, yeah, anxiety. But I've asked women out before. I've been on some dates. Not recently. I'm definitely not trying now, and for a long time I haven't been able to bring myself to do it. It's just awful trying to date. So if you want to blame it on me, go ahead. So there you go. I'm hopeless. [info] None [info] 1508552979 [info] train
CoolJoey99 [info] I thought as much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I didn't connect this paranoia with that.Unfortunately, I have no one to talk to at the moment. My family doesn't believe in mental health and I'm home for the vacation so no therapist or doc anytime soon. [info] None [info] 1559406374 [info] train
pcs199 [info] Need to vent. Worn out from fear of epilepsy among other things. So a little while back I posted about how I get deja vu all the time, and how Dr. Google diagnosed me with temporal lobe epilepsy. This obsession has been paralyzing me ever since, and anywhere I go I get deja vu triggered by anything really. It got real bad when I traveled far away this March, but died down like a month later. Not too long later, I got super stressed, anxious, and obsessed over a girl that I liked at the time, and the deja vus came back and have stayed since. It can last for any amount of time. My psychologist tells me it's derealization, and my doctor (who is fantastic and has known me since I was a baby) knows my history of anxiety and OCD well so he pretty much told me to knock it off lol. What scares me though is I've read stories from people with temporal lobe epilepsy that they get misdiagnosed with anxiety etc. Of course, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD since I was very young, so this is just an irrational thought pattern. I have a family history of anxiety disorders, but none of epilepsy. That helps reassure me a little bit, but not really.I get a bunch of other physical anxiety symptoms. I get so many I can't list them all, but I have constant vision symptoms like visual snow, floaters, and this stupid little smudge in my vision that flashes and blurs on lines and stuff sometimes. I also get these sharp headaches above my eye, mainly in the morning. These things really don't help my epilepsy and brain tumor fear.I've taken 100mg Zoloft for 8 years. I tried upping the dose this year to 150 but my anxiety got worse, so it's down to 100. Perhaps Zoloft's effect has worn off on me. I take 0.25mg (sometimes just half of one, so 0.125mg) Xanax when my anxiety gets too bad to handle. I only need to take it once or twice any given week.I just wanted to vent my frustrations out. Maybe this can help others with similar anxiety problems to know they're not the only one. [info] None [info] 1502896074 [info] train
firespitter [info] I have very similar tics, but also all over my body. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my psychiatrist just assumed that the tics were a manifestation of it, should I look into tourettes as well? [info] None [info] 1471396354 [info] train
3Dbabble [info] Same here. I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADD, and DepressionBut nothing explained the intrusive thoughts or my anger at things that shouldn't upset me or my constant need for someone to acknowledge what I have done no matter what it is.It affected and is affecting my relationships and I had no idea what could cause it. Come to find out none of the previous diagnoses had much merit and it was OCD the whole time.It's like a terrible Scooby Doo episode. [info] None [info] 1543547437 [info] valid
garlotch [info] Still, d1fty has a good point. Check out /r/chch. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, as well as a list of other illnesses. I was put on resperidone, a drug to calm my anxiety. It was so powerful, that for all the time I was taking it (3 years) I was quite literally a zombie. The best decision I have made, was to stop taking it, and throw it in the bin. Despite my anxiety, the surges of hot prickles up my body, I have definitely changed. I made it to the second audition of New Zealand's got talent, in Wellington (2012), and I went up on stage in front of thousands of people, that was probably the most frightening thing of my life. I also play in a highland-pipe-band, and go to events every year, thousands of people watch me there too. But you know what? I don't feel scared of them any more. I honestly could not care what those people think of me, and when I get out there in the spotlight, I am proud of what I do, and have accomplished. Now, I welcome fear, I welcome anxiety. It reminds me that I am human. Fear is one of the most vivid feelings in your life, and if you embrace it... you will live a lot happier. My doctors have urged me to get back on ANTI-ANXIETY medication, but I wouldn't take that again. Even if I was paid 300 dollars a week, I wouldn't take it.Point being, I got over my anxiety from 'Practice'. From being out there in the crowds. The more you experience it oxychromaticdynamite, the less it will effect you so.Sorry If I rambled/ranted on, I'm really bored, and this is the perfect thread to vent my thoughts onto. &lt;3 [info]  [info] 1432191032 [info] train
amzbeeee44 [info] Yep .. I had many games like this .. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am now medicated so don’t play them anymore thank god  [info] None [info] 1550331142 [info] train
summer1171 [info] I have gp. Have you ever had an endoscopy? Honestly anxiety shows it’s self in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 7. My main symptoms were nausea and vomiting. But because it came with lots of crying it was thrown off as anxiety. Not until age 22 was I given an endoscopy and then a gastric emptying scan ultimately diagnosing me with gp. So I in no way want to tell you it could just be anxiety. But what I will say is that there are many other gi illnesses than gp. It seems to be the new thing everyone comes up with! Your symptoms definitely mimick some symptoms but it could be a number of things. Research the gp diet and follow that while you wait for an appt with a gi doctor. I’m keeping my fingers crossed for you that it’s not gp. Just know if it is there’s a separate group on here as well as Facebook devoted to gp :)  [info] None [info] 1539316816
luckymama1990 [info] I get a little jittery after doing a inhaler, but I am not currently doing one. I have an emergency relief inhaler right now, but I don't really use it. I guess I should have also mentioned I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I'll be 27 next month. Sometimes I can blame it on the anxiety, but other times, it truly comes out of nowhere.. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1486758101 [info] train
Pigstah [info] First time suffering with severe anxiety... As the title say's I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have been feeling really shit for the past two months but past week has been the worst. My  **fiancée** has been dealing with much the same, if not worse, for the past 10 years and in turn she has been trying her best to help me.I had my best day yesterday as I was laying in the sun with my partner, doing absolutely nothing and was super relaxed. Then today back to work, my chest is back to being tight, clenched jaw and fluttering stomach. I've recently started this job (6 months ago nearly) and is my first step into my new career in IT. I love the job to pieces but have been taking more and more on which is turn has made me feel very overwhelmed. I'm also getting married this year, which I'm over the moon about but this too could be a reason for the anxiety all of sudden. Last week, I had a slight panic attack at work and got sent home, I then also had a big panic attack Saturday night and my partner had to cradle me in bed to calm me down :(...I didn't really have a question but more of a way to vent and to see how some of you have handled your own anxiety? My doctor advised I start taking anti-depressants, which I have and seek some therapy. I just want my normal self back, and to not associate my anxiety at the moment with work. [info] None [info] 1556028663 [info] valid
Zonda71 [info] The aftermath It's been just over 2 years.  I was diagnosed with anxiety several months before he passed, at the time we were about 3 years into dealing with his illness. My anxiety has been significantly worse lately and I've been feeling like life is quite beyond my control. Yesterday I was diagnosed with PTSD. Apparently still thinking often about all of the graphic, gruesome details of the last month of his life, and having the constant internal monologue of "if he was still here..." and "if he was still alive..." isn't good.  My doctor said that they refer to it as being "stuck".  So, new meds,  Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT), and more counseling for me.  &lt;sigh&gt; [info] None [info] 1575611711 [info] train
sweet-cutie-pie [info] Finally recovery feels like something real! This year has been hella crazy! I was going to marry my fiance but he dumped me in mid-January. I have to move in with my parents (they were a major trigger from my ED) and then COVID-19 come in and I have been lock-in for the past two months.But, not everything is bad... I'm still getting (online) therapy. The doctors, psychiatrists, psychologists and nutritionists that are helping are freaking amazing and I'm thankful for their work. I'm taking Paroxetine (12.5 mg) every morning and Trazodone (50 mg) for better sleeping. I was diagnosed with anxiety and EDNOS.My parents have become a major part of my support system, I was finally able to talk to them about my anxiety and ED. They've been really supportive and I no longer feel like they're a burden or trigger...I still miss my ex-fiance and that's honestly the most painful thing in my life right now, but I also feel all of this happened for a reason and maybe I needed this storm to lay back on and start working on being a better me.The most important thing is that I haven't binged and purged since December 2019. I'm still learning to eat healthily and trying not to put that much pressure to lose weight. Yeah, sometimes I feel like losing it and I overeat, but that's honestly nothing compared to the binges I used to have.The next step is setting actual goals: weight loss, better eating, more sleeping, etc. I'm shitless scare, but feel like I finally might be able to achieve those.I hope one day all of this will be just part of my past: things that help me grow and be the woman I wanna be.Hope all of you reading this can find peace during this quarantine. It will get better, I promise. [info] None [info] 1588104483 [info] valid
paincoats [info] To me, that sounds like anxiety. I get that to a lesser degree, and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Intrestingly, the counsellor initially thought I was on the spectrum. I wouldn't be surprised if anxiety was commonly comorbid with autism. [info] None [info] 1423107859 [info] train
Unnamed-Visitor [info] "Fantastic. Back to square one." This was my response to finding out how many mental issues I haven't been diagnosed with but very potentially could have.I found out a few years ago that I have an interest in mental disorders, so I would read up on any I happen to find, and keep a close eye on ones that I find interesting. The problem lies in the fact that when reading the symptoms and effects that these disorders have, I've come to realize just how many of these symptoms and issues I've accepted as normal everyday occurrences. I used to think my social struggles and strange habits were just me being me, but now I'm pretty sure it's not just me. I have enough social difficulties and struggles that I could be put on the autism spectrum (though that says very little due to the massive ground covered by the spectrum) or even have Asperger's. Either way, it's terrifying for me, someone who's struggling to just find a job that I can comfortably work at, to think that there could be a dozen mental disorders I don't even know I have.And right now, I think that's what keeps dragging me into my depressive hole again; not knowing. If I knew what was wrong with me, maybe I'd be able to handle it better. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months back, and since then I've been working it into regression, despite not getting to see any therapist or psychologist about any treatment options. All that happened when I asked my parents about getting help was I went to see my doctor, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and told to seek help resources, then nothing else. Don't get me wrong, knowing helped me get a little boost, but after that I wasn't sure what to do. I'm not sure what it is, but I feel absolutely helpless without some sort of support from someone I consider a superior. I'm terrified of living alone because the times I've been away from those people, my anxiety flares up and I go into full panic mode. I'm otherwise unsure where to start on the gigantic puzzle of my brain.If I figure out what to do, I feel like it's not gonna be enough to fix all of this nonsensical bullshit with my brain, but I gotta try, at least so I can one day tell everyone that I tried. [info] None [info] 1574708556 [info] test
aislinnlane [info] To-Do Lists Are Ruining My Life I feel so silly even posting this, but I'm not sure of what to do. Also, if this is a poor choice of threads, please let me know.When I look up information about list-making, I just get cringe BuzzFeed quizzes about being organized. My problem with list-making isn't about simple organization and it is slowly debilitating my everyday functioning. I have no money for therapy and was wondering if anyone had experience with this, in any form. I just don't want to feel alone and crazy anymore. I write *everything* down. If I make one error in what I'm writing down (from spelling, to order of thoughts, placement on the paper, or just a thought of "oh, that letter looks weird") I will start again. And again, and again, and again. I do not erase, I will rip the paper out of the book and start again. In the past four days, I have created **261 iPhone notes** about daily tasks, gone through **an entire journal** for my exercise plan, and created **hundreds and hundreds** of google documents detailing future living expenses (for jobs I don't have or want). None of these tasks I have even completed, though I truly believe when I get it down correctly, I will complete them. All of my notes and documents are typically very repetitive/almost identical, but I never really quite get them right. I have had some level of this habit for at least the past 2-3 years now, although it only started getting this bad about 5 months ago. I am not sure if I'm scared of failure, forgetfulness, being unprepared, or all three. Perhaps this is just my way of dealing with stress. Perhaps I'm obsessed with planning. I have no idea, but I am scared of my own mind. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders as a tween/teen. Perhaps this is just another manifestation of the anxiety? Again, sorry if this seems insignificant or silly, but I would love to know if anyone has any advice, has dealt with anything similar or has any ideas for me to try. [info] None [info] 1574476905 [info] train
Bananabreadfun [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety too. I understand how crippling it can be, but I promise you, you can do it... you are stronger than you think  [info] None [info] 1542311316 [info] train
music_boy93 [info] I have not been diagnosed with OCD but I think it's possible I do have it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder NOS and social anxiety. The reason I think OCD might be at least slightly probable is because of the poisoning fears when I was little, my social anxiety takes the form more of obsessive thoughts (I go over everything I had said and done in my mind after a social interaction to look for anything embarrassing or stupid I may have said/done), and I kind of have a very irrational fear of becoming a pedophile or being accuse of being a pedophile. I've had this fear for the last 5 years and it's slightly worsened over time. I have absolutely no attraction to children and pedophilia disgusts me so I know *logically* I'm not a pedophile and no one has any reason to think I am one. It wasn't until recently that I found out that Pedophile OCD was actually a thing. The only reason I'm not more certain that I have OCD is that I don't think I spend hours a day obsessing about the pedophile thing. It's more like short durations off and on during the day. I've never really kept track of how long it lasts and I feel like if I did, it'd only get worse.  [info] None [info] 1432007941 [info] valid
Soldat_of_the_race [info] What are you referring to that sounds bi-polar, I haven't looked into this, I was diagnosed with anxiety before  [info] None [info] 1511269214 [info] train
misspurple99 [info] I need help 20 (F). My ex boyfriend broke up with me a month and a half ago. He said I was manipulating him. What I apparently did to manipulate him was I was feeling low one night and I asked if he could come see me and he said no, which was okay and I respected that. Then my friend messaged him being all concerned with how low I was feeling and he said I was being manipulative. He then ignored me for 12 hours and then called me the next morning to break up with me, saying he couldn't do it anymore. In the past he said I was being very manipulative and examples of me apparently doing this is me saying "I'm sorry you don't understand what I'm saying, I'll explain it better". Also another way I apparently manipulated him was he made me very upset as he said a condition I have was fake and I was making up excuses and it made me cry, so I asked if I could go to his to talk about it and he said yeah and I was like "thank you. I'll be over soon, I just need to clean up" because I had been crying and he was like you can't say that, that is very manipulative and if you ever say things like that again I'll break up with you, so at that point I really struggled to open up to him, it made me feel like s*** and it made me feel like I had to watch everything I had to say to him. When we broke up I found out that he cheated on me at the start and i confronted him about it on Instagram direct message and he said I was just making up excuses to blame him and I was apparently trying to make him out to be the bad one when it's apparently me. He's being telling everyone I was abusing him mentally, saying I was manipulative and gaslighting him. I now have no confidence in myself and I am beginning to wonder if its me or not, I really struggle to see positive in my self and I have been diagnosed with anxiety recently because of the way he's treated me and made me feel. I went to move out my flat yesterday and move back home with parents because college is closed and I then went to my exes to pick my stuff and he had wrote me letter telling me how he hopes I get the help I apparently need from being manipulative and he says that I apparently never loved him and apparently I was just an overall bad person and I'm lying to myself. It's made me feel so bad because I'm now questioning whether I'm the bad person or not. He made me feel so low when we broke up that I tried to take my own life. I am just really struggling atm. [info] None [info] 1587586597 [info] train
GCDD [info] I just turned 18 and I've noticed that I always enjoyed my alone time over going out with people one calls "friends". However, I must say that I did not do this because I was scared/afraid of them or of what may happen or whatnot, but because I lacked interest. Also, I didn't trust them. Anyways, this is also something I don't understand, and maybe you can help me define it better, but is anxiety having "fear" overall about something specific, or what is it? Quite surprisingly, I was diagnosed with anxiety, which I don't agree with because i do not fear society. One exception though is the fact that I experience panic symptoms during presentations. My voice breaks and I don't know why, no matter how hard I try. Maybe I unconsciously do have social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1512086597 [info] train
MachineGum_throwaway [info] &gt; Thank you very much. Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect. I don't deny nor hide the fact that I have issues. If you have BPD, then you'd recognize something inside of you that is more than just the external symptoms.Your friendship issue is just one thing, but BPD is many other things. Do you feel like you constantly need to defend yourself because people say things that critisize you? Do you feel like people are disliking you? Does you sometimes have periods where you hate your husband because you feel he did something bad/wrong? If you found out you were broken, could you accept it?&gt; I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me. Maybe try meditation. Meditation is not a treatment for a specific condition; it is the discovery of one's self.Successfully analyzing your symptoms requires you to go really deep in your mind, something that some of us can achieve simply by washing the dishes and mowing the lawn (mindless activities) while others need to work to be able to go deeper within themselves.For example, when I am in therapy, I will often give answers based on what's on the surface of my mind because I am interacting with someone, however the therapist's job is to ask further questions to go deeper. The therapist can't connect dots (the "whys"), but can help you find which dots to look for.When I am alone, I don't stop on the surface answer; the surface answer becomes my next question and I push for more until I start connecting so many dots until I have small moments of epiphany (The dots all lead back to 2-3 major external factors in my childhood).&gt; I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships. My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much. (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) If the feeling of comfort with your husband has been consistent for a long long time, then I wouldn't be worried about BPD what-so-ever.You most likely have something causing you anxiety and you can only feel safe with people who really know you.  [info] None [info] 1480525926 [info] test
forensikat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went to college, and I know I had some OCD tendacies as a child (could never step on a crack or tile line, had to finish walking up stairs with my right foot), but I grew out of those.I think this is an example of how religion compounded issues that were already there, not a statement on all Catholics! [info] Ex-Catholic [info] 1494297291 [info] train
alliesbachshitcrazy [info] Help! First experience last night So last night I woke up at 2am hallucinating, but I knew I was awake and seeing things that were not actually there. This had never happened to me before, so I sat in the bathroom wondering if I was reacting weirdly to one of my medications and began to get anxious that I needed to go to the ER. After I stumbled to the bathroom and turned on the light, I noticed that the light helped. My hallucinations were all sorts of things, from little things flying around my vision to my fiancee’s face swirling. Nothing truly scary, though, just odd. I was terrified because I had never experienced this before. I’m wondering if it was due to alcohol/late nap, here’s how my day went: my fiancee and I were out all day from like 10am-7pm, and by the time we got home we were exhausted and I had had quite a few mimosas at brunch and the farmers market that still hadn’t quite worn off. We both fell asleep accidentally from about 7:30pm-10pm, woke up, ate something, and I fell back to sleep around midnight. Then I woke up around 2-2:30am hallucinating for the first time. The hallucinations lasted for about 20 minutes while I sat in bed trying to calm down and drink water.Additional info: I am diagnosed with anxietyMy question: should I expect this to happen again tonight? I’m terrified. Or do you think it was because of alcohol and a late nap, etc? [info] None [info] 1578281419 [info] train
throwaway-1648 [info] I got a wave of anxiety and it’s gonna drive me nuts. Help me rationalize my thoughts please I just bought a brand new hoodie from the store. It’s Nike and I bought it from a local mall (a little run down. Not much traffic. Etc) the hoodie was a medium and was behind another medium so I’m hoping nobody else tried it on but- I had this wave of panic and I just feel so uncomfortable. I keep having racing thoughts about “what if somebody wore it before me and now it’s diseased” my body feels dirty from trying on the hoodies but I really really want to wear this hoodie tomorrow. I just got it and would be upset if I didn’t get to tomorrow... I can’t relax my thoughts and can’t stop telling myself that a series of events is gonna lead me to die soon because of somebody else wearing my hoodie. It’s really frustrating. Driving me insane. “What if” this and “what if” that. I had over a month of calmness and now suddenly my anxiety peaked in the most inconvenient time. I’m going between “oh nvm I’m okay” and “fuck I’m gonna die” like I’m flipping a light switch. What do i do? I don’t have time to wash it tonight..Edit- I am diagnosed with anxiety. This isn’t just some random person venting about being nervous [info] None [info] 1569545450 [info] train
foodcourtdruide [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger. It's similar to any addiction, in that it never actually leaves you, but you learn to manage it. As an adult, I have some rough moments, but overall I'm able to live a very normal life.I have no sympathy for Fez. His anxiety is just an extension of his extreme narcissism. Everyday Fez chooses his own safety and comfort over everything else in his life. He goes to a job where he literally stares off into space 90% of the time, where he's not growing as a person or improving others around him. When given opportunities to grow, he denies them and hides behind his anxiety. When he has a conflict with someone, he always looses control of his emotions and uses any power he has to hurt that person. He has no remorse or guilt in doing so, either. In 2015, we use terms like "anxiety" and "narcissist" to make excuses for the fact that Fez is just an asshole. He's an asshole that believes since he's been doing this for so long, he shouldn't have to try hard anymore. He's mentioned several times that "Shelby is like me, but I wasn't this way at Shelby's age." Meaning that Fez's behavior is acceptable because he's "paid his dues".  [info] None [info] 1426686272 [info] train
Miyenne [info] I [33F] have been working for my boss [65M] for over a year. I want to leave, but am afraid to. I've been working for my boss for over a year now as an office manager for his family owned and run company.He hired me based on knowing me from a previous job and because of my attitude and personality, knowing I didn't have office experience. Well, it's been a huge struggle. He just stopped doing his paperwork for years because he didn't know how. I came in and had to figure it all out on my own, he didn't know how to train me. I've got everything running quite smoothly now, if I do say so myself.But he's an evil, cruel man. Now, my mother was rendered disabled 12 years ago. It's a horrible thing and it changes a person. Makes them angry. Depressed. They lash out. It's terrible and it tears people apart. But we got through it. My mom's still disabled, but okay now mentally. I love her again. For a while, I didn't.Now, this is another reason my boss hired me. 5 years ago a drunk driver hit him. He's disabled now too. And he's still in the angry hateful phase. He treats his customers and suppliers horribly. He treats his employees so badly (and illegally, as in if you work overtime you don't get paid for it because he didn't say you could or he lowers people's pay when he gets angry at them), that no one but his sons have lasted more than 3 months for him. I get verbally abused every day. Sworn at. Berated. Insulted. He has to find something wrong with what I do every day. The other day he couldn't find anything wrong with what I was doing, so he focused on how I wrote the labels on the files. I didn't write high enough on the label tabs for him. He lectured me for literally 5 minutes about how I have to write as high as possible so he can pull the drawer out and see every individual file name without having to reach for it. He will straight up contradict something he told me to do a week ago too, if there's no other easy target for him. One week it's file everything alphabetically. The next it's put files together that would logically be together. I've spent days reorganizing bankers boxes of files from 2008 because they're not sorted right, nevermind I had nothing to do with these boxes before. Never even seen them before. But I should have *known* to go through them all and sort them. Yesterday he was questioning a charge on his credit card, so I looked into it. he ordered adobe to be renewed annually last year. He's like "I wouldn't have bought this, are you sure you didn't? You must have." Except the date on the receipt is from before I worked here. Even after showing him that, he said "Are you sure you didn't do it? I wouldn't have. Why did you order this?" And got upset with me again. I couldn't even argue.I suck it up because when he's not here it's a good, easy job with a completely flexible schedule and it pays very well. And I like his sons, the ones in the process of taking over the company. I work really well with them. But they all admit he'll never let go and know it's not worth fighting.The man is never wrong. No matter what you can prove otherwise, he's the type that is never wrong. You simply can't argue with him, he'll just talk over you louder and louder and with more obscenities until you give up. This is how he conducts business too. It's shameful.He texts me all hours of the day and night and on my days off to berate me too, or make me work from home. Every time my phone beeps or rings I cringe and a wave of dread sweeps over me. Sometimes I even have someone else read the text first because I can't handle it. So my friends and family have a good idea of how he treats me because they've all done this for me.I have enough money to leave and get by for a little while. I share an apartment with my sister and she's urged me to quit saying if she has to, she'll support us both just so I get away from him. Everyone around me urges me to leave. They say I'm a different person now. Bitter, sad, edgy. I know since I started working here I've been diagnosed with anxiety. It does interfere with my life now. My back and neck muscles are always so tense I'm always in pain. I've been having stomach issues too because of the stress. I've had a period for three months long now due to the stress.But if I leave, I don't want to give notice. I don't want to face him that angry. If I leave, I will say goodbye, pack up my stuff and never talk to him again. He could withhold my pay, but our accountants do direct deposit and I get on well with them. So I could just send them my hours as they stand (I do all the payroll otherwise and tally and send in the hours) and be done with it.I know I should leave. Money isn't worth this degradation of my mental health and my self. But I will be letting down his sons, who I do like. I won't get paid this well elsewhere with my lack of experience (though I do have a job interview this afternoon).He's also paying for a college level accounting course for me. I've only just started it last week. It would look great on my resume. But I'd have to stay for 4 more months to finish.I guess my question is, should I give him notice, or just walk out one day? Walking out on him could bring down legal repercussions, but I doubt he'd go to that effort. But with the illegal things he does I'm not so sure.Or do I suck it up and stay?I know I'll never get a reference, but that's fine with me.  ---     **tl;dr**: My boss is a cruel man, I want to leave but am afraid of giving notice and spending two weeks with his fury. What dhould I do? [info] None [info] 1481220210 [info] train
Uneeda_Biscuit [info] What an idiot. "I was diagnosed with anxiety, and prescribed medical Marijuana. I didn't want the diagnosis to hurt my career." [info] None [info] 1508049970 [info] train
NBogart9129 [info] I keep getting fat lips, rashes, and occasional eye lid swelling...what's happening? Age: 28Height: 6'Weight: 200 lbs (very into weightlifting)Medications: atenololSmoking status: I don't smokePrevious medical issues: IBS, anxiety, high blood pressureCurrent medical issues: &amp;#x200B;I've been having these symptoms for months.I think the possible culprits are: some sort of food allergy (I cut out gluten, but was still having these symptoms), my blood pressure medication (atenolol, which I started just before these symptoms appeared) or...anxiety. I was working an insanely hectic schedule for almost a year (basically two full time jobs) and was experiencing terrible anxiety about it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and have IBS, which I always assumed was related to it.Any insight would be appreciated. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1580085584 [info] train
PowerOfYouth [info] Great guide. I didn't have this issue until I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and have been looking for fighting game tips specifically to no end [info] None [info] 1546469541 [info] train
xisaloser [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (not social anxiety, speaking more of depersonalization/derealization/paranoia) and make up helps me but in a different way. It's not about "I have make up on so I gotta get out of my shell," but more "I am dissociating so I am gonna try 5 different eye-looks to focus on something else and get out of my head." I find it works better than trying to focus on reading or watching when my minds tends to wonder and pictures in motion can sometimes make me feel dizzy. I basically lay out all my eyeshadows and try to come up with looks, it actually needs my focus and some creativity so instead of over-analyzing myself or my surroundings I am like "do these go well together? maybe I should try to mix two contrasting colors, that would be interesting? Maybe I'd find a new use for this shadow" etc. etc. and then the blending is really relaxing to me as well. Same with looking in the mirror, of course that's mostly therapy doing, but I am not afraid to face myself when I go through phase of depersonalization. Before I'd see myself in the mirror and think "is this me? am I looking at myself? this is uncomfortable I need to look away," and now I am like "yeah that's uncomfortable but hey I gotta ride this one out." I guess we all have different ways to cope with anxiety, but I just see this particular task as really good to cope cause my mind doesn't wander.  [info] None [info] 1495642810 [info] train
Kevinpierce93 [info] Does anyone else feel like they are dying everyday? I feel like everyday I am going to die even though I have been to multiple doctors and they have all told me I'm perfectly healthy. I was just diagnosed with anxiety and I seem to over think everything that happens to my body. Right now I have running in my throat and I think it is brain matter or something and that I am going to die. I feel like my brain is trying to shut off my body or something. Sometimes I randomly feel weak and lightheaded. I just hate feeling like this. Does anyone else have any problem similar? [info] None [info] 1477880092 [info] valid
dolphinblood [info] Yes, but how do I find a "special" doctor? Like right now, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but my "instincts" tell me it's something else. How do I affirm that it is something else? How many doctors do I go through until I think, "yep, they're right" [info] None [info] 1386005028 [info] train
jma1024 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16 I'll be turning 26 this year and yes that can be caused by anxiety. The reason I went to the hospital when I was 16 was because I was having chest tightness and my heart was racing and felt like I couldn't catch a breath they found nothing they said I was having a panic attack and diagnosed me with anxiety. I went through a series of test some that you've been through to make sure it wasn't my heart or something life threatening and all came back normal.I wasn't feeling a worry or depressed before my first panic attack it just came on all of the sudden. I still remember just watching TV and my heart started racing and I couldn't catch my breath chest was tight and burning thought it was a heart attack. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1471050021 [info] train
the-masculine-egg [info] I go through cycles - I move forward with transitioning, feel happier and less dysphoric, and then feel "less trans" for not having enough dysphoria. I always seem to forget that the reason I feel less dysphoric than before is transitioning. I know I'm moving in the right direction because when I think about going back to living as a woman - well, I don't want to be too dramatic, but sometimes it feels like I'd rather die. I don't know about you, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have a long history of worrying about everything all the time, and I strongly suspect that's why. [info] 💉4/25/19 [info] 1556345435 [info] train
Michelle_ma_belle16 [info] Ongoing, mild hallucinations related to anxiety I can’t find anything online about this, but I believe I’m experiencing mild hallucinations during anxiety attacks. This has been going on for years. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, but the hallucinations aren’t related to what I have PTSD from as far as I can remember (childhood abuse).When I’m in high stress and anxiety and I try to go to bed, I can see and feel my flesh being sliced open. If I open my eyes, it moves to my face and cuts open my eyes too. I tried to imagine my boyfriend holding my hand as a comfort, and I watched his hand being sliced open. The only thing that helps is time and touching where I’m being “cut” if it isn’t too severe. No matter how hard I try, I can’t reason myself out of it. It’s terrifying, and I’m not sure what else to do. This has been happening for about three or four years now, and isn’t improving. I’m not getting used to it.Does anyone have any info? Thanks! [info] None [info] 1544512133 [info] train
WhenInDoubtDab [info] Medical Marijuana has helped combat my anxiety astronomically. Hello everyone - I’ve been suffering from heavy anxiety for a couple years now and I just wanted to reach out and offer some advice to anyone who might be seeking refuge through medical marijuana. First of all, I live in Pennsylvania, which is one of many states that accepts Anxiety as a reason to be prescribed a MMJ card. I highly recommend researching your state to see if you can get access to one. I’ve had my card since August. This being said, marijuana, much like other traditionally prescribed medication, isn’t for everyone. It took me a few weeks to get used to it as I was not a heavy weed smoker prior. Now, before I started taking MMJ, I was prescribed lexapro, which worked for a little bit but caused me to gain over 20lbs of excess weight and did not cure me of my regular panic attacks. A friend of mine got his medical card for chronic pain, and said I should look into getting one for anxiety. So, I did exactly that. The process was easy. I showed up with my medical paperwork showing that I was diagnosed with anxiety, and that was it. Got my card a couple weeks later in the mail. For those of you who are unfamiliar, there are two different kinds of weed for the most part; Sativa and Indica. Sativa is more of an “energetic” high, which is not good for most people with anxiety because it can cause paranoia. NOW, Indica on the other hand, is excellent for combating anxiety. It provides a “body high” that makes you feel calm and relaxed. I smoke a little bit of Indica at the end of the day each day and it reduces my anxiety astronomically. I get better sleep, and I wake up the next day with no anxiousness, feeling fully refreshed. So all I’m saying is, give it a try if you can. Remember to be responsible! I hope this helps anyone who might be curious in seeking treatment via marijuana. TLDR; Try getting your medical marijuana card and see if it helps your anxiety like it did for me [info] None [info] 1577454643 [info] test
Volleyballer08 [info] Was Diagnosed As A Kid, Now Problems As An Adult After work today I really want to put my foot down and get whatever is going on with me under control. When I was 11, I was diagnosed with anxiety. I didn't know this until about a year ago when my mom told me. I had gone through a brief period of therapy for panic attacks that resulted from being a hypochondriac. I work in healthcare now and don't have that issue anymore. My mom I guess had asked if she thought medication was needed and my therapist at the time said she didn't think so. I grew up a teenager always worried and I dealt with stress poorly, but I would say I was 'fine' as far as that goes. I had lots of friends, was very physically active, and wouldn't have really considered myself having any mental health issues.Flash forward to me at age 22-now at age 29. I'm finding it suddenly hard to make friends and have been alone for a very long time with only rare occasions of meeting up with people. Recently I moved due to a career change and now I'm feeling even worse than before; panicked, afraid everyone hates me, so anxious by the time I leave work everyday I'm in tears. My parents know this sort of thing has been going on for a while and God bless them, they've advised me to go to therapy again and try things like online dating apps and such but I'm so damn insecure these days I'm afraid I'll just feel worse. Seeing them upset makes me feel worse and the cycle goes on and on.Living in a new town with what could be a fresh start I already feel like I'm slipping into the isolation and constant state of anxiousness I was before. I don't even know where to begin in terms of seeking help and I feel like such a failure. I want to move past this mental barrier that keeps me from being myself but have zero clue how. I don't get why I'm this way after so many years of being fine. [info] None [info] 1539800664 [info] train
leyjanz [info] Just when I feel I have my anxiety under control, it comes back stronger than before. Hey all! I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about 4 years ago. I've experienced it since I was a child but was labeled the worrier/emotional kid. Since being diagnosed, I've felt empowered to take steps to cope with my anxiety, and the in last 6 months I've had less frequent attacks/episodes.I have noticed that when I do experience anxiety now, it comes out of nowhere, more intensely than ever. I wake up shaking, I sleep maybe 4 hours a night, and I completely disconnect from everyone around me because I'm afraid of being negative/that they will be mad at me. My husband is so supportive but I hate having to tell him that I am yet again dealing with my mental health. I wish I could just solve it and be done.What long term steps have you taken to cope? It feels like I am safe until I fall into this trap, slowly make my way out and I'm fine until the next round. Does anyone experience this like...relapse? Sorry for the negative rant!! Thank you in advance!EDIT : I feel like I should add that I have been exercising at least 3-4 times a week now which has been a huge help, but I'm finding that I start to spiral if I don't go to the gym. Anyone experience this? I love exercise but I don't want it to be a crutch. [info] None [info] 1579234813 [info] train
Eddytonos [info] Confused and questioning myself I’m new to this subreddit, and wanted to release some tension, as I am uncomfortable asking certain questions with people in person. For a long time, I have always been sure of my sexuality. I have always had crushes on females, never showed any romantic or sexual interest in men. Unfortunately, this did not stop my adolescent mind from questioning my sexuality. I began constantly reassure myself, but it wasn’t and still isn’t enough. I began doing something that isn’t necessarily healthy and quite obsessive, but I began watching clips of gay porn to see if I got aroused. The first few times, I showed no signs of arousal. More recently, however, I began to feel a strange feeling in my throat, numbness in all parts of my body, and began to breathe heavily. I didn’t get an erection, but felt strange in all parts of my body. I’m now questioning whether or not these are symptoms of arousal, or if I am suffering from anxiety attacks. This would make sense, as I am diagnosed with anxiety. This entire situation has confused me, stressed me, and caused me to question my past. What’s even stranger is that I have always been capable of masturbating to lesbian porn, and outside of this questioning have never had or felt attraction to men. I guess the culmination of this entire post is a question as to whether other people have experienced a similar thing, and what it could possibly be. [info] None [info] 1556466678 [info] train
overcometogether [info] I haven’t taken medication, it’s the route most don’t take. I was prescribed Zoloft,  because I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. I was having panic attacks for a week straight, one after another. I was actually afraid of taking medication because of the side effects. For 5 days I haven’t gotten any attacks, just mild chest pains. I keep telling myself, it’s not a heart attack, just anxiety symptoms. Eventually the symptom goes away but comes back. I don’t let it stop me, I went back to work 4 days ago and I told my boss about my anxiety because I missed a whole week, thankfully boss was understanding. I went to a psychologist and he did recommend breathing exercises. Taught me to breathe with my belly. Put your hand over your belly, keep your chest staright, and breath in through your nose while pushing your hand into the belly. Breathe out through your mouth, and your belly will push your hand away. Repeat this exercise everyday. 3 times per day. That’s all I got taught.Also side note, I’ve learned not to think about the past, or future just the present. It will take slot of worries, what do you we know of 5min into the future? We don’t, so there isn’t much we can focus on, just the present. Also talking or people about my anxiety has helped tremendously. Message me if you have more questions. Wish you the best.  [info] None [info] 1540662330 [info] train
holyshmoke [info] Yes I get this sometimes and it's one of the reasons I am currently struggling to go back to work. I have been diagnosed with anxiety attacks as well as ibs so it's sort of a chicken or the egg scenario when it happens -- does the anxiety attack cause the need to use the bathroom or does the ibs trigger something that causes the anxiety? I don't know if I'll ever know unfortunately. Seeing a therapist to deal with the anxiety attacks and always having some Ativan on hand for emergencies has helped somewhat but I still try to avoid scenarios where an attack might happen or where I won't be able to escape to the bathroom if needed. I wish I could be of more help, sorry, but yea I think you're definitely not alone!edit to add: random question but are you female and happen to be on your period? Just curious cause I usually get very similar attacks to what you've described on the first/second day of my period. Think it's something to do with the cramping causing bowel movements and loss of bp from blood loss (I have very heavy painful periods however in general). [info] None [info] 1444095177 [info] valid
tortillaslut [info] I did this too, could only sleep if I knew someone else was awake. {thankfully my step dad was always up super late watching TV} I was diagnosed with anxiety and once I turned 18 and moved out of that house I never really had that problem. &amp;#x200B;I guess it was because it was an older house, and I was constantly afraid of fires or something happening so I needed someone awake in case anything happened. [info] None [info] 1561400249 [info] train
sunshinecunt [info] I lost about 45 lbs when I went through my worst period of anxiety. I also had to force myself to eat. I noticed that much of my anxiety’s physical symptoms include stomach pain / cramps so I think that had something to do with it. But the food tasting bland is still something I struggle with. I also struggle with bulimia that was never diagnosed until after I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. [info] None [info] 1557510157 [info] test
vanjs [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety but thankfully (for this case) it's more mentally than physically. I was shaking so much I dropped the post-care paper they gave me (they made me sit up once to rinse my mouth after anesthesia/before the actual extraction) so I was close to my peak for anxiety. I listen to some good music, hummed a little and didn't know my tooth even came out until they started working on the bottom one (I kept saying 'huh? huh?' since I couldn't hear well due to my headphones and the assistant kept yelling 'it's out! it's ooooout!!!!!').Still no pain, but lots and lots of drool :(And I know how you feel man. I've been pretty healthy (physically) my entire life so I've only gone to the dentist to get scaling done and the doctors to get immunized. It's my first time getting 'surgery' so I was terrified but now I'm just sitting here in my own drool, packing away... you'll be fine :) [info] None [info] 1502938801 [info] test
lawyer_or_actor [info] Me [35 M] with my GF [30F] of 5 years, broke up with her last night; she won't quit calling or texting. What do I do next? She has a lot of emotional issues stemming from abuse she had when she was a child. One of her main issues was that she was very angry with me all the time. Little stuff, big stuff, it didn't matter. She has a temper and I think I was her outlet for her anger. I finally had had enough and reached out to my parents who told me they think I had "battered woman" syndrome of sorts wherein she would emotionally abuse me but then flip it around to make it my fault. I was diagnosed with anxiety the past year, part of it stems from her treatment of me. Just to give you all and idea of the type of person I am dealing with.Anyway, it was a toxic relationship (I wasn't perfect either) but I do feel bad about calling it off. She's not all bad and I tried so hard to make it work. She has texted and called constantly saying she will change and finally go to therapy.Part of me wants to give her another chance but part of me knows I have to put my foot down. So what should I tell her? She's the type of person that will not quit calling or texting but I feel like I should probably say something to drive home the point that we are done so she will start to heal and move on. Should I call her? Text her? I already broke up with her should I just ignore everything? I'm at work right now and had to block her so I can try and keep it all together.Thank you so much for any help you can give.**TL;DR Broke up with my girlfriend last night. I love her but she has so many issues that just weren't good for me. She won't quit calling or texting me. What do I do next?** [info] None [info] 1532451366 [info] train
ExcitingPanic [info] I'm not exactly sure why I am depressed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and it's definitely more under control than it used to be, I suppose maybe one reason could be I'm studying on a demanding course, but I still feel these emotions even during the summer holidays. Other than that, I have a very nice life, good family and friends, I should be more grateful for that [info] None [info] 1562515007 [info] valid
CeeDiddy82 [info] You may possibly just be having anxiety/panic attacks.I have had experiences like this for a long time. Being atheist, I didn't have the spirit thing going for me. I actually thought aliens were going to abduct me. For a while, doctors attributed the symptoms to complications from being overweight (blood sugar spikes, high blood pressure, etc).I have dropped almost all the weight I needed to and became more active so I am actually tired at night and sleep. I also cut out carbs, as they are basically sugar and cause blood sugar spikes with me (/r/keto or /r/paleo can be helpful).Even though all of that has helped a lot, I still get anxiety attacks. Not sure what triggers them. I had one the other day at work I actually passed out and they called an ambulance and I went to the ER. After that I started getting panic attacks nightly, over nothing inparticular, usually I was just scared I would pass out again. My dreams I would have following waking up during a panic attack were scary. I dreamed I heard loud screaming, I dreamed I was in car wrecks and plane crashes. I dreamed some vortex was sucking me in. Just downright scary shit in that state between sleeping and awake.Finally, after "stone cold perfect" blood tests from the ER and from the follow up doctor visit, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.Doctor prescribed xanax and I have to go to a therapist who specializes in anxiety.I recommend getting healthier eating/exercise habits and telling a doctor about panic attacks at night. The xanax works wonders for me. I don't take it everyday, only when I start to feel anxiety. Kind of like aspirin to headaches, only take when needed. Xanax is a highly addictive chemical, so hopefully when I finish my therapy I won't ever need it. If you have an addictive personality you need to get into anxiety therapy ASAP.  [info] None [info] 1353570956 [info] train
Rapcher [info] Changing and improving my social skills is a lot harder than it seems. Been going to therapy again for the past 5 weeks, 2-3 times a week with my old therapist to practice improving my social skills. She's recommended me a lot of books. I'm currently reading 2 at a time. During lunch or during the gym in between sets. Writing down notes and practicing small things with people at the gym and at work. It's a lot harder than I thought it was going to be. My therapist told me to inform a few people about me going to therapy so I could have a strong support system. People who can tell me when I'm doing something rude, or come off too strong. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and what my therapist thinks is OCPD (Obessive Compulsive Personality Disorder). Which she also attributes to my temper, anxiety, and OCD like behaviors.My therapist thinks I keep strong guard so I don't get hurt given my childhood. When I let people in. I get nervous and anxious because I don't know how things will turn out. I've had anxiety attacks and they aren't the best. To the point of passing out, hyperventilating, losing sensation in my face legs and arms. I guess I'm just looking to expand my support system a little more. Some days feel hard, other days feel really hard. Sometimes I feel like I might slip up and say something mean, or someone might get misinterpreted, or I wasn't clear enough in expressing my thoughts. Sometimes I feel like I'm not making progress. Recently, I've been avoiding confrontational topics or subjects. Things I know I might sound too assertive on. [info] None [info] 1454521398 [info] train
b_port [info] I mean, before I was diagnosed with anxiety they ran a bunch of tests on me to make sure it wasn't something else. I had to pay a decent chunk of change for all those tests, but it was definitely worth it to find out that the only thing that's wrong with me is anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1534266429 [info] train
Hey_Im_Probably_Okay [info] Did this, I was diagnosed with anxiety last spring. [info] None [info] 1547049822 [info] train
Kardinale [info] I was the classic underachiever in high school, but was still offered a full ride to an in state university. Where I struggled was freshman year, since I had spent high school just skating by and not giving a shit about my future in general. My first college semester ended with me skipping my finals and getting a .69 GPA. I took a year long break, during which I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I retroactively withdrew from my first semester, giving myself a clean slate. I’ve been back for a year and a half now and I’m about to attain my 4.0, thanks to me giving a damn about my future and some studying. On another note, I’m done trying to have a social life lol. It’s just not possible for me [info] None [info] 1544495649 [info] train
unofficialmoderator [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. [info] None [info] 1576387188 [info] train
ZA-X [info] How to approach the possibility of ADHD Okay, I tried to answer my own question by creeping, but that hasn't worked so I'm going to bite the bullet and make a post. I'm not sure how often you guys get posts like this and how annoying they are but I need some advice.I think I may have adult ADHD, and I want to explore that possibility but I don't know how. I am diagnosed with anxiety, which I know can sometimes manifest in ADHD like ways, but I am on a low dosage of meds and have been working on it for a couple years, but I feel like what I experience isn't something I can just chalk up to anxiety...How do you all suggest going ahead with this? My family has a long history of dealing with mental health problems, so I am wary of both crying wolf AND of leaving it unaddressed. I am currently seeing a therapist, and will be starting with a new general practitioner this week. Who should I talk about this with? I had a "holy shit that's me!" moment when reading about ADHD recently and I want to be able to communicate that is the case with someone but I'm not sure who.TL;DR I recently realized I may have ADHD. I do have a diagnosis of anxiety, but that was diagnosed when my life was ruled by panic attacks. That is no longer the case and I think there may be something more. Who do you suggest talking to (therapist or GP) and how do you broach the subject? [info] None [info] 1478126341 [info] valid
mydogscollegefund [info] Kinda sounds like both to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety after crohns and when I flare my anxiety about how my body will react jumps up and I find myself over worrying about every sensation and feeling. Make sure the people in your life understand your medical condition and that sometimes it takes you longer to get out of the house. I have had to stop getting ready entirely, text my boss or a friend and say “hey I’m sorry my body isn’t cooperating I’m running a bit late!” And nobody seems to be upset. [info] None [info] 1555770067 [info] train
pandaruffles [info] Silence. It developed during highschool "silent reading period". Half hour of pure silence. I don't know why, but usually if I'm STUCK in a silent place I get a horrible panic attack. Eventually, i developed agoraphobia because I didn't want to be put in a situation like that ever again. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and the meds help with the silence but I still feel agoraphobic. However after a while I get cabin fever. [info] None [info] 1416097076 [info] train
penisinthepeanutbttr [info] What running shoes would you guys recommend for someone just getting back into running? I'm a 22 year old male, trying to get my shit together because its Spring and I'm tired of the bullshit. I used to be a fitness fanatic a few years ago. I lifted for 2 hours 4-5 days a week and ran about 4 miles a day 3-4 days a week outside with hills. I remember feeling great all the time and it impacted my life in many positive ways. However I still struggle now with getting back into it. I have this paralyzing anxiety whenever I even think about running or working out. I cant explain where it comes from. Sob stories aside, I made the mistake the first time of doing it for "a girl" who had no interest in me but motivated the hell out of me ***blah blah blah no one gives a shit...*** I think thats what I'm missing now but I would like to motivate myself another way to kick my own ass out the door and run a mile or two without feeling a sense of doom, heart flutters and general inexplicable anxiety and fear. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but for some reason it really rears its ugly head when I contemplate exercise. At the moment all I'm doing is every morning before work (4 days a week) I do 30-40 push-ups, 15 pull ups, and 15 seated rows, its not a lot, but I feel good for doing it. I know it does practically nothing but it does exhaust me quite a bit and I feel quite drowsy after doing it. If I don't do it I feel extremely guilty. So I've managed to create a habit for myself, which gives me some hope!**TLDR: Trying to make a new habit of exercising, too anxious to start**So I figured yesterday that I would make myself start by investing in a new pair of running shoes. The running shoes I currently own are from 2009 and are kind of rotted to say the least I was wondering what you guys would recommend in terms of beginner running shoes to get me back in gear. My budget is $60-$80 dollars.Thanks so much in advance! [info] None [info] 1399403896 [info] train
brillantezza [info] I've had this all my life and I've been diagnosed with anxiety. As you said, it's generally when you're alone in bed trying to go to sleep which is the exact same thing with me. I also sometimes worry when I haven't been in contact for my mom or dad or even boyfriend that they got into a car crash, and then my head goes to a very elaborate place like "What if their cellphone got destroyed and I'm not listed with an updated number on their info. It's not totally uncommon to sort of stew on what would happen if a loved one died but it is not normal. This is a symptom of anxiety, albeit a common one. You should really seek counselling because although these thoughts might not be particularly intrusive in your everyday life, they can be very insidious and indicative of an underlying problem. But know that you're not alone, and it's not just you. [info] None [info] 1390920946 [info] train
OwOMaster10000 [info] Suddenly depressed and have severe anxiety? I'm 16I use to be strict on when I'd feed my betta and now I'm slacking, I don't remember when to feed him or have motivation to. I've been having to force myself to get upI have 25mg Hydroxyzine pills from the hospital when I went for panic attacks a few days ago but it worked the day before yesterday, and didn't yesterday even though I took two (5 hours apart)I don't remember if I ate or not but my anxiety is making me feel nauseated and I don't know what to doMy mom has been staying home to make sure I was fine but had to go work today (Instacart deliveries) and I don't feel safe aloneI can't stop thinking about the fact I'm going to die some day and it's making me have panic attacks constantly We figured it was from me staying home more often but I think about it when out of the apartment too, I had a panic attack in the car on the way to the storeI can't be left alone right now but my mom has to work and I'm freaking out I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder a few years ago but it's never been this bad. I'm not suicidal, it's literally the opposite [info] None [info] 1587657705 [info] train
revmyk [info] I can only speak for myself, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder (also PTSD) about two years ago. I was prescribed Xanax, then decided to give it a weed a try after reading about experiments conducted for anxiety and ptsd. My symptoms were chest pains and panic, usually when I had to go shopping for groceries or sometimes in other public places. I have found great relief from using weed. I prefer vaporizing.  [info] None [info] 1358912950 [info] valid
RealHumanHere [info] Interesting question. Not really, I have not been fined once, nor a speeding ticket nor anything. I have very high education (Ivy). But I am diagnosed with anxiety, and I am a perfectionist and control-freak, and I definitely over-worry about things, I've been looking forward to joining Freemasonry for a long time (many years), and since my interview is so soon, I was worried I had everything under control :P. But you've risen a good point, I should not worry, and if it works out, it does.  [info] None [info] 1466344827 [info] test
chewonpebbles [info] I feel like I’m going insane TW: Animal death mentionOver the past two weeks I feel like my mental health has taken a turn for the worse.I was diagnosed with anxiety about a month or so back and I was happy to finally be listened to and was doing well for a while.However, recently I’ve been struggling with self-care (I didn’t shower for a week or more and I can’t bring myself to do much other than sleep) and mood swings. This is nothing compared to the extreme paranoia I’ve been facing.This is just a small part of what I’ve been dealing with:There’s a super busy street by my house, right by my school. I was late one morning and happened to see a dog limp in the grass by the curb. A lady was sobbing and the man was on his phone and not at all consoling her, so of course it’s easy to assume the dog was hit by a car. Then, yesterday I was on my way to a school event and saw a couple of people carrying another dog that happened to get hit by a car. Seeing someone grieving over their dead pet inches away from me was extremely heartbreaking and I feel like the image is imprinted in my mind but that’s besides the point.- What does this have to do with me? My mind is telling me that because I keep seeing animals getting hit by a car, one of my pets are going to die or I’m going to die. I have barely been able to sleep (checking on my pets and setting alarms to make sure I don’t drop dead in my sleep) and processing my emotions is so challenging. I’ve been lashing out at everyone I care about and hitting people, being an overall piece of shit. I’m only fifteen, I don’t know how to find any resources and my only coping mechanism is hitting something. Anything, really. I haven’t hurt myself more than “That hurt enough to bring me back to reality,” but I’m scared. [info] None [info] 1558483752 [info] train
kylepierce11 [info] I was always just like "Okay Kyle, don't fuck it up. Don't let your voice crack. Just say 'here' in a nice, normal tone and we'll get out of this just fine."I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later.  [info] None [info] 1458258596 [info] train
misterchief10 [info] Success Story: I Landed an Interview A week ago, I was in a pretty bad place. I failed a standardized assessment for an internship I wanted, and I figured an interview I was planning was off the table. Well, now the person I was in contact with at this company said he still wants an interview with me. It feels amazing. I’m really anxious about it, because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I have really bad social anxiety. And this is really the first interview I’ve had. The one for my previous internship was a friend of a friend at a small publication. This is a formal company interview.I’ve been studying the possible questions on Glassdoor and prepping mentally, now I just to wait.But I have to say, it at least feels great to be this far. I never thought I would get this far. My horrible social anxiety made me fear I would never have what it takes to even get an interview with a big company. I’m not outgoing and my last internship was something that sort of came to me. Even if I don’t get the job, I will still feel proud of myself for the first time in a while, because I’ve proved to myself that I can do it, I can get myself out there. And that’s great. Now, obviously I’d be disappointed if I don’t get it, but this is still a victory for me. Now to try to make sure my anxiety doesn’t shut my brain off during the interview and turn me into a quiet, stuttering mess... [info] None [info] 1520286654 [info] train
Narit [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, so i know all that already hah.  My stomach is super topsy turvey [info] None [info] 1363908951 [info] train
3catnight [info] On my phone so have to be short. This is so much like what I've gone through. Memory, concentration, learning, all kept getting steadily worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nothing helped that. Years of talk therapy, nada. Changed AED meds, no improvement. Recently went to a psychiatrist instead of the therapist route, got listened to &amp; was diagnosed with ADHD, the inattentive type. Concerta is now helping, noticeably. So is using a physical planner instead of an electronic one. Writing things down instead of typing them in helps.  [info] 200mg Lamotrigine XR [info] 1479747938 [info] train
Jibblers [info] Wow, you sound exactly like me, what with the having no filter and overanalyzing things in hindsight. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and OCD (mostly of the obsessive thoughts). Before I finally got on medication and got used to it, I would always obsess over things I say to people, if I said the right thing, what they thought I had meant and everything. The one or two true friends I have really get me so I don't feel uncomfortable around them. I'm much better now, since I'm on Paxil CR, but it's still hard to push myself into social situations. Think about trying medication again if you ever feel discontent with not interacting with people. It helps you control those thoughts and maybe even not having to deal with them at all! [info] None [info] 1347593044 [info] train
batman1285 [info] That was really well worded. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. I am wondering if you have any reading, podcasts or videos you'd recommend with more information like what you just shared. [info] None [info] 1558823836 [info] test
Die-Hard188 [info] How to deal with anxiety Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. During that time I had a lot happen to me in the span of 1 month. It took a month to realize I needed help and 4 months to quit the medications. For 2 years I was good now there was some times that I’d get panic attacks but I got through it. Now present day I’m in college (about to graduate in a year) a loving gf new car two jobs I love (main one in the field I’m studying the other as a cook both part time). It seems all fine and I am happy but my jobs kinda cut my hours my main one im on call all the time to fill in shifts for full timers well no one has been taking off that fits my schedule. The cooking job is at a golf course and with the seasons changing I’ve been getting called off. It’s been a struggle to pay for my car phone and insurance and because of that struggle I’ve been losing sleep and slowly the panic attacks have been coming back. My parents say they will help and my gf has tried giving me money but I always feel like a financial burden. The other day I had a horrible panic attack on the way back from a wedding with my gf. She walked into the house and I almost collapsed from not being able to breath and started throwing up. I had to tell her what was going on that my anxiety has been sneaking up on me. She told me get help get on medication. I don’t know if i feel if I go to get help it’s a stigma in the profession I’m going into because I have to be able to take stress (and when I work in the field I can take the stress of that work) or if its something else but I don’t want to. I want this to pass but I don’t know how to get better if I have to get back on medication I will but i really don’t want to. So what do I do [info] None [info] 1569896162 [info] test
TrainerAbu [info] I'm worried about my leg pulsating I sit/lay down a lot.  I'm on the computer all the time, I have no friends at all so I don't go outside much.I'm 30 years old, and I can visibly see my leg pulsing, right above my knee.I've told my doctor many times that I can feel my body pulsating often, usually with my legs, and that I'm worried that I have a blood clot.  He told me to excercise more often.I'm also extremely amenic, and I don't eat any vegetables.  I worry about my health, but my doctor always says that's just because I was diagnosed with anxiety.Should I be worried about my leg visibly pulsing right where my right knee is?  I can feel it right now.  It really is pulsating a lot.Please help. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1519590955 [info] train
meowords [info] Anxiety attacks first month within the job? Hi guys! Just another green bean here! I'm 19 year old girl currently in college, been working at Starbucks for about a month (2nd job)We are about the 2nd busiest Starbucks in VA, we have a drive through and crazy rushes with lines going out into the street, so it gets a little crazy!I've worked in food before and am used to the fast rush and long lines. I decided to work here because a long time friend of mine has worked here for a couple years. So far, I think everyone is ok with me, I'm not sure... district manager came in and told our supervisors she loved me which was great! She pointed out my personality and willingness to make things right and how I'm always eager for the next task! It made me a little flustered but honored! I try my best to be as enthusiastic and energetic in my Starbucks as possible. The last thing I'd ever want to do is become a burden to all the hard working staff in my store.Unfortunately, things the past few days have been getting a little bad for me. I mess up little things occasionally, like accidentally turning my back to a customer (at drive thru window) while waiting for a drink or forgetting a few of the duties of my stations, accidentally leaving a rag at my station while trying to multitask.Today, one of my coworkers pulled me aside for the 4th time that day. I was super anxious and nervous about this,They were talking to me about how my customer connection needs to be better and how if the customer is waiting, I need to talk and engage into a convo with them (Which is completely understandable!)I'm just an overall very anxious person, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have been on medication for it for a few years. I've been working my way on opening up and facing my fears and exercising the better part of my mind! But sometimes my medication can only do so much.After one of my peer coworkers had to talk with me about my performance, I tried to hold in my tears, but ended up completely melting down...I can't help but think my coworkers hate me, or that I'm doing a terrible job.I had a lot of talks throughout the day about some little faults and they all began to add up to that point, and it all finally collapsed on me.This has happened about twice within the month of me being employed, similar situation.I ended up having my meltdown in the back and threw up periodically into the trashcan trying to catch my breath and wipe my tears.I felt extremely suicidal in that moment, all my insecurities and doubts were all reinforced at that very moment at the same time. I felt I was constricted and trapped by my mental illness, I felt that I wasn't normal and that I could never do any task successfully like a normal person....it was an absolute mess, I hated it and I hated myself more than anything.At drive thru window, I always greet my customers and ask them how their day is, remind them their order and total and whatnot and start to get the payment done. I let them know that their order should be out shortly if it isn't already... etc. And I always talk to them and have a conversation with the customer if they bring something up! But after that or if they don't say anything and they're on their phones, I get a little anxious and quiet.... I just have a lot of trouble initiating a new conversation if we have to wait for their order. My coworkers get very mad at me for that, they tell me I need to keep my customers entertained.I was sent home today after my meltdown.I am wondering what I could do to do better at my job? Or if you guys think I'm showing bad signs as a green bean? I am still a little new at this job, I have much more to learn, but I feel my coworkers don't like me.A lot of the things I get talked to about are things I see other employees doing, which of course doesn't make it ok for me to do it, but makes me feel targeted sometimes....Maybe today they were just having a bad day, I'm not entirely sure really! I love my coworkers, they are all super hard working. I just don't want to disappoint them, I'm afraid they hate me.Long time employees, what are your thoughts? What are some things about new employees that you constantly need to remind/things that annoy you?Do you guys have a feeling that I am probably just not built for this job?I'd love to hear your thoughts and get a different perspective on the issue,Thank you guys!!!! [info] None [info] 1564115775 [info] test
jennlody [info] I definitely do. I started getting sicker when I was 15, and no one believed me. I never threw up so they couldn't actually see any symptoms so they thought it was in my head. They thought I was being bullied or was scared to go to school so I was making up being sick so I didn't have to go. They bribed me with donuts ironically. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds. After months of treatments not working, my mom asked to rule anything else out and they found the Celiac. Now over 6 years later I actually do have awful anxiety, especially when I go to see new doctors and when eating around other people. Luckily my family believes me now but they don't fully understand how stressed I get over these things. At least my parents apologized back then for being mad at me for skipping out on plans once they realized I really was sick at the time. [info] None [info] 1562727080 [info] valid
MollyMittens [info] I'm always anxious 24/7. I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and it's only gotten worse as I've gotten more responsibilities. &amp;#x200B;I recommend therapy and talking to your doctor about medications. Ideally before you start having panic attacks and ulcers. &amp;#x200B;Also find some good coping mechanisms to help you when you're getting super anxious. If I can feel a panic attack coming on I can sometimes prevent them by listening to calming music and drinking water.  Also naps really help reset your emotions. But obviously this type of coping mechanism is more of a band-aid than a long term solution so definitely look into longer term solutions (like therapy and meds). [info] Anxious Mess [info] 1538962177 [info] valid
shika_Peekis [info] I Broke Up With My Girlfriend To Figure Myself Out, Now I would Really Like To Be With Her But She Says She Has Moved On. Before I start I would like to say that we live together and she was the one who wanted to renew the lease before I broke up with her. She still wanted to renew it even after I talked to her about breaking up. So to start last fall I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and didn't think much of it. I figured I was just really stressed out at the time and it would pass. Over the coming months I progressively got more and more agitated with just about everything including her. I was really out of hand. then one day I said some really hurtful things and realized how toxic I was acting. I needed to get a hold of myself. I broke up with her in the spring so I could focus more on myself. We didn't talk to much over the summer. She went back home and I wanted to dedicate the summer to helping improve myself and understand how to deal with my anxiety. I feel like I really did improve and I do have a better idea of what I'm dealing with. Once the summer ended she came back to the apartment and everything was alright until I would bring up the relationship. She said she moved on and we're not getting back together. She hasn't really been able to see how much I've changed and actually did improve (Before I say something hurtful and then say, I won't do it again and I'll fix it. Then a week later I would just go back to being what I was). I can tell there's still something there but she's worried to open back up to me because of the past. She's still willing to hangout and spend time with me. But I keep messing things up because I keep bring up the relationship and getting back together when things start to look a little promising.I would really like some advice on how I should handle this. What should I do to show her things are better? What should I do to truly move on if my situation doesn't change? Thank you for giving me a platform to talk on. [info] None [info] 1568351599 [info] train
joelthezombie15 [info] Been diagnosed with anxiety for years but only really noticing it now, How do you cope? I've been diagnosed with anxiety for probably 13 years now, It was never a diagnosis that entirely clicked with me but I definitely did feel very anxious occasionally and I had and still have bad social anxiety. Recently though, through talking to people with anxiety and things, I've realized I was looking for the wrong symptoms in my anxiety. I was thinking you could only be diagnosed with anxiety if you had panic attacks damn near daily and crying fits and genuinely feeling like you were being hunted 24/7. I've now learned thats of course not the case and I'm noticing I feel anxious ALL the time. My hands and arms feel weak, my lungs almost feel like they're shivering, I have this overwhelming urge to run away all the time, I'm struggling to focus, everything freaks me out. These things all happened before but I didn't notice them as much and I didn't attribute them to anxiety (for whatever reason) but now that I know those are the symptoms of anxiety I notice them ALL the time and I'm really struggling this last week or two. Since I never really suffered from regular anxiety I never really picked up good coping skills. It was always triggered by something specific like being in public, so I'd go home and isolate myself to calm down. But now there is seemingly no trigger. So I don't know what to do.I'm not really asking for actual medical advice or anything, just things that seem to help you guys out. I've tried listening to calming music and laying in bed but I find that I just freak out that I can't hear what's going on around me, and if I sit in silence that freaks me out too. I hope this post is acceptable here, I'm just really desperate to find something to at least help a bit that I can do easily. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1549959787 [info] train
Thunderfin [info] This is me right now (though I am going to the weight room, I haven't been as productive work-wise).  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and use procrastination to ease my worries -- maybe you have something similar.The truth is, that voice won't go away.  Even for the most disciplined guys in the world, there's a voice inside their heads as they get out of bed at 5 am to workout, telling them to go back to sleep.Some things that have helped me are:-Have a to-do / goal list.  What do you want to accomplish immediately and/or in the next week.  What about the next month?  Type or write this out and make sure it's visible.  Another way to think about it: what are your goals?  Set yourself some deadlines.  Eg. I want to impress ____ or reach ____, and I have until ____ to reach it.  Obviously you ultimately should be doing things for yourself and not for external validation, but it's better to do this than nothing at all.-Have a rough schedule.  Make one the night before for the next day.  Include enough break time at the start, because it's very difficult to go from 0 to 100 just like that.-I haven't tried this, but get someone to hold you accountable.  Family member, friend, even someone random on this sub.  They'll message you every day at ____ telling you to get off your ass and start working.All the best man! [info] None [info] 1533181387 [info] train
Palonirya [info] This post actually made me tear up a little bit.I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2009, by actual doctors in an actual hospital and not just some internet forum, and even though I am so much better mentally than I was back then, there are still times when I will disassociate to the point where my own name doesn't feel as though it belongs to me.Knowing that there are people my age out there who will actively feign having anxiety and other mental illnesses and who think that having a mental illness means you literally have to talk about it all the time makes me sick. It is NOT so easy and so intriguing to talk about that you can write reams and reams on Tumblr about how your life is 'full of darkness' and how your body aches. A lot of the time you don't even want to talk about it because it can make you feel worse.The last thing I want to do when I'm having issues with my anxiety is turn it into a freaking poem for the internet to enjoy and praise me for. It is NOT worth my time. [info] None [info] 1471390836 [info] test
canihasnewbf [info] Definitely going to have to listen to that. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and take Zoloft. [info] None [info] 1545939075 [info] train
Giddyin [info] How do you feel about anxiety medication? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for many years along with 9 other things. I'm a 20f and I've only ever taken medicine for asthma and ADHD. I only take my asthma meds now. I have never had anxiety medication but it was suggested I could try it this year by my caseworker. For a few years now I've managed to push myself out of my comfort zone and get things done that needed to be done. But now I think that's gotten me as far as it can go alone. For example, I'll go to appointments alone, pick up food my boyfriend and I ordered, make appointments, pick up medication, call in medication, ect. Basically I can do things that need to be done by myself now without some unnecessary sense of dread. But if I'm alone and hungry I won't go out, I won't shop alone, I don't do anything I don't need to alone. I've lived my life of numerous disabilitys for so long I can't remember what it feels like to not feel how I feel. I don't know what's me or what's my disabilitys anymore. I think I should try anxiety medication if it takes away the negative feeling about going out alone. Does anyone have sorta this same situation? What are your thoughts on anxiety medication for every day use? I'm tierd of feeling sick of just thinking about going out alone for food. I don't even make posts on here much because I think I'm doing it wrong or what I have to say or ask is stupid. Probably a confidence issue too but I don't know where one thing ends and the other begins. I'm in therapy and my therapist thinks I should take the meds. I do too. But I know nothing about it. [info] None [info] 1532908076 [info] valid
Leah8329 [info] There is a chance she isn't crazy and projecting and abusive, she might have a form of anxiety. I found myself convinced that my wonderful SO was cheating, along with various other incredibly paranoid things when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Either way, counselling and lots of it.Edit: wording [info] None [info] 1444837129 [info] train
My_Beloved_Ice_Cream [info] In my opinion, you should just go talk to a psychiatrist and find out what it is and try to fix it without pills. Sometimes just talking is all you need. I have the same kind of word confusion as you do, and it is frustrating. I do feel like I must be rain damaged sometimes.. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, that's all, and I made it better through a little meditation. Pot desensitizes you, so after you get clean and give your brain a chance to recover, it might start to get overactive. Think of it like a search engine running full speed. As you type in a phrase, the engine suggests all kinds of words for you. I don't believe in ADHD, and a lot of people disagree with me on that.. (Soap box) somehow i think it would be very difficult to keep some types of very smart people in a standard classroom. In kindergarten, all the kids are hard to handle, curious, noisy etc... they tried to diagnose me with ADHD and the doctor really swore to my mom that I needed to be on pills. They did that with a lot of kids, put them on meds that made them feel like zombies. when all they needed was more stimulating information. In my opinion, your brain is so hungry for information and emotion, that it is acting like a little kids sponge like brain, and it's just soaking everything up, trying to take in everything that you've been missing in the high school years. When I get stressed, I get like this, but I use it to my advantage. It allows me to cover a lot more information when I study, and I focus more when i want to. It sounds like you're really smart, you just need to focus your mental energy towards something useful. But again, talk to a psychiatrist.. (sometimes you can get a "Free trial" from the state but im not sure how to do that without acting out and getting in trouble)Try to stay off the meds though, unless you really really can't focus. There's nothing wrong with thinking a lot.. you just have to be functional [info] None [info] 1389932908 [info] train
livelifelove13 [info] &gt; Would you say a person taking insulin is looking for attention?How can you even draw equivalence to this? It completely trivializes the DEATHS that occur as a result of people not taking their insulin. And before you come back at me with the deaths that occur from not taking pills for these perceived illnesses, try to remember that they are all suicides and self-inflicted.&gt;I have education in early childhood development and have worked with the 4-6 year old age group for fifteen years. I have seen kids with ADD/ADHD versus neurotypical kids. They are very different.I worked in child care for a significantly less amount of time than you did, and I agree with you, I know the hyperactive kids from the normal ones. Why does it have to be a disease or a disorder, though? ADD/ADHD kids aren't exactly rare. Not in the majority, but certainly not uncommon. That's enough for me to say that this is simply a trait of a sizeable chunk of kids.&gt; It's kinda naive until you live it.The reason I posted this in the first place is because I did live it. My parents were determined to find a reason for every one of my perceived faults, including hyperactivity. So I was diagnosed as a kid--and in high school, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well as MDD. It wasn't until later that I found that these perceived issues went away when I actually started trying to care about my life. I was always hyper and never focused, but I later chose to not be hyper and to focus. It's all about choice. You and your husband may not choose to place ADD/ADHD onto your identity, but you can't deny that many people do--especially kids in junior high, high school, and college. The epidemic of attaching one's self to a mental disorder can only have negative consequences. [info] None [info] 1490010015 [info] test
ServantofHades [info] Anxiety and PTSD I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago. But after almost 2 years at a job with borderline abusive bosses, I am now starting to have episodes where I black out, but don’t fall, and even continue on in conversations, only to come too a few seconds later. I also have spells where I feel like I am moving through a dream. I have been told to go to a trauma therapist for PTSD treatment by a “regular” doctor. Does this sound reasonable/logical. This possibility terrifies me, but I don’t know if that terror is “real” or just heightened by my anxiety. Not looking for an online diagnosis, just some advice from others who may know a thing or two while I search for affordable professional help IRL. [info] None [info] 1577991681 [info] train
AntiChr1st [info] That being said having something to do can be helpful.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17, the more i work the less I feel it. Back when I was full time army and working 12 to 17 hour days it was basically gone. [info] I couldn't think of anything funny to have here [info] 1563353707 [info] train
cmunk13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety first, because that's a more prominent issue in my life and obvious in my personality. It does way better with established routine, and consistency and preparation. However, it never really worked for me. It always made my grades WORSE, I was disorganized, and just unable to relax. Now, I know that that's the ADHD bit. So I have to compromise. A planned ahead schedule, so it changes per day but planned. Consistent windows for some things that are hard to schedule- meals, study times. Knowing when it's ok to blow things off and just do something weird, while not shirking my responsibilities or using it as an avoidance technique.  [info] None [info] 1523236237 [info] valid
mink2018 [info] ECG normal, shortness of breath when relaxed, clear breathing when heart is working hard. So basically yeah,  i cant breathe through my nose when i am relaxed, but nose breathing just fine after moving around(like climbing a short stair) I have tried saline and nothing comes out. After trying to sneeze hard,  my heart goes a bit fast and i can breathe easier for a short whileI was diagnosed with anxiety. Fuckin hell i thought i was dying, my body and mind acting like shit for 5 days. [info] Patient [info] 1579530780 [info] train
zergling50 [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 6 and had no severe problems with it until college. It basically opened the floodgates and I was suddenly struggling with so many mental and emotional hurdles and feeling like I was going crazy. I'm doing a bit better now but I'm still recovering and trying to just finish. [info] None [info] 1496867815 [info] train
OwlCupWithTea [info] I'm not sure i belong here I'm only 16, so some may say i still have a chance and things could improve. I understand that. I feel so alone. I been depressed all my life and had to start therapy at a young age because of an abusive brother. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 4/5. I'm  the result of two people who don't understand what being civil and not talking shit means. I've grown up around smokers including my parents, my uncle, my aunt and my two oldest brothers( i have three), at this point i have such a hatred for not only the smell but the act yet i probably have the lungs of a smoker of at least 5 years. I started homeschooling this year because i got extremely anxious at school and couldn't get out of my own head and was so depressed that staying in bed and watching videos to ignore the stress was so much better. In fact someone at the school actually recommended homeschooling because the school average was in jeopardy. I'm intrested in art and im not bad by any means but thinking of doodling makes me feel like I'll fail and not improve or ever be successful. I've had friends back at school but only one has continued talking to me, probably once a month. I have an online friend who talks to me more but also has a job and other friends. My mother is always concerned with my sister or my youngest brother(the abusive one as mentioned before). My father is working in a physically demanding job and has a girlfriend who constantly complains of being ignored by him. I'm overweight and exercising doesn't faze (i believe is the correct word?) me but sweating and being judged weighs heavily on my mind. I am terrified of dying i just simply wish my parents stopped after my brothers. Im sure they wouldve been happier as well.Im unsure of what i except of this but here it is. [info] None [info] 1579927732 [info] train
LGBTerrific [info] &gt;have met the likes of Kevin Rose and Mark Zuckerberg, and a pile of other "famous" Silicon Valley types.Any interesting stories?  Any surprises?  What were they like in person?  I'm always curious when people meet someone who's famous, mostly to hear about how they met the person and how that person reacted to the public.&gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety this year, and am receiving treatment for it.What led you being diagnosed?  How are your treatments working out?&gt;I've just joined up as a member of Australia's only GLBTI radio station (Joy 94.9)[Joy 94.9](http://www.joy.org.au/) - now added to my list of streaming radio stations. :) [info] New Mexico [info] 1302779123 [info] train
jgardner [info] I think teenagers would need to see a list of things and where they fall on the spectrum according to common understanding. With enough examples, they would know what to do in the various cases *and* remain perfectly tolerant. (I had someone say "I'm getting an abortion" when we were teenagers. That shook me to my core. I wish I had known at the time there were people who would've wanted to talk to me about that like my parents and my bishop.)As a professional, you can tell them what "signs of abuse" are and how to properly report, as well as what kinds of things are kept confidential with the bishop, etc...Another thing I might add while I have your attention: One thing that blew my mind as an EQP was having my mom (earned a degree in psychology) explain what the various common disorders are, what their signs are, and most especially, *what it is like living with these things.* Understanding what it meant when someone says, "I am clinically depressed" or "I have been diagnosed with anxiety" really awoke me to a better understanding of these issues and my patience, tolerance, kindness and charity towards people who deal with these things grew infinitely. I think teens need to know because that's when some of these things start presenting and I understand a very large number of people develop their illnesses in their twenties and their peers can be the most help of anyone. [info] child of God (and so are you) [info] 1560376105 [info] test
Prestiegefull [info] I get this alot as well. However, I was diagnosed with anxiety. As long as im avoiding triggers and keeping busy in life, I do fine. The thing that matters most is friends, hobbies, etc. It doesnt help to sit and loathe. Whenever I just sit around with nothing to do, I think too much. This makes me very sad and sometimes I get suicidal thoughts, and I self harm. But recently I've been trying to fix that, and I hope you can find out whats wrong and help yourself, good luck. [info] None [info] 1389104452 [info] train
jennyfromthebloccc [info] Things are falling into place for me for the first time in a while and I am so happy about it that I feel the need to share (lol) This is my first post on this sub - you are all so amazing!So here’s the deal, I’m a junior at an incredible university majoring in Human Resource Management - only problem is that I hate human resource management lol. Going into uni, I had no clue what I wanted to major in and HR seemed convincing and the fact that I am a people person made it seem like a decent fit. Over the last 2 years I have had 3 INCREDIBLE internships at very well known and large scale companies but I was absolutely miserable at all of them. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was only 11 years old and after starting college, it got severe and led me down a very dark and depressing path. I cut myself off from my friends, family, peers, and just about anything fun. It was bad. I figured, let me just get my degree and figure it out maybe it’ll grow on me. Fast forward to this past summer and I got a very random opportunity through a family friend to intern at a Superior Court in a judges chambers. From the first day of this internship, I absolutely loved it and truly believe that I have found what I was meant to do. I always had an interest in law and the legal system but never knew where to get started. Now, my internship has been extended to the fall semester and the judge PERSONALLY said that he sees incredible potential in me as an attorney which means a lot coming from him (he’s a pretty big deal). Fast forward again to this afternoon where I used the money I made from this summer to buy very expensive but necessary books to start studying for the LSAT and have already begun research on law schools that are likely within my reach.  I have never been this happy and PROUD of myself. For some, this may seem silly of me and you may be thinking “well yeah - a lot of people find something they love and want to pursue”. I never thought this would happen for me. I was prepared to sit in an office for the rest of my life and become a robot. I am so excited for myself and this journey I am beginning. Much love! [info] None [info] 1568689323 [info] train
IntrovertIdentity [info] I think what touch my nerve (although I didn’t post anything because today wasn’t my day for it) is that too often, I’ve been taught that “mental illness is simply unconfessed sin.”Too often, the solution to any mental health situation is more prayer or the likes and it neglects what is actually going on.Anxiety is more than just “everyday stress” or “DSM diagnosed psychological stress,” because it can be physiological as well. For example, my internist is my primary care physician. He once prescribed Paxil SR because I had anxiety. As a result, I see anxiety as a medical issue even though most folks see it as psychological.So, when there’s a post that reads “anxiety is contemplating your future without putting God in it” seems overly simplistic at best and dangerous at the worst.And while I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was an active church goer. So, then, what was the basis of my anxiety? Not contemplating God?If you’re trying to make a Successory poster like statement, what you said was fine. But, it really glosses over what anxiety actually is.And when we factor in the immanence and transcendence of God, our relationship with God when we are not feeling our best only gets more complicated. [info] John 12:32 [info] 1550004855 [info] train
yumcrackers [info] Questions in regards to possible emotional abuse... Hello, All.I'm a lurker here, as I have long suspected that my father possesses many of the traits that I've read about here, and today he has gone too far for me to keep quiet about.I will preface this by saying that I am a 35 year old female, with a 5 year old son. We do live in the same abode as my father, where I also help to care for my disabled mother (who has her own problems, though likely medicinally induced). I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues (likely due to experiencing emotional abuse and mild physical/non-sexual abuse growing up, as well as PTSD from a very stressful pregnancy).Today, my mother and I were packaging items to sell at my son's holiday bazaar at school, when my father became frustrated that he could not properly view the television. Apparently, the mere fact that my son was moving his body while playing with toys, exacerbated him to the point of physically threatening to "do something to" my son's hand. I happened to be behind him, and informed him, very concisely yet in a calm fashion (dunno' how) that he would not be threatening my son physically again, or that I would be calling the authorities.He then went on a rant, which I was recording on my phone. He belittled my anxiety problem, threatened our shelter, and threatened to turn break my personal property (telephone). Now, I do not pay rent, as my job is to care for my disabled mother while he is at work (whom he has literally left for dead twice on the couch in the last two years when I was not present- once it was septicemia, and the other time it was a sarcoid in her lungs). I have him recorded flipping me off, purposely using infantilism and other verbal methodry to exacerbate my anxiety. Upon threatening my shelter and informing me that I don't pay him enough money (while caring for my mother, working from home, caring for my son, caring for his animals, the home, and purchasing groceries and such that he eats), I handed him my large wallet, which he threw at my back, thus striking my upper right flank.I then proceeded to write everything down as an incident.I apologize for my format and wording, but this just all happened and I'm unsure of what to do. I don't have the means currently to leave (having spent money on Christmas for my son), I can't leave my mother here, and I can't take her with AND support her expensive medical care. In the past he has broken her arm, and neither her nor my brother (no contact with them now) did anything about it at the time, and I was living out of state (I was no contact with them at that time).I'm shaken up, beside myself, and am trying to maintain the emotional strength to keep it together in front of my child.I'm not sure what I'm looking for with this post. Advice, encouragement....I just don't know. I do know that I'm at the end of my rope, have a stomach-ache, and my hands are very shaky. Now he is sitting there acting like nothing happened. My mother, I think, is unable to react at this point. Ugh, guys. [info] ACoN, SG, fleas for days [info] 1481495076 [info] train
zingersting [info] That's true. I am saying anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety by more than one professional. This is a similar thought pattern to my own which does cause a constant hum of irrational fear and/or a full blown panic attack. Ruminating on these things are what is my issue. I'm not trying to Dr.Google or anything.  [info] None [info] 1524192526 [info] valid
Uhhlaneuh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD.  I’m on medication right now. I already take tons of meds (allergy meds, adderall, celexa, birth control, asthma) the last thing I want to do is get more meds. I was hoping for something therapeutic or a mental exercise I could do.Currently wedding planning and I obsess everyday about losing weight (although I’ve been like that for 15+ years) and gained 60lbs between 2014-2015.  I’ve never been this big. But as my plate gets fuller as I start accumulating more responsibilities, my brain just shuts off. All I want to do is sleep.  [info] None [info] 1507220869 [info] valid
jacckka [info] has anyone else actually been diagnosed with anxiety or do they just self diagnose I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I experience it differently to the people who say they have anxiety so I'm just curious [info] None [info] 1571819924
FinalBlackberry [info] Agreed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago, yet no one would know. I see that same thing with co-workers as well. [info] None [info] 1560524602 [info] train
rainbowinthedarkasdf [info] Weird guy in a weird situation Hi,I'm in a weird place. I'm 25, and I recently moved away from my mom. My mom kept me in my home for years and years. She did not raise me well and I have suffered greatly for it. I was diagnosed with anxiety at an early age and later OCD. I have always forever felt the sensation that something is terribly wrong. My mother and I have always been violent with each other. There have been many broken bones and bruises. She expected fear from me, but I wasn't afraid, so we fought and I became afraid. She never let me have any friends or hang out after school. When she became unable to stop me from leaving the house, she would stalk and humiliate me. This happened enough that I isolated myself and didn't leave the house for 5 years from age 18-23, when I no longer had to leave for school. During that time my mother and I continued to torture each other until finally my father died in march 2017. Our lives exploded and I became extremely symptomatic, unable to function. Every waking moment was a terrible nightmare, and when I slept I relived that nightmare in my dreams, and when I woke the nightmare was still there. I became unable to leave my bed due to the intense stress my obsessive compulsive disorder put me under. In bed, I would writhe and turn in very particular patterns, rolling my eyes across every inch of the ceiling and walls and floor to perfect satisfaction, only to be forced to repeat the process again and again. This would happen until I became exhausted and fell asleep. If I dreamed I would dream about writhing in bed and rolling my eyes across the ceiling and the walls and the floor. I lost a lot of weight during the year I spent in that constant, constant, constant state.  Prior to that year I had experienced severe, distressing symptoms of OCD but nothing so terrible and extreme.The only relief from this state was Klonopin. Klonopin was the king of calm. I could only feel calm with Klonopin. It was my forbidden love, I felt I became the real me when I had Klonopin.I somehow left. The details aren't worth writing down. After an extended period of recovery the details of which again will not be written down, here I am. I am functional, no longer writhing in bed, living far far away from my mother. OCD still haunts me and runs part of my life, but I have a life away from it which is steadily growing. I go to college. I am in therapy, which is working for me. And yet I feel like an alien. I didn't have the normal life my well adjusted peers seem to have had. I can't carry on with conversation. I cannot hold down a friendship. I can fake it well enough and get by superficially, but I do not relate to these people. All I want is an average life, with an average car, an average girlfriend, and an average job. I aspire for either this or total annihilation. I want to be ejected out into space and freeze there, back to the nothingness I feel inside myself. Hello? [info] None [info] 1557297857 [info] train
Gaboyski_ [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety last month and the symptoms are severe (palpitation, headaches, fatigue, brain fog, short-term memory loss, etc). I had to postpone my thesis because I could not handle my workload this semester. Even coffee/stimulants can no longer give me the fix I craved in usual amounts. Which is why I can't go on a reboot; I honestly doubt that my ailments can go away by going cold turkey for a few days or weeks. [info] 3 Days [info] 1554708510 [info] valid
Stormheartgirl [info] How Can I (22F) Get Better at Communicating with my BF (24m) I'm really bad at communicating when there's a problem in the relationship. I can't seem to talk about it at the time, and instead I bottle it up and dwell on it until something snaps and I either have a cry or we have an argument. I feel like my points are valid (I get annoyed at doing the majority of the housework, I don't like how he has a tendancy to snap at people when he's annoyed about something etc) but I just can't seem to express them in a healthy way. Part of it is that I don't have much experience of having to solve problems alongside a partner. My exes have mostly been very immature or clingy and the one time I got annoyed with my most recent ex (he made me miss a train home late at night because he was late) he just apologised and that was it. I should also note that I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back. I think most of it boils down to a bad breakup, one which came out of the blue for me, and a lot of my anxiety seems to hinge around worrying my partner might suddenly leave me, especially if we're having lots of problems. Tbf it is mostly the lack of good communication that seems to bother him. He does make changes when I point out problems, though that usually comes with a bit of frustration at me crying or getting needlessly angry. I have tried therapy before, but it doesn't seem to have helped me much. I'm also just plain confused at times. Sometimes I do take a while to bring up issues, but even when I think on them a while and try and bring them up in a non dramatic way, the hesitancy can cause confusion. Today, for example, I struggled to bring up a problem that has been an issue for a while, but became a bigger deal today. The problem was delicate and a little embarrassing to bring up (I trust him because he's my partner but it still felt a bit awkward) and although I did mention it several times today, my bf shrugged it off. I tried a third time to broach it casually, and while I was chewing over how to phrase the next sentence he changed the subject. And then realised when I went silent that the original conversation wasn't over. Not a big deal and totally accidental, but I'm now a bit confused because I did try and raise it in a non dramatic way, but because I didn't do it instantly at the time it didn't seem like I was trying to have a conversation about it. I feel like, even if I did get better at talking things out, I would still need some processing time. Any advice would be handy. I love this guy so much, and I really want to make this work, but I don't know how to bring up problems in a less dramatic way.Tl;dr I am terrible at communicating when there are problems in my relationship, owing to a lack of experience and anxiety. I bottle things up and then cry or end up arguing. My bf understands so far, but he does seem a bit exasperated that I can't find a less dramatic way of talking about things. [info] None [info] 1551646929 [info] train
AnnaMolly1007 [info] I'm still prescribed it, I only take it when my back is unbearable. And no I don't get high off of klonopin. That's the exact reason I had to stop Xanax because I was so sensitive to Xanax and I hate feeling high. And yes it's a hard core drug haha. I've read about the people that have been on it years as presribed and how they HAVE to ween down or risk seizing and/or dying. If that's not a hard core drug I don't know what is. All benzos are hardcore up there with pain killers on risk of physical dependency and withdrawing. Everything I read, people still get bad withdraw symptoms even when weening as ordered. But unless the mri I'm getting says otherwise, it helps because I have extreme muscle tension. Because I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1479664067 [info] train
absurdlyastute [info] &gt; ... but dealing with antagonistic people is so commonplace that it doesn't trigger that kind of response.You said that you avoid social situations IRL though. If you get anxiety with your peers, I don't understand how you can avoid anxiety during times of duress--especially after you said you'd push past someone like me to avoid confrontation. I've been diagnosed with anxiety (who hasn't these days) and while what you said sounds good on paper, I don't believe you're being candid.    Why does it have to be something beyond curiosity? You create a theory about someone, and you attempt to validate it directly/indirectly. It does usually have a side effect in that if someone believes there is another person calling them out on lies, that they will think twice about lying. E.g. Someone similar to /u/mvincent17781 used to delete every single one of his comments that scored below 1 for two years. When I asked why, he stubbornly refuted deleting any of his comments. However, in the next week or so 50% of his commentary scored zero or below. I never bullied or upset the guy, but his behavior changed. If you can apply what you've learned to real life that would be an incredible tool to avoid conflict, scams, and unscrupulous sales people. On top of that you can improve others' days or your own. There are women at the grocery store I visit that call me their work son/bf. The guys at the meat counter don't know my name, but they give me free steaks from behind the counter or 50% discounts on their prepackaged meats. Is that not the least bit interesting?I'm not here to fight. I'm only answering the questions you're putting forward.  [info] None [info] 1520004927 [info] train
sociopaths-throwaway [info] Masters and PhD’s all around and I would say we are rather upper class. My family on my mother’s side has always been full of incredibly intelligent and rich people. My father’s side perhaps lacked on the intelligence and money but I was never around them or him much. I don’t use drugs, and I use alcohol socially. I hate not having control over my own brain and I can’t help but look down on addicts. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but that was a very long time ago. I used to have severe social anxiety when I was in my early teens but have felt none of it in the past four years. That is also subsequently around the time I stopped feeling most thing all together. Weakness to me is more general sometimes but the things I find weak are as follows for my current boyfriend since it is freshest in my mind: not pursuing further education, not in constant pursuit of higher positions (or work for him overall), high level of emotions whether it is sadness or anger, constant self doubt and shame, lack of money without attempts to better the situation, alcohol or drug problems (he was addicted to pills and some other substance), self pity is my biggest one too. I have more but this is what I could think of at the moment. These traits always tell me that the person is open to manipulation. If someone immediately puts me above them it lets me know they are weak. My best relationship has been with a woman who had sociopathic/psychopathic tendencies because we were both on level with each other. That of course fell apart because I wanted to be able to manipulate and be praised and she wanted to inflict pain that I couldn’t feel. [info] None [info] 1561218251 [info] train
PentaQQ [info] I feel like I'm a complete melt and am being cornered Hey guys! First time posting here. I don't really know how to structure long posts so it might get messy. Furthermore, I know I might sound EXTREMELY selfish in certain points but I'm just so burnt out I dont know anymore. And finally, sorry for the long post. There's a lot that I wanted to go through...I'm truly sorry for that :(.So a little background before I get into the my problem. A few years prior to the events I'm about to unfold, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and have since been on medication from then till now. Fast forward a few years till 2018, I've been studying abroad since Feb 2018 in Canada (and I'm in Grade 11 so I'm not having those freshman problems I think) and during the semester from Feb till June, everything was going fine. I made some new friends, met a store clerk from the music store who was willing to teach me all about music production (which I was REALLY into it) and was I generally satisfied with how life was going. Then, I went back to my home country during the Summer.However, things started to go downhill after I came back from Summer. (to be honest my summer didn't go particularly well as I had several breakdowns and confrontations with my friends back in my home country but I want to solve my current issues first). The first issue I encountered was that I felt so different when I'm at school, as if I was an outsider to the school. It's just as if the school's atmosphere had took a 360 degree change. I don't know why but I just feel an external pressure pushing down on me for every step that I took within the school grounds. I just don't feel like myself anymore when I'm at school. The second issue I had was with the music instructor (the aforementioned clerk). He was a genuinely good teacher and tolerated me. However, when I tried to ask him when he will be available so we can have a lesson, he didn't respond. I know he had a busy schedule and stuff and I completely understand that. But he was constantly in game which had me questioning. Am I a nuisance to him? Does he want to stop teaching me? Theres still so much I wanted to learn about and this made me scared and unmotivated as I feel like I was left in the dark, trying to find the exit to this darkness with nothing but a dim of light.I'm just so burnt out at this point where normally everyday afterschool, I would be quite enthusiastic to talk with my friends in Canada and just make music in general but now, I'm just finding contents on Youtube to take some stress off my mind, wasting time. I don't know what to do. I don't feel like I'm myself at school anymore and I've started to fear what I once used to have a passion for. I'm just a complete melt and feel like I'm being cornered.Once again, sorry for the long and unorganized pile of text...I'm just so stressed and shit I don't know anymore...but big ups to whoever read the whole thing :) You are the MVPs. [info] None [info] 1536636831 [info] train
V4ST4 [info] I've already invested in a lock for my chest. I will be sleeping with my phone and wallet in my bed next to me. I really want to do this without all that build up. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it. I'm afraid that mentally I will not be able to handle this without my grades and mental health suffering.  [info] None [info] 1507772479 [info] train
JustLetMeGetAName [info] Dizziness and heart flutters for a few days now, do I need to go to the ER? So first off I am diagnosed with anxiety and I am normally on medication for it but I have been out for a few days now. So I dont know if this is related to that at all, but I've never had this happen before. So since Sunday night I have been feeling dizzy and having heart flutters when I'm up and moving. If I'm sitting or leaning against something I'm fine. It feels like waves washing over me every minute or so. I just took a shower and I've been sitting down for about 15 minutes now and it still hasn't gone away. I tried googling my symptoms and of course I'm extra paranoid now. I also didn't want to call the ER and ask because I know they take heart stuff very seriously. I also am a recreational weed user in a non legal state so I also didnt want to be dismissed due to that. It happens when I'm sober or not. Thank you to anyone who has advice! [info] User Not Verified [info] 1585717240 [info] valid
dennismiller2024 [info] Urinated. Until yesterday.A little background, I'm 23 years old, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school. I have a small group of friends, but I like to stay in the same routine. I was talking to one of my friends about my daily routine, because we were having a deep conversation about both of our anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD also? Sometimes I have to wash my hands for minutes after I pee before I feel clean." I had to tell him my biggest secret, someone that I've never told anyone. I said, "I've actually never peed before. I know it's something you're supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda never had the time." He was stunned by my revelation. "You've never peed before?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with urine or maybe it was just because I had never told him that before, but he was amazed that someone had not experience urinating. “You NEED to try it. In fact, let’s go to the bathroom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He walked me into the bathroom, and taught me how to lift up the toilet seat. He took my hand and arranged my fingers on the stem of my cock. “Relax, it’s easier than it looks. Here, watch me do it.” He pulled out his cock and started pissing into the toilet. “Just relax the muscles in your crotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenever you feel a force coming outward of the penis, focus on it but don’t try to control it. If you feel it moving inward, then recognize it, and relax the muscles again until it’s moving outward.” I followed the instructions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t help it. I feel the force. It’s moving back up. I’ll never pee, I should just give up.”“You got this, just relax. Don’t play mind games with yourself, you will pee before I let you leave this bathroom. If you don’t think you will pee, then no pee will come out. Trust me, you just have to believe in yourself.” I tried again, and pee started spraying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm urinating!"I peed for 5 straight minutes. He said, "How do you like it?" I politiely asked him to leave the bathroom so I could be alone with my piss stream. I wiped the tip of my cock with a single square of toilet paper, and flushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I ran over and hugged my friend in the most intense display of platonic affection I had ever experience. My pants were sprinkled with wet spots and urine continued to drip down my leg. My friend saw the urine marks on my pants, "Don't worry about that. You'll get the hang of it soon." We fell asleep together on the couch in his apartment. [info] None [info] 1553696566 [info] valid
cannabivore_9 [info] Start-up agency, sleepless nights, anxiety &amp; cannabis. Hi guys! I’m not here to promote the use of cannabis. I just wanna share experiences with anxiety that leads me to sleepless night, the state of mind and cannabis as a friend. I’m running a 2 mos. start-up brand marketing agency and I’m 23. My mentor decided to take the chance and build a start-up with me since anything that involves brands is always our passion.But running a start-up isn’t that easy. I had to find potential clients, build a service pitch deck and pitching to potential clients. Too much to think lately, until I reach to self-doubt and overthinking. I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago and fighting it was a journey. These past few days, I realised that I think it’s coming back, I missed appetites, sleepless nights and sudden crying due to overthinking. I had open this up to my dad, thankful I have a good relationship with my dad, cause everything was so heavy.I had to take time, toke some, relax and think. Focus on what’s needed to be done.  Today, I’ll start doing self-medication and self-therapy with music, talks, and cannabis. And would be more open to my family and friends.Would love to document my journey here and let everything out, one step at a time. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1562129119 [info] train
CityLights8 [info] I appreciate your suggestion; thank you.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders, panic attacks, and PTSD, so during some of the time that I have not worked or have had very part-time or low-responsibility types of work over the past several years, it might help if I explain to them that that's the reason why I was not working harder. [info] None [info] 1574990377 [info] valid
PostError [info] Marijuana induced anxiety... I've been smoking weed since about 16 or so. Now that I'm 18, I've been smoking for about a year straight now, never taking more than 2 days without having at least another joint. Yesterday, I got some kill Gorilla Glue from my bro (a strain I've had before) and  for some reason, this time smoking was a terrible experience. As soon as I put out my joint, I went to lay in my bed, and my heart started RACING. Like, 140 bpm kind of racing. I started to shake uncontrollably, I felt sick, cold. It was actually a pretty scary experience to say the least. Most of my friends are stoners and they have been for years, and I've never heard about anything like this happening to them. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I'm no doctor, so I can't really tell what's going on. I woke my grandma up at 2am to drive me to the hospital. X-rays, blood tests, piss tests, all nothing. (At the time of going to the hospital, I didn't consider the fact that it may have been marijuana induced, so they said nothing to me about it.) After I went back home, I lit up the same joint and sure enough... Extreme anxiety. Guys, it's the next morning and I still feel this way. I'm kind of worried, I never want to even touch weed again. Will I be okay? [info] None [info] 1571771771 [info] train
SearchHere [info] It is hard to explain.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I realized I had it.Have you ever been in a public place and someone was playing their music out loud? It’s kind of like that, but the music is much louder and drowning out anything you’re trying to do or think about.It can manifest physically. For me, nausea/vomiting allll the time, especially when going out was a red flag.  [info] None [info] 1538262454 [info] train
yoyoman54675 [info] I Feel Like My Brain Is Wired Wrong I feel as though my brain is wired wrong, please help me. I can think the logical thoughts and realise when I'm spiraling, but it's as though the two sides of my brain are constantly at war with each other. I constantly overthink about things that I know the truth of, but I cant help but to think that some how it's bad. I just wish my thoughts would stop.      I trust my girlfriend with my life, so why is it that I think she could be cheating when I know that that's not true at all. I know it to be true, but I cant stop thinking about it when I cant talk to her. It's like I need the reassurance from her constantly, and I hate that. I do love her, but I want to be able to be independent in the relationship as well.      What the hell is wrong with my head? Why dont the thoughts ever stop or at least slow down? Does it ever stop? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and tried medication for a while but it felt like I had no control over my own life while I was on them. Help me, please. [info] None [info] 1577899468 [info] train
BennyBooper [info] WIBTA if I hung up my sisters phone Do to some recent circumstances me(14M), my 2 sisters (19F), my Mom, and my dogs have had to stay with my Oldest sister and her husband. I have only put the age of the aforementioned sister.So me and my sister have decided to stay in the same room while my other sister and my mom sleep in a different room. Because me and my sister both stay up late. But I didnt know that she kept her boyfriend on the call while she slept. They are in their early stages of a relationship where they do all the cutesy couple stuff and they stay up all night and the recent events have made them miss eachother, which is fine. But she leaves him on the call while she sleeps. I cant fall asleep because I can hear him awake on the call, he is continuing like this is normal but I get severe anxiety for certain things. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. And I cant fall asleep comfortably. Its 5 AM where I live and I dont feel comfortable with him on the phone. Even then I dont know her boyfriend that well. I've met him twice and they've been dating for about 8 months. So WIBTA for hanging up her phone? I'm planning on talking to her about it in the morning. I will post an update when I can. [info] None [info] 1587816218 [info] train
Gartles-eth [info] I was making good progress and then I fell apart. Hey there, me and my ex broke up about 1 month ago today. It was a very close relationship, we spent almost all our time together and we shared a flat together. She herself wanted the constant contact, she would complain if I had a bath for too long and she never gave me time to do what I liked.She wanted to text all the time, when we were not in university. I love her and I love her family and it's so hard to deal with.It perplexes me how she wanted to go from this to wanting to leave. This is what happened though, it took me by shock because I was saving up for an engagement ring and she told me she wanted that. She'd always talk about our future.I constantly contacted her just after the break up, I missed the constant contact and assurance, I missed her telling me she loved me or the nickname's we called each other.I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and was given medication and have tried meditation. I've been working out too, which helps.I went about a week of no contact and I probably felt much better. On sunday she gave a game of mine back, I didn't see her face though and it was probably her dad that put it through the letterbox. I saw a picture of her on Facebook too, she looked beautiful and was happy and since then I've constantly contacted her, I've begged for her to come back it's complete desperation and pathetic. My anxiety is completely off the charts at the moment. Hopefully with a number that showed how well I was doing it would help me.P.S. I just need to be helped out of the rut i'm in now. She clearly wasn't the right person for me, I just need to see it. [info] 107 days [info] 1431021209 [info] train
Vivian42069 [info] Considering dropping Vyvanse (30 mg) I started Vyvanse 5 days ago, and so far the side effects have been pretty bad, but I quite like it as a drug for what it offers me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, if that assists in anyone's understanding.It was going perfectly fine, other than my mouth being dry almost constantly, occasionally having issues 'getting it up' , and not being able to tell when I was hungry or thirsty, until day 4. On day 3, I had a very stressful day and experienced gag-inducing nausea. Long drive home, bickering with friends, getting into a very yell-intense argument, and then day 4 approached. On day 4, I felt like I was dying. I checked my heart, and my heart-rate had almost doubled, and my pulse had increased by about 40-50%. I sat in my desk-chair nearly the entire day, called out of work, and my heart-rate never went down.Today is day 5, and my heart-rate and pulse is still awful but not as bad, and as a result of my dry mouth one of my lip-piercings got infected.I'm getting very seriously tired of this drug, I want to continue it but it just gives me problem after problem, and it's starting to put my health on the line.Do these symptoms fade away in your cases? How long was it until most of the side effects (if any experienced) wore off? [info] None [info] 1545449119 [info] train
SoftBluePetal [info] Rash on had for weeks 21, female, 168cm and 61kg. Only take contraceptive pills, smoke occasionally, no drug use, have been diagnosed by a psychiatrist with anxiety I have a rash on my palm. that seems like it could be ring worm. It started as one dot and slowly got bigger. Now it's dry and redish on the inside with little spots in a C shape around it. But it doesn't look like the Google pictures, it's not really super red or anything.My scalp has also been quite itchy lately, and apparently that's a sign too. (it itched before I googled it so it's not made up) sometimes I can see some blood if I scratch my head a bit too much I tried putting clotrimazole 1% on it twice a day, morning and evening but it doesn't seem to help. As you can see, I am diagnosed with anxiety soo I'm scared I have some type of skin cancer. But I know some kind of infection is more likely. Thanks for the help [info] User Not Verified [info] 1575155699 [info] test
jamwiches_jamwiches [info] I’m so sorry for what you’ve gone through. I was diagnosed with anxiety and dissociative identity when I was 17 but I just want you to know that you are not defined by that and are not defined by your past. You sound like a very sweet thoughtful person you will find other people like yourself and they will become your new family. I’m sure that must have distorted your idea of love but please know that there are lots of people in the world capable of loving you like you deserve.Edit: thank you for the silver, that’s the first reddit award I’ve ever gotten! [info] None [info] 1573361197 [info] train
HorrorSorbet [info] I was afraid I would swallow my tongue. That was my biggest fear. I had so many fears at a kid, but that was my biggest. Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  [info] None [info] 1550173235 [info] train
SgtOceanus [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. I feel like it's different from what I see on reddit and that.For me, everything is normal until either A. i remember something small, or B. Have something happen to be that seems super important.For A, I start panicking and worrying, going straight to the worst possible scenario. It's happened with leaving stuff by my computer, not remembering if I left my door open, or even which pen I took to school.For B, it's insane. I was working a double shift on Friday, and trying to hurry up so I didn't get left behind and make my boss (who is also my grandpa) mad. While adding whipped cream to a pie piece, I blew whipped cream out the back of the bag all over my apron. I was alright until I realized that I had tracked it on my shoe. Then I wanted to burst into tears and cry.B also makes it hard to fall asleep. I realize it's taking me longer to fall asleep. If I don't handle it quickly, I panic even more, and the cycle continues.Also intrusive thoughts but working out has helped so much with that. [info] None [info] 1497833252 [info] train
throwaway782323 [info] Yes! Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought panic attacks were not real. Apparently, I've had anxiety and panic my whole life and it seemed normal to me. In my 30's I used to have so much anxiety, I would get up at 2 am and walk outside for miles for 1-2 hours by myself. I was totally oblivious because mental health wasn't talked much back then.Every morning I wake up with a racing heart, sense of dread, fear, and panic about having to get through another day feeling like this. It has not been a good life, but I'm trying my best. I also put on a front so no one knows my pain except my SO. I've recently started telling me family. I wish there wasn't still stigma about it. [info] None [info] 1538509958 [info] train
ButReallyFolks [info] I feel you.  When I was in the process of the long road to my MS diagnosis, I was told upon arriving to the ER by the triage guy that I had anxiety. I didn't. But that night I was diagnosed with anxiety by the ER staff, as well. Brain fog and tingling arms and legs = anxiety.  Ever since then my doctors have labeled me with anxiety and major depressive disorder. I am circumstantially anxious - I strongly dislike doctors, and I have cried frequently at their offices because of how strongly I dislike visiting them and their disinterest in helping me. Apparently that makes me clinically anxious and depressed. Or I just want them to find out why I am having decreasing ability to breathe and immense lower back and hip pain. I was told it was anxiety and muscles. My MRI said a lot else. Go figure. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1574393164 [info] valid
foxhill1996 [info] Inpatient care and OCD Hello, I’m a 22 year old female in the London area. I suffer from severe OCD and agoraphobia, with anxiety and regular panic attacks. I’ve had these issues for many years. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started on medication at 15 and later diagnosed with OCD at 17. I’ve gotten through rough patches and for a while I managed to function well. I’m entirely self dependant and have held down a job for two and a half years, taking medication and having therapy to deal with my issues. Yet the agoraphobia has come back and I’ve lost myself in a major way. I’ve been off sick from work for two months and I don’t even know who I am anymore. I’m struggling beyond the point of self help. I’m looking for a reset. Something intensive before I really spiral back into suicidal tendencies. I have attempted before due to these issues a long time ago and I’m afraid that’s back around the corner. I have seen a treatment programme, inpatient for 16 weeks, CBT and occupational therapy included with full time support. It may seem extreme, given two months ago I was functioning fine, but I know how fast I can get worse. My job and my relationship are basically ruined due to this relapse. What are my options in the uk, primarily around London, for inpatient care? I can self fund as I have savings. Are there private options? Does anyone have any experiences with inpatient care in the area? I’m struggling to search around for myself. I’m overwhelmed and I keep short circuiting. [info] None [info] 1562300242 [info] train
TJoestar [info] Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety since a very young age. I have also had panic attacks for quite some time now, but it was the first time it happened in a moving vehicle. [info] None [info] 1531484876 [info] train
ariesbabeye [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety also. So that might be the reason for my weird experiences just like your experiences.  [info] None [info] 1550686247 [info] train
AWeebByAnyOtherName [info] I guess I have anxiety. New to this. Hi All,Recently I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I was on an anti-histamine for a bit. I'm about to start on SSRI. Therapy, exercise, and dieting didn't work. Apparently, this all started when I was just about to graduate from school. I was also working a full time job. I used to drink energy drinks every single day but I quit. No more caffeine even as I worked. I would say, I was working 60-80 hours a week. I also had a traumatic experience that same year. To cope, I drank nearly every other day for two weeks. I thought that 4-5 beers was nothing. My anxiety was worse just when I was about to graduate. When I finished, I thought it would go away. I have two masters degrees with multiple publications but working a job that I am immensely overqualified for. I'm not a writer but I am good at other stuff. I started a company and now I'm shutting it down. I live with my parents. I'm 30. I did too much and resulted in nothing.The reason why I made this post was because just typing about it made it a bit better. Before posting here, I was writing a "just in case" note (it was a note detailing what my new symptoms are and to blame my doctors. I plan on living a LONG time.) I felt nauseated, dizzy, and a hot flash and it felt like the end, but it was a panic attack that one anti-histamine pill fixed in 30 minutes. I always thought that I would be living alone for the rest of my life but I'm thinking I might just go out there. Not sure what I am looking for but anyways, hi everybody. My interests are manga, video games, and watching the same set of tv shows on end (Psych, Monk, Burn Notice, The Nanny, 30 Rock, Drew Carey Show, Scrubs, King of the Hill, Regular Show, Adventure Time, Parks and Rec, Everybody Loves Raymond, and The Office). I might be just posting on and off. [info] None [info] 1547699398 [info] valid
ashweeeeeeee [info] Is it anxiety? PTSD? Autism? Something else entirely? I have always been shy. When I was a kid, I didn't talk to anyone I didn't know for the first almost 10 years of my life. I was too terrified of it.This of course led to problems and even when I NEEDED to talk to someone, even if I knew them (friends/family/etc), I simply could not do it.I remember going to church and I was in Sunday school. I really had to pee, but I was so afraid of talking to anyone that I couldn't. I ended up hiding behind a chair and peeing on the carpet because I couldn't hold it anymore. I couldn't have been older than 5.My "parents" were not the greatest and have done many things throughout the course of my life that have probably made me much worse.My "dad" molested me, manipulated me and physically abused me. My "mom" manipulated me constantly. She is constantly gaslighting. She has told me to kill myself numerous times and denies it. She is physically abusive and mentally abusive. She held me by my throat over a staircase. She neglected me and refused to feed me or bring me to the hospital when I needed to go. She even threatened to kill herself when I disagreed with her.In school, I didn't talk. I had very few friends and most of those "friends" were my friends because they decided to be and in almost all those situations, they ended up using me.I HATED highschool. I had the same problem with people. Constant bullying and people pretending to be my friend so they could use me.I am now out of school and struggle much more to go about my day.I find no interest in being friends with people and I'm happier when people don't try to be my friend.I think that I often dissociate. I haven't talked to a doctor, but from the research I've done, it sounds like what I feel.I often feel nothing at all and have a very weak sense of self.I have no idea how to explain how I feel.I have a hard time thinking. I feel as though I rarely have "actual thoughts". I don't know how else to describe this. I struggle to make eye contact. It makes me feel extremely uncomfortable and I never know what is enough or too little so I settle for too little. I don't really care about this. People who know me aren't bothered.I have a TERRIBLE memory. I can be having a conversation with my boyfriend and then completely forget the whole thing happened halfway through a sentence.Simple tasks are so hard for me. I honestly cannot understand how other people can do them and not have to take a whole day or more off from everything else just to cope from the energy I have to put out just to do things.I am almost constantly stimming but I'm not sure if it's just from anxiety. I did it as a child and my mom would scream at me for "being psychotic" and so I stopped until more recently again (I'm assuming this is because I recently moved out and my boyfriend is very supportive of my many "quirks").I struggle to sleep. Sometimes I can't get to sleep. Sometimes I can't stay asleep. When I do sleep, my dreams are often very stressful.I have multiple anxiety attacks a day and often shut down afterwards. I'm not able to communicate and if I'm out, I can wander for hours before I realise that I'm lost and I have no idea how I got where I did.I think I may have some anger issues. Something minor can happen and, of course, that means that something has to be thrown. I often have the same anger towards dropping my charger out of reach as I do when I'm arguing with someone.I often shut down for hours or even days when things get too much. "Too much" can be walking by a crying child in a supermarket some days or even just hearing a light buzzing or other small, constant sound on other days. Other days, I am fine with short outings as long as I don't go out often.I can't leave the house often. When I do leave the house, it's with my boyfriend and I am easily overwhelmed by noise, lights and movement.I have days when talking is too much energy and days where everything just hurts. I have read that these could be caused by anxiety.I constantly feel like maybe I'm completely healthy, that this is just how people live and that I just like to complain.Anxiety, autism and ptsd are just what I've found to line up the most...if you have anymore suggestions, I'd love to hear them.I am diagnosed with anxiety so far. So if it's just anxiety, I'm so sorry to other anxious people who go through this and feel like this.I am on meds for anxiety. I went to therapy. Like I said, I just moved so I'll have to find a new doctor and therapist.I just feel like this can't be all. I feel like I struggle too much for there to not be more.Sorry that this post was so long. Thank you for reading it. [info] None [info] 1572990651 [info] train
megatron412 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and I went to cardiologist for the same thing... everything keeps coming back fine. It’s great that we don’t have a physical problem, now it’s how the fuck do we get out of our own heads? [info] None [info] 1565370420 [info] valid
justhereforthemems7 [info] It’s been a year since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564957354 [info] train
hibecca [info] Not a doctor.. had very similar problems and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Didn’t believe it at first, and my problems got much worse. Thought i had an inner ear disorder, brain tumor, etc. When I did finally accept it months after diagnoses, things are getting a lot better (therapy and medication to help). [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1557174147 [info] train
Lambeau_Analytica [info] Came here to say this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ~~dissociation~~ derealization. I recall in my H.S. years being in a perpetual state of ~~dissociation~~ derealization for around 7 or 8 months. I'd wake up: *Am I cool? I'm cool. Wait, why would I ask that, I must not be cool, that's why I'm asking, 'cuz I'm still fucked aren't I, or maybe this is how reality used to be, or is it?, oh fuck oh fuck* BAM and it's like everything becomes a dream.        The best way I could describe it to my parents and doctors is, imagine looking at the world threw a backwards pair of binoculars. Everything seems so far away, you feel distant from everything in all directions. Even sensations like touch can take a second to register. You feel like a passenger in your own body. Familiar places look completely foreign.        For instance, I was having an episode so I walked around my apartment complex's parking lots. On my way back I had trouble finding my place because nothing looked familiar. It's the worst fear I've ever had in my life. It's literally a civil war inside your brain.          Lucky for me I figured out ways on how to never have this happen again. And it hasn't for about 10 years now? Now I can openly talk about all my experiences with it, but back then just hearing the word would instantly throw me back into the dream reality.         I could see where it'd be a fun experience if you're taking a drug. You know why it's happening and how long it'll last, but when it happens for reasons unknown to you, you lose all hope that you'll be able to live in that old reality again.  [info] None [info] 1540232486 [info] train
Shamrck99 [info] Coffee is for the corporate slave. I’ve just finished reading caffeine blues and decided to kick the habit I’m 2 days in with some mild headache, I had already cut down to 1 a day with maybe one more some of the days. I can feel my blood vessels opening as he describes in the book Caffeine restricts blood flow around the body the extremities and brain most effected.It has thought me that the science of caffeine is heavily flawed how most research is based on epidemiology and not on directly what caffeine does to the body on a mechanistic level (Your kidneys and shit) the research is sometimes old or flawed, they omit important factors, they study about coffee as if everyone is drinking out of 6oz cups and not eating chocolate or drinking coke. I did his calculations and found that I was consuming much more than what my fitness calculator and Starbucks had me believe.I always wondered how people my age could be so chill and I was always rushing around ready to kill someone for using a stapler wrong , it’s the caffeine which targets your adrenals to push out cortisol, push fat and sugar into the blood, restrict blood flow and engage the fight or flight response. The constant stimulation of your adrenals whilst also blocking adenosine causes your body to try and upregulate the adenosine receptors, this is why you get such potent withdrawal adenosine is responsible for sleep and blood vessel dilation so you just want to lay down and your head feels like a pounding erection.I thought I used to suffer with anxiety but I realised I was taking in more caffeine than Nestle , of course you are going to think your about to die when your throwing back this neurotoxic run run fluid, I remember I used to drink about 600mg+ of caffeine in school when I was diagnosed with anxiety I would walk around with those Starbucks “very very large posh Italian word used by an American company “ sized cups and I would sweat like I was after coming back from a run and wonder why so I went to the doctor and he tried to throw medicine at me so I spilled the coffee on him.Caffeine is a natural pesticide that is designed to overload the CNS of small insects and cause panic in smaller vertebrates. If you think it’s not dangerous caffeine can cause death in small dogs and cats just by one or two teabags alone and we slam back cups of it.Caffeine is one of the pillars of corporatism I believe, caffeine spikes you with enough buzz to be more productive but not enough to kill you and have you flopping on the floor like a fish that just got wired out of nemos backyard, in all seriousness caffeine blues talks about how we’ve all been brainwashed into thinking we **Need** our morning coffee or we can’t function. And it’s only to the benefit of 24 year old marketing graduates that we keep knocking it back.I realised also on a fitness level that my craving for chocolate was not an actual craving for it but a craving for the caffeine it contained  when I hadn’t had a cup in a while ( Don’t worry sugars my next enemy ) seeing as sugar consumption can predict violent crime https://www.sciencemag.org/news/2009/10/sugar-gateway-drug-violenceOn a health level you don’t have to be the professor of “health-ology at the institute for all things healthy and not bad” to understand that dumping fat and sugar into your blood **CHRONICALLY**can lead to diabetes and weight gain and that drinking fatty sugary frappa wappa cappas doesn’t help either.Coffee is one of the highest traded commodities in the world, the conditions for some bean farmers were terrible and some still are and it all goes to fuel our own insatiable craving to be a corporate drone maybe if I pound another 20oz and eat a whole bar of Columbian dark I can write more papers than that asshole mark, stop it. One of the most profound parts of the book was how it makes you lose most of your nutrition one of the basic core needs for existence, Magnesium, Calcium and potassium are all pushed out, B vitamins also that’s not good the “institute of all things healthy and not bad” would not approve.Stop reading counter articles talking about how caffeine is an antioxidant, stop talking about moderation is the best form of action and just get off it, wean off if if you want to avoid significant withdrawals, but just stop it https://miro.medium.com/max/324/1*HI4kj-TPAQrfQkAdrw2KTA.pngAnd check his book out. [info] None [info] 1583895123 [info] train
KitKatThePirate [info] "it's really nothing to worry about, it's just practice. It's not a tournament or anything. So just stop worrying!"My dad said this to me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1549031707 [info] test
Huge_Zookeepergame [info] How easily does mental illness go away? I'm thinking about going to a therapist if I might have a mental illness. But I'm not sure. I think it's quite possible because when I was very young I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a mild case of OCD. I didn't know until an adult because I never read the papers that I gave to my parents to sign when I was in school. But for fun I decided to go through them as an adult. [info] None [info] 1552334983 [info] test
boylognese [info] Depersonalization/Derealization Hi, friends. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6-7 years ago. It’s gone largely untreated as it seemed to taper off a bit after high school and hasn’t been a huge hinderance since then. However, in the past month or so, I’ve been stricken with the worst anxiety I’ve experienced so far. On top of that, I’ve noticed symptoms of what I believe to be a manifesting depersonalization/derealization disorder. I feel entirely detached from myself, almost like I’m ghost walking on autopilot. I was driving home from work last night and I completely blacked out. I recognized that I was driving, that I was stopping at lights and making correct turns, but it was almost as if I had no conscious control over what I was doing. Probably the scariest experience I’ve ever had and definitely led to the worst panic attack of my life.I’ve been attempting to get in contact with my primary care doc for a referral so I can get on a medication/psychotherapy regiment, but I was wondering if anyone had any tips or stories regarding this or would potentially like to chat? Greatly appreciate any response! [info] None [info] 1556043792 [info] train
sayyoureaguy___ [info] I used to drink caffeine from the moment I woke up until I was trying (and failing) to sleep. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my doc was pretty adamant that I stop any stimulants. It’s been ten years and I haven’t looked back. I miss it sometimes but now I get anxious just thinking about how ridiculously anxious it would make me to drink it again.  [info] None [info] 1545053207 [info] train
fobfromgermany [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and breathing control is the only thing I've found to be helpful in controlling the physical symptoms. Even just a few minutes of mediating can have effects lasting a day or more  [info] None [info] 1394818346 [info] train
larafrompinkpony [info] &gt;You must not be in the US. They give adderall out like candy. I've been to 3 psychiatrists, none of them will give me adderall  :( instead I've been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1400589696 [info] train
Uma__ [info] Holy shit, thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I haven’t had the time to do therapy or medication yet as I’m drowning in school and work (so I can continue to go to school). I’ve been making time to exercise at night every other day because that really helps me, but I’m going to start doing these. Thank you so much.  [info] None [info] 1517447283 [info] train
princesscarmella9 [info] Reverse/Opposite PMDD Disclaimer: Not really PMDD related, but desperate and seeking help.I understand PMDD occurs during the Luteal phase. I experience the exact opposite. Symptoms only during the first half of my cycle. Generally starting around days 7-9, peaking at ovulation (day 14-16), and then tapering off from there. I've noticed this for the last 9 months I've been tracking my cycle using an app.Once I ovulate I feel like a brand new person.Main Symptoms:Mood SwingsAnxiety/Panic AttacksIrritableNauseaLack of AppetiteBloatingConfirmed via: Feel like trash when a Clear Blue Ovulation Test says high estrogen, and feeling the worst the day before or day of my LH SurgeI am diagnosed with anxiety but the difference is night/day during these 7-10 days. Examples:After Ovulation: Have waited in lines over an hourBefore Ovulation: Panic attack when I'm buying 2 items in a short lineAfter Ovulation: Can eat 3 meals a day, even if its slightly greasy or unhealthyPrior to ovulation: Can barely get dry toast downPrior to Ovulation: Severe panic over a blood drawAfter Ovulation: Visited a family member after surgery with zero issues.I've noticed these time and time again. Its even coming to the point that I schedule stressful things post ovulation!So far:PCP: Has never heard of anything like it, brushed off.Pdoc: Suggested upping meds during those 7-10 days Therapist: Thinks I may be creating it by expecting anxiety at certain times of the month.Advice welcome but not expected. I hope maybe someone can relate to me most of all.HUGS [info] None [info] 1545622772 [info] valid
ohtheplacesyoullgo_ [info] I have a heart murmur thing and I got it tested and the docs said nothing was wrong. Later when I was diagnosed with anxiety I realized that was probably the culprit.  [info] None [info] 1512021616 [info] train
AlueMoon96 [info] Suffering in silence So, I'm currently 23 and weight close to 340 lbs. I've been diagnosed with anxiety/paranoia disorder among other things and after getting off my meds (with the advice of my doctor) I found myself regressing back into a panicked eating. My waking and sleeping life is full of food even if I just ate a massive Thanksgiving sized meal. I'm in therapy and working towards slowly tracing the source of my weak will when it comes to food. I hoard food and fall into a food/drugged state and from this I struggle to do anything aside from stuff my face. Is this BED or just something else. I'd like to get more help [info] None [info] 1549767494 [info] valid
julietonnes [info] I get the same way with noises in my apartment.  I'll literally go from having a normal conversation to screaming and crying the next second all because I heard a couple thumps from the apartment above me.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety rather than misophonia, but it sounds like we react the same way. [info] None [info] 1353598337 [info] test
CovertOpsCon [info] AITA for declining to go and see my girlfriend's extended family? I am on my winter break from work and have met and met up with many people (friends/family, including my gf's). I have not had a day where I spend time working on my own projects such as working on my music, reading on philosophy (a personal interest of mine) and working out. Today when I woke up I knew I had the whole day set aside for myself to do these things. At around 2:30pm today my girlfriend asked me if I could go see her extended family from out of town. Her parents are particularly notorious for making last minute plans, which my gf understands. So when asked I politely declined stating what was said above. She is now upset that I decided not to come. To be more specific, she called me an asshole with a raised voice and continued with her arguments:1) I have had the past week and a half to work on these things and I have chosen to "waste" it spending time with other people. I should have set aside time earlier.2) I am an asshole because I have the availability and I am refusing.I have spend lots of time with her over the past week and a half (I believe it has been 7-9 of the past 12 days) and the other days have been a mix of family and friends some from whom came from out of town. I would argue that the expectation of my attendance is rather rude and inconsiderate as the plans were made last minute. On another note, I have been diagnosed with anxiety (runs in the family). I get really worked up and worried when things like this happen. I love my girlfriend with all my heart and I hate that I have hurt her, however I am not sure if I am wrong here. AITA? [info] None [info] 1577663574 [info] train
EnoughDetective [info] Trouble sleeping (Im a guy, currently 19 years old.)For a long time I have had trouble falling asleep, everytime I am trying to fall asleep and there is a tiny noise in my room I have this sort of shock that goes through my body, it also causes me to see like static and it comes with a sound similar to being flashbanged in a video game.The sounds are all real and in my room like cracking of my wood floor etc. For as far as I know like from the age of 12 I have been having this, and It never really caused any trouble untill now. Because now I have a 29 hour a week job. And the thing is that I start to notice how fatigued I actually am, I always thought I was just lazy but the amount of energy this takes at night from being shocked every time I hear something it just drains me.On the sidenote, I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder (who not these days).And I've had some serious trauma's growing up as a kid, from being abused by my kindergarten teacher to being knocked out by a bully.&amp;#x200B;I haven't been to a real doctor yet, I was wondering if anyone could share their thoughts on my situation beforehand. Or diagnose me. [info] Patient [info] 1585571629 [info] train
Dewdeaux [info] Interesting. I was diagnosed with anxiety in college (several years ago), but I never had panic attacks. It was more like insomnia and an inability to turn my mind off of intrusive thoughts. Are panic attacks triggered by underlying anxiety and stress, like delayed reactions? Because when these episodes happen, I’m not particularly worked up about anything.  [info] Son born 6/26/16; ? due 3/1/19 [info] 1544121740 [info] test
alosar7 [info] Ok to clarify what the psychiatrist said after his evaluation: He is AWARE that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but he does not think that what I am dealing with is related to it. I have no family history of mental illness or somatic disorders. The anxiety diagnosis was from around 12 years ago and I have been managing it since then. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1571023097 [info] train
evileine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in the past, and I'm being treated for PTSD, but my therapist is leaning towards C-PTSD. She can't diagnose it if it isn't in the DSM; maybe it will make it into the next edition. [info] None [info] 1472656810 [info] train
Mynipsareonfire [info] Sure.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, and it turns out I have a disorder of the autonomic nervous system.  Is it because doctors see women and think "anxiety" or is it because women are actually more anxious? [info] None [info] 1502253093 [info] train
bridget22 [info] I used to sweat through multiple shirts a day, only would wear dark shirts but would often just wear hoodies. it never went away until I was diagnosed with anxiety and got on a good medication. I remember 7th grade was so embarrassing because we switched to gray gym shirts and had to stay in them all day. I was sweating through the shirt before gym class even started. My white uniform shirts had yellow stained armpits.  [info] None [info] 1531621322 [info] train
Squiddytick [info] I have anxiety medication that I'm meant to take every day, but I never take it, which caused me to eventually attempt suicide. Saw this sub on top growing communities and thought I'd share my story.So I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 12, I'm now 14, by my therapist which I am still going to now. I have medication for it. It started out as 25g of medication, which I took fine. When they started increasing the dosages is when I started to stop taking the medication. They brought up the dosage to 50g, I still took it fine. It was when they took it to 75g that I stopped taking it. You see, they didn't have a 75g pill. I had to eat 1 and 1/2 pills, which meant breaking the pills. I got lazy and just stopped taking it. I'd flush an estimated amount of pills down the toilet each week, and lie to my doctor and my therapist about how much I've been taking. Now, apparently suddenly getting off anxiety meds can cause some problems. It was about a month or 2 after I stopped taking said pills when I tried to commit suicide. I tried to slit my wrist, but thank god the object I was using was pretty dull, and not very sharp, because if it was a legitimate knife, I wouldn't be here right now. I started bleeding, but it was way too painful, so I realized what I was doing and stopped. The next time I went to the doctor to check up on my anxiety, I told them what happened, so they increased my dosage to 100g. They had a pill for 100g, which meant no more breaking pills, but since it was already out of my routine to take them, I haven't been taking them either. I'm still flushing the pills down the toilet and lying to my doctor and therapist. I'm not sure what might happen in the future as a result of this, but definitely not good. I'm trying to get back into the routine of taking them, but when I forget, I still have to flush them down the toilet, which is most of the time. My parents are getting on to me about not taking my pills because it seem like there's too many in the bottle (which there is), but I just act like they're crazy and I've been taking them daily.Just something to eat off my chest. I'm sorry if anyone was disturbed. [info] None [info] 1573439083 [info] test
smokingpickles [info] It's strange to me how often it isn't characterized as that though and how often people think of anxiety disorders as intrusive thoughts when many people just have real life stressers that cause them to feel out of control and deal with it in other ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turns out most of my anxiety is career related-I worry about not having a job or not having a job that is good enough. If I can convince myself that I am working toward somethings in my career, everything seems to fall away. Not entirely, but not in an insignificant way either. What you have going on sounds awful, I am happy to hear you have a therapist that is able to work with you and help you get to route of the problem. [info] None [info] 1536018390 [info] train
AOEUIsaac [info] Bignoknow’s content is great (also his dad’s channel Dr. Paul Thomas). He’s also the one who made me convinced me that there is a strong connection between good mental health and healthy testosterone levels. I was diagnosed with anxiety before being diagnosed with low T. It was because of my anxiety that I went to my doctor to get my hormones check.  [info] None [info] 1545253881 [info] train
NotAnyOrdinaryPsycho [info] Huh. That makes me wonder if there’s an offshoot where you don’t pass out, but you do get really dizzy. A long time ago, I went to an interview for a college scholarship program. Those assholes put me through the ringer over a paper I wrote. I broke down crying there in front of the tribunal, but before I started crying, my head was swimming and I couldn’t figure out how to hold it upright. I felt like I was sitting sideways, and I couldn’t get back to normal. It was terrible. Maybe I was having an anxiety attack. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later. But maybe the two diagnoses are linked, or have a common thread. [info] Teach me with your special eyes.  [info] 1568647012 [info] valid
AndyDoopz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I've definitely been struggling with that.  [info] None [info] 1497413873 [info] test
myknifeurlife [info] I would say mentally ill before I found emo, at least got really into emo. When I was young (age 10) I found bands that I felt were emo but was only somewhat into them.  As I got older I was diagnosed with anxiety and it wasn't until maybe 3 years later I found and fell in love with emo music.  From the age of 19 to now (23), I would say that emo music became a remedy for sure, or at least a great way to know that I wasn't alone in a lot of the feelings I had.  Now, I still love the music, and I honestly feel like it helped me learn a lot about myself and find out what (i hate using this word lol) triggers my anxiety.  Now, its pretty rare for me to get the same bad anxiety attacks I used to get, I still have my problems with my anxiety disorder but overall it has gotten a lot better and I honestly can say I feel like emo music had a lot to do with it. [info] None [info] 1510759464 [info] train
BigOneEyedPurpleEmu [info] Thanks. Ive been struggling with multiple illnesses for the past couple of years but never got a clear deliniation between them. Ive been on klonapin for 2 years and am currently on valium. Not very effective imo.Is that anxiety general anxiety disorder? I have been diagnosed with anxiety but at different times different types.Edit: is there a word for the dtart of the cycle ie the random thought that sends you into limbo. [info] None [info] 1517768775 [info] train
JCashish [info] The comment below by [GoldenBirdSong](http://www.reddit.com/user/GoldenBirdSong) from another [thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Meditation/comments/1uun8j/effect_of_meditation_on_anxiety/celvr73?context=3) is so damn good that I have to re-post it here. [{I've started meditating after my therapist suggested it to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and I suffer from panic attacks.It took a while, but it's helping to the point where if I feel myself getting agitated I'll meditate for a few minutes and get less anxious. I also don't get anxious as often.The trick is not to grab onto any of your thoughts, just let them float by.When my mind is wandering or relaxed, the reason I get anxious is because my mind is latching onto thoughts and it turns into a spiral of obsessive anxiety.TL;DR: Try it. It helped me and you won't know if it helps you without trying.}] [info] None [info] 1390436103 [info] train
sachal10 [info] Withdrawal symptoms of Olanzapine and Fluoxetine I have been diagnosed with anxiety and been taking the aforementioned meds under prescription. But unfortunately my parents have asked to give up meds and focus on religion for anxiety. I want to be prepared for what might come so please let know what withdrawal effects I should expect.&amp;#x200B;PS: I have been taking this medication for about 4 months [info] None [info] 1557486370 [info] train
BarfPendegrass [info] Finally starting therapy for my anxiety/doubt/worry, and I couldn't be more excited! So I've always labeled myself a worrier. I've always had a voice of doubt in the back of my mind, I overthink things, and I'm super sensitive. I live a lot in my own head. I had very critical (of myself and really everyone) parents, one of whom was alcoholic. I really never had much of a chance to be a kid as I grew up. Now I'm out of that environment, but all my learned behaviors are still there.I never really tied all those things together into meaning that I have anxiety, but recently I went to the doctor because my nighttime tooth grinding was causing headaches. I even found myself clenching my teeth during the day, when I'd think of things that stressed me out. The doctor asked if I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I just shrugged. I always assumed therapy would be super expensive, but after looking into my work's insurance plan, I've realized that it's entirely doable. I made some calls and found a therapist who seems super friendly but super ready to call me on bullshit when it comes up (I saw a student counselor during college, and was turned off by the way I could pretty much tell her anything and she'd just sorta go with it). Ever since I made the appointment, I've been so excited. It's at the end of the week, and I can't wait. I told a friend that I know deals with massive anxiety and he was so excited for me. "You won't believe how much easier life is going to get!" I don't have any questions or need anything; I just wanted to share my excitement with the sub! I suppose if you have any advice for someone starting therapy, I could use that. [info] None [info] 1395183326 [info] train
giraffeking [info] Do you have anxiety? I ask because I felt the same things until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues, and while I never considered my self anxiety ridden, I found that doing many of the exercises for treating anxiety helped with my self conscious issues, and the other things you mentioned improved because of it.  [info] None [info] 1442430736 [info] train
Cont4x [info] Long distance relationships are hard. When it's with a pwBPD it's even harder. My ex lived in the US and me in Australia. We were together for just over 4 years and we got to be together physically a total of 4 months. Last year was the hardest year of my life. My ex started showing symptoms of a serious ailment that scared the crap out of both of us. This occurred only weeks after she had left my home for her own. Essentially for over 6 months of last year, we thought she was going to die. There was a lot of complications, screw ups by doctors, insurance being a bitch and some other issues I won't go into. It wasn't until the middle of August that she was given the all clear of any terminal illnesses. However the stress had taken it's toll on our relationship. Alongside all this stress of trying to support her the best I could from a distance, I had to continue my studies in my last year of my degree. My grandmother's health was also failing, work was getting quite hard and as it turns out, I've been battling a serious mental illness for most of my life (I was diagnosed with anxiety depressive disorder after the breakup).This would of been really hard for anyone to go through and I have to say I got through it, albeit not unscathed. She hasn't been officially diagnosed with BPD, I haven't even heard of it until a couple of months after the breakup. As I started researching the disorder, I started to see patterns emerge. I was heavily sceptical that she had it, I even laughed at my therapist when he suggested that she probably has it. Now I see all of her behaviour as just not normal, that it really does match up to someone with BPD. She had a incredibly rough childhood, her father was abusive and turned out he does indeed have BPD. One minute he would be kind to her, the next a demon. When I first met her, I thought it strange how strongly she was coming onto me, clinging to me incredibly tightly. I was coming out of another relationship at the time that really broke me, so the attention was certainly boosting me. Eventually I did fall for her and to this day I still love her. I made plenty of mistakes last year, I wasn't the perfect person to her. I understand now that being perfect is impossible, but I did try my hardest to be the best I could. I do indeed take responsibility for my share in our failed relationship, but I no longer take the view, like I once did, that I was the prime reason for our breakup. She piled all the blame onto me and I accepted it. Now after being on anti-depressants for some time, have to say that a relationship is a two way street. The behaviour that made me believe very firmly that she probably has BPD, is after the breakup. She still was very attached to me, but no longer in a romantic way. She resented me for my behaviour to her last year, feeling like I had let her down in her 'time of need.' So it fell into that "Hate you, don't leave me scenario." I didn't cut off contact with her until last month, when I didn't want to experience the same thing over again in Jan. Basically she met someone only a few weeks after me and was dating him a month later. Turned out he had BPD and the relationship didn't last. However she would tell me intimate details of the relationship, show me pictures and even go a little bit into the sexual details as well "I'm so proud of myself, he's even bigger than you and I didn't even gag". Other things include Me: "What was that noise, your orgasm noise?" (skype call) her: "HA, like you would know what that sounds like." She would countlessly tell me she was struggling to refrain herself from telling me everything, under the guise that she was used to 'telling me everything.'Honestly that excuse is a cop out. Anyway that relationship shortly imploded and she was becoming more and more irrational. It was obvious to me and as it turns out, obvious to her BFF, that she was becoming wildly destructive. When she started talking to me about another guy in her life, was when I decided to just go NC. I ignored all her messages and she did not like that one bit at all. She was becoming worried to the point she contacted my mother. A month passes after I told her to back off and give me space that she messages me again. This time asking why all my friends and family had unfriended her and blocked her on FB. I did indeed ask a few of them to unfriend her, but not block her. However it was their own decision to do so and most of them had already done so before my asking. Even though it was somewhat my fault, she blamed me for turning them against her. That I had somehow demonised her to my family and friends. Most saw the state that I was in after she left me and I don't think she won any fans on those days. I told her that I had done no such thing and told me that saying nothing is just as bad as saying bad things. I tried to keep the conversation positive without any kind of aggression. I told her I was saddened to hear her decision to unfriend me on FB and that I hope that one day we may meet again. Out of that whole positive message she focused on the one word in it that was accusatory to her. I had simply said she had abandoned me, which wasn't a lie, but the fact that I placed a little blame onto her was enough for her to explode.In the coming weeks I saw some posts on her blog that were just massive posts of describing various reasons why she hated me. At one point she stated that I was just as bad as her father, a man that has done horrible things. Even though I've tried my hardest to create space and to walk my path of healing and self discovery. She has taken every opportunity to drag me down, to hurt me when I was starting to walk away. I know she did indeed love me, but I don't think she ever loved me like I loved her. My favourite line she used to always say was "I love you more". I posted this on my blog (She reacted in a massive rage) 'I’d always say, “I love you more” and even though you’d always say, “Not a chance,” I was right all along' I don't hate her, I don't envy her and I don't wish her ill will. I really hope she gets the help she needs, that she finds the balance and peace within herself. That she finds love for herself, rather than trying to obtain it through relationships. I still miss her dearly and my feelings for her haven't changed. But I feel like I'm a used rag that's been tossed aside, because I was no longer useful anymore. I think that's what hurts the most [info] None [info] 1530285420 [info] train
Gianni317 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young but this has never happened before.  [info] None [info] 1510630969 [info] valid
DragonLordOfCookies [info] Is something clinging onto me? I get panic attacks. A LOT. I am diagnosed with anxiety and know the precautions and signs of them coming,but then theres... something else. A cold feeling runs down my spine. It digs metaphorical claws into me. I freeze. I sink. I sink into a vortex of everything I fear. Its out of the blue. Ill wake up and suddenly it shall consume my thoughts. Sometimes I feel a presence around,part of the room is covered in shadows more then usual,synchronicities stop when its around. I question everything I believe in,Nothing helps. I cant call for guidance,Family members cant calm me down, the only way to get rid of it is to fill my mind with something else. Ive talked to plenty of people before,even a psychiatrist and psychologist. None of them understand. No one seems to relate to the feeling... besides one person. They were a wiccan and suggested a cleansing with gems and candles (my only possessions at the time for any form of ridding myself of... it), and it was gone! For about a week. Thats all I ever get. A week here and there without it. Does anyone... have any clue what to do? Im usually a sane person who loves evidence but... all thats thrown out the window when I spiral. [info] None [info] 1527264923 [info] train
Trilllvana [info] Anxiety and flying. Help! Hello all! I am new to this community because I was just diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I am having the hardest time controlling it or making it go away when I am in the middle of an attack. And most of the time it just happens randomly, it doesn’t even have to be triggered. I am flying today, and I can feel me become the anxiety ball that I am just thinking about it. Do you have any tips or tricks to help me through this flight and just through every day life?? Thank you all so much, it’s been a real struggle. [info] None [info] 1537980448 [info] train
thesilversound [info] I was recently diagnosed and almost all of the friends I’ve told were really surprised and didn’t believe it, which has been discouraging. To clarify: I have childhood trauma issues that intermingle with the ADHD, and so most of my friends were more so expecting me to tell them that I was diagnosed with anxiety or a trauma disorder (which I still think I have, on top of the ADHD). I am also in medical school and always did really well in high school and college (except for the higher level college classes that I couldn’t keep up with due to my inability to follow what the professor was saying or study for exams earlier than the day before the test). So everyone is skeptical that I have difficulty focusing on a daily basis.For the past month or so, I’ve been overcome by this compulsive urge to prove to myself that I actually do or don’t have ADHD, which has led me to spend hours and hours each night searching this subreddit, reading about ADHD, and talking about symptom-related memories and experiences to my friends and partner every single day. It’s been really exhausting and has been really draining for my partner as well, who is dealing with her own issues but always patiently listens to me spilling all of my stream of consciousness thoughts on to her.My dad also confronted me yesterday because he found out that I filled prescriptions for Adderall and Vyvanse. He gave me this lecture about how I should stop being angry and frustrated that I have trouble studying, because there’s no use to being angry, and that I should just accept that I might need to take more time than other people. He told me that everyone needs to just learn to live with their hardships in life and work with what they have. He said that he also is more disorganized than his coworkers and sleeps a lot (uh... yes, my whole family is like this, where does he think I get it from?) and that when I was younger, I always concentrated really well on drawing and reading (yes, because those were my favorite hobbies and I hyperfocused to the point that my mom banned me from reading fiction books up until I was 18) and that there’s nothing unusual about all that. And that he hopes that I don’t rely on the meds forever.So all in all, it’s been discouraging because for once in my life, I finally feel alert during the day and I finally have been able to sit down and do work without stressing about how I keep reading the same sentence over and over again. Tonight, I tried to watch a video for studying purposes after my meds wore off. I had forgotten what it was like to study before I was diagnosed. And I found that as soon as I sat down and clicked play, my brain immediately went into a sleepy trance and I was using all of my energy and willpower to redirect my attention, all while still missing stuff in between. I know that checking and rechecking your symptoms is not a healthy solution to doubting your diagnosis, but it’s what I’ve been turning to. All this to say, yes, the self doubt is a real struggle. [info] None [info] 1545615325 [info] train
friendswithknifes [info] She knows I get stressed easily ( I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9/10) and I suppose I can see what you mean, but she certainly could have worded it better. I got so anxious and freaked out from what she said I nearly threw up, if that's any indication on how stressed these things make me. And she definitely should have. I'm not a mind reader. [info] None [info] 1566252317 [info] train
anothermanoutoftime [info] Hey buddy-Your story mirrors my own in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, but it really reared its head in the last 6 months or so as I coped with a great deal of work stress. I would get home, eat supper with my wife, and play Skyrim until bedtime. Usually past bedtime, because I didn't want to leave that world where I was a hero, or a villain, or maybe just a simple leek farmer, who happened to also be Archmage of the College of Winterhold. On the weekends I'd sometimes load the game up after breakfast and only stop for dinner. I know exactly what you mean about the roleplaying aspect- I'd construct a character in my head and really dive into it, and all the worry and stress would slide away. I wasn't me, I was a Nord warrior with a grudge against necromancers, or a Khajiit trying to find redemption for past crimes. But I'm also here to tell you that it gets better- I'm on a new med combo that finally seems to be working, although one of them makes me sweat like a damn pig, and life looks bright instead of terrifying for the first time in a long time. I'm glassing up a bit here, so I'll just say keep moving forward, that's all any of us can do. And PM me anytime you want. And death to the Stormcloaks! [info] PC [info] 1470462618 [info] valid
RedditCanBeAScumbag [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorders after suffering for at least fifteen years. And I've decided to lose some weight too. [info] None [info] 1419635382 [info] train
NotEzrasWife [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety for years now, over ten. Today, I was diagnosed with agoraphobia and social phobias as well. For me, today was a bad day. It felt like I couldn't control anything. I felt lost, overwhelmed, miserable, ashamed that I am who I am and angry that I've ruined everything I. My life to end up at this point. I had 3 appts I HAD to go to. There was no avoiding them anymore. I've avoided them to the point of a full-day severe panic attack. I've avoided them to the point where I had payments cut completely for not attending (I'm on a single parent pension - Australia) and I've avoided phone calls to the point where I almost racked up a $4000 debt. Physically, it feels like my head is going to explode, like I can't breathe, my entire body aches (I found out today my chronic pain is caused by my anxiety). I feel strong, tight, cold-burning sensations in my chest and upper back. My heart races, and I feel extremely hot and sweaty. I shake uncontrollably and cry hysterically while hyperventilating, or go completely numb while also being hyperactive - sometimes both. I become hyper-aware of my surroundings. If somebody 10 seats over from me moves their head, I know. If someone crosses their legs, I know. If someone sighs, maybe I've somehow annoyed them. I swap between extreme paranoia and embarrassment of myself, to anger thinking people should be more aware and understanding of anxiety. I'm not crazy, I have a mental illness. I feel like I'm letting everyone in my life down, I can't understand why anyone likes me. Maybe they're just pretending. Maybe they just feel sorry for me. I can't be fun, or funny, or smart. I feel like I'm letting myself down. If only I tried harder, was a better student, sister, friend and mother. If only I was smarter. Studied harder. Stuck to my decisions. Stood up for myself more. For me, crowded places send me in to overdrive. Anywhere that isn't home, or somewhere EXTREMELY familiar and comfortable, is hell. My family is home, and I can deal with these places with them around most of the time, but even then it's not easy. I hate appointments. I hate phone calls. I hate people knocking on the door. Sometimes I even hate seeing my neighbours, who I'm extremely close with. Paying for things is excruciating. Maybe there won't be money on my card. Maybe the item is more expensive than it's marked and I don't have enough for it. Maybe my cash was robbed from my purse and I don't know yet? Thankfully, today, I made my appointments. I had my anti-anxiety meds increased and got a medical certificate so I can take some time to settle, be still and recover. Today was probably the hardest day of my life.  [info] None [info] 1481200132 [info] valid
chicklet2011 [info] Anything that causes me stress makes my ticks worse.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I'm doing great right now.  [info] None [info] 1375085187 [info] train
mind_fcked [info] Check out r/rOCD. I'm sure you'll find useful information there. I can relate to what you're going through. My boyfriend and I have been together for 7.5 years and last year I was diagnosed with anxiety. Four months ago, my boyfriend and I both were changing jobs and I felt myself becoming anxious over several days and then, out of nowhere, I began overanalyzing our relationship. So many questions would go through my head like, "are we meant to be together", "is he 'the one'", "am I supposed to be with someone else", "do I like someone else". It jumps to our compatibility, to his "flaws", and whatever else my brain can come up with. I was so happy before this started and we we're even starting to plan our wedding. I had no idea why I was questioning these things and honestly, I still don't know. I'm going to therapy weekly and we've changed my medication around to see if that helps. Some days are better than others but I won't give up on my relationship.I hope you find your way through this. [info] None [info] 1517806057 [info] test
meet_lgbt [info] Featured Member: jonez450 ###MeetLGBT Featured Member: April 14, 2011#[jonez450](/user/jonez450)&gt;##Stats &gt;&gt;* **Age:** 35 &gt;&gt;* **Gender:** Male&gt;&gt;* **Location:** Melbourne, Australia &gt;&gt;* **Pictures:** [http://i.imgur.com/53Jb0.jpg](http://i.imgur.com/53Jb0.jpg)&gt;##Life&gt;&gt;* **Job:**Internet Editor &amp; Publisher, Company Director&gt;&gt;* **Hobbies:** reading, golf (well once every 3 mths), Reddit&gt;&gt;* **Pets:** 1 spoodle and 2 goldfish&gt;&gt;* **Political views:** left wing socially, right wing economically &gt;&gt;* **Religious views:** avowed atheist &gt; ##What makes you ____ :&gt;&gt;* **Laugh**: Reddit WTF, being able to joke about myself (keeps me sane) &gt;&gt;* **Happy**: being able to help others, being true to myself &gt;&gt;* **Sad**: the state of Government, particularly when it comes to sexual discrimination &gt;&gt;* **Angry**: bad drivers &gt;##Favorite Things: &gt;&gt;I love reading, and learning new things, particularly coding. My business also, particularly when we achieve new highs and create new things&gt;##Sexuality&gt;&gt;* **Orientation:** Bisexual (pansexual really, but I accept bi as encompassing that) &gt;&gt;* **Coming out:** I've come out to some people (close friends), and my mother and partner, not my father, it's the one I fear the most. I'd like to come out more, particularly in public (Facebook and Twitter) but I'm not at that stage yet. Small steps I guess. &gt;&gt;* **Relationship status/background:** engaged. Was married for nearly 10 years until 2009, and have one son. I've had relationships with both men and women in the past.&gt;##Misc.&gt;&gt;- I'm currently working on some new websites to complement our main site, including one big project I'm particularly excited about. &gt;&gt;- I used to write for a very popular tech blog (hint: it was acquired by AOL last year), and have met the likes of Kevin Rose and Mark Zuckerberg, and a pile of other "famous" Silicon Valley types. That's all in the past, but it was an amazing experience &gt;&gt;- I've been diagnosed with anxiety this year, and am receiving treatment for it. Me coming out as being bisexual to those close to me is in part about me taking back my life and overcoming my issues. Being active and helping others is part of that as well; knowing how hard it has been to finally accept who I am means that I now hope I can help others with it &gt;&gt;- I've just joined up as a member of Australia's only GLBTI radio station (Joy 94.9), and I'm hoping to do some volunteer work there, maybe even some on air stuff.    ----You can be a featured member, too! **[Click here for details](/d880k)** [info] None [info] 1302777474 [info] train
somebubblegumbitch [info] I’m in a constant state of panic I’m wandering if anyone else has felt this way or has any advice to reassure me (as long as it is allowed on this sub!). I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago, finally came off all medications a year ago but was put back on them today. A week ago I started getting panic attacks and it’s now just a constant state of panic- heart palpitations, chest tightness, difficulty breathing. I’ve been to a&amp;e twice and admitted to the cardiology ward yesterday.  There’s nothing physically wrong with me and I feel so ridiculous that my brain could make all these debilitating symptoms happen. [info] None [info] 1573752798 [info] valid
ThanosisKing [info] Employer will not listen to complaints, affecting my health I have had a job in the vision center of my local Wal-Mart for about 16 months now. Our old manager moved on in April of last year and we got a new manager in September of last year. Almost immediately he began creating rules and making schedules so that I'm working alone during peak hours. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and Asperger's and get panic attacks whenever things get real busy and I'm all by myself. All of this is documented by several doctors and has been turned into my employee file. I've tried pointing out what the manager is doing but my complaints are falling on deaf ears. Nobody is taking my health seriously. I complained to HR, to the store manager, to the market manager, but nothing is getting done. They are not listening to my complaints, which I think could fall under the ADA.Any info or help you could give me? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1525954846 [info] train
SinOfMemesMeliodas [info] I can relate very much, while hospitalized for other reasons, I can relate to having a similar convo with my no (at the time she smoked weed in front of her three kids (I'm 17 now, PJ was 6 and Kaitlynn was 5 at the time). And lastly I can relate I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't let it ever hold me back :) [info] None [info] 1551113956
veinpain [info] Yes! I've finally been officially diagnosed and am being treated. I first saw a terrible psychiatrist who tried to pin my pain on a past sexual trauma and then attempted to pawn me off on a psychotherapist (with no anxiety treatment). I didn't buy that because of years of imaging and diagnostics from specialists that clearly show a physiological basis for my pain. I wanted help for the severe anxiety I felt as a result of my pain. After that frustrating experience, I had a procedure using conscious sedation. The medication didn't work and I had a full blown panic attack during the procedure. It was horrible and humiliating. Thankfully I was scheduled to see a new psychiatrist right after that who was more willing to listen to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety and given medication to help on a daily basis and one for if I felt an episode of panic coming on (mostly social situations where I fear pain coming on). Just knowing I have it helps. I rarely use it now. I'm just glad someone took me seriously and listens. But, yes, pain and worrying about your pain and its effects can truly cause anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1501860291 [info] train
To_a_Green_Thought [info] Thank you very much for posting this.I have a hard time going to the temple.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD, so I think that has something to do with it.  However, even before going to the temple got *really* hard for me (a few years ago), it was always tough.  It's a very stressful experience.  I mean, for crying out loud, I'm going to *God's house*.  That's pretty huge.  I think that, if more people really thought it through, more people would realize the magnitude of what they're doing (and, consequently, be stressed).  For many people, going to the temple is nothing more than going to the meetinghouse for church on Sunday....which is both bad and good.  On one hand, our church leaders have told us to contemplate the importance of the temple, to realize how special it is; based on their comments, it seems many members aren't doing that.  On the other hand, if our members get to the temple and do ordinances for their ancestors, whatever gets 'em there is good, I suppose.I'm rambling, I know.  The bottom line is this: I feel for you, because I feel the same way.  I may not have the exact same concerns as you, but it's hard for me, too.Let me share an experience I had in the temple that helped me.  This happened about a year ago, back when I was really making an effort to attend the temple more often.  (I have a toddler, which only adds to the difficulty of going, and I finally had a moment where I could get away.)  I chose to do initiatories, because it's better for me, I've found.  As I sat, waiting to start, I got a very strong impression that Heavenly Father wanted me in the temple, because it meant that I was closer to Him, and He simply wanted to be close to me.  I really felt how much He loved me.  Obviously, God can visit us whenever and wherever He wants to; I felt that He was telling me that it'd be easier for *me* to feel Him near in the temple.  It was a tender moment.I try to remember that.  It's still hard for me to attend the temple, but I try to remind myself that God just wants to be close to me, one of His children.  I reiterate this: *it's still very hard for me*.  I share this experience not to give you any sense of shame for not going, but simply to share what I've felt.  At the bottom of it all, God just wants to be closer to us, and that doesn't always mean doing an endowment session.  Just go (and, again, I'm telling myself this, as much as you) and be near God. [info] None [info] 1530468462 [info] valid
rgdenis [info] As expensive as a therapist is, go see one right now (assuming you have insurance at the moment) and get as much counseling as you can before you make the move.Talk to friends, and talk to people you trust. I have been diagnosed with anxiety almost two months ago and I'm finally doing A LOT better just by talking to my best friend for about an hour on the phone a day. It seems really tacky and obsessive but from my actions before the help, I don't know how far I could've made it before my thoughts made me lose all sanity. [info] None [info] 1437584825 [info] train
rightlyanxious123 [info] This is an interesting thread for me because I’m over 90% turbulent. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 years old, so yes, I agree to the whole mental illness thing. I’ve been in therapy for many years and I take anxiety medication, but I don’t know if I can ever truly be “healthy” [info] None [info] 1557072746 [info] train
easterbran [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety my sophomore year here. I've always made sure I have an outlet to keep me happy when school gets tough (hobbies). One pitfall I see a lot of GT students fall into is abusing alcohol to feel less-anxious. Be really careful with that stuff, I am still getting over my problem with it.Also, STAMPS psychiatry has been awesome for me. I worked with my doctor to increase the dosage (anti-anxiety meds) until it was worrying to me how little stress I felt about classes/assignments. Then we lowered the dosage a bit to where the anxiety is still there (keeps me a hard working student) but does not interfere with my day-to-day life. [info] None [info] 1556115052 [info] train
incompletesentenc_ [info] Looking back at it, I had them since I was a very young kid. It wasn’t until 2 years ago (when I was 18) that I was diagnosed with anxiety and I identified them as panic attacks rather than my ~mental breakdowns~ as I called them.  [info] None [info] 1551963004 [info] valid
trashbasically [info] Want to give phenibut a go but I'm scared I won't be able to keep it in moderation Basically I've read a lot of about phenibut and it seriously sounds like a godsend. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14 and I'm turning 21. It was always pretty manageable and for a year when I was 16 weed was the greatest anxiety-reliever. For the past (almost) five years I've been toking practically all day every day even though it makes me an anxious wreck and I have no life outside of smoking weed and going to work. So what I want to do is grab a little bit of phenibut online, and on my days off during the week that's when I'd dose. Usually my two days off are different every week, never weekends, and they always feel like such a waste. I always have so much in mind but my anxiety keeps me at my mom's house. I feel like with phenibut I'd be more proactive. But I know that if it's the relief I'm imagining to to be I'll get carried away. And I know that addiction to the stuff is no good and the withdrawals are even worse. How do you guys dose in moderation? Be it phenibut or anything else, how do you do it? [info] None [info] 1469489891 [info] train
Osixotin1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 so it’s definitely not new to me. I’m thinking it is time for a med check. I am on meds but I’m on the lowest dosage so it may be time to up them a little. I’ve been given breathing exercises but I have had a hard time realizing I need to do them when in a situation like that. I was trying to breathe while in the store today and I had my “worry rock” (a slick rock that I use as a sensory toy) but it didn’t seem to make things much better. Hopefully I can just get better at them. Thanks for the advice! It is greatly appreciated [info] None [info] 1545604030 [info] train
MoKix [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. AMA. [info] None [info] 1402289312 [info] valid
democraticwhre [info] I’m sure a lot of people “think” they have ADHD - Do I do anything about it? I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago during undergrad and now I’m in grad school. Whenever I have a certain issue and look up information about it, I invariably either match the characteristics of ADHD, or benefit greatly from the suggestions given for people with ADHD.Like this list - https://www.chesapeakeadd.com/how-can-i-study-so-hard-and-still-do-badI could completely just be WebMD-ing myself, and I don’t fit all the symptoms of ADHD, but is this worth doing anything about? I am on medicine for anxiety. [info] None [info] 1513313336 [info] train
anonbff [info] I went to therapy. I learned that behavior can be a symptom of anxiety, which I didn’t know I had. Therapy taught me a lot more about myself. Like how to spot when it’s just me having a moment and what to do. After I was diagnosed with anxiety I went to my doctor and started taking Zoloft which was the best thing I’ve ever done. The change started at the root of the problem, the relationship. Though we loved each other very much, I knew I had no. There was no way for me to move on and grow from my old habits. I needed a clean slate. My next relationship was leaps and bounds better. We are both in a good place of mind, which makes our relationship all the better.  [info] None [info] 1550927391 [info] train
Darksilverbuttons [info] I am struggling to get a diagnosis from my doctors and it is destroying my life. I am waiting on an Autism and an ADHD diagnoses for over a year after a psychotherapist wanted me to go get evaluated by my doctor after she told me to take online tests and print them out, I went to my doctor and got a referral but I am still waiting. My doctors are very useless and I am trying to be taken seriously as my doctors like to misdiagnose you with stuff, I have be complaining of all the stuff the psychotherapist told me was due to Autism and Adhd like sensory overload etc but my doctors keep telling me it's my anxiety. Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought I would finally feel understood but after it, I felt like there was something missing, I knew it wasn't a part of my personality like my delayed hearing, my sensory issues, being picky with food etc I am struggling in life because I don't have my diagnosis which is making life harder for me, I am not able to get help in college because I need proof of needing help which I can't get without my diagnosis, I have lost friends because I don't know what I did to offend them and I can't explain about autism and not understanding social cues if I have no evidence to back it up with, I have gone through fights with my boyfriend because of my withdrawing from him, because of my mood swings where I have been a complete mess because I am unable to understand more arguments and try to tell him I don't understand I will come across as manipulative which is complicating everything even more.I am at my wits ends because there is 1 thing that can solve all of this but because I am an adult female I am unlikely to get diagnosed because I am being misdiagnosed and having pills pushed on me by my doctors that have caused memory loss, mood swings, loss of appetite and worse of all have made me extremely tired and anxious. I stopped taking them after my hair fell out due to me stressing out so much, anything I complained about the tablets instead of checking me for something else they just upped the dose and changed the tablets I went from citalopram 20mg to sertraline 100mg in a matter of 2 months.How do I get my doctors to listen to me? I have no money for a private diagnosis. [info] None [info] 1577959728 [info] train
peasm00sh [info] Health anxiety/obsession with health? Does anybody else obsess that they might be ill?I have been concerned for a while that I am unhealthily obsessed with my wellbeing. Every time something slightly out of the ordinary happens I Google it, terrify myself and then spend days agonising that I’m sick but can’t bring myself to call a doctor. I stay awake at night reading all the symptoms, make myself so upset, and worry so much that I end up wanting to kill myself because it never has a good ending. I don’t know what to do about this because I’m too scared to call a doctor. For background, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago and underwent counselling. I was pretty much okay until January when I had a traumatic experience. [info] None [info] 1565117577 [info] train
mako-jaeger [info] Hmm, it's hard to say. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in February, and I'm still trying to figure it out myself. I think you have to make peace with who you are and who you where in the past, and then take the proper steps to becoming the person you want to be.It of course won't be easy. In February after I went through the darkest period in my life, I realized a lot of things about myself. I think I had to just let go of all the bad things that had been holding me back, and embrace the good. For too long I was tied down by worrying about all the negative things people thought about me, and not appreciating the positives.I'm not sure if being "chill" is exactly the goal. I think being forgiving is a much more applicable goal. Being chill is good, but we will all have times of anger, uncertainty, and sadness. Trying to force those things out will only increase anxiety in my opinion. Instead forgive yourself if your anger, uncertainty, or sadness causes you to do something stupid. And investigate into why you are angry, uncertain, or sad.Also don't confuse eustress with distress. Putting it simply, eustress is what makes you feel like you have to get out of bed to fight the stressor, and distress is what makes you feel like your bed is your only safe haven from the stressor. Make sure your doing things out of eustress. Let it push you up. And accept that you will be stressed. It is hard for me a lot to accept that I am stressed. I don't always like it, and sometimes I want to ignore it. But the bright side is there is always a cause for stress, whether internal or external. Find the cause, investigate it, decide on how to act on it, confront the stressor, and move on.And as a final piece of advice to bring it all together, accept the bad days, because you'll have them. That's life. This semester has punched me in the gut so many times, I'm surprised I'm graduating in such a good shape. I think the key was accepting what happens, forgiving yourself and others, and moving on. Remember you can't change the past, but you can change the future. I live by this phrase in a lot of things: "Late, but not too late." Meaning essentially that sometimes you'll be late to a realization or doing something you should have done a long time ago, but it's not too late to make things the way you want them to be. And when it is (because it will be), accept it, forgive, and move on. [info] None [info] 1524878990 [info] train
Tipper92 [info] 27 [M4F] North West, UK - I'm back, looking for someone special in my life ***SORRY THIS IS SO LONG. I SUCK AT WRITING SHORTHAND***&amp;#x200B;(Firstly, I know looks play a large part in someone's opinion, and while judgement terrifies me ahaha, I think it's only fair to share [what I look like](https://imgur.com/a/okuzyWj)! I don't take a lot of photos of myself, but folks say they like my dimples)&amp;#x200B;It's hard to know where to begin. I used to be quite active on reddit during a point where the option of a social life wasn't really open to me, and met a good pen pal. Unfortunately, I find myself in a similar position again, seeking something closer both in location and heart. While I'd like to be social and have someone close and special in my life, the few people I did have like that left some years ago. I'm here hoping I might find that again.&amp;#x200B;I live in the Manchester area. Currently studying film production at university and work part time retail on the side. I'm lucky enough to have my own place, but living by yourself without anyone to visit you gets quite isolating. I like to keep myself productive, creative, and open and ready for opportunities! I also have a large policy on being honest and open-hearted, so I guess I'll just open up as much as possible/necessary here and hope I don't scare everyone off!&amp;#x200B;**About me:**1. I'm 27, but I've been told I look much younger, which is why it's difficult getting attention from people my age - they think they'd be talking to a teenager or something! I act even older and am a middle-aged homemaker at heart. I wear wool cardigans, enjoy nights in, like doing crosswords, make homemade stews and soups, and while I'm not a neat freak, I like to keep quite tidy.2. I'm quite short for a guy - 5'4". Again, this doesn't help me look any less like a kid haha.3. I know it's a cliche, but I very much like animals, especially birds. I enjoy collecting RSPB bird pins. In a more stable, free position, I'd like to work more with animals.4. I used to be slightly overweight, but nearly two years ago decided to start looking after my mind and body a bit better, and now enjoy a healthy lifestyle. I've lost about 50lbs and hope to keep going. I don't completely deprive myself of the things I enjoy, as I think moderation is important.5. In total honest truth, I've never had a romantic relationship. This also means a date, a kiss or otherwise. I had a very close friendship with someone almost like a brother to me when I was younger, but the friendship ended messy and left me with a lot of anxieties and self-image issues. I know baggage turns people off, but I like to be 100% honest, and I think everyone has some form of baggage or experience-driven flaw. That's my big one.6. &amp;#x200B;**My Hobbies, in favourites order:**1. Daydreaming, honestly2. Video games (pretty much any platform, though I don't have a Switch), films and music3. Watching Youtube videos (Youtube &gt; Netflix &gt; Conventional television)4. Video editing (hoping to do it as a career)5. Writing (stories, scripts and song lyrics mostly)6. Hiking and nature, when I can get out of the city&amp;#x200B;I am, in the best case scenario, looking for a relationship, and I think it would be a good idea to share what good traits I have in that area, so you know if it's what you're looking for. I will also share my flaws, in case any of them are dealbreakers so that you're not wasting your time in messaging me.&amp;#x200B;**Good things about me:**1. Again, I consider myself an honest person who doesn't like lying.2. Without trying to sound too forceful, I fall into many of the cliches that girls say they like about guys (funny, committed, long walks on the beach kinda things). I've been told I'm funny and wanted to be a comedian growing up. I'm also write comedy. I like nature and the outdoors, and having someone to hike in the country with would be cool! I'm also paternally and monogamously-oriented, and while I don't want to rush anything, it's my dream to one day be a husband and father.3. I don't like doing things for myself as much as I like doing things for other people. When I had a close group of friends, I lived vicariously through them, and it makes me happy putting my focus into other people.4. I'd say I'm quite empathetic and prefer to listen and respond, rather than talk myself.5. I'm a moderate, objective person. I know what I'm good at, and what I'm not good at. I take criticism to heart, and if I mess up, I'll not only admit it, but need to be called out on it. It's how we grow.6. I suppose I could be considered quite a sensitive person, I'm in tune with my emotions and think its important to recognise all of them. I can be angry or miserable, at times, but I can also be energetic, relaxed, romantic, jokey, fiery, and more.7. Even though I am inexperienced, I consider myself quite an exploratory and vigorous person. I'm bi, and enjoy the idea of opening up to experiences in that area, should it ever happen. I say this to let people know that I'm not cloistered or physically broken or anything.Bad things about me:1. This is quite a biggy and I suppose I could have mentioned it earlier, but I was diagnosed with anxiety in my teens and it can flare up at random intervals, either lightly or heavily. As a result, I get easily nervous and if I ever do struggle to open up or voice concerns, it's not due to being egotistical and macho, I'm probably just really anxious about putting myself out there.2. This comes with a slew of other flawed traits; low confidence for example, which is why I'd prefer to talk about you or other people than myself. I can also jump between optimism, realism and pessimism quite regularly.3. Though sensitive to what people are saying, I'm quiet a lot of the time, and I say what I think is honest and necessary in as few words as possible. Although, I *think* that's mostly down to not really finding someone I have a passionate, connective engagement with for so long, and think if I found the right person, I would open up verbally a lot more.4. I'm a late bloomer in most respects; I can't drive, I've only recently been drunk for the first time (although I'm not opposed to a drink at all), and similarly just went out of the country for the first time too. Although travelling has always been a larger dream for me, my current situations never allowed it, as I've never been a rich man.5. Gonna reiterate it here, I'm 5'4". I know some may be thinking "that's not a negative, that's just your height", but I rarely, at least in the location I live in, see girls more attracted to guys shorter than them, and it's something I'm quite insecure about.6. I have an average frame, a little bit of muscle but also a little bit of pudge. I'm working to make it better, as I said I'm following a healthier lifestyle, but it takes some time to get there. I think self-betterment is important, and I don't think it's fair to ask for anyone who looks after themselves if I can't get to the same place myself.&amp;#x200B;**The kind of person I'm looking for:** I think everyone has preferences and I hope I don't come off sounding exclusionary and egotistical mentioning my own, aha. Though I am bi, I get on far better with girls, and pretty much just have female friends exclusively as testament to that. The main thing I like in people is kindness and sweetness. A nice smile and a soft voice are my weaknesses. I also like talking with people about various creative things, so if you're into anything artistic - if you're a photographer, musician, painter, fashion, streamer, anything - it'd be something we could definitely talk about. Same with healthy living, if you're into exercise and home cooking, it would be great to share tips and help encourage each other!  I prefer girls my age, or younger, so between the ages of 20-27 would be preferable. Physically, my type is petite girls. Not necessarily fit, but I do go for shorter, smaller girls. This isn't a dealbreaker for me at all, so don't worry if you're not short or have body fat - I would be a hypocrite otherwise! If you're shy, or homely, or sensitive, and want to open up to someone more, then I think we would be in very similar positions and get on well. I don't smoke or drink much myself, but I'm 420-friendly and don't mind getting tipsy, if that's your thing!&amp;#x200B;**What I'm after:** In an *absolute ideal* world, I'm looking for someone who would be interested in getting to know each other, become close, and hopefully if we hit it off, have it develop into something more. If not romantic, then the minimum I'm looking for is to open up to someone together. Someone who would like a person in their life they can have a strong, honest connection with - that person that you chat with nearly every day and don't feel weird about sharing all your frustrations and emotions with. I do miss having a best friend, and I would like that again.If you live in the North West area and are in a similar boat, or I sound like someone you'd like to know, then please message me! And, as I said at the beginning, I'm sorry this post was so long. Still holding out to rediscover someone who will be very important to me.&amp;#x200B;(I do want to make a point to say, you don't have to be an overtly confident speaker, but as you can see, in an effort to carry on a conversation, I write quite detailed. I ask for more than one line replies, a desire to actually engage in topics, and don't be afraid to ask questions in your messaging and replies. I always reply to really cool-sounding people on here, who have written large open-hearted posts, but then when we get into messaging they write one line about the weather and don't help me to share or connect with them at all.) [info] None [info] 1562431154 [info] train
sookisucks [info] Yea I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I saw a therapist for about 9 months and sometimes feel I should find a new one in this state. I just simply decided to own it. Some shit really messes with me. I was once driving about 4.5 hours with just one of my gfs friends. I knew her but wasn’t all that close. Night driving in the highway really fucks with me so I just told her up front what was going on. I’m not shy about saying that issue because it really helps and most people will understand. [info] None [info] 1522019256 [info] valid
skimask7 [info] I first did acid when I was 15, and I will tell you that although for the first 2 years I had no regrets, once I actually grew up I regretted everything.  Not so much actual regret, but I just know that my mind was not ready to make proper sense out of all of my experiences.Just like I did, she's probably doing it because it's hype.  I honestly would have shamed her and the people giving it to her, because we all know "hey drugs are bad" doesn't work.  The ONLY thing that has worked for me to stay out of certain drugs as a teenager was being socially shamed for it, then again, idk what works for other people.  And by shame, I don't mean talk to them like a coach, I mean going "lol that's gay asf bro".  Once you grow up, you don't care what people think.  When you're a teenager however, 75% of your motives are to impress other people.  I wouldn't be surprised if she took it because everyone hyped her up.  "AYY THE LIL 14 YEAR OLD WANTS A TAB HOW COOL IS THAT SHE CRAZYYY".Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I know that tripping played a part in the equation bc the root of all of my anxiety is my impending death, something I didn't care about before tripping.14 year olds should NOT be trippingEdit:  also, no diss towards you, but your friends are weird for hanging around teenagers when they're 23, let alone a 14 year old girl.  Not jumping to conclusions but are you sure they're not one of those people that hangs out with highschool girls when they're in their 20's?  Weird, possibly rapey.  I'd re-evaluate who your friends are, and who you take drugs around.  Again, I'm probably jumping to major conclusions here based off of the people I've met, but be careful regardless. [info] None [info] 1543537679 [info] train
FedexMeYourJewGold [info] I've been wondering if I might suffer from some degree of bi-polar disorder. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take antidepressants but I just feel like there is something more to it. Sometimes I will feel so fucking down and depressed, with absolutely no desire to speak to anyone. Then again, other times I will feel almost wired and completely sociable.  Sorry I know no one asked for that rant but it's been something that has been floating through my head for a while now. [info] None [info] 1537979055 [info] train
misspulkadot [info] You hit it right on the head: I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately, I also have narcolepsy so anxiety meds make me sleepy, N meds make me anxious. I’m a mess! But I actually manage quite well if I do say so myself. I could use someone to talk to though, so a therapist may be in my future.  [info] None [info] 1515800509 [info] train
Tinabird20 [info] When Doctors Suck. Warning I'm going to talk about some topics specific to those of us who menstruate. If you don't want to read about that don't read this post.  I saw another post about a bad doctor and switching your primary care physician. So I thought I'd share my story as well.   When I was 14 years old my saint of a Primary Care Doctor switched to strictly pediatrics. So my Mom chose a new doctor.  Well being a young girl I didn't know that the things that happened weren't acceptable, or that I had a choice to switch doctors. Here is the list of things that finally at 23 made me kick this particular doctor to the curb.  1. I was on the boys wrestling team in high school. When I went to the doctor to complain of knee pain. He scolded me for "being silly enough to be in a boys sport" and that "girls aren't meant for that kind of physical activity."   2. When my periods were so heavy I couldn't go to class without having to change my tampon every hour he put me on birthcontol. The pill lessened the heaviness but prolonged my period to 15 days. When I complained he shrugged and said he already put my on the pill there was nothing else to do. I didn't know until college I could just change types of birthcontol.    3. I was diagnosed with anxiety and after that any and all ailments were chalked up to me being anxious and dismissed.    4. Had an untreated sinus infection I went in for three times. Each time I was told I just had a cold go home. This weakened my immune system and made me miserable for a month or longer. When I went to the emergency room because of a bladder and ear infection I was told I had a sinus infection. Three days of antibiotics later I was perfectly fine.   Basically moral of the story we are the customers of doctors and we should listen to their advice. But, if your doctor is dismissing your concerns get a new one. [info] None [info] 1556304573 [info] train
kiwiiwik [info] Do you suffer from anxiety? This reminds me of me when I was younger, before I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1390032102 [info] train
Taylor_Audrielle [info] If I'm diagnosed with anxiety, will that hurt me in two years when I apply? [info] None [info] 1528871336 [info] train
Pneu6 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and very rarely get less than nine hours of sleep, so I would definitely say the latter from personal experiences. The former implies that less sleep makes you more anxious, but I don't think that's the case for clinical anxiety. I'm sure there is a correlation between sleep deprivation and being temporarily more anxious, but I don't believe that would require anxiety medication or therapy but rather medication or other methods that that aid sleep.I've been anxious for many years and just recently realized that it wasn't normal. Since I went so long undiagnosed I developed my own methods to fall asleep amidst my thoughts, which is why I can get so much sleep, but during the day there is an onslaught of thoughts of running off the road, having an aneurysm, or anything like that.Tl;dr: I think there is a significant difference between anxiety that comes from too little sleep and anxiety that keeps you from sleeping.  [info] None [info] 1515348551 [info] test
DarthDadaD20 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I know it's hard. The whole week up to playing I think if excuses to not play, I get angry and say "why do I even fucking play games".I do the same with other competitive games too. I'll drive to go play Pokemon or miniatures or magic and half way there turn the car around and go home.....make up an excuse to tell my wife why I didn't go.But here are a few things I hope helps you.There are "lfg" (looking for group) pages here on Reddit and other social media. post can help you find games in your area.there are also websites like meetup.com. my small town has a huge meet up page for Dungeons and Dragonsif you're ever at a store and see somebody pick up Lord the rings or Star Wars, magic cards or something else nerdy....they might know of or be interested in the game.As for actually playing, know that many, many players actually suffer with anxiety or other mental disabilities, or even just socially awkward so if you find a group you might not be alone.And I'll tell you. At first I hate myself and just want to go home, but while playing, after getting into it I really do forget all about it and have the most fun, then I feel good the next few days (and then unfortunately the whole cycle starts again) [info] DM [info] 1450397028 [info] test
hrhashley [info] Thank you for posting - as you mentioned, I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues (hence the sertraline). I've definitely had anxiety/panic episodes before in the past that have stemmed from a health standpoint, but I've been taking my medication regularly and I don't necessarily feel like I'm having a long-winded anxiety episode, though I'm sure that could be a part of it. I've just never had chest discomfort and bouts of shortness of breath last this long since before my last heart surgery.I guess my biggest concern is that I've read one too many things on the internet about how people, especially women, go in and all of their tests look perfectly fine so they're sent home and then 2 weeks later they're having a full on heart attack, which again, I know sounds like anxiety, but it's more of me wondering 'what's the likelihood that this could actually happen' question.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1542059610 [info] train
AllRebelRocker [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder long before IBD. Would that mess with the survey? I'd be happy to take it, but I don't want to ruin your results!  [info] C.D. [info] 1414101483 [info] train
swild89 [info] Maybe some perspective can help you with your anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well as panic disorder with agoraphobia. Some days I cannot get past my front door. What do I do? I kick it in the ass. I go to therapy and I follow my medication plan. I have extremely healthy eating and sleeping habits. I have a dog to force me to leave the house twice a day for a walk. Your case of anxiety is not a bad case. Go see your gp to refer you to a general psychologist and look into some cognitive behavioural therapy. Good luck.  [info] None [info] 1372101322 [info] train
Star_em [info] Any information on Sleep Anxiety? I'm trying to do research on it but I can't find much useful information to determine whether or not I have it. I've seen one person mention it in an interview and I was hoping if I figured out what it is I could finally find an answer to my lifelong sleep problems. Basically ever since I was a kid I've never been able to go to sleep because my mind would be racing, when I was a kid it would mostly be worries about dying which I still get most of the time, but it's also just general anxieties. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past if that's any help. I'm just trying to find some people who have this issue as well and ways to cope with it. So far I have had to watch/listen to something every single night for 15 years to distract my brain enough to go to sleep. [info] None [info] 1501399858 [info] train
A_random_passenger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. Essentially, anxiety is nausea/fear of vomiting, for me. Nothing more.So yes, they are definitely bound together. [info] None [info] 1564085630 [info] train
Romainvicta476 [info] An interesting interaction For a little background, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I'm also high functioning autistic. Grew up in an offshoot of an offshoot of Mormonism. Anyway, my faith crisis is finally nearing it's end with me comfortably finding a home in atheism. I have a friend. This friend is rather special to me. She understands me so much better than anyone else. I'm able to be open with my anxiety and autism with her. She's the same way with me, able to be open about her experiences. It's not my place to share more details than that. As part of my faith crisis, I started to join the Catholic church. The historian in me loved it. But, last night I had a thought I never had. "What does normal look like for me?" I'd asked many times "how can I ever have a normal life?" But I asked that different question last night and it changed how I looked at things. I have an incredible opportunity to define what normal is for me, from the bottom up. And the first step in creating that is to leave religion behind entirely. I told all this to my friend, who is Catholic, and explained my reasoning. I told her the big points of my faith crisis and what drove me away from Christianity (shared experiences of emotional rises when witnessing moral behavior, all too uncanny similarities between Jesus and the other man-made gods, and god being more akin to an abuser than an all loving deity). I told her all of this and she responds right away with "Well what if god gave you those things to impact and change the lives of others?" I went right back to saying that was more like an abuser than a loving deity. I went into more detail about how my upbringing with religion stole away so much of my life and prevented me from even thinking about professional psychiatric help when I needed it when I was a kid.  We've hit a lull because she's at work, but of all the people. I thought she would at least understand why. I never expected her to like that change, she was very supportive of me in joining the Catholic church, but at least be understanding. Just an interesting interaction today. [info] Atheist [info] 1576453566 [info] train
boundariesnewbie [info] Hermit fears are not mine Was finishing up Understanding the Borderline Mother last night and my mother is pretty solidly a hermit. One of the things that struck me is how hermits never can (or often even try) to comfort their child when the child (adult or kid) is anxious or afraid or otherwise upset. Instead they exacerbate any existing fears/worries. This is certainly true of my mother, who finds new and creative ways to plant seeds of doubt and anxiety regarding every subject almost every time I talk to her. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I’m 99% sure I have C-PTSD. (my therapist agrees but can’t officially diagnose bc she’s a LCSW). The anxiety has been tackled by a few therapists and I’m healing really well from it. But I realized last night: most of my fears are expressed in her voice (in my head, not audibly tho thankfully). Like, the things my mind makes up to make me scared are not actually things I’m naturally afraid of myself and are easily dismissed by evidence (thanks CBT!). Anyway. I just wanted to share that in case any other RBBs can relate and take comfort. Your hermit’s fears may not be your own! This anxiety doesn’t belong to me....And I certainly won’t let it control me anymore. Sorry for any typos, on mobile. [info] None [info] 1553183523 [info] train
xBordlampe [info] Emotional Support Animal for anxiety? Hey, I hope you're all having a good day!I've been looking into getting an emotional support animal, but the problem is that it's not really a thing where I live. I was diagnosed with anxiety in october, but had it like this for years, just didn't know.   I just wanted to hear your experiences with emotional support animals, or any info that could be useful. &amp;#x200B;Thank you &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1547580570 [info] train
PhysAnx92 [info] How do I remove attention from my heart beat? Unfortunately I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago and it's done well at making my life a living Hell.Often times I will become hyper-aware of my heart and heart beat and proceed to fly into a panic. This is interfering for obvious reasons.What methods can I do to prevent or at least reduce this? I already reduce my caffeine intake. [info] None [info] 1543043036 [info] train
interiordesigner1999 [info] Shortness of breath, heart palpitations, minor chest pain. When to see emergency? I am a 20 yr old female, average height and weight. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I feel as if these symptoms aren’t that as I know what that feels like. I have also been previously diagnosed with iron deficiency about 4 years ago. No longer on supplements. The only thing I am taking is birth control. For the past couple weeks I’ve had symptoms of shortness of breath, heart palpitations and some random moments of chest pain. The shortness of breath feels like I can’t get a full breath and am just trying to catch up with my breathing. Heart palpations I’ve been dealing with for about 6 years and was diagnosed as anxiety. I’ve had a couple moments of chest pain that’s like an ache in my chest on the left side. A few times were during exercise but the most recent was when I was just sitting at my desk. I’ve also experienced some light headedness suddenly while standing. I have a doctors appointment for next week but am wondering if this is more urgent and I should go to emergency. This morning I felt as if I could barely catch my breath and the smallest movement walking from my house to my car wore me out. I don’t know if I’m just overthinking my symptoms or if this is something serious. Any advice would be appreciated thanks! [info] User Not Verified [info] 1573573300 [info] test
IRAQIHERO55 [info] TENSION HEADACHE. I have had IBS since I was 16, now I'm 26. I have been experiencing tension headache for the last 4 years especially when I eat certain foods. I was wondering if you have the same problem? btw I'm diagnosed with anxiety and take antidepressants. [info] None [info] 1572219489 [info] test
4dham [info] As I am sure you are aware, ADHD is often comborbid.I was diagnosed with anxiety alongside my ADHD and to be honest, it's gone away with medication. I think therefore that anxiety was probably just a coping mechanism I developed for dealing with the aspects of ADHD that I found most difficult - it's difficult to deal with racing thoughts all of the time, so mild anxiety helped me to anchor my thoughts on a single (but usually negative) thing that might happen because of my ADHD e.g. running late, might blurt out the wrong thing in a social situation, might find it hard to sit still etc.It sounds very similar to this?&amp;#x200B; [info] ADHD-C [info] 1541837633 [info] train
Ellajt [info] Yes!! I have been diagnosed with anxiety but my counsellor and work OHC both think it’s OCD. I’m 100% sure it is. I have had 4 GP appointments in the past 2 weeks and still they won’t send me to a psychiatrist, even though they’ve deemed me unfit for work and signed me off. ArghfjjfjgEdit - I didn’t even realise the ins and outs of OCD until it was mentioned to me by them. So I didn’t say ‘I think I have this’ at all. But it makes complete sense now I know about it! [info] None [info] 1542208346 [info] train
barcelonatimes [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  I was prescribed .5 MG of xanax, twice a day.  Once i graduated and went to college, I decided "I don't need this shit anymore!"  Well, for about two weeks I would constantly catch something moving out of the corner of my eye, catch a flash of light from the side.I thought I was losing my fucking mind, and I had no idea that just taking one of those pink pills would make it stop(luckily.)  That shit is completely normal.  Anytime you are imbibing a GABA inhibitor, you will experience things like this during withdrawals.  Just keep trucking...you're the exterminator, and the varmints are decreasing by the day! [info] None [info] 1394513301 [info] train
purple_turtle16 [info] Always On The Edge I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder back when I was a sophomore in high school (about 8 years ago). I remember it was July and I was in my room and all of a sudden I was hyperventilating and I started to get all dizzy. At that moment I thought I was going to die. My parents quickly drove me to the emergency room, and waited for about an hour or two before I was seen. After talking to the doctor about what I was experiencing,  she concluded that I was having a panic attack and I should seek a therapist to talk about how to cope with it. Since then I went to the normal meetings with my therapist, but eventually stopped because my mom couldn't afford it anymore. I was doing okay my junior year of high school, didn't have any trouble at all. Then Senior year came, and since then my anxiety has been through the roof. I would get panic attacks at work, going out with friends, even at home just hanging out. I've gone in and out of therapy since I moved out about 5 years ago. Nothing seems to help. I refuse to take medication. I constantly think to my self "Why can't I be normal" Why was I made this way" "I hate myself for being like this" and so on. This past year I started to realize that I've had panic attacks before that incident my sophomore year, I just didn't know what it was at the time. Farthest back I remember having one was probably when I was about 7 or 8. I was sleeping over at my cousins house and I stared to feel chest pains, and shortness of breath, my parents had to come pick me up, I felt better after seeing them pull up in the driveway. (separation anxiety maybe?) Also, I was probably about 9 or 10 and I recall crying because I was having trouble breathing, and everything just felt so heavy, not sure how to explain it, but everything I felt back then I feel almost everyday now. I remember not being able to focus in middle school because I was always on the edge. Especially during tests. I would always have a panic attack during a test, which ended up with me guessing on all the answers just so I can turn it in and get it over with. Sorry this is all over the place. Living with this disorder sucks. Sometimes I think about taking medications hoping it will make things all better, but i'm also afraid that it will make things worse than it is now. [info] None [info] 1541710899 [info] test
bmollberg [info] OCD and Fear of leaving home. So I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and I have been on citalopram (off brand celexa) and I have always had issues with OCD. I feel like I need to do things twice or in fours or whatever (like turning light switches or opening things.) And it hasn't gone yet. However my biggest problem is I can't ride with people or drive too far away from my hometown or I feel trapped and have panic attacks. I feel like when I ride in a car with someone I can't leave if I want to and it freaks me out and I hate it. Does anyone else have symptoms like these? What helps for you? [info] None [info] 1357796324 [info] train
invaderpixel [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, not taking or doing anything for it at the moment, the BIGGEST thing you have to watch out for is everyone else. A wedding is the ultimate small talk for most people, even though for you it's deeply personal. I had a ton of random acquaintances who found out I was planning a wedding in 7 and a half months tell me "WOW THAT'S REALLY FAST!" and go on and on about it, to the point where I was convinced I had something seriously wrong with my wedding and everything would be a disaster. (I actually even had my dress and venue, catering and drinks taken care of before I was officially engaged with a ring on me because my FH was saving up for one) I think anxiety made me freak out more about people's reactions to how short my engagement was, when really my engagement length wasn't THAT short or unheard of. The thing that helped me the most was making quick decisions after basic research and then reciting all the things I've done so far. "I already have my dress, venue, catering, invitations, cupcake tower, cake topper, shoes, undergarments, dj, photographer, flowers, etc." Little random things will pop up (absolutely need a musician to play at the church? Ok I guess) but I will handle them after reciting all the big things I have done already.  [info]  [info] 1370648039
JW-1998 [info] No help, I have had medical help and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I refuse to touch medication due to negative experiences in the past. Indeed, it is indescribably distressing, I believe I have health anxiety. Constantly beleaguered by crippling migraines, panic attacks, feelings of trepidation and impending doom, awful head sensations, and thinking I am on the verge of death. I have had this since the turn of the year with no respite. I won’t be surprised if I end my life, it is certainly heading in that direction. Thanks for your support. I miss having people that give a damn about me. [info] None [info] 1564106280 [info] valid
CardioPumps [info] Not sure if they count as antidepressants but I have been taking SSRI pills since 2-3 weeks and they work fine. I am the same me, only a bit more relaxed and my mind is on ease. Nothing BIG happened though, it is not a magical pill obviously.My psychologist prescribed them since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1448221417
WaffleWolf124 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] Plays MineCraft and not FortNite [info] 1574350108 [info] train
annmarieg5 [info] I feel the same. I have allergy induced asthma (during the spring I find it really hard to breathe, or when exercising outside. I have an inhaler and it works fine.) But before I was diagnosed with anxiety I would just be sitting at home on my couch and suddenly it would get hard to breathe. Thought I was having an asthma attack and would get frustrated when my inhaler didn't help. Now I realize its a panic attack (so much better right?! lol) I just have to lay down and try my hardest the breathe in deeply and remind myself im not having an asthma attack and treat myself for the panic attack (talking to someone, breathing exercises, taking my emergency meds). Idk if this helped but yeah... [info] None [info] 1529839294 [info] train
Jynxbunni [info] I need some help So, I was diagnosed with anxiety over a decade ago. I've never read my own records, but if memory serves me correctly, it was social anxiety. I believe this has definitely morphed into a more general issue, especially over the last few years. It's only occasionally been an issue, until more recently.I started nursing school about two weeks ago. It's been, okay really, so far. I've already been a CNA at a hospital for a few years, so I definitely have a step up on my peers. I keep organized well enough, but I always feel like I am forgetting something that is due. If I don't write something in my calendar right away, it will definitely be forgotten about. The homework load is okay, I actually got all of this week's work done by Tuesday.But..something has changed. I can feel it, and I know my fiancee has noticed it as well. I can't pay attention in class. I have to be doing something else at the same time. I can't just be listening and taking notes, I have to also be playing a game or surfing reddit. This is what I did for all of my pre-reqs, and I passed with A's, so I am not too worried quite yet, however this continues at home as well. I feel like I can't relax, no matter where I am. For the last few days, I have had this constant pit in my stomach, that never seems to go away, no matter what. I feel so unfocused and out of control. I've been more easily irritated with my fiance (who's major show of affection is annoyance), and I know he knows it. I can't sit still, when I do I feel like there are so many other things I can be doing, but when I actually have time to do them, I don't. We're also getting married in October, but something needs to change before then.I'm not on any meds right now, though I'm not terribly opposed. I try to relieve stress through games and riding my bike. I don't know what to do, and this isn't working, and I feel like I'm losing it. What do? [info] None [info] 1441380766
ChairModelLady [info] Need help for When talking to your doctor about anxiety goes south I have been diagnosed with anxiety and some OCD tendencies by both my current therapist and a doctor in a city I used to live in years ago. I took medication in college and the two medications I was on helped me SO MUCH! So much so I had my young, naive self convinced I no longer needed it. So I just (stupidly) stopped. Everything was fine. I thought. I just lived with it. Until it wasn't fine. Five years later. I've moved a few times since college, found a therapist and decided that medication would again be a good choice for me. My new doctor DID prescribe me medication, just two DIFFERENT ones than I was previously on. I had previously taken a very low dose of Klonopin and my new doctor said he does not prescribe medications of that type to anyone.To make a long story short, I returned to his office several months later for a regularly scheduled check-in. This time, I had some concerns about my OCD tendencies and a spike in anxiety. Rather than talk about changing my meds me told me "maybe you should take up running or something stupid like adult coloring books. Just think less." I left feeling like maybe this was all in my head. Maybe I'm dramatic and my anxiety isn't so bad. I didn't speak up. But in the weeks following, it's gotten so bad, I can't go to work without throwing up. I made another appointment with him for this coming week, but how do I ask for a referral to a psychiatrist? Especially after he was so judgey last time. [info] None [info] 1507409037 [info] test
Thelostbky16 [info] Advice: Working in Public with anxiety Right now I am in my final year as an accounting student.  Throughout my time, here my accounting professors have been placing a lot of pressure on me to go to work at any of the Big 4 in NYC. They mention that if I do not work at any of the Big 4 Accounting firms than my career is meaningless.  They do not know that I struggle with anxiety since I like to keep my health related matters private.  So I was curious if any of the Big 4 are good organizations to work for if I am diagnosed with anxiety? [info] None [info] 1571839885 [info] train
DaintyGhost747 [info] I used to get that a lot. And I made sure I didn't miss anything, I'd do everything, with every friend, club, group, and family. It didn't go so well, and I went to the hospital extreme exhaustion. That's day I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1553334893 [info] valid
booksblanketsandtea [info] Every year when I was a kid my family and my god parents and their kids would go on holiday together. We usually went up to Nelson or Picton area (top of the South Island, NZ) and stayed at this holiday home we rented for a few years running. This one year (which was to be our last year at this home we rented) we ended up going to a beach a few bays around from where we were staying. I must have been about nine or ten at the time. Anyway, so we get to this beach and I have to say, it was the worst fucking place we could have chosen. The car was up a hill and you had to walk down a track in the bush to get to the beach. The beach itself was right against the flowering native plant life, so there were wasps fucking Everywhere - and I'm terrified of the little wankers (I like bees, though am still scared of them). Normally this would be fine, I'd just go swimming and wouldn't be bothered by them - but nope. Jellyfish. Jellyfish everywhere. So, I'm sitting on the beach hunched up trying not to cry from fear - my Mum and Dad think I'm being a whiney little brat and are ignoring me. My sister, brother and god-sisters are all frolicking around having a great time. I am Miserable and on the verge of a panic attack (I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and this is the earliest panic attack I can remember having) - so I try and do what anyone would do in that situation: I try to get out. I tell Mum that I want to go sit in the car (not wanting to ruin everyone else's fun). She says no. Every few minutes I ask when we're leaving, flinching as bees and wasps fly around me, keeping a good distance from the ocean and the blue bottles swimming there.Eventually a wasp gets caught in my (then, waist length) hair and I decide 'fuck it, I'm not dealing with this shit anymore' - so I just get up and walk up to the car on my own. It's locked of course, but the window is open so i spend the next few minutes with arm in the car trying to unlock it- and suddenly I hear a noise and turn to see my Mum stalking towards me. This was my 'oh shit' moment. Never in my life have I been more scared - the jellyfish, the wasps and now my own mother is bearing down on me with a look on her face that says she is ready to Kill. She grabs me by the arm (still in the window) and drags me away from the car and starts giving me a hiding - I've already been crying from the fear and because no one had taken me seriously when I expressed that fear (which was honestly probably the worst part about it all) - now I'm crying because Mums giving me a few good wacks round the arse for (in my mind) simply being scared. I was grounded like you wouldn't believe - had to stay in my room, wasn't allowed to see my friend (the daughter of the people we rented the holiday home from) and we only ever saw each other once a year - and as I said, this was our last year renting that place. I wasn't allowed to play my gameboy or even read my books. I basically stayed in bed for the last four days of our trip and had to think about what I had done. It still makes me furious and scared to this day - I still have the odd nightmare of feeling trapped on a beach. I never really told my parents that I was worried or scared again after that, because it just felt like they didn't care.  [info] None [info] 1417138845 [info] train
poppy1996 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I finally felt comfortable talking about it with my doctor and since starting medication, I feel amazing. But for a long time I just had so much anxiety because I expected everyone to act like my nmother. Now I’ve realized that’s the minority, and most people I come in contact with are great. Just know it does get better ❤️ [info] None [info] 1568463668 [info] train
AlphaCentauri94 [info] Got this letter edited on an online editing service. Just wanna get your opinion whether they have done a good job? So I got this letter edited by a person who claims to be a professional copy editor and proofreaders working for an online editing website. Please keep in mind that english is my third language and I am not so good in my writing skills. So I really cannot give a proper remark on this letter. And this is why I will need your help.   But if you ask me, I'd say the grammar looks fine to me but I dont know why but there is something in it that looks odd lol.  The letter is huge, so I only posted the first half of it.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B; =======================================================================================Dear Sir or Madam,I am writing this letter to explain the purpose of my visit to Canada. But before doing that, I would like to give some background information regarding my previous stay in Canada. In the year 2014, I began my undergraduate studies as an international student at University of Guelph in the bachelor of arts and science program in Guelph, Ontario. Around the second semester of my studies, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and because of this, I started having extreme difficulties coping with my school work. With the help of medication prescribed by the university physician, I managed to complete my fourth semester (second year). Unfortunately, by the time I was in my third year, my anxiety symptoms started to worsen. And as a result, I decided to withdraw from University of Guelph. As I was still receiving treatment from my physician, I decided to stay in Canada for 4 months after withdrawing from the last semester of university, then I left Canada and only I returned once in December 2018 for a short visit before the expiration of my study permit.My condition has improved significantly since the time I withdrew from my studies, and I belive I will be able to resume my studies sometime in future, maybe in few months. Now since I don’t know how long will it take for me to fully feel mentally healthy to go back to school, I am deciding to apply for just a visit visa for now. I have stated below the reasons for the urgency for my visit to Canada.During my upcoming visit, which I am planning to set for two weeks, I will be collecting some documents from the university (e.g., a letter from my professor, my transcripts, etc.). And though I have not yet booked an appointment with my doctor, I will be visiting her clinic to request some documents and a reevaluation of my medical condition. While in Canada, I also plan to visit my bank, CIBC, to make a few changes to my account (as I still have an active Canadian bank account). I am slowly gaining interest in pursuing business education, and I plan to visit some universities with reputable business programs while I am in Canada. As for the rest of the available time, I plan to tour around the city. I have attached the documents and the daily agenda that I have created for my stay. The attached documents include: 1. my hotel reservation for two weeks, 2. my tentative flight plan (I have not yet purchased the tickets. If my visa is approved, I will make the final payment at that time), 3. my daily agenda, 4. a letter from my university physician, and 5. my personal bank statements for the past six months. [info] None [info] 1552964036 [info] train
wyldepixie [info] I've had a really hard time getting a diagnosis.  All my paperwork says, "Severe Anxiety Disorder".  I was diagnosed with ADHD very young but then it was overturned by the time I was seven.  Then I was diagnosed with anxiety and night terrors.  I would hide, constantly, in closets and cabinets, anywhere dark and quiet.  My psycho upbringing had my parents and church believing I was being targeted by demons.  (That reeeeaaaalllly helped).  Then I was told I had a "sensory processing disorder" but no treatments were offered.  I was sixteen or so by then.  I didn't seek any help from then into adulthood until a car accident.  I'd built up my own coping mechanisms and was mostly okay.  After that and multiple surgeries I got worse and couldn't cope.  My SO asked me to get help.  I tried.  I did rounds of doctors, therapists, and neurologists (but no neuropsychologists to my knowledge).  MRI show "structural abnormalities" but they said it didn't necessarily account for my migraines which is why they kept scanning me.  I was put on every SSRI in existence, which did nothing.  They couldn't diagnose a specific anxiety disorder because I have symptoms of each major anxiety disorder.  It's been trying to say the least. [info] None [info] 1482696344 [info] train
PM_ME_UR_TANNED_BUTT [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety **and** insomnia. Racing thoughts about an exam or a long shift is **anxiety**. When I just can’t sleep just because that’s **insomnia**.I know the difference and can explain both because I’ve experienced both.Could be, like I said. [info] None [info] 1537061806 [info] test
exhaustedwerewolf [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was privately super dubious about it, even though it was my second diagnosis, and I know I’ve always been a worrier and concerned, I still thought it was an exaggeration. My therapist recommended me ‘Overcoming Worry and Generalised Anxiety Disorder’ and Chapters 8 and 9  included some tests like the Intolerance of Uncertainty Scale (IUS) and some other identification tests. I scored very high for anxiety on everything. I hadn’t realised because my anxiety mostly results in a lot of successful avoidance on my part, so I am not actively anxious as often as a normal person with anxiety might be. But I am beginning to come to terms with the fact that yes, I am anxious. TLDR; yes, you can. maybe look into talking to a profesional or take some self led tests? [info] None [info] 1532389179 [info] train
Gymlover2002 [info] I was 'diagnosed' with POTS and hyperventilation at the same time. The doctors there said that that combo indicated anxiety, so I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. One visit to a psychologist later and it was very clear I did not have anxiety disorder.Maybe try keeping a packet of info about POTS with you so first responders can know what they are talking about? [info] None [info] 1573224388 [info] train
DannyWillSun [info] Should I go back to minoxidil ?? Hi guys, long story short I have been using minoxidil (5%) last year for about 4 months (consistently).Although I am 21 years old, I almost don't have any hair or even mustache so I was determined to grow a beard by any means necessary.I noticed a HUGE difference in the fourth month , but unfortunately one day I just had a panic attack ( I though that my blood pressure is becoming down as a result of minoxidil , and that I will die soon)So I decided to STOP the treatement. When I recall that day I become depressed, especially when I see 18 years old boys with a full beard.Should I go back to minoxidil ? Should I try 5% or 2% to avoid possible side effects ?( I am 100% healthy, I didn't noticed any side-effects except some drowsiness in the first month/ I am diagnosed with anxiety that's all) [info] None [info] 1579776665 [info] train
imnotgrownupyet [info] It’s okay. I have had my resting HR around 140 without any drugs when I tried to donate blood (spoiler: I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years later). It felt pretty bad but I was okay.My HR still frequently shoots up to 120+ just in daily life.Have a calming beverage - milk or decaf tea. Read a book if you can or watch your favorite comforting TV show. Snuggle in bed. Don’t force yourself to meditate or breathe a certain way if it doesn’t work for you.It will pass. [info] None [info] 1549592953 [info] train
rc1025 [info] My first pregnancy was a 20 week loss, my second was successful, and I am here again now. All the worrying in the world could not prepare me for the pain of that late loss, it was so useless. Worry is such a useless exercise. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD after that, and my next pregnancy I was on zoloft a bit and had appointments every two weeks, mostly to manage my anxiety. I would talk to your doctor about your levels of anxiety. Tell her it is impeding on your day-to-day life. When it gets to that point, I think something needs to be done. Also, if you are anxious, get off these boards. Stop reading about incompetent cervixes and PPROM and stuff. I wish I had taken that advice myself. I'm doing better this pregnancy so far- the other day I was reading about something horrible (like you are doing) and freaking out and then was able to tell myself "stop it. stop worrying about this rare, unlikely thing. you'll deal with it if it happens". And then I just...stopped. It was a huge moment for me, brought on by therapy, drugs, and doctor's help. You will deal with it if it happens. Until then, you are okay. [info] 21 week loss 5/16, rainbow boy 4/17, #2 due 10/1 [info] 1519329281 [info] train
HyphMngo [info] Holy shit, this sounds like me. I find it incredibly difficult to focus for more than short bursts and must start assignments incredibly early or I'll never complete anything on time. I can literally start something and never actually get around to doing anything for 4-5 hours. I'm terrible at focusing for exam study. I'm not exactly hyperactive but I'm constantly fidgeting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I wonder if its all related? [info] None [info] 1441886811 [info] train
Asspickles [info] Will I experience anxiety my first time smoking? I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I am going to smoke for the first time soon. I have heard that weed causes anxiety. Will I experience a lot of or enhanced anxiety after smoking, or will I be alright? Wondering because I don't want to have to back out because I have an anxiety attack or something like that. [info] None [info] 1434608770 [info] valid
Jenny-Thalia [info] I'm a bit late to this but... When I was younger, I was in blatantly abusive relationships. I mean, I knew they were. Sexual and physical abuse are obvious aren't they? Then I got help and got much better mentally and emotionally and had healthy relationships. Then he came along. This one was so much harder to see what he was doing. He was amazing for three years. In year four, things got weird. I found some suspicious texts (truly by accident, they popped up on his screen, I never ever checked his phone). It spiralled. He spent months telling me to stop seeking reassurance about us, while simultaneously cancelling our plans on the regular and just being straight up cold towards me. He stopped bringing me out but always had excuses like he was too tired. He stopped letting me see his friends or family, again "too tired," or "I don't see them much anymore." He'd drop out of contact for a night, telling me a relative was sick or his mom was needing help. He all of a sudden never had money anymore so I'd "lend" him money that he'd feel so so guilty about. But never paid me back. He never bought me a birthday present (not even  a card, I'd  be happy  with a card) and I had to pay for him to come for dinner for my birthday because he had "no money." The worst part was I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was always so honest about that. So anytime I questioned how things were, how he was treating me, if he was cheating, he'd tell me my anxiety was making me paranoid and to stop being crazy. It got so bad that I spoke to my doctor about going back on meds and to therapy. She actually told me I didn't need either but that therapy might help me because I was somehow perfectly happy and healthy in every other relationship or friendship in life. Guess she knew what was up. Turns out he was cheating. Even when I saw the proof, I was crazy and he loved me and I need to stop being so anxious. The effect being mentally abused has had on me has been profound. It was so slow, so sly and so unlike what I'd experienced before. It's only been a couple of months but I'm a different person. I don't even speak to male friends now, fearing ulterior motives. I hide all of my feelings and don't share my emotions with anyone in case they're ever used against me again. I'm very quiet and reserved now and keep to myself. Before I was bubbly and fun to be around. And it fucking sucks because despite what he did, I love him and although I'd never ever take him back, I can't just write off those three years where he treated me like royalty. And now I'm stuck wondering was it all a lie?  I thought I was stronger than this. And he doesn't care.  [info] None [info] 1542909810 [info] train
LilPad93 [info] Thank you very much.  Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect.  I don't deny nor hide the fact that I  have issues. When I can afford therapy, I most certainly am going. I want to try it, and I want to try to get this burden off of me.   I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me.  I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships.  My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much.  (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) Thank you again.   [info] None [info] 1480523970 [info] train
dragonattack [info] Good luck! I actually have "Don't Panic" on my wrist as an Adams tribute and reminder to not sweat the small stuff. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8 years old, so it's been a long ride for me and I'm finally sorting things out.  [info] None [info] 1365861048 [info] train
Christophk412 [info] I’m lost I genuinely don’t know if I’m depressed, and I don’t want to put off the impression that I’m depressed and all fucked up since I don’t really know. I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and it eventually turned into a panic disorder. I would have horrible panic attacks where I thought I would die, medication helped me suppress it and eventually I grew out of it. I’m still a slightly anxious person, I don’t have panic attacks anymore though. But recently I’ve been feeling very off. I guess I would call it depressed. I have a severe lack of motivation, low self esteem, very little passion, and no hobbies. I know that I’m not living right, I’m doing something wrong, but I don’t have the motivation to help myself. I’ve become careless, I’ve started using drugs recreationally and making choices I know aren’t the best. I’m scared for my health but I don’t know if I’m depressed or if I’m in a funk. Most of the people around me have some type of mental disorder. My girlfriend is very anxious and a bit depressed. I wanna be there for her, I wanna make her feel better. My friends are depressed and anxious. Nobody is ok at this point. Maybe I’m doing the best out of all of them, but I feel so lost. I don’t really have anyone to talk to, and I wish I have no guidance from my parents or any adults. I’ve just been venting a lot here today. [info] None [info] 1549859279 [info] train
Fartingpenguinhole [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and this bent shelf gives me a problem. So I can't agree more, but anytime I say what you said I get 50 messages about how I'm  the problem with invisible diseases. This picture makes me want to cry. And itch. Very itchy.  [info] None [info] 1552731913 [info] train
saffronshor [info] recently diagnosed I was diagnosed with anxiety less than two weeks ago. It’s a pretty long story so to cut it down, I’m a 17 y/o female and what triggered my anxiety was when (yes i’m aware this was a very bad idea) i took an extremely high dose of 2C-B roughly mid february and had a very very bad experience - tripped that i was dead - and ever since, i’ve had panic attacks convincing myself that i’m either having a heart attack or a stroke. I’ve even had panic attacks thinking i’m back in the trip and since taking it ive had a few hallucinogenic episodes that lasted about 20-30 seconds. It’s that bad that i can’t even think of the trip without getting into a state. I was prescribed 10mg propranolol 3 times a day, and to begin with, they helped a lot but now i’m building a tolerance and they don’t really do anything at all. I’m going to make another appointment with my GP and explain this and hopefully get prescribed something else. Does anyone know any ways to deal with this and if anyone could help me suggest what else it could be besides anxiety because i really don’t think it’s just that. [info] None [info] 1523196327 [info] train
solojones1138 [info] I thought I had a TIA once and my roommate had to call 911 for an ambulance. Turned out to just be a random panic attack (this was before I was diagnosed with anxiety). But my face was numb and I couldn't speak properly, so it was definitely scary. [info] None [info] 1571242611 [info] train
Chirikyat [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and telling close friends this has managed to drive some away. Many people do not understand how it works, therefore do not know how to sympathise.As we cannot explain it, they cannit understand it. [info] None [info] 1386412316 [info] train
reallyokfinewhatever [info] &gt; How can you tell if your struggles are due to an actual issue, or due to finally hitting a "challenging" level of work that is actually hard for you?In grade school up to 6th grade, school was shockingly easy for me. Laughably easy. I was told I was a bright kid. I was told I was naturally good at everything--sports, music, math, writing.In 7th grade I got my first A instead of an A+ (*shock!horror*). And I wondered if I wasn't smart anymore. In 8th grade I got my first B+ and I honestly thought I was completely failing, or had contracted a terminal brain diseases or something.In high school, I realized kids did this thing called "studying" and I didn't get how staring at a textbook made you smarter. My strategy was always to get really stressed out the day before a test and just wing it. I thought, if I didn't just know it then I must be inherently stupid and bad at learning.I spent SO much time trying to figure out how to study. I could stare at a textbook taking notes for hours and retain nothing. Meanwhile, I also found that turning my studying into games--like simultaneously teaching myself PHP in order to code myself a practice test for history class--made my information retention skyrocket.As I continued to go up in grade levels, college, etc. I came to find that I actually had NO sense of discipline, motivation, or focus. My entire four years in college were spent agonizing over how much I could not focus, feeling like a failure, and missing deadlines.I wished desperately for the years when I was little that everything just made sense to me because I thought that was how I was SUPPOSED to be--just inherently knowing everything without trying. When I had to truly focus and work hard to learn, I found my thoughts were actually completely scattered this whole time, and it made me increasingly agitated and incapable of functioning.For a long time I was diagnosed with anxiety (which, to be fair, I totally had/have). Like the typical high-functioning kid/young adult I was, every time I said something that revealed my low self-esteem, I was tagged as the typical perfectionist pretty girl with anxiety and an eating disorder. No one ever suspected ADHD until I did, and it wasn't until AFTER college when my symptoms finally became so extremely obvious, completely outside of an academic setting.All this to say maybe think about the non-academic symptoms you might be having--it became laughably obvious to me that ADHD was the driving factor my whole life once I came to identify all the symptoms I had that were not aggravated by school. [info] None [info] 1512315215 [info] valid
Horny_Hipst3r [info] As far as my experience with leading groups comes from, I've been involved as the main organizer of some smaller\-scale political demonstrations. Also I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and keep having panic attacks time to time. I would like to say that being in any leadership position, you are not doing the most work, but you can delegate and rely on others to do it for you, while you just have to be sure how what they are doing  fits into the bigger picture, and sometimes you are expected to speak on their behalf when you are representing your group \(in your case, I'd imagine it would be you who'd end up writing articles about your club's activities to the student paper/blog/social media etc.\). Good way to negate your anxiety is to get to know people who you're about to get involved with \(other club members etc.\) \- try to find time to talk to them a little in person, such as joking around, making small talk etc. getting comfortable so you'll feel less anxious about your situation, and feel their support. Saying this because it absolutely sucks when you can't trust people you're working with, only adds to the stress and anxiety. You say you are passionate about french language and the minor you're studying, I think that's about all that you need right now. Remember, it's a student club at a university, you are not some high\-level executive at a corporation, so you are more expected to be enthusiastic and reasonably proactive, not to crunch numbers or fuss over business management models. Don't worry, you'll do an amazing job :\) [info] GAD/Panic Disorder [info] 1525759943 [info] train
goldinkstar [info] Struggling with my anxiety disorder I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had it for near 8 years. I know that the gospel tells us to worry for nothing for God is our provider, which I whole heartedly believe in. But, sometimes I am wrought with fear and am flooded with so many "what if's" and that everything is going wrong and I wonder if I am really doing what God wants. After lots of crying I usually calm down, it's a typical panic attack for me. But I am embarrassed that as I christian, I suffer from anxiety. Of all people, wouldn't it be thought that christians would be the least likely to suffer from anxiety? And is my anxiety a product of me not trusting God enough or perhaps a product of sin?  And should I share the fact that I have anxiety with others? Thank you [info] None [info] 1419232213 [info] train
Daniel-Tigers-Dad [info] I’m going to take a crack at answering this; not because our situations are necessarily analogous, but because my anxiety and self-doubt are on such an extreme side of the scale and TRT has helped in some ways.I am diagnosed with anxiety and Obsessive Compulsive Disorder, which itself is an extreme anxiety disorder. I got on TRT while recovering from a significant mental breakdown which lead to my OCD diagnosis and subsequent treatment.  They call OCD the doubters disorder because it manifests in extreme self-doubt making you question whether anything and everything you do is the right move. I had always been able to manage my OCD until my 30s when due to a variety of possibilities my T levels tanked and after some research I found there are correlations in studies between low T and OCD. Once I got tested my dr put me on T Cypionate and I have had mixed results; likely due to estrogen spikes.To answer your question my anxiety is less, but not inherently. I have the same amount of stress and anxiety, but what changed is my ability to say, “Fuck it. This is hard, but I have what it takes to push through and make shit work.” I was always able to do that before my T levels tanked and all the sudden I felt myself paralyzed and feeling like a victim instead of a warrior going to battle. Stressors come, but I kick into gear, refocus and go to war with life. Additionally I have found myself not doubting my training and knowledge which has helped me make quick, correct decisions at work. I have also found myself standing up to people more when appropriate as where before I would have stayed quiet. Not picking fights, but standing up for ideas that are important.Sorry for the novel of a response, but I felt the back story would make the explanation make more sense, especially having gone from normal T to low and back to normal. [info] None [info] 1531067243 [info] train
OwlfaceFrank [info] I went to my Dr. because of chest pain. I was afraid of pretty much what's described here. Instead I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take meds for that now and I feel much better. Tell your doctors everything.  That's what they are there for. [info] None [info] 1556086372 [info] train
Yer1blackfriend [info] I love my mom and I think that undiagnosed and untreated general anxiety disorder made her this way, but she’s incredibly negative. Every time I wanted to try something new as a kid or take up a new hobby, she’d always mention how it could go wrong/wouldn’t work. Want to try out for soccer? “Who will pick you up from practice?” Want to take up acting/drama? “You know that’s not a stable profession.” (I was like 10 btw). Want to try cheerleading? “You sure you can do all of those tricks?” Playing in a concert for your middle school band? “Ugh, now I have to sit during that long concert.” I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and now have to check myself from being a negative Nancy all of the time that often makes me insecure about taking up something new. For instance, I love comedy and have really wanted to take up improv for the longest time but it takes a lot to move past the negative thoughts and just go for things. I know that when I have kids, I want to make sure that I always encourage them to go for their passions and at least try new and different things.  [info] None [info] 1528490369 [info] train
hairenya [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and although my meds work pretty well, I am still affected by the following triggers:Large groups of peoplePhone CallsEye ContactShop at Walmart (sounds funny, but I'm actually serious)When my family members are angry or stressed. Being Late or Off-ScheduleLoud NoisesUnfamiliar People or SituationsWhen I am Solely In charge of/ Responsible for SomethingDrivingLast Minute Plan ChangesGood luck at the dentist! I've had my top wisdom teeth out, didn't hurt that bad. The pills they gave me were awesome :)   [info] http://www.amazon.com/gp/registry/wishlist/1JH3EWY5G2Z1P/ref=top [info] 1389269986 [info] valid
big_diction4ry [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and tbh im in complete denial of it like I talk easily and openly to others and find conversation comes fluidly HOWEVER omg group situations are scary omg no omg everyone hates me [info] 16 [info] 1511467855 [info] train
lazy-beans [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for 8 years before ADHD [info] ADHD-C [info] 1523076894 [info] train
Reddgsx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well and went through the same cycle you have described. It stopped once I started to keep track of things and manage my existence. Writing things down, organizing things accordingly, planning appropriately, setting goals, tracking progress, reviewing or re-assessing "things" and reflecting weekly have really improved my quality of life and decreased anxiety.   [info] None [info] 1484700449 [info] train
AlexandriaVineyard [info] Is this anxiety? Or insomnia? Any advice appreciated! 24F5’675kgCaucasianU.KNo existing medical issues Nexplanon Implant (contraception)Used to be a casual drinker (~2x/mo), doing Stoptober with my family No recreational drug use So for the past few weeks I’ve been REALLY struggling to sleep - not managing to sleep until 3/4/5am, waking every hour or less, and, although throughout the day I feel it, but ignore it, when I get into bed I can feel this almost adrenaline feeling in my arms and legs along with a tight knot of worry in my tummy, and although I feel it during the day, it’s harder to ignore when I’m trying to block out everything to get to bed. The adrenaline feeling makes it impossible to sleep for ages because I feel like I need to get up and go for a run, or hit something, to try and use this energy up. Some nights when I get my head into a vicious circle of thinking, I can become a little short of breath and have to ‘talk myself down’. My mother and my sister have both experienced panic attacks in the past, but up until now, I was lucky in that I’ve never experienced this - I always used to think of myself as happy go lucky person; positive, nothing could hurt me - so I’m not sure if what I’m feeling IS anxiety.I always used to be able to use ‘thinking through situations’ to help myself feel better. But now, I can’t stop it when it reaches its ‘end point’. I panic, and go through every situation - what would I do if each family member died, where they might die, how they might die, how I would support my family, what they would do, what I would do, etc. It varies from financial situations, to death, to other situations.I’ve tried soothing music. Acupuncture. Cutting out all caffeine. Rescue remedy. Lavender pillow sprays. Herbal stress relief tablets. Herbal sleep teas. Clenching one muscle at a time and then releasing. Opening a window to cool my room down. I’ve even tried drinking alcohol in the evening as depressants to help me sleep - Etc!I’ve been through a rough year - left an amazing job to move 400 miles to live with who I thought was the one, who turned out to be narcissistic and a serial cheater, spent most of my savings on my house we lived in, then in July I found the courage to end things - moved back in with my parents, and started the process of selling the house 400 miles away. I’ve only just managed to secure a job (found out Thursday) which is amazing but I’m constantly aware that I’ve set myself back immeasurably by following my heart, and this links in to the thoughts that run through my head with this adrenaline feeling.In all the issues that happened during the last year, I also gained a lot of weight. I used to be 63kg, so during October my family and I have cut out all alcohol, and have been eating healthy, mostly vegetable based dinners (but we have protein I.e fish, chicken, tofu) in almost every meal, in an attempt to lose it - and it’s been working, I’ve been losing weight steadily, as have my parents.Since this ‘anxiety’ has become more apparent over the course of October, I’m wondering if perhaps it is linked somehow to the foods I’m eating? Or is this normal to have peak periods of time where it seems worse? I ask about the foods because my mother (55F, white coat syndrome, on Lisinopril for HBP) over the past few days has complained of almost my exact symptoms - insomnia, feeling too much energy, but unlike me, she’s also become sullen and ‘in a bad mood/aggressive mood’. She’s always been what I would call a ‘worrier’, and has been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I:A) want to know if what I am experiencing is anxiety? Insomnia? B) want to know if this dieting could be having an effect on both me and my mother?C) want to know what the treatment might be? If it’s therapy, I know in the UK at least I can get treated quicker privately than on the NHS, so I would rather get this going as quickly as possible. D) can my UK GP tell anyone if I am diagnosed with anxiety? I don’t want to lose my job! I know it sounds strange and the above is very convoluted, but this is my first experience with anxiety and I want to make sure I have all the facts - before going to a GP and discussing this with them. The last thing I want to do is waste anyone’s time, and the ‘what is anxiety?’ websites can be less than helpful at the best of times! As I type this, it’s 03:22am. I’m desperate, please, for any advice.Thank-you to anyone in advance who responds to this, from the bottom of my heart. [info] Patient [info] 1572318982 [info] train
ChromeColonoscopy [info] I'm "depressed" Half of my family has told me I'm depressed. I don't disagree with them, however I don't agree.After this summer break, I'm returning to Hell for two more years of it. I feel like I can't do it anymore. I'm fine with school, but the people at mine in particular make it unbearable. Ever since the third grade, I've been bullied. But it wasn't like a gradual thing, it was more like "Congratulations! You're done with 2nd grade! Now kill yourself, you fucking worthless faggot."That's kind of how I've been treated.I'm constantly called fat, gay (because I have long hair), a girl, stupid, pathetic and worthless. I know these are all just whatever insults, but after NINE fucking years of it, it builds up. I'm done. I can't do it. I have begged my family to let me switch schools, but they won't listen to me. I've asked them for online classes, and they say it "doesn't exist." I've openly told them I stress-smoke, and they tell me they're "upset" but it's my choice. They've noticed my cuts, but never explicitly talked about it to me. I've come home from school crying several times in the past two years. I checked out over 30 times in one semester because people give me stomach aches. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, social anxiety and anxiety-induced stomach ulcers. But that doesn't matter. I just have to tough it out. I've considered suicide four times in the past year. I would've done it by now, if I weren't so much of a pussy.With only about a month and a half of summer left, I'm terrified. I need to get out of here. What can I do? I don't want to go to therapy. I feel like it wouldn't help. I can't tell my parents I've considered suicide. I'm stuck. [info] None [info] 1405503551 [info] valid
pequenamorena [info] Honestly I haven’t decided, I’m very indecisive which I guess means I’m not an 8 despite my matching up with almost everything else. I find it hard to just flat out describe myself so I found this questionnaire on a thread (There are two parts):• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 24 year old female from the U.S. • Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I have been diagnosed with anxiety but it’s under control/pretty much obsolete right now (probably due to a change in living situation)• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised loosely in an Episcopal church, we fluctuated in attending church regularly and only for Christmas/Easter. In middle school my family began attending a Methodist church and I was active in youth group activities and mission trips which I loved but didn’t like going to church. If this had any influence on me it was probably just my fondness for helping people. It didn’t bother me to attend but my whole family grew out of it. (When I was 16 or 17 I got a cross tattoo on my foot/ankle, I don’t regret it but I’m not religious anymore plus I probably thought I was more religious than I actually was back then)• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I’m 2 years post grad (public health major). In my first year post grad, I taught math in a middle school. Now I live in Spain and teach English. It’s okay for now because I like it but I go back and forth on it this is what I want for my life. I am constantly researching nursing school, medical school, MPH programs, psychology masters programs....I guess you could say I’m still figuring it all out. • If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?Probably very lonely. In my lowest times, I felt like I was going crazy if I was left alone. I get really bored and would probably need to go to the mall or a restaurant just to shake the feeling (speaking from experience). • What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I was good at sports, played rugby in college. I coached middle school basketball. I’ve developed a new fondness for working out, but I need structure. (I found that in a new fitness program I am doing). I also enjoy group fitness classes. • How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about?I’m super curious and can be obsessively curious about things. Researching and spending a lot of time and energy on new things. I often spend more time researching than executing. • Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?I would enjoy a leadership position; better yet I would prefer it. In my experiences as in a leadership position I have done well. I think my leadership style is strong and dedicated. I can be bossy and bad at delegating (if you want something done right do it yourself). • Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity.I’m not sure if I’m coordinated. But sometimes I like working with my hands. I enjoyed building my own headboard, compost bin, working on remodeling or painting the house with my dad. I used to love ceramics/pottery. I’m terrible at art otherwise and I don’t really care for it. • Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I am not artistic and would consider myself avert to art in general. I hate going to museums and think a lot of famous paintings are overrated. • What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I often hold grudges from the past. I am also not very sentimental other than a small amount of random things so I don’t know if that’s telling about my thoughts on the past. I spend a lot of the present considering the future rather than actually doing things. Im not 100% content with the present.  [info] None [info] 1550686081 [info] train
seagull19 [info] Same thing happened to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It took me a long time to finally ask my mom to get help, but after my first therapy session, she wanted to know all the details about what I was going through, and what I talked about in my session. I did the same as you, told her I didn’t want to talk about it. She cried and cried and cried and tried to guilt me into telling her what was going on. Like you, it didn’t make me want to open up to her. I moved out about a month ago. Best thing to have ever happened to me. I wish you the best, you are not alone.  [info] None [info] 1540085494 [info] train
kaykorvid [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12, so I'm no stranger to it, but I control it really well nowadays. [info] None [info] 1558357984 [info] train
RomeroChick26 [info] Anxiety during Meditation I was hoping to get some advice on how you all meditate during your practices. I can't seem to empty my mind during tarot readings,rituals,etc.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so my mind is just always going going going.  Any tips on relaxing your mind enough to empty it? I felt like there's got to be other anxious people on here. Any advice would be helpful. [info] None [info] 1528997060 [info] valid
BFNYPatMatt [info] Guided meditation experience I hope I'm in the right place.  I've been lurking around here for a little bit reading different posts and trying to learn.  I am, for lack of a better term, a massive newb when it comes to all this.I started dabbling in meditation several years ago as a relaxation technique when I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I tried it at the behest of my doctors but have used it only as a way to stave off attacks and that was it.  I ended up reading a book where the author mentioned that she found great help from guided mediations by Belleruth Naperstek, so I decided to download some and try it.  The one that I was using when this experience happened was for unlocking  intuition.Now, I have always thought of myself as being fairly intuitive, having had experience where intense "gut feelings" have kept me safe or alerted me of dangers with loved ones, but I never tried to harness it.  The meditation just caught me eye as interesting.I started out with the question of how do I become more wealthy.  I know, very generic, but I didn't know where else to start.  The meditation has you putting yourself in a safe place in nature and my mind took me back to a river I would go fishing at in my youth.  After about 5-10 minutes something happened.  My grandfather, deceased now 8 years came to me.  I didn't see him, but it had his energy, his mannerisms, his "feeling."  It felt really nice having his presence there, then I had flashes of my mom growing up, of myself and my siblings being born and growing, I felt the joy he felt in watching us all grow and mature and spend time together.  And, as the images subsided, I felt his voice in my head say "this is what wealth is."  The guided meditation ended and I came back to the room.I have NEVER experienced anything like this, but I honestly felt great afterwards.  I just don't know what I experienced.  Was it really him?  Was it just my subconscious telling me to shift my focus?  I really don't know.  Any insight that could be provided would be much appreciated as I feel that I am dabbling in things that I don't fully understand. [info] None [info] 1530651556 [info] train
pupbrat [info] I need help coping with anxiety attacks Okay, so I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ever since I was young I've had these anxiety attacks where it just feels like my throat is slowly closing and it scares me, I once described it to my mom when I was small like "it feels like I can't get enough air". They usually happen at night when I can't sleep, and I start to get anxious and I get that feeling in my throat, I usually don't hyperventilate or anything unless it lasts a while because I get worried. I woke my boyfriend up one night and I even had him look down my throat to make sure it wasn't swelling. I don't know how to calm myself down when this happens, it seems impossible because my mind is just a constant " what if it's actually swelling up and you can't breath", Im just looking for like a way to relax when this happens, anything to try maybe. Anything is appreciated and helpful &lt;3 Summary: I have anxiety attacks where it feels as if my throat is closing and I'm looking for some tips or coping mechanisms to calm myself down when this happens. [info] None [info] 1565499570 [info] test
AnxiousTornado [info] Anxious for standing my ground Ok I need to vent a little about something that's been bothering me for a little while ;Long story short :I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, post traumatic disorder and panic disorder . I'm 27 y/o. I'm a girl.I foster cats. I am not paid to do this. I put lots of time into rehabilitation and took difficult cases and found them nice families to go in. I find alot of pride in doing this and every adoption is a pat in my back saying ' you did great! good job ! ' I also love to see the happiness in the adopter's face when they come  to adopt a cat from me. So, it's easy to understand why I'm so passionate about it.I live in a small apartment. I care about my neighbors. I'm a people pleaser. Always want to be nice to everybody and not bother anyone.I took in an adult cat that my local rescue organization found outside. When he was in my apartment the first night , he kept meowing all night. Loud meows. It woke me up and I instantly got a panic attack because I was so stressed that neighbors would knock at my door and complaint. The cat was scratching the walls . I got sick from being so stressed and no matter how hard i tried, the cat would keep meowing and  jump in the window , trying to get out. ( it was a stray cat, not used to indoor life ). I was up all night and had work in the morning. It also woke my boyfriend up, (who was not very happy either) but he knew it wasn't my fault. Because of my medication and my ptsd,  I cannot wake up in fear during the night , otherwise it's a mess of emotions the next day and im unable to function properly. So i contacted my local rescue and told them about the situation. I told them that for health reasons, I needed to give back the cat to them. One of the three people that runs the shelter was crazy mad about the fact that I wanted to give the cat back because I couldn't let that affect my professional life at work and my mental health. I really liked that person so her being harsh like that with me affected me deeply. I saved countless cats in the past for them and I felt like all I did for them before didn't matter anymore. I cried alot because I'm also learning to stop trying to please everyone and stand my ground when something bothers me ( Also, i was polite in my way of talking to them so I felt it was just unfair ) .I don't know what to do. I kinda feel betrayed, but I don't feel bad for choosing my mental health and making it my priority. I love being able to foster cats but I'm scared that everytime something bad will happen , I will receive the same treatment. What should I do? find a new shelter ? Talk with the person? Thanks for reading my story [info] None [info] 1550635696 [info] train
Dschulz72 [info] Quick Question I was diagnosed with anxiety(panic disorder) almost a year ago. I have been stable on medication for about 7 months. Today I was stripped of my duties as range coach(TAD) because of this. I’m now heading back to battalion. Is there anything I can do to fight this? And if not, is there a way I can request a medical review board for medsep, due to being unable to perform duties?**i am a seabee** [info] None [info] 1570576743 [info] valid
oliviabluesky [info] How I cured myself Hi all, my name is Olivia. I am 19 and I live in England. In February 2019 I was diagnosed with anxiety and a panic disorder. In other words hypochondria or Health Anxiety. I can say now that those months were the darkest most horrible months of my entire life. It is the most horrible thing I have ever experienced and I send my love to each one of you who feel this, I know what pain and suffering you are going through and I hope my words help some what ❤️My trigger:I never intended to ever touch class A drugs. I never thought I would. I loved my drink and weed but i’d never step over the “line”. When I met my boyfriend (the love of my life) everything was the best it had ever been. He came back from a festival to tell me he’d tried Ecstasy. I was so angry with him and felt so left out. As I was also friends with his mates too. The way he described it made it sound so appealing. “You’ll have the best night of your entire life” “it makes you feel the happiest you’ve ever been”. I was terrified of trying it because of hearing the deaths from it but I did eventually and it didn’t sit right with my the first time and was so intense compared to your weed high but I wanted to fit in. So I did it again and again. This time it was amazing. I went to uni and did it instead of drinking with the worry still lingering in the back of my mind of how dangerous it is and damaging. It became my life. I had no interest in anything else. When’s the next rave? When am I next doing it? It wasn’t until February where I woke up after a heavy night on it. I felt different. The days that followed after were different. A weird aching in my chest that wouldn’t go away and was gradually getting worse. My stomach hurt too. What if I’ve damaged my heart? What if I’ve damaged my stomach? I kept needing to pee too. What if I’ve damaged my bladder? The thoughts poured in like a cancer to my brain. Fearing my drug use had messed me up. I smoked weed a lot too. Like 4 times a day. As I was miserable because I missed my boyfriend. I got offered it while I was feeling all of this. I went down and smoked it. With the thoughts in the back of my mind being, weed makes your heart beat fast, what if you have damaged your heart. I started walking to the supermarket at night. The thoughts got more intense. My heart pounding faster and faster. My chest hurting and getting tighter. Feeling lightheaded and couldn’t breath. I thought I was having a heart attack. It was actually my first ever panic attack. What came to follow was hell. At least 4 panic attacks a day. I couldn’t relax, couldn’t resist or ignore more thoughts. I got an overactive bladder which would make me pee all the time and make my bladder hurt. IBS too which would have me almost crying with the stomach cramps it gave me. My neck would tense all the time and hurt. My chest the worst, it hurt so bad and I felt it constantly even if I didn’t feel anxious which was fucked up which definitely made me think something was wrong with my heart. Any pain or weird feeling meant I was about to die. I couldn’t sleep. It was hard to eat. I couldn’t go out and do anything anymore. I had an ambulance called from having a panic attack so bad they thought I was having a heart attack. I literally thought I was going to die that night. We’ve all thought we were about to die uncountable times. I was not safe anywhere as how can you escape your own body? I didn’t feel safe in my own skin. The cure?:I thought I was going to be stuck like this my entire life. I became suicidal yet funnily enough fearing death was what my anxiety was centred around. My boyfriend, my beautiful boyfriend stuck by my side every step of the way. The state I was in, he should have walked out, I wouldn’t have blamed him. He wasn’t the best at comforting me but he stayed. He got me through it mostly. I moved home from University. Safe with my family.  No longer worrying that if I died in my sleep in my university accommodation no one would find me. I was on Propanol for a couple months. It helped a little but it made me more anxious being reliant on something that effected your heart. I tried diazepam also but that made my anxiety so much worse. I came off my medication slowly. I found that coming off it helped me so much. I had CBT therapy. It taught me what all these pains and weird feelings were. Now imagine you’re walking in the woods and a bear starts chasing you. What do you do? You run and you are scared of course. It’s the fight or flight response. You’re body is protecting you, preparing you to run. You get scared of something your heart beats fast to get your blood to your muscles so you can get away. Breathing is hard as your heart is beating so fast you aren’t used to it. The chest pains is your chest not used to functioning so highly, like an aching muscle while exercising. The lightheadedness, the sickness and numbness is blood circulation. As everything is being pushed to your muscles to get you ready to run. The need to pee all the time, making your body lighter to get away quicker. Same with being sick. What you feel it’s your body keeping you safe. If you are under stress it upsets your digestive symptom. The mind and your body are so connected. Even if you don’t feel anxious there are still subconscious thoughts causing it. You’ll all be happy to know that if you were having a heart attack your heart would be slowing not beating fast. Your heart beating fast is a really good thing. It means you are alive!!! I stopped my bad habits. Which were googling my symptoms and checking my pulse. I felt something weird I had to know what it was. I’d google it which would come up with , you have cancer which meant panic attack. Google would blow things out of proportion. I started by asking my mum to google stuff instead. Or I’d tell her what I was feeling and she’s give me a reasonable response. Feel free to go to the doctors too. It was a relief for me. I got so many tests done so I had that to hold on to know everything I was feeling was anxiety caused. I stopped checking my pulse. As soon as I weaned myself off. I stopped hearing my heart all the time. It stopped beating rapidly every time I woke up and slowly the chest pains and palpitations stopped too. The voice of reason! Curing your self takes a lot of work! You have to want it and put your all into it. My anxious voice which took the spot light in my brain had to be over thrown. Introducing the voice of reason. You have to battle your anxious thoughts with fact, reason and truth. For example, I was shopping the other day and my vision went blurred and black for a second. Old me would have lost my shit. My first thoughts were eye cancer! You’re going blind! Then the voice of reason says. When had this ever happened before? If you were going blind it would be more obvious. You didn’t get much sleep last night your body will do weird things. You have to battle till the bitter end. Practice even if it starts small. Don’t let the anxious thoughts win. I got this app for my panic attacks called beat panic. It talks you through it and without it I don’t know what I would have done. It’s blissful. I stopped drinking and drugs all together. Therefor had no trigger and allowed my brain to heal. I got a job, it helped distract me so much. It will be hard at first but slowly but surely you’ll see it fade away. I still get the odd chest pain here and there. If I feel really ill it comes out. But I’m myself again. I’m so proud of myself. You can be too. I stop an anxious thought the second it approaches. The voice of reason now has the spotlight. I haven’t had a panic attack in months. After all that worrying, I’m still here. I didn’t die after all. What does that show you? Good luck everyone, I’m always here to talk if you need advice but you can do this, I promise :) [info] None [info] 1572901293 [info] train
redditor-for-2-hours [info] Army or navy or whatever recruiter called me right after graduation, too.  Me: Hello  Recruiter: Hi blah bla from blah *insert military branch here* blah  Me: ...Hello.  Recruiter: Do you know what you're going to do after high school?    Me: College.  Recruiter: Do you have plans for college already?  Me: Already accepted to the community college. They accept everybody.  Recruiter: What about after that?  Me: Transfer to a university.  Recruiter: After that?  Me: Get a good career.  Recruiter: Well, have you ever considered joining the *insert US military service here*?  Me: No, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and if you're diagnosed with anxiety disorders you can't join the military.  Recruiter: ...Well...uh...um...well...I...um...it sounds like you've done your research. *click*  No other recruiters ever called. My brother had recruiters calling for him for about a year after he graduated before they finally gave up on him, I only had that one call. [info] None [info] 1329273905 [info] train
MonsterMash1987 [info] My head is always full of thoughts and im constantly overthinking stuff. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, my issue with it is talking to people in real life. People tell me everyone has nerves when talking to people but they dont panic like I do.. it sucks to think i will always struggle to make friends and get to know anyone. Dont apogise for the wall of text, its good you were able to talk about it. Its such a difficult topic to talk about because everyones anxiety is their own personal demon. I dont judge you for feeling the way you do. I actually think you should be proud of yourself for getting through the days feeling like that. It must be tough. [info]  [info] 1556491919 [info] train
Petro0162 [info] Honestly, it's cases like that, that give cannabis a bad name. People who overinduldge to the point of constant dependency bring all of us down. I'm an army vet, never did anything serious but due to the nature of my work, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Cannabis helps me wind down and take the edge off, but I don't huff it all day, everyday. I take care of my kids, I clean my house, go to work, and looking at me, you'd probably never guess that I would smoke. I'm not saying your opinion is wrong, but please don't condemn a very helpful substance based on the poor desicions of the few. Again, not throwing any shade, just presenting the information from a different perspective. [info] None [info] 1555232109 [info] train
Brindy11 [info] I've been tested for autism it came up negative I was under in each category of the least and from what I'm told it was just under for the school requirements to get help. But I am diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1544370376 [info] test
owoifier [info] A wittwe backgwound, I'm 23 yeaws owd, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high schoow. I have a smaww gwoup of fwiends, but I wike to stay in the same woutine. I was tawking to one of my fwiends about my daiwy woutine, because we wewe having a deep convewsation about both of ouw anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD awso? Sometimes I have to wash my hands fow minutes aftew I pee befowe I feew cwean." I had to teww him my biggest secwet, someone that I've nevew towd anyone. I said, "I've actuawwy nevew peed befowe. I know it's something you'we supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda nevew had the time." He was stunned by my wevewation. "You've nevew peed befowe?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with uwine ow maybe it was just because I had nevew towd him that befowe, but he was amazed that someone had not expewience uwinating. “You NEED to twy it. In fact, wet’s go to the bathwoom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He wawked me into the bathwoom, and taught me how to wift up the toiwet seat. He took my hand and awwanged my fingews on the stem of my cock. “Wewax, it’s easiew than it wooks. Hewe, watch me do it.” He puwwed out his cock and stawted pissing into the toiwet. “Just wewax the muscwes in youw cwotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenevew you feew a fowce coming outwawd of the penis, focus on it but don’t twy to contwow it. If you feew it moving inwawd, then wecognize it, and wewax the muscwes again untiw it’s moving outwawd.” I fowwowed the instwuctions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t hewp it. I feew the fowce. It’s moving back up. I’ww nevew pee, I shouwd just give up.”“You got this, just wewax. Don’t pway mind games with youwsewf, you wiww pee befowe I wet you weave this bathwoom. If you don’t think you wiww pee, then no pee wiww come out. Twust me, you just have to bewieve in youwsewf.” I twied again, and pee stawted spwaying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm uwinating!"I peed fow 5 stwaight minutes. He said, "How do you wike it?" I powitiewy asked him to weave the bathwoom so I couwd be awone with my piss stweam. I wiped the tip of my cock with a singwe squawe of toiwet papew, and fwushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I wan ovew and hugged my fwiend in the most intense dispway of pwatonic affection I had evew expewience. My pants wewe spwinkwed with wet spots and uwine continued to dwip down my weg. My fwiend saw the uwine mawks on my pants, "Don't wowwy about that. You'ww get the hang of it soon." We feww asweep togethew on the couch in his apawtment. [info] None [info] 1553724128
Passthesaltshaker [info] Constantly sweaty hands and feet...hard to function I have been having constantly sweaty palms and feet,for a few months now...I think. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. My feet are so sweaty that my mattresses get soaked,I have to constantly wipe my hands. Worst thing is,I may not be in an anxious situation but I keep recalling situations which made me anxious,such as people putting me down,being in an abusive friendship(I cut off contact from her,but I'm always afraid she might show up somewhere near me). I have been prescribed with 100mg quetiapine. I think I need to take the full dose. Previously I was hesitant to take the full dose due to weight gain n sedation. But I think I have no choice. Whenever I apply for jobs I get anxious,even when I haven't started going through the interview process. Does anyone have any tips? Anyone can relate? [info] None [info] 1562514421 [info] train
LokisPrincess [info] I was 19 when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was put on Buspirone and another thing. I was fit and active with a great metabolism until I was put on that. Gained so much weight, became depressed, and I struggled with my anxiety. I am off it now, and I'm on a different set that's working really well, but things haven't been the same since I was on that. I'm still not able to lose the weight, and curb the hunger. Now I'm 5'9 200lbs and feel like a piece of shit for it.  [info] None [info] 1509015683 [info] train
feathersandanchors [info] I’m sorry. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now and it’s awful but it CAN get better. I’ve managed really well with diet and exercise along with tools I learned in cognitive behavioral therapy. I have friends that have managed well with medication. There are a ton of options, and you deserve to explore them so you don’t live like this ❤️ sending you love  [info] 25 | WTT #1 | Fall 2020 [info] 1542462292 [info] train
CPledger [info] I have this problem a lot. Convinced myself for a decade that it was just expedient to be faster before all the symptoms piled up and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Funny how we can convince ourselves to gloss over things and justify them as normal. Odd thing is walking slow now makes me anxious. [info] None [info] 1515303530 [info] train
Faithyxox [info] Yeah I have a diagnosis for Asperger’s, Anxiety, and ADD. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, and then Asperger’s and ADD at 17. I am living away from halls this year, meaning I choose who I live with. I’m with some random people I met on Facebook this year as my flatmates ditched me (I’m living with a couple which I didn’t know about at first which is gonna be GREAT /s) so it will be a bit quieter, but hopefully I make some better friends. [info] None [info] 1563851970 [info] train
lumpycakemix [info] Mine too then terror feeds the anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago but only recently, like weeks ago, started reading about it and trying to find strategies to live life without letting the anxiety bring me down.  [info] 35/F/5'10" | SD 6/17 | SW 283 | CW 204 | GW 170 [info] 1528916862 [info] train
CrazyProudMom25 [info] I don’t think convincing them will work.  Not from what I’ve seen on this sub. And with my nmom, even if she does concede it’s a hollow victory. She ended up convincing me to go to college instead of taking a year off school, and to do it for engineering instead of writing. I. Was. Miserable. Dropped out in a month. Six months later I was diagnosed with anxiety, social anxiety, adhd inattentive type, and got a provisional diagnosis for autism. And it’s only now, 6 years later, that she’s finally acknowledged that I sometimes am not up to doing some things, but there’s still this air of expectation that I’ll do it. I told her ‘maybe’ on something yesterday, and she told me ‘if you’re y up to it of course.’ But it felt like a hollow victory because she was assuming I’d even want to do what she suggested... because she didn’t even ask.So, I’d only try convincing them as much as you feel comfortable with, but it’s not likely to work and if it does it might be a hollow victory- maybe they’ll try to make you feel guilty about the choice but say ‘if you have to’. That sort of thing. See if you can get any friends or family to help out, talk to people, do research. Maybe you can find some easy thing for moving, maybe not. Maybe you’ll need to skip on moving things you’d like to keep but don’t need. Who knows? Just prepare as best as you can and make a lot of plans. [info] None [info] 1564142498 [info] train
JennyTommy [info] I’m surviving for other people and are absolutely miserable. WARNING RANT BUG LOOKING FOR HELPIf you couldn’t tell, I’m suicidal. Have been for more than 4 years since probably middle school and I’m 20 now. I was diagnosed with dyslexia in fifth grade, generalized anxiety disorder in 9th and adhd and major depressive disorder this year. All of these run in my family so I was doomed from the start. I have been to 3 different therapists (insurance is stupid) and I’m tired of playing the game. I know how it works. They let you rant, the focus your rant, gain your trust and recommend meditation. Every therapist has this formula and I’m tired. I hate meditation. I can’t sit still and I don’t like how it makes me feel but they recommend it every time, multiple times. And then I’ll be all happy when I’m working with them and think I don’t need them anymore and I’m back here. Back at the bottom. I’m on meds too (lexipro) and have been since I was diagnosed with anxiety but they don’t have the same effect as the used to. I’m just anxious and sad all the time all over again. I used to be worse honestly. Before the meds and therapy I would cry every day and get really low. It didn’t help either that I was in an emotionally and sexually abusive relationship. I’m out of it now but I apparently have ptsd from him and a string of bad relationships and situations around sex. It took me a year after I broke up with my ex to just kiss someone without freaking out. Then I had an amazing relationship and he cheated twice because I couldn’t give him sex. I feel like I wasn’t good enough for him or any of them. I know it’s a victim mindset but I can’t help thinking that if I was just better or did more then maybe they wouldn’t have miss treated me. To an extent it is true though. My ex told me after we broke up that he wanted to break up with me at one point but didn’t because he was afraid that I would kill my self. Now I’m overly concerned that I will give off that vibe again to someone because I know that can be damaging for the other person. The other issue is my friendships. I run under the assumption they don’t want me there so that when I find out they actually don’t it doesn’t hurt so bad. Last night was rough for me for this reason. I was going to go to a party with some friends but they essentially forgot about me. I got all dolled up and got my hopes up for nothing. It’s happened to me a few times (ie no one showing up to my birthday)and I can’t handle those emotions. They aren’t really my friends I’m just kept around out of pitty. People don’t invite me to things either. I try to be good. I’m really social but I just can’t get people to like me long term. They see how annoying I really am and then don’t want me anymore. Another thing is that my dad is close to disowning me and I had to grow up learning how to diffuse people so that I wouldn’t get yelled at. There’s more details in my post history if you want but that’s the gist. On top of that I have never held a job and I don’t know what the fuck I’m doing and with school being so hard I don’t know how much longer I can keep this up. I’m not even in a hard major, it’s liberal studies for gods sake and yet I’m struggling. It’s so stupid and yet I’m falling apart. I don’t even know if I want to be a teacher, but I don’t know what else I’d do. I’m just tired. I’m so so tired. It’s like this every year and every year the same thing happens. I’m tired of interacting with people and having the same conversations with strangers and friends and the monotony of the cycle of life. I have to eat, sleep, bath, socialize, do homework, be a good daughter, go to class, etc. I’m tired of it. And I don’t even know what I’m doing with my life. I’m honestly too stupid for anything. I’m also concerned I’m a budding compulsive liar and going to become an alcoholic. The compulsive liar is because I tend to tell the part of the truth that fits me and twist the rest or omit the rest. It’s disturbing and it’s gotten me into sticky situations but I can’t help it. I don’t know how to be 100% honest. The alcoholism is because I got drunk a while back and the only thing that I can think of since is getting drunk again. I’m not 21 so I can’t buy it on my own and that’s the only reason I’m not drinking 24/7. I want this to end yet I know at least some people will miss me so I stay alive for them. There’s more too my issues but I don’t want to bore you more. I just don’t know what to do anymore. I’m depressed right now for no reason and I just want to escape. TLDR: everything is fucked, I’m not smart enough to do shit, I’m socially inept, and I might loose my support system (family and friends). I want just to escape it all. [info] None [info] 1569150368 [info] train
SaucySpazz [info] Ah perhaps so! I have been diagnosed with anxiety so perhaps this is a by product of that. Ill work on that first and see where it goes then. Thanks for the response! [info] None [info] 1538685237 [info] valid
AguaThrowAway [info] Cymbalta for anxiety? Hey guys,&amp;#x200B;So I was diagnosed with anxiety over 10 years ago, and have been on clonazepam daily since(I know, I know).&amp;#x200B;The first anti-depressant they put me on was zoloft in 2009, and it didn't do much, but I didn't give it much of a chance. I started off with a pretty low dose and just gave up on it after 2 weeks because the clonazepam worked so much better.&amp;#x200B;After that I was put on wellbutrin, and it worked pretty well, I think I needed that somewhat stimulating effect it has. One day I just quit cold turkey, and that was that.&amp;#x200B;I've been prescribed Lexapro, and I never started taking it. &amp;#x200B;I just saw a new psychiatrist, and he prescribed me Cymbalta. Claims he takes it himself.   The thing is, I'm not horribly depressed. I struggle to get certain tasks done, and and by all means lazy, but I don't generally want to die or anything.&amp;#x200B;I've never tried therapy, and I'm finally seeing a psychologist in a few weeks, and starting CBT. Should I just not take the Cymbalta, see if therapy helps, and go from there?&amp;#x200B;I've read some AWFUL reviews on Cymbalta, and some not so bad ones. But I'm torn on what to do. [info] None [info] 1555580550 [info] train
ThrewTheDrew [info] I am, or rather was, EXACTLY like you.Meditation helps. In a couple of weeks/months you should see the improvement.I also began practicing Stoicism, which also helps me with my anxiety.I would also suggest that you see a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a therapist might be of great help if you have any such disorders. [info] None [info] 1566195150 [info] train
that1girl01 [info] Also, goes without saying that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and obsessive thinking. [info] None [info] 1536613997 [info] train
Redhaired103 [info] OP, I have to tell a story. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder but still had it undiagnosed, I went from in my safe zone to working as a waitress at a 5 star hotel's ever-crowded restaurant. The first two weeks were challenging in every way. Both physically and mentally. Physical exhaustion only made my anxiety worse. But, it was one of the best things that happened over time. I got use to the environment. I liked my co-workers and that place started to become another safe space for me. Even with the customers that were problematic, I didn't really care because it was still *my* safe space, with some fun co-workers I liked. I tell this story because while your 'bad scenario' is an option, my experience and alike are also definitely on the table.But let's say things didn't work out at this job. I think of the things us with anxiety disorder sometimes don't totally accept is that this wouldn't be the end of the world. There are zillions of jobs out there with different work environment, different work duties, different co-workers. Yes, you might not make enough money for the life standard you would like to have at all of them, but "paying the bills"... the chances are you can find a job like that. And please please please don't forget, you are not *stuck* at any job. Another common thing I see is that we feel like whatever situation we are in, sometimes we feel that will always be our situation. It's not. If you don't like the job, if you want to leave, you can do it anytime you want. One of my best friends is an employer. She did have employees over the years who quit after a week, didn't show up at work, etc Some had good reasons (anxiety is a valid reason), some were just irresponsible like they went on a date instead. She never thought badly about the people who couldn't continue to work over health reasons, including mental health. Her employees actually don't know this but she suffers from anxiety disorder herself and gets panic attacks, sometimes at work. The moral of the story: more people are familiar with anxiety disorder than you think. They won't even think badly about you, nor they expect you to have an incredible performance in the beginning, regardless of if you have anxiety or not.Give it a try. If things work out, great. If things don't work out, not the end of the world. [info] None [info] 1532264370 [info] train
justdustandechoes [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 weeks ago when I finally picked up the confidence to see a doctor after dealing with it all for ~2 years. I'm 20, I can't do therapy because talking about it makes it worse, I've been given pills (10mg Citalopram daily) and so far they've been okay, but I still get waves of painful thoughts and worrying multiple times a day. [info] None [info] 1445265824 [info] valid
coolerthancats [info] How Can I Study Etiquette Without Feeling Anxious? Etiquette is a topic that interests me quite a bit. I've wanted to learn more about it for several years, but every time I try to seriously study it (or even do a bit of light research!) I get horribly nervous, start hyperventilating, and feel like I'm on the verge of a panic attack. My manners are all right, there have been no complaints, so there is no immediate pressure for me to learn more. I'm pursuing this subject out of my own interest, not because anyone else is making me. I don't have this problem with any other subject: math, science, english, geography, etc. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's usually pretty moderate and doesn't affect my studies. I have been diagnosed with PTSD, but this doesn't feel like other triggers and I can't see any obvious connection between my trauma and studying etiquette.It doesn't matter if I'm reading a book, learning from a teacher, or listening to a lighthearted podcast. After a few minutes of study I'll feel too panicky and have to stop (the longest I've ever made it is about a half-hour, and it took me another hour to fully calm down). Can anyone explain what's going on? It's been years, so I'm confident this isn't a fluke. Should I try children's books on the subject? Smoke weed before studying? Give up on learning etiquette? See a therapist? Any ideas welcome. I'd like to get to the bottom of this. [info] None [info] 1584157466 [info] train
Hooze [info] Scheduled to run my first half-marathon this upcoming Saturday. I am physically capable but I am not sure if I am mentally capable. Help? Roughly a month ago, maybe a little longer, I ran 10.1 miles in around 1:27.  Since then I went through an extremely rough patch with a significant other (currently the relationship is not dead but it is on life support) and I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  My runs since that 10.1 have been terrible.  The most I've done is 3.6 miles.  I know it's all mental, but my brain honestly crashed earlier this month and I've slowly been building myself back up.I do not have a time goal for this half marathon any longer, my only goal is to run the entire time without walking.  Does anyone have advice that can help me mentally breakthrough? [info] None [info] 1380559336 [info] train
Simply_SieSie [info] I don't know what's wrong I know it sounds weird but I feel like I have a mental illness but I don't know what.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I thought it was anxiety but I'm not anxious about this.  I just want to know why I am the way that I am because I feel like something is wrong but I'm not panicked about it,  more so calm and serene. I can't go to a therapist because I'm 15 and my parents don't believe in therapy, even my doctor told me to "wait for my anxiety to disappear." I hate having to water down my emotions so that I don't get "out of control". It's tiring and I just want to know what's wrong with me [info] None [info] 1588236913 [info] train
MagicHobbes [info] I don't mean to hijack the top comment but I sort of need help myself. I know for a fact I don't have insomnia. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but my lack of sleep goes past that.I spend a lot of time in front of a screen. It's the just the way my life works at the moment with work, school, and free time. I enjoy it, I love computers and I like spending time doing things I enjoy but my lack of sleep is really bothering me more and more.The problem is I've tried different methods (like turning everything off early, taking melatonin, etc.) but nothing seems to work consistently or for long enough. /r/asmr does work sometimes but it's not nearly consistent enough to rely on.I feel like there's nothing I can do to fix my sleep patterns. I'm simply thinking about way too much if I'm just lying there and I get stressed out and NEED to watch a video or something to help me fall asleep. I don't spend all of my time on my computer by any means (and I absolutely love hanging out in the real world with people I care about) but it is both good work and a really important hobby to me so I can't just give up electronics completely.I just don't know what to call my problems and I don't know what I have. I guess I'm just wondering if you have any advice? Sorry for the super long comment.**TL;DR:** I just am thinking about too much if I'm simply lying in bed with nothing happening. It's like I NEED to distract my brain to trick it into sleep. /r/asmr has been the best method but I need a way to get consistent with my sleep schedule. [info] None [info] 1394522336 [info] train
ClovisBlack [info] For a bit more context, I used to be considered a gifted student, but I've struggled monumentally with school as I've gotten into my teen years. I've been agonizing over being told by adults that if I don't pull it together, I'll be stuck working jobs that won't satisfy me. I've been slowly and sadly accepting the fact that I may not graduate with grades that qualify me for a college education.There's absolutely nothing wrong with non college requiring jobs, but I've had dreams of being a psychotherapist ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety :) this is a huge deal to me. I thought I'd bomb the test.  [info] Glad [info] 1547097267 [info] train
Godofwar512 [info] Like this. I use that app all the time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. This app does the same for me and helps me calm down. Less reliant on Xanax because of it  [info] None [info] 1521908638 [info] train
BlueInkSz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues at first. The foundations of my paranoia/"paranoia" are things that are completely possible, even though I have been unable to fathom a true reason behind them. An old therapist of mine said it was anxiety related. Fast forward a few years and I was diagnosed with schizophrenia by someone who had far less information. Of course, I fully realize I've gone off the rails with paranoia at times, which really sucks, because there are certain things in my life that actually happened that no one takes seriously anymore. Long story short, schizophrenia is the convenient excuse and some people are manipulative scum.Of course, since I know people with schizophrenia who believe such things are a dime a dozen, I don't expect to be believed. But yeah, at first it was all anxiety issues. I had some bizarre thoughts that came and went, but for the most part it was believable stuff. C'est la vie. [info] None [info] 1569896304 [info] train
mcdona9 [info] Is this an anxiety attack? New member here. I am diagnosed with anxiety. I have ups and downs but most days I can deal with it. However, I have days like today every few weeks where I wake up feeling awful and I can’t shake the feeling all day. My mind is racing and I can’t relax, I feel like everything is falling apart. My heart is beating quickly, my body is moving at 100mph, my chest hurts, I keep needing to cry. I feel completely dissociated from life and not like myself. It’s a horrible feeling that usually lasts all day.I’ve tried all sorts over the years - doing yoga and other exercise, distracting myself with shopping or going out, getting outside, doing hobbies, etc. Nothing seems to help apart from sleeping. Usually I sleep for around two hours and after waking up I feel an amazing sense of calm and like myself again. Obviously, though, depending on where you are and what you are doing, sleeping isn’t always an option :(Is this an anxiety attack? Does anyone else ever feel like this? How do you cope? Any other suggestions how to shake the feeling off apart from sleeping? [info] None [info] 1568648819 [info] train
crookgang40oz [info] Stomach issues (Again) I’ve posted in the sub before trying to find out if anxiety can cause stomach issues and I got some good answers, but it seems to be getting worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2014 and for the most part I’ve been able to keep it under control for years up until all this crazy COVID stuff started happening. At the beginning of the lock down, I’d say about a month or so ago I started to get really anxious and stressed out due to the fact that I lost my job and I have a baby on the way during a pandemic. I noticed that it was effecting my stomach, I was losing my appetite, my stomach was constantly growling and I was altering between constipation and diarrhea. It all seemed to get better after I got my anxiety under control. For about a week I was fine, I was able to eat, my stool was normal, and I started to gain weight due to being home all the time so I thought all was good. Then about 2 weeks ago I woke up in the middle of the night and my belly button felt like it was being ripped out of my body, it was sensitive to the touch but it went away after I got up, stretched and used the washroom. Now ever since then, I’ve been dealing with constipation, diarrhea, stomach cramps, and undigested food in my stool. I went to see my dr and he said there isn’t much he can do since most testing for diseases and viruses has stopped due to COVID. He thought maybe I have IBS because of my anxiety so he told me to pick up some meta mucil and probiotics but none of it has been helping. I’ve basically gone vegan because I thought maybe it was all the take out I was eating but nothings changed. I took some pepto to help with the stomach aches and diarrhea but all that did was turn my stool a really dark green color. I’m very stressed out and I don’t seem to be getting any better, I’ve looked up a lot of home remedies for IBS and other stomach issues but nothing seems to be working. I’m pretty scared and upset at this point, I have a baby on the way and I can’t get sick before she comes. I have an appointment with my dr tomorrow morning but like I said there’s not much testing he can do at this time. I’m posting this because I want to figure out wth is wrong with me. Diabetes runs in my family so maybe it’s that? Maybe I have an ulcer? Crohns? I honestly don’t know. [info] None [info] 1588282320 [info] valid
colonialnerd [info] I don't even know what to call this, shit just sucks. I'm a transgender teenager, I have to go into the doctor's office every week to get shots, I am diagnosed with anxiety and I haven't been able to get proper therapy in months. The best I can do is the school therapist right now and for that, I have to leave my classes. I'm a full-time student, I can't drive, and most places won't hire me because I'm too young. This is all regular stuff for me, but things get worse.My mom is having a hip replacement next week and my grandma has to stay with us, she is "a product of her time" to put things lightly. We have two other people staying with us who are the literal definition of that saying "were you born in a barn?" seriously, they got kicked out of their old house for messing the place up and not paying rent. I have to share a room with one when my grandmother comes to stay for over a week while I still have school. My dad is the only one working now and is never home. I have been the only one delegated new chores in my family (well at least more than two) My dad got floors and trash, and one of the people staying with us got guinea pig cages (they are her guinea pigs and we have to tell her to take care of them and she lets them run wild and I'm going to have to share a room with that), the bathroom, and her own laundry. I got feed cats twice a day, feed fish twice a day, make lunches, cook dinner, dishes, laundry, litterboxes, water bowls, room cleaning, and tea service for my mom. The only alone time I've gotten in the months they've been here have been me locked in my room and I've been continuously shamed for it by my parents and now they're making me share a room to top it all off. I've been falling behind in my classes because I'm falling asleep in them since I haven't been able to sleep and because I keep getting taken out for therapy. And finally, my mom has been in such great pain in these days leading up to her surgery all she does is yell at me and tell me I don't do enough for this house. Shit sucks for everyone involved, any advice is okay if you have some to offer. [info] None [info] 1581038011 [info] train
fancypattie [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past. I do have that pretty well under control. For example I would be afraid to be in public places., be afraid of an intruder, have panic attacks which required being medicated. So I don't know if it's just a branch off of that. I also didn't have this fear with my son's father. I feel like I loved my SO and my son so much that I'm always worrying about their safety. [info] None [info] 1556831759 [info] test
EepressoDepresso [info] Panic attacks and anxiety attacks are two different things, I have both.Panic: chest tightness, hyperventilating, dizziness from hyperventilating, feeling likes you're dying, lasts from a minute to an hour or soAnxiety: stressed, easily annoyed, nitpicking, etc I was diagnosed with anxiety and Panic disorder about a year ago [info] None [info] 1571350359 [info] train
Xenouz [info] I mean it happens to me, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a doctor so maybe it's just a small amount of people. [info]  [info] 1464311334
queenbleepbloop [info] This reminds me of my mom’s very helpful advice when I was diagnosed with anxiety in grad school: “but you didnt *used* to have anxiety so why have it now?!”.  It’s almost like people’s minds (in your case) or people’s mental health can change (in mine). But I guess since the TSCC has never changed, we can’t either!! [info] None [info] 1524419342 [info] train
QuillPenMonster [info] Bad things keep happening to me, and I feel trapped Last week, my cat had an odd growth that he somehow removed. I took the tissue sample to the vet, and the news came back today that it was cancerous. There are talks of chemo, a special cream, or surgery (but this is the least likely due to the growth being on the chin).Today I fucked up and got into a car accident, my own damn fault. The chances are high that the car is totaled.I work at a shitty job that doesn't give me enough hours, and my boss hates me. I was ironically on my way to an employment office when I got into the car accident. I'm still kicking myself for it.A prior medical bill bounced back, and the insurance isn't able to cover it. I now have to call them back, and I have phone phobia.My mother has been financially supporting me out of the goodness of her own heart, especially after I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm still in school, trying to get my thesis done. I feel like such an inconvenience for my mom, being 26 right now, and it feels like my chest is going to explode with everything that's happening. I messed up way too much, and now I wonder if I'll ever amount to anything.Thanks for reading this. I needed to get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1560197359 [info] train
cosmiicsloth [info] Scared to seek therapy My mental health has been deteriorating for the past few years. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and struggled with an eating disorder for some time quite a while ago and now I'm falling into self-destructive behaviours again, this time only it's very different and I'm not sure what's happening. I don't know how to explain because I keep feeling like it's all just me overreacting or simply being lazy, but I can barely get anything done in my daily life, my relationships are deteriorating and can't find the motivation to study or take care of my health anymore. It's really driving me on edge. Even the thought of seeking help makes me feel guilty because my problem seems so superficial, something I should be able to fix with just a bit of motivation. And then there's the fear of telling my parents. They went through hell when I was struggling before and I really don't want to worry them again, even though I'm an adult now and would be getting therapy of my own volition. I just don't know if I should, if I deserve - if this all is just me seeking validation or being unmotivated to take care of stuff like school and relationships, but I don't want to be like this and I'm growing desperate. [info] None [info] 1575733601 [info] test
derekjlight [info] Running out of options...? Long story short(er). I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD when I was about 10 year old. About 8 months ago I got off of medication for the first time in 23 years. Very slowly my anxiety levels have been creeping back up. I call it my "coping level". It feels like things affect me much more than before and I feel overwhelmed much easier. A couple of months ago we had a very tragic death in our family, very sudden. This obviously did not help but didn't seem to make things terribly worse for me. Plus side of getting off of meds is that I have lost 70 pounds and am gaining more self-confidence, so that does help some. I have tried several supplements like 5-HTP and Ashwagandha, not sure if either have helped. I am not depressed at all. I just don't feel like myself anymore, and don't get much satisfaction out of the day. [info] None [info] 1558814584 [info] train
giraffesNstuff [info] Anxiety or something else to be worried about? Sorry if this is the wrong sub for this. If so please direct me on where I can post this for helpA few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and since then have been on and off different medications. As of the last 2-3 months it has been getting more difficult to function as things have gotten much worse. I’ve found it much harder to focus on things in front of me and thinking in general has become difficult, as I feel like my focus is in several different places at once. I’ve also had an increase in panic attacks, as well has tightness in my chest and trouble catching my breath at times. The most concerning issues that I am hoping for info on have been intense head fog, dizziness and confusion which is been occurring all day, every day, for the past month or so. These have worsened and have made me take off several weeks of work, and make it difficult for me to drive.Also in the past weeks have been dealing with some minor stomach pain, constipation, acid reflux,intense gas that has caused discomfort in my chest, but I’m told issues like these are common in people with anxiety. Also, if it’s related, I have been having several allergy and sinus related issues such as sinus congestion and headaches for a few months now. Can this also be related to anxiety?I had a CT scan done on my brain last week as well as several tests on my heart, liver, thyroids, and blood which all came back showing no issues. I would like to know if all this could be due to anxiety alone, or are there other possible issues that I should investigate further? Also if the head fog and confusion could be due to ineffective medication (buspirone), which I did not have issues with the first few months of taking, but now seems to be ineffective, considering my increase in panic attacks and other symptoms listed. [info] Patient [info] 1571849712 [info] train
mithedthiel [info] I used to work as a barista and was super into coffee until I was diagnosed with anxiety and decided to quit drinking it. (I had to stop pursuing bartending as well because alcohol was also triggering anxiety symptoms).I switched to green tea and it makes a huge difference. A nice zen like awareness, rather than coffee jitters.  [info] None [info] 1547605952 [info] train
Obversa [info] Same here. Yes, I absolutely consider myself disabled.Not just because I'm autistic, but because I've been diagnosed with anxiety so bad at times that it *is* disabling. My diagnosing psychologist even wrote up a document for me to be excused from speech class due to said anxiety. [info] ASD Female [info] 1558801463 [info] train
Jecykah [info] This is me to a T. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, it surprised me that my doctor said “anxiety and OCD.” I was like, “Oh please... I’m not one of those weirdos who has to flip the light switch 70 times or the moon will explode.” But when she explained my anxiety as an obsession it all clicked and made more sense to me than anything ever. [info] None [info] 1542954810 [info] train
TuloCantHitski [info] Lots of ppl will take "I am stressed and have work to do" as "welp, I guess I'm diagnosed with anxiety now" [info] There's money to be made in prolonging the problem [info] 1554782419 [info] train
Mega-Mew [info] The issue is that she insists on going like an hour away to eat something and I kinda have to work on other things too. XD And she has like a ton of homework. She's worse than me with procrastinating. Then again I have been diagnosed with anxiety so yeah. That might have something to do with it.  [info] 4485-2366-6045 || May (Y, X, ΩR) || 3768, 2041, 0908 [info] 1466754878 [info] train
flogGNAW9 [info] I used acid far too often for a few months and now I feel really out of it and get bad anxiety sometimes. I haven't tripped in the past 3 months. How long will it be until things get back to normal? I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder before I ever tripped but I'm not sure if or if not I actually have it.  Before tripping I went through times where I would feel really stressed out without a good reason.  After tripping 13 times over a 3 month span I started to feel really out of things for a while.  Around 4 of those 13 trips were bad trips.  I started to feel somewhat better after not tripping for the past 3 months, but things still get weird sometimes.  I do not plan to trip again.  I get paranoid sometimes, and I've had the three worst nightmares of my life within the past 3 months.  How long do you guys think my mind will take to get back to normal? [info] None [info] 1396550316 [info] train
Lil-Ackbar [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety yeah that wouldnt surprise me but I actually sort of enjoyed it this time other than the few moments of losing a grip. [info] None [info] 1569111697 [info] train
Sheehan7 [info] I feel like a failure who has no job future I'm 20, going into my 3rd year of community college as a business administration major, and honestly I need some guidance. Tbh I'm not very good at school, never have been, and my GPA is a 2.6 (graduated HS with a 1.8). I want to work in the automotive or mental health field, maybe fashion but probably not, but outside of that I have no idea what I want to do. I took a full time IT internship this summer at an office and hated it, hated it so much that I had a mental breakdown two months in one day at the office and left forever. Since then I've been diagnosed with anxiety, put on medication, and I'm seeing a therapist this month. That whole situation has made me think I will never be able to work a full time office job and I feel like a failure. I do, however, work retail at a clothing store part time, and I've been there for 9 months. While I'm there I feel very calm, I'm apparently one of the best associates, always on time, good sales, friendly, etc. but I can't work retail forever, $10/hour is no livable wage. This again makes me feel like a failure. I have no idea what to do. I don't understand why my anxiety was terrible at the cushy office job but it's fine at the high stress retail job. I thought of dropping out of college to go to mechanic school, but what if I go through that and find out being a mechanic makes me just as unhappy as the office job did? Then I could drop out of college for a while but that will just land me in the retail world and then I'll feel like a failure. I also don't want to get a degree if It will just end up like the internship all over again. What do I do? I'm so lost. [info] None [info] 1473038505 [info] train
JayJay729 [info] I have very little body fat and have some nice definition. My problem is that I have difficulty eating exorbitant amounts of food and therefore have trouble putting on weight and staying energized at the gym. I have found that SS requires lots and lots of eating and energy. I know I need to eat more, but I just have trouble doing so. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) and my lack of appetite is one of my biggest symptoms. When I'm hungry, I eat, and eat some more, but there are times during the day when I just don't feel hungry. Liquid food is easiest to get down, but I just don't have the time available to liquefy everything. [info] None [info] 1330381745 [info] train
caterinaprimavvvv777 [info] how did you overcome anxiety in relationships? how do I not let anxiety ruin a relationship? I was diagnosed with anxiety at age of 7. I been in 3 serious relationships. when I was 15 I was in abusive relationship. I lost trust, my self worth, I get my anxiety from there sometimes. luv last two relationships end, becsuse they say “ i’ll be here” then end up leaving. my anxiety gets the best of me, makes me overthink, analyze everything. i’m nervous my anxiety will ruin my relationship I have now. no matter how many times people said in past, it won’t ruin us and we’ll get through it, but then it somehow does. my bf is good to me. he supports me. I believe him when I say that my anxiety won’t ruin it. How can I calm myself? how do I not push him away? I feel like he getting distant how do I not come off as clingy or needy or pushy, but my anxiety gets me like this and I hate it [info] None [info] 1587833471 [info] train
fredemar [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2007 and got my first panic attack in 2010. For me it was also a point in my life when I was stressed out about multiple things, and I just snapped I guess. That feeling of your first panic attack stays with you for a while, it's scary. It helped me to see a psych about it. With her I trained so that I could feel the panic attacks coming, and knew what to do. For me I start having a tingling feeling in my arms, signaling that I need to get up and go do some exercises (that makes them 'go away' most of the time). She also made me realise that the things I feel when having a panic attack is normal, it's my body and it happens even during my 'downtime'. So during a panic attack I have a high heart rate, so she made me do jumping jacks until my heart rate was up when I was feeling good. Same thing about dizziness. [info] None [info] 1568995633 [info] train
do-you-like-darkness [info] I worry too much.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's been a part of my life for as long as I can remember.  It's exhausting and stops me from doing things I otherwise would.  I hate it.  [info] None [info] 1541041176 [info] train
Ryuutorak [info] I take the same medication I took when I was diagnosed with anxiety, even though that diagnosis has been overturned and replaced with ASD and ADHD.It doesn't matter that they misdiagnosed my sensory agitation as anxiety-- the sensations and issues were still decreased by taking Effexor, regardless of what they were labeled. [info] None [info] 1471141355 [info] train
deadcrushsoda [info] My (22F) bf (23M) likes a ton of IG models &amp; it makes me uncomfortable I realize that the title of this post may giveaway a fact that I have already come to accept: yes, I am insecure. I have trust issues that I am truly trying to work on, and I am aware that I can be possessive.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD (not an excuse, but just an explanation as to why such a matter leads me to overthink).I need advice on whether my discomfort is due to me just being insecure, or if it is warranted. My boyfriend and I have been dating for a few months now, and although he is a great guy in general, I noticed he follows a ton of IG models. They all look pretty much the same - super curvy with big butts - and I look nothing like that (pretty flat chested &amp; thick-slim, not slim-thick lol). I brought this up to him and he unfollowed a majority of them out of his own will (I never explicitly asked him to unfollow them, but he caught on that it made me uneasy). I noticed a week or so after, however, that he followed accounts like that on his other social media and even a few on IG still. He continually likes pictures of these half-naked women, and when I see his name in their likes, it makes me feel inadequate, He would even go as far as following the same model's twitter accounts and ig accounts. I don't want to come off like I am 'spying' on him, but to be honest, with nothing to do all day, I find myself checking his activity (we do not live together). It just bothers me that he searches these women up, follows them and has these pictures at his disposal. I don't mind him watching porn because at least that's private. I don't know how to bring all of this up to him again. We are in a fairly new relationship, plus with the pandemic happening, my concerns just feel insignificant. Any advice?&amp;#x200B;TLDR; my bf used to follow a ton of ig models // i told him i dont like it // he unfollowed some but kept the others &amp; im still uncomfortable about it [info] None [info] 1587867674 [info] train
lovemesomezombie [info] Exactly! I will make this long story as short as possible. I was at a very large work related awards banquet. I found myself crying in the bathroom because I felt like I didn't have anyone there that liked me or wanted me to sit with them. A couple girls asked me to sit with them and tried to make me feel comfortable. I was very emotional as this was a feeling I carried all the time. It didn't matter if I had friends, I always felt like I wasn't really liked. There was never a reason from the outside but this is how I felt internally. That night I won the "Rookie of the Year" award out of 200 people and got a standing ovation so somebody liked me. Not long after that, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Your advice to OP of therapy is a really good one. It helped me tremendously.  [info] None [info] 1550700874 [info] train
SBNP95 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety an panic disorder, I know literally all about it. These are not anxiety attacks. These episodes are literally caused by Joy an excitement, I'm not saying that maybe I am wrong, an you're actually right. I just know that even with a family history of anxiety an panic disorder, the early onset of it was brought on by me overdosing at age 16, before that I had never felt anxiety or any of the sorts, but these episodes I'm describing have been happening since I can remember. [info] None [info] 1556240416 [info] test
LegendaryConfusion [info] should I find a way to ask for anxiety medication? I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year but it was never much of a problem but started getting so intense last month. It's constant. I try every day to do anything to make it easier to leave the house, i shower and dress nice and charge my phone and get my purse ready and know all the shortcuts to avoid people. But it never works. I try so hard but it's just not working. I've been trying the "just force yourself" thing but nothing and it's getting to a point where it's so bad I can only eat around twice a week. I never have enough energy to study or work. If I can find a psychiatrist, is this enough to be able to ask for medication? Will the psych think im overreacting and tell me to try harder? Has anxiety medication worked at all for you? How about if you have substance problems and dont wanna give up your weed and alcohol? [info] None [info] 1438715283
mariposa-indigo [info] Obsessive-compulsive disorder and zen Hi!I have some very recurring thoughts and get worried by them. These worries are accompanied by songs that get stuck in my head frequently, all the day, with anxiety too. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I used to practice compulsions, but now is more the obsessive part. I wonder if I'm attached to this "diagnostic". When I breathe, it seems that I can let go this thought of "worried, worried, worried" that keeps coming, but it's for short moments. "What if" thoughts with the "worst case scenarios" keeps popping all the time, like something very bad is about to happen. Then it becomes hard to breath, pains starts to appear and I get stressed. Mindfulness helps me a lot.Sometimes I feel very negative and somehow... something! arises and I calm down. I don't know what is... love, peace. Them I get distracted by the obsessions again.Is that an identification? Like, my mind is creating the same structure of conflicts? Creating conflict so I can calm down... Creating conflict so I can calm down? I don't have panic attacks, though. Even getting peaceful is a reason for the mind to argue about it "you are too peaceful".Thanks for the help! [info] None [info] 1502489809 [info] train
SubjectShape [info] So I started realizing there were issues and got diagnosed with IBS. I started by keeping a food journal to see if I could figure out what was setting it off, but there wasn't anything linking the IBS. Not to say it was useless coz I found out some other stuff, but it seemed like my IBS hit no matter what I was eating.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but when I moved I left my therapist and lost my insurance so I can't afford to see a therapist anymore. But while reading about IBS I saw someone suggesting it might be an anxiety response, so I started keeping an anxiety journal instead. Basically whenever I recognized I was super anxious about something I'd write down when that happened and what I was anxious about. Sure enough my IBS symptoms were almost always right behind anything that majorly set off my anxiety.Since then I've had to be better about my anxiety and find ways to manage it without a therapist and meds. Edibles help since they're legal here, but they are also semi-expensive so not always accessible. Meditation has been a huge help, just spending a few minutes in the morning when I get up to sit and be mindful of my body and how I'm feeling that morning. I still get stressed, of course, but knowing that it's coming because I can feel that stress building up is also very helpful. Plus I just like....don't leave the house except once a week to do groceries and I always make sure to go early in the morning so I haven't eaten breakfast yet. I work from home, I have a dog to help with my anxiety, I keep on a pretty tight schedule in terms of waking up, going to bed, working, ect.The thing is like....everyone's anxiety is different, so how I control mine may not be what works for someone else. I control my environment to control my anxiety and do the best I can to cope when that's not possible, both with the anxiety and with the IBS. [info] None [info] 1567109327 [info] train
JETMAZER [info] I don’t know what to do rn I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and it’s been hard ever sinceI feel so alone in the world, I only have one new friend in high school (just got into high school this year) but I don’t even know if he’s my friend, he pushed me around physically, like just as a joke but I don’t know if I feel good about it, and the other day he was begging me for money and got annoyed that I didn’t give him any money.I don’t want to stop being his friend because I am so scared about what might happen if I do. I’m so lonely I also went to an abusive therapist that just sat there the whole session whilst I cried and saying stuff like, calm down, take deep breaths, stop acting like a 2 yr oldSHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UPAnd my mum paid so much money for that therapist and I feel so sorry for her because I know I am a pain in the ass to her and an embarrassment to her and her life would be easier if I were gone.I just want friends to talk to, friends that understand what I’m going through friends that don’t minds the fact my fucking voice hasn’t dropped yet, I sound like a 6 yr old or that that I can’t pronounce my r’s correctly. [info] None [info] 1585054840 [info] test
WTF_Christine [info] I went through a bad breakup at the same time my parents were divorcing. My dad asked me to move home because he had this huge house and no one to help take care of it.I did most of the cleaning and was able to stay on top of it, even while enrolled full time in college. However, my dad's entire family was coming for Thanksgiving and he wanted the house to be "deep cleaned" so he hired a professional cleaner.I came home from class one day and the cleaner had washed dishes. No big deal. But as I went to unload them, I noticed she loaded them differently than I loaded them and I had a full on melt down, including screaming and hysterically crying. It lasted about 10 minutes.Afterwards I called my doctor and told her that I thought I was having a mental breakdown and she had me come in immediately. I was diagnosed with anxiety.Turns out I have BPD.  [info] None [info] 1551417778 [info] train
Markmange [info] Why am I so miserable? I just recently started a new job, a job which in theory I should be over the moon about, it's better pay and more experience and benefits than I could ask for... But whenever I'm there I just can't wait to leave.I long for weekends, not because it's free time to do things but because it's the only time where I get to lie or sit down and do literally nothing, I don't want to do anything, no hobbies, no interests, I do things only because they're required to stay alive (eat, drink etc.).I have a dog who for the most part at least adds some form of stimulation to my life, I enjoy his company but at the end of it all, I have no energy or great desire to play with him, explore with him or do anything but sit on the couch and cuddle with him.. I take him for exercise not because I want to but because he needs it, and I feel like a bastard for being this way.I like where I stay, granted, I hate my neighbor's but they have next to no impact on how I feel. My home is my own and I can do what I want when I want, but that what is always nothing whatsoever.I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues in the past and put on meds for it, and while it keeps me chill (and helps me sleep so damn well) and originally helped me from freezing up and having a panic attack, now I don't even worry about that, when I get anxious, I just feel fucking miserable, like I want to be immediately erased from the situation, with a massive god sized eraser.Last time I went to the doctor in regards to this they basically said"Don't smoke dope and fix your life. You're not depressed"So I did that. I've not smoked weed in over a year, I've got a new home, new job, new life really...But I'm still god damn miserable!I'm running out of ideas now, and beginning to fail to see the point in even trying, if I didn't have my dog, I'd have probably given up by now. [info] None [info] 1542788232 [info] train
Snitchwithabitch [info] Anxiety or something else? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for about 3 years now. Recently i am feeling disconnected with surroundings like memory loss or something like that i don't know who am i and what i am doin on this planet what's the objective, it sounds like a existential crisis but i think it's different it used to drive me to a panic attack but now this feeling has become more prevalent. I don't know what this is, is this psychosis? [info] None [info] 1569609612 [info] train
Passionofawriter [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 14. I'm sure if I went in to the psychologists office now, I wouldn't be given the same diagnosis; I have recovered from it, and the reason why is probably tied to a bunch of reasons (some of which I probably am not aware of).One thing that really helped me - I have not suffered from panic attacks in years because of this - is recognising how I feel, and telling myself that I do not have to feel this way. I ask myself if I want to feel this way and why. For example, the other day the fire alarm at work broke, and it was silenced while we were getting a specialist down to look at it. I was going to have to sit for hours in a reception with a repetitive high pitched signal sounding off. That's exactly the stimulus that would normally trigger an anxiety attack for me. I immediately felt tense and anxious, memories of my past attacks flooding me. I realised this, and asked myself why I was feeling this way. Is the alarm going to hurt me? Will worrying about it help to stop the situation?The most important thing in a panic situation is to calm yourself down, and for me that worked by asking myself questions and realising I can change how I feel; I am in control of my emotions. When it came to burdens in my life, I tried only to think of events that worried me for as long as it would help me. It helped to remember that worrying about an event in the past or future would not prepare me or help me in any way for it. [info] None [info] 1506707992 [info] train
maydsilee [info] I've noticed in many situations where I thought I was following my dog's instinct, I realized in hindsight that my gut was already telling me a situation was bad, if that makes sense? Like, I probably realized subconsciously that something wasn't right or someone was making me uncomfortable, and then my dog picked up on my own body language (me tensing, for example). Since he can show it better than me (his hackles rising, or shifting uneasily next to me, or not wanting to walk past someone, etc.), I listened to him and would change direction or avoid that person. A lot of people don't get just how much their body language rubs off on their dogs, who notice you're uneasy, so then they're uneasy. It's why trainers stress to clients often that their own feelings rubs off on their dogs.Of course, it's also not absolute :P I'm diagnosed with anxiety, so a *lot* of things make me uneasy, and my dog notices that, so...it's definitely not clear-cut lol! [info] None [info] 1573678035 [info] train
Admiralfrewt [info] Hey y'all! New user here with a BUNCH of questions Background: I have been diagnosed with anxiety and perscribed 5mg Valium as needed. I have not been taking it because I hate feeling "couch-locked" for hours (same reason I don't enjoy smoking marijuana). I have pretty constant anxiety all day, but manageable with few and far between actual panic attacks. I used to smoke cigarettes/ vape nicotine but have quit for almost a year.I went to a vape shop two weeks ago and had a new rig set up (I use an RDA instead of a tank) to just vape 0mg nicotine for the mechanical satisfaction of smoking something. But I also bought a little CBD vape pen. The brand of CBD liquid is "The Clear" with 500mg of 220 mg CBD The guy at the store told me it would last me a while but I went through it in a week to which the guy said that it was unheard of that I would go through one so fast. I felt like I wasn't getting much effect unless I had 2-3 puffs every few hours. Now these disposable pens are very expensive ($40!). I think my alternative is buying the flowers. But I want opinions from experts/ experienced users. Should I try the flowers as a cheaper alternative? Should I be regular dosing with oil? Please give me all advice and insights! I want to be educated! [info] None [info] 1555431897 [info] train
NI1515 [info] Very sharp pain in head when hit with anxiety - should I be concerned? I'm a white 21 year old male, 5'9, and around 145lbs. I'm currently on 200mg Lamictal daily for HPPD. Alongside HPPD, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.For around a month, I've been experiencing a sharp piercing pain in my head whenever I experience a "hit" of anxiety, or even remote nervousness. It's sort of hard to explain what I mean by hit, but basically just when you get that "drop" in your stomach. Like I said, this occurs through general nervousness, not just intense anxiety. For example, I was nervous about kissing someone and as I leaned in I got the sharp pain in my head again.I thought it could just potentially be tension headaches. But the strange thing is - the past month or so has possibly been the least stressful month I've had in the past 7 or so months, and I've generally been having a great time. In addition, the pain is always right on time with the "hit" of anxiety and is very short lasting - about the length of the "drop" in my stomach.I'm a little concerned. Any thoughts? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1580520890 [info] valid
Snake010 [info] I used to be just like this guy I didn't understand then I was diagnosed with anxiety now I understand and I wish more people could just understand [info] None [info] 1560396581 [info] train
PenguinsGoMeow [info] I am such a hardcore nailbiter that I bite polish and fake nails off. :( I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 times the clinical level though so I think I will bite my nails forever. I've tried to stop and it just never works. :( [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/1UBORK18CHCK6  (Multi) [info] 1426510017 [info] train
MakeupMua16 [info] Has anyone ever had constant itching in one particular spot every day but then it stopped completely once they started taking benzodiazepines? Like I have itching Only or I should say 98% only at night. sometimes it gets really bad that it doesn’t happen till it wakes me up in the middle of the night not going to say where (you can probably guess) it’s too tmi and it only happens every single night (btw already checked by 4 different drs I know and I don’t have a rash/redness visible, no bumps, no hemorrhoids or pinworms). Only maybe 1-3x does it happen during the day a month or not even that. A year and up to about a month or two before the itching started I was on an Ssri (first ever anxiety medication taken) for anxiety called Paxil hated it because it caused me to gain a whopping 50 pounds so I went off and didn’t find that I really had anxiety that bad that I needed a medication just primary dr thought I did for social anxiety. Anyways had panic attack about two months ago my first ever and oddly when I was at the worst of the attack for the first week or two where I would get tremors in my stomach, extreme nausea, couldn’t sleep 4 days in a row the itching stopped randomly (still wasn’t on any medication yet oh wait I did take Zoloft for 2 days the day after my attack happened hated that it didn’t help immediately so cut it off cold turkey) then because this was my first panic attack and I didn’t know it was a panic attack I had went to the ER three times within two weeks and every time I was diagnosed with anxiety reaction I even had blood testing (every visit) brain scans done and ekg and a stomach ultrasound and all came back fine. and the third time I actually got a prescription from the ER doctor for Ativan not just giving me the iv and sending me with nothing home. The Ativan worked good stopped my itching completely but I hate how innorder for it to help my other anxiety symptoms I had to take it every 7-8 hours or it would wear off quite quickly. Now my psychiatrist who I hadn’t seen in a year since being off Paxil switched me to valium 5mg two pills 3x a day and my itching has stopped now we are trying to get off the benzos and onto more of a long term medication like an Ssri. So today we started in the morning to cut down drs orders to taking one pill 3x a day and I could immediately notice the itching came back when I woke up. Do you think then that itching like this is an anxiety related problem if regular and hemorrhoid specialist doctors couldn’t find a medical problem wrong with why I am itching and only at night? [info] None [info] 1541096555 [info] test
im_your_bullet [info] 27 with Anxiety and I'm asking for your help. Hello, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd from my time in Afghanistan. PTSD not so much, but the anxiety is terrible. We got back in the states in  2013, In 2015 (yep took this long) is when I was diagnosed. I was prescribed anxiety meds and they made me feel like an emotionless zombie (which right now I would take). I stopped taking them because of the zombie like state they put me in. Because I was. No longer taking meds I started to self medicate with cannabis. BEST medicine yet. For me, it helps instantly and usually for the entire day. With that being said, I'm in vacation with my family. I'm in a place that Cannabis is still illegal and I usually don't medicate around my family. They would understand but I just like to be sober unless I'm home. Well, as you guessed, my anxiety is going crazy.  It's just this terrible feeling that's over my entire body. I'm only here for a week, but I would really like to enjoy it. Going to do some meditation as soon as I'm done writing this. I keep getting hot flashes followed by sweat. Any over the counter medicine I could go to a store and buy?  I would just like to not feel this way for the next five days while we are here. Thanks in advance. [info] None [info] 1494802383 [info] test
Aeriayna [info] TIFU by living with complete bitches for a year I lived in a house with 4 other people (making there 5 of us in total) I thought that these girls were my friends but apparently not, they made my life a living hell for that year. They would scream and shout and bang on my door at 4am when they knew I had to be up at 6, they would make nasty comments when I was in the room or just sit and snigger about how fat I looked that day, or how my hair looked etc.. They drew pictures of myself and my boyfriend on the whiteboard we had in the kitchen and write comments around them (mature I know), there was even an occasion where they broke into my room and searched through my stuff (they got in by making up a bullshit story in order to get the full bunch of house keys off my property agent) and they found some thrush cream and then thought it was hilarious to shout and make up songs about it and tell all of their friends. I'm really not sure why all of this bothered me so much looking back, but when its 4 vs 1 with no escape from it it's pretty hard to not let it bother you they would send me petty nasty texts all of the time as well even when I wasn't in the house, there was literally no escape.One of the girls was nice as pie to my face and didn't join in with them as such, but turns out all of the things I had told her in private she had then repeated back to them, two faced cow. But now, because of them I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues and completely wasted a year of university by locking myself in my room through it when I didn't have lectures. The worst part is I have done nothing to them, I didn't even bother trying to get revenge.Luckily I have now moved out and never have to see any of them again and have much nicer people to live with next year, but its just more a horrible feeling that I wasted one of my years at university worrying myself over them instead of enjoying myself. I literally bought them presents from my holiday to try and make them stop, looking back, I wish I hadn't bothered. Since moving out one of them has even tried to insinuate that I fancied her, get your head out of your arse love, I have a boyfriend. Background information: I'm at university in the UK and in second year it is common to move out of student accommodation and into a house with friends. However, the property agents bully you into signing contracts so early. I started university mid September and had already signed a housing agreement with my so called friends by mid October. TL;DR: lived with nasty bitches, wasted a year of university. [info] None [info] 1434214897 [info] train
SenorVolf [info] I'm a firm believer in the paranormal, but this seems like your average, every day anxiety. I remember when I was accepted into college after deciding to transfer schools, and I got my notice of acceptance only a week before classes began, the exact same thing happened to me when I saw my boss at work. Overwhelming fear, feelings of dread. I was diagnosed with anxiety years before this ever happened, and never felt a thing like this until I had my first panic attack. I was so concerned with my feelings from that day that I had to see my doctor about it. It's really amazing how simple nervousness can manifest itself.Edit:  I read this again and noticed you said you were specifically afraid of the man, not the situation. It still sounds like an anxiety issue to me. It can manifest differently for every person and every attack is different. I've had more than a few where I've been afraid of one person in particular. I had one, once, where I had an overwhelming fear that I was going to kill myself. I didn't want to kill myself, I had never been suicidal, but I was still so scared that I was going to be compelled to kill myself that I put all the knives in our pantry and went for a walk, just to get away from them.I'm not saying that something paranormal didn't happen to you, 'cause I obviously wasn't there. But if it were me, I would honestly just chalk it up to anxiety. [info] None [info] 1520715536 [info] train
babykittiesyay [info] So I'm coming into this from maybe a different background, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and "severe major depressive disorder" (yes, that's actually what's on my charts, lol). I'm also a FTM.The anxiety has been way worse than I've experienced before. Partly, I think it's that my emotions are turned up to 11 from all the hormones, which might continue for the whole pregnancy but definitely not past that. This is probably the first thing to remind yourself of, this is temporary. It's also good to remind yourself of all the people you know of who are parents. Are they all perfect? Humans have been making it through all this for millennia. Make sure to check in with yourself about the effects these worries are having on you. Are they keeping you from getting things done, taking up a lot of time, messing with your breathing or heart rate significantly? If yes, it's time to chat with your doctor. It's very normal to be nervous, it's also pretty common to develop anxiety disorders in pregnancy, between the hormones, the information overload, and the huge responsibility. Getting care sooner will hep prevent any temporary issue from becoming long-term. We can do this! [info] None [info] 1546283184 [info] train
SuperHaunter [info] Every human being has mood swings now and then, it's completely normal. We all have a bad day or some stress that gets us and make us a mess. So please be gentle to yourself. You're awesome, laughs at yourself, you're out there to make friends and as an ENFP you might feel too much a lot of the time.Like you, I have mood swings as well. And I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Yes, anxiety can give you mood swings. But it's because you start building up your stress without letting it out becoming a constant state of fear and stress because of literally nothing. It's not being moody like a normal human being. It can even trigger a panic attack. It's the feeling something really terrible is about to happen even if everything is alright.Because I wanted to have better control of my panic attacks, I started to rationalize my feelings so I could understand whether I was feeling that emotion or I was absorbing it/building it up out of nowhere. That made me understand when it was my anxiety talking or me being a normal human being. Maybe that point of view helps you somehow.Now let's talk about your boyfriend. He needs to understand that, as a human being, it's normal to have mood swings. One moment we're ok and the next not so good. We have pet peeves. We get stressed. And he is supposed to support you even in your worst. I'm not saying anyone should support an abusive relationship (or that you're or him are abusive to each other), but he should be patient when you're not feeling that well. On the other hand, you also should be aware of your emotions and actions not to outburst at someone. Take your time out to chill and everything will be alright.What I mean is: don't beat yourself up on this but try to rationalize your feelings to identify what is actually going on. If it's something that triggered your anger or if it's just accumulated stress that you need to let go. And talk to your SO about it. You can't change who you are but you can understand yourself better to not use someone as an outlet to build up stress.You two can work things out perfectly if you both open up to understanding and no judgements, only love and support. And the best way to get this is talking to each other and being honest about your feelings even if your anger has no reason at all and you just need some time out. [info] ENFP [info] 1489586977 [info] valid
Violinchan [info] Idek if I have disassociation or anxiety anymore I was diagnosed with anxiety, but as long as I can remember there are sudden periods on random days where I feel extremely uncomfortable (like baddd) because I feel detached from people I normally know. For example, I could be sitting in the living room and suddenly I would feel so horrible being and talking with my parents because they felt like strangers and everything felt fake. I also saw the world from the view of “space” sometimes as a child. Right now I also have the weird, weird feeling. Like I’m dreaming and not exactly in my surroundings, but also extremely anxious. Point is, I’m confused. [info] None [info] 1565673427 [info] test
-partlycloudy- [info] And if you absolutely have to check if that weird feeling in a particular body part is really just caused by anxiety, include the literal word “anxiety” in your search. Eg “lump in throat anxiety”. 99.99% of the time, that weird symptom will be down to anxiety. This helped me during my google rampages when I was just diagnosed with anxiety and having wild panic attacks! [info] None [info] 1546777401 [info] train
kirbysdreampotato [info] That's crazy. I've had minor versions of that my whole life; seeing bugs that don't exist, seeing something stationary "move", mistaking objects, always far away or out the corner of my vision.I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and I've always been easily stressed, which builds up when everything stresses you out. I always thought seeing small things like that was normal. Never thought it could be connected. [info] None [info] 1547935471 [info] valid
hotstickywaffle [info] Need help with medical marijuana for anxiety and looking for a doctor I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. I haven't been to a doctor in a while, but have been wanting to look into medical marijuana. I know there have been big changes to the laws recently with more coming, but it seems like step 1 is to find a doctor who can and would be willing to prescribe it. Are there any good resources with doctors that are open to it? [info] None [info] 1559047445 [info] train
Nevermore--- [info] I managed to stop a panic attack over the fact that I don't have consistent work hours at 16 For a bit of a background I've been diagnosed with anxiety, last checked it was pretty bad even if my family doesn't see the full strength of it cause I hide.I work a casual job as an events caterer. Meaning I only work when people want to go out and spend a tonne of money. There has been one event this year and it was making my budget plan go a little bad. But then I thought 'I am sixteen goddammit. I do not need to worry about my university fund so much when I don't even know if I'll do law.' Then I calmed down. No panic attack or freaking out. [info] None [info] 1516017967 [info] train
heath9821 [info] I don’t know what to do anymore. Hello everyone. I have only heard about this reddit thread recently, so I decided to share my story. Bare with me, I’m a mobile user and I’m currently crying and panicking while writing this.I’m the oldest of three, me being 21, my sister 17, and my brother 14. I currently live with my family after quitting college. I have been going to therapy and last year I have been diagnosed with anxiety and severe social anxiety. I will tell you, one of the main source (maybe THE main  source) of my anxiety and panic attacks is my father. I found out that my ather was emotionally abusive in early high school, when I joined and became a leader of an anti-bullying program in my school. Being a lesbian with Asperger’s in a conservative town, I felt motivated to help and educate people how to stop bullying, how to speak out against it, and how to get help. In middle school, all I learned about abuse was sexual and physical abuse. I started to learn about emotional abuse while I was in the anti-bullying group.A little bit more about my dad. He sells artifacts, like arrowheads and antiques. He also worked as a manager at a gas station, so he could be charismatic when he wanted to. Not so much at home. He constantly yells at not only me, but my siblings and my mother, which in turn made yelling the only way to communicate problems with each other. Like I said, I have Asperger’s, so sudden noise like yelling freaks me out, especially since when I get home I want to feel safe.He also likes to do stuff for us, only “to pay him in return.” For example, he would make us dinner or gives us money to do stuff, like pay someone else gas money (I don’t drive, it gives me anxiety), he will say things like, “I do shit for you, why don’t you repay me in return?” or “I made you dinner, now you have to do the *insert chore here* because you have to repay me now.” Shit like that.He is also a fan of gaslighting. Whenever he is mad at one of us, he is mad at all of us. He will blame my mom for doing things around the house, even though he makes my siblings and I do the chores while he sits in his room, and my mom is the only source of income. After he stops yelling at her, he will come up to yell at us over something. Like I said, I’m in therapy so I have been more open to tell how I feel in the moment. When I tell him, “Hey you yelling is making me start to panic” or “Hey can you leave me alone? You are scaring me” he simply blames me for being yelled at and lists off the things I have done, like dropping out of college, so he is “justified” for yelling at me. He also tells me stuff like I would be helpless and homeless without him.This year, after talking to my therapist a little while, I have realized that I have repressed some of my memories when I was a kid. I will tell you guys the two that still really scare me to this day.1.) It was winter and me and my brother were out sledding outside. We were going up back the hill to sled back down. Being a shitty middle schooler, when he stepped on the sled to sit and ride on the sled up, I would pull the sled from under his feet and he would fall into the snow. I know it was shitty of me to do, but I made sure he wasn’t near rocks when I did it. Only snow covered places. I thought it was the funniest shit. I was laughing so hard that I didn’t see my dad tackle me, shoved my face in the snow, and pulled me back into the house by my hair. He then made write not one, but two letters TO HIM, not my brother, about what I did and to apologize to my DAD. 2.) Again a middle schooler, I was in the laundry, having a fight with my dad about something. I don’t remember what, but it was probably about school. He then pushed me against the wall and put his hand over my throat (he only can use one, because his other arm was paralyzed in a car crash when he was in high school), yelling at me. I can still feel his hand on my throat.Now, I’m stuck. I have been trying to learn how to drive a car and get a job, but honestly, I feel I’m not mentally ready for it. Not only with me trying to cope with my anxiety, but the fact that his words, no matter that I know he is emotionally abusing me, still affect me. I also don’t want to leave my mother and my siblings behind, because I honestly think that my siblings have anxiety too, coming from the same upbringing as me. I feel so trapped. [info] None [info] 1561407711 [info] valid
candiedbug [info] I have the monitor because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I thought I'd better keep my eye on my bp and see if anxiety made it spike. I guess I have my answer. I've been taking phenibut and L Theanine for it. I wonder if stacking before playing would keep the bp numbers in check? [info] None [info] 1412960930 [info] train
HarmDeezy [info] Yup. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nowadays everyone has “anxiety” so if I were to ever mention it people would not think of it as an illness but as fake  [info] None [info] 1545194301 [info] train
lanasy [info] Funny, I mentioned I was diagnosed with anxiety to a nurse during her basic questioning and she said "Oh you just need to work our more". Uh... yeah right, let me remove my abdomen so I can move again, k thx. [info] None [info] 1562950716 [info] train
Clay-Helmet [info] Missed Multiple Classes - May Face Severe Consequences I am on my way to a meeting with my supervisor in 2 hours. I am extremely scared, not sure if I might get suspended. I haven't attended my hospital placement in the last couple of weeks.Had no motivation and feeling so anxious. I came see my doctor because I want to join the army in the future and if I'm diagnosed with anxiety again I'll not be able to enter the army ever in the future. They are very strict on their health requirement.All of this is completely my fault. The placement is great, all the staff are fantastic but am unable to find any motivation. If you've read this far, thank you. [info] None [info] 1580391872 [info] train
StaleRomantic [info] It's improved my issues with anxiety a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for which I used to take medication, and it hasn't cured me by any stretch but it's forced me outside of my comfort zone a lot. Just being in medic school has raised my anxiety so much that things that used to make me anxious and miserable seem meaningless now  [info] None [info] 1512878445 [info] train
YeahXynni [info] 19/M/EST (Up late nights) Looking to binge games/anime with someone :) &amp;#x200B;Hey everyone, I'm Drew and I live in Massachusetts. &amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;I'm self-employed and intend to be for the rest of my life. A few years ago I streamed World of Warcraft full-time, and played semi-professionally in the eSports scene for WoW, Heroes of the Storm, Smash Brawl/Melee (Shiek Main) and Rocket League. After quitting streaming due to anxiety I spent a long time figuring out exactly what I wanted to do. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and currently medicated to great success. I started taking courses online for marketing analytics and I currently self-employ myself as a stock/currency trader. I'm very new to the process, but have seen great returns and aspire to do even better to help pay off my mothers' car and my grandparents' house.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;I'm posting on Reddit because I'm lonely at times. As someone who lives with anxiety, it's not likely that I'll often go out of my way to meet people in the real world. The majority of the friends I've made throughout the years are from WoW. This is an issue because I finally decided to quit the game a few months ago after playing for nearly 15 years. My friends solely play WoW, so I won't be interacting with them as much. &amp;#x200B;I'm looking to find chill people who have time to hang out regularly. I'm a chill, outgoing person, but I have a dark sense of humor and I'm very honest and upfront with my thoughts. If you're the type to be offended by jokes or whatnot, I'm not your guy. Since I work from home and have diagnosed insomnia, I'm active A LOT. &amp;#x200B;I love to invest time into large projects with a person. Whether this be starting a new game from scratch and playing the entire thing out, or binge watching a Netflix/Anime series, etc.  &amp;#x200B;To explain what exactly I'm looking for in a **perfect world** :\-  Someone who has a generous amount of free time.\-  Someone who loves video games. \-  Someone who enjoys anime and/or watching shows and movies together. \-  Someone who doesn't get offended.\-  Someone who loves playing video games with a partner. \-  Someone who isn't picky on what type of game they play.\-  Someone who has a voice for themselves.\-  Someone who is outgoing. &amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;Here's some random extra information about me :&amp;#x200B;\-  When I played WoW during a competitive raid season, I would be investing up to 18 hours a night. When I wasn't raiding, I was preparing other characters and grinding the game more.&amp;#x200B;\-  Because of how often I played WoW, I had little to no time to play anything else. This was an ongoing trend throughout my entire history of the game. Because of this, there are TONS of games that I haven't had the time to play up until recently quitting. From the span of 04' to 18', I never got the chance to play games such as Skyrim, Oblivion, The Witcher, Divinity, all of the Fallouts', etc. &amp;#x200B;\-  When it comes to playing video games, one of my primary goals is to fully complete the game. Side-quests, hidden shit, DLC, collectibles, etc. On top of this, I want to \*fully complete\* Every game on the steam Marketplace. I'm sure you can tell I have a lot of spare time.  &amp;#x200B;\- I'm clingy, but I can take a hint. (*Not retarded*)&amp;#x200B;\-  I have a pretty deep voice.\-  I've played with members of Midwinter, Method, TSM, Cloud9 and Limit.\-  I have a western terrier named Max, and two orange tabbies that hate each other.\-  Sometimes I prefer no beard, sometimes I prefer a beard.\-  I binge a lot of shit. Anime, random games, Netflix.&amp;#x200B;\-  I started watching anime on-and-off about a year ago, I've seen about a dozen series; the most basic recommended ones such as DB, Attack on Titan, SAO, but it gets boring watching em alone. I have a big list of anime I plan on watching.&amp;#x200B;\-  I have consoles, but I play on PC most of the time.\-  I play piano, guitar, bass, drums and used to sing in chorus. (bass/low bari)\-  I'm great with money, I keep numerous notepads on my financial analytics and track my growth. \-  One of my personal goals in life is to own every steam game / DLC on one account.\-  I want to be fully retired in a paid off estate before I'm 30.\-  I own contacts, but I prefer to wear glasses most times. Doesn't matter too much to what I use.\-  I'm currently grinding Black Ops 4, but I'm down to play whatever with people.\-  I would love to start a Baldur's Gate playthrough with someone.&amp;#x200B;\-  If you want to know what games I play, I'd be happy to share my library/steam accounts. I have a ton of games and wouldn't mind buying one to play with someone if I like the game.PM me if you're interested :D&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;\-Drew&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1540438753 [info] train
AgitatedBrilliant [info] I'm not sure who I am anymore or how I got here but here I come So, a few days ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Before that day I used to think a lot I had ADHD so I was wrote all the process regarding my chase for that diagnosis report in r/ADHD. Well, I was shocked to find out I was diagnosed with severe anxiety instead.https://www.reddit.com/r/ADHD/comments/a690nx/finally_got_my_diagnosis_well_im_quite/?utm_source=reddit-androidI used to like that sub a lot because everyone always seemed so grateful and kind hearted with people who would open their lives to them no matter what, but I found their response for my case in particular to be somewhat cold-blooded, also due to several downvotes that lead my thread buried into the oblivion.Except for one person who suggested I should repost here. I'm not going to, as I think I've described enough and the original link is there if someone wants to read my deepest thoughts about this.I'm seeking life advice. I'm lost, I don't know who I am, or how can I get over all this. I'm now truly anxious like I never expected I could be. [info] None [info] 1545062921 [info] valid
C1awed [info] &gt;I'm also introverted and avoid social situations that I haven't experienced before or that I'm anxious about. I tend to avoid people altogether if I'm particularly tired or in a particularly bad mood. I've never felt the need to go to someone for emotional support... I dislike music, loud noises, drunk people, dancing, partying and crowded gatherings of people. I don't use any drugs. I'm not good at expressing emotion.&gt;I sometimes feel extremely lonely and I long for the kind of connection that I used to have with my close friends. I miss the great times we've had together and would like to have more similar experiencesWithout trying to be insulting,  what kind of connection and great times are you talking about?  &gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety(mostly social) and Asperger's syndrome.Have you considered therapy?  Something like CBT could greatly help with the anxiety and teach you strategies to be able to stand - or even enjoy - a wider variety of social experiences.Right now it seems, even with all the changes you've made, that you're still waiting for other people to reach out and be friends with you, the way they did in elementary school.  Unfortunately, you're going to have to do a fair amount of the reaching out as an adult, and you're going to have to be willing to put effort - emotional and non-emotional - into the friendships to grow them and maintain them.All the experiences in the world aren't going to make a difference in making friends if you're not actually actively trying to make friends.  You won't passively attract them by looking nice and showing up the way you could in elementary school.Adult friendships tend to be more about chatting with each other during the week, and meeting up to do things once to a few times during the week, evenings and whatnot.  Neither of those seem to be areas you feel particularly comfortable with or good at.The first step in friendship, and the goal of the clubs and groups and meetups, is acquaintances.  From there, you talk, you find things you have in common, you move the friendship outside the club.  Or maybe you just hang out at the event and see them there.  But that's an active thing.&gt;I've changed my diet several times and have started exercising more and am slowly getting into shape. I'm experimenting with doing different stuff with my hair, facial hair and clothes. I'm learning a second language. I'm learning to drive.That's great to improve yourself.  Self-improvement is always a good start.  None of those are "I asked people to do something with me / got their facebook or digits / invited someone to hang out / was in any way social."  I'm not trying to say that what you've done is bad - it's not! - but ... &gt;They all seemed to be well functioning socially so I can only assume they'd have asked me if they actually wanted to be friends with me. They're assuming the same thing about you. [info] None [info] 1484786074 [info] train
fullsunflower [info] I agree that some people need to chill out. I go to a school with a very large Asian population in America. As an Asian myself, I always feel obligated to get the highest grades possible. I always feel guilty doing poorly in school because my parents who immigrated to America when I was little sacrificed so much for me to get American education, so that I wouldn't have to go through even more rigorous education in Asia (literally 1 test defines your life). As time goes on, my parents have become more relaxed with me. Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety, they've started to focus more on my happiness instead of my grades. [info] None [info] 1537915540 [info] train
Chimerasame [info] Oh yeah, I get you.I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a GP to the extent he felt comfortable prescribing me as-needed medication for it, but I don't know if it's "chronic". I get it sometimes when I go to grocery stores, and when i'm around a lot of unfamiliar or only-slightly-familiar people in a scenario where there isn't a really specific prescribed sort of action-we're-supposed-to-do (e.g. parties w/ like 20-30 people are often bad, but audiences with like 200-300 people are fine).I'm not real clear on where the neurotypicality line is, heh. [info] None [info] 1498591682
Aezthetics [info] Strange sensation when stretching neck/shoulder. \[23\]\[M\]\[5'11"\]\[200 lbs\] When i try to stretch my neck, specifically the back neck muscles, i can feel this odd sensation on the right side of my chest and shoulder. It's hard to explain the sensation. It's almost like a ripping/tearing feeling with no pain. It feels like its a straight line going from my right pec to right shoulder. I'm not sure if these descriptions are descriptive enough, but i figured i might as well try. I have mentioned this to my doctor but since i'm diagnosed with anxiety most obscure things like this are written off as stress symptoms.Curious to see if anybody has any clue as to what it could be. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1569840376 [info] train
jamessayshowdy [info] Honestly I really thought for the longest time it was normal to worry about everything and always be stressed out. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like "wait wut".  [info] None [info] 1554241591 [info] train
drowningGreenBean [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 and have been taking anxiety medication on and off since then. I got diagnosed with ADHD (primarily inattentive) in my first year at college. I am now in my 3rd year of college and I take medication for both anxiety and ADHD. I have asked this same question about myself and I don't think that there is a chicken or an egg for me. Rather, the anxiety and ADHD build off of each other. If I am anxious I have struggle concentrating. Conversely, if I can't focus my anxiety gets worse. Hope this helps! [info] None [info] 1488244970
orangemoon93 [info] i have before,i'm diagnosed with anxiety and i was prescribed even stronger anxiety pills but i don't want to take them, i've been doing fine just dealing with anxiety on my own, i'm just going through rough times now, a really painful break up.this pill i took is not risky it's very mild and it can be given to anyone suffering with panic. [info] 220 days [info] 1471245204 [info] train
floormopthews [info] I'm turning 16 next month and I am not looking forward to it (You can skip this post its just going to be me ranting)I know that as soon as I turn 16 I'm going to be expected to be more responsible and to get a job. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia and am terrified of getting a job. My parents know this, but that doesn't stop my grandparents and other family members constantly asking when I'm getting a job.  My grandparents constantly tut at me because I'm "wasting my potential". Because I'm the most "academic" and "the smartest" of my cousins, they see me as a disappointment. They also constantly ask me when I'm going to get a boyfriend. I don't know if you've looked at me Liz but I'm not exactly desirable. It's fucking draining constantly being told to get a boyfriend, I'm trying goddammit. I'm trying my best. I'm trying to live the best I can with this stuff that I can't control. Medication can only do so much and you constantly pulling me down isn't helping. [info] 16 [info] 1560082952 [info] test
iamaquietmess [info] I was to scared to ask about this too. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd and on worst episodes whenever i think back on something i bang my head and or punch myself just to try and get the thought put of my head.But on normal days i get this. [info] None [info] 1564976612 [info] train
fruple [info] Implanon and Anxiety? I got Implanon inserted about a little over a month ago and it's been pretty wonderful.  However, I've noticed over the past few weeks that my anxiety is going haywire.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now, and I can mostly keep it under control (I don't use medication).  The past two weeks though, it's just getting awful.  I'm more anxious than ever and I'm getting upset about things and just honestly being a pain in the ass to everyone because of it.So, I was just wondering if anyone had experienced this before.  I don't know if it's from the Implanon or just life in general or I just need to get back into therapy, but it fits the timeline pretty well. [info] None [info] 1408307186 [info] train
Ethanyolo1999 [info] Lots of strange things I have been feeling for a while I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am unsure if this list of strange symptoms are related or something else. Something I have experienced for a long time is very strange, the first experience was when I was say 5, I feel extremely uncomfortable with the inferred transmitters on tv remotes pointing at my body and it is phisicaly uncomfortable to the point where I have to move it, I get funny about lots of these small things and it gets really bad if I can’t stop it. One that bothers me constantly is the fear of cutting of circulation, where I cannot wear tight clothing or even put my wrist over the edge of the table. Another strange thing recently is that my surroundings seem to change, such as distance changing and objects changing size and visual clarity seems to change too, none of these are really distorting or changing anything and don’t effect balance or depth perception. An example of this is is when using my phone it can seem to be closer to my face and and then seem to get further away with like tunnel vision and can appear allmost like HD sometimes (best way I can describe it). It makes it seem as if common things such as rooms I am familiar with seem to be bigger or smaller for no reason. Also maybe not mental health but I experience bad vertigo often, where I allmost lose vision at times just from standing up from the couch. I have spent lots of time in hospital and my blood pressure and heart is healthy and normal.Thankyou in advance for any insight! [info] None [info] 1556448169 [info] test
hurtstobealive [info] I get the point of this post but I don’t think it’s right to downplay someone’s mental illness because you think you have it worse. It’s kind of like a spectrum, sure everyone has anxiety (as long as you have a nervous system) but everyone’s is different in terms of strength and in different situations. Social anxiety can also make a person rude or defensive because when ur anxious ur body is literally in defensive mode so I also disagree with your point there. I am diagnosed with anxiety but I knew I had anxiety way before I was ever diagnosed so I don’t think a diagnoses really matters. I mean it’s not like doctors really do anything special to diagnose you they just ask you like a few questions. Lots of mentally ill people can’t afford doctors or even know that they need help. [info] None [info] 1573748556 [info] train
Morphiadz [info] Sleep apnea or anxiety? I am female and I am 19 years old. I am not diagnosed with sleep apnea. The doctor sent me for a sleep study which is happening in November or December, or possibly January.I am diagnosed with anxiety. Here is the issue. I am not anxious about anything anymore. My anxiety is pretty much entirely gone. My doctor passes off all symptoms as anxiety. I continue to explain I literally have no anxiety, and I am very happy and calm.My symptoms are as follows:- dry mouth, especially in the morning- very very bad fatigue, all day long- cannot focus, cannot get anything done, just too tired to push myself- bad vision, somewhat blurry vision- sometimes waking with sore throats, quite bad- palpitations (never had them even when I had bad anxiety years ago)I am reluctant to try a medication because I don't want to be on a medication for anxiety when I honestly do not think this is anxiety. I could just try it and see, but it is a long process (takes a month or more to kick in) and the first few weeks are always full of horrible symptoms until your body gets used to it. I don't want to go through this at a time when I need to be focusing (I am a student). I don't feel any anxiety. I don't know what to do about how fatigued I am constantly. Also, I have hypothyroidism and I am on a medication. I don't believe this is related to that as my TSH is under 1. [info] None [info] 1505248781
Crimzina [info] Experiencing breathing troubles when lying on my sides Hello, I'm an 19 year old girl and I've been having this problem for about 3 months. Whenever I lie down to go to bed, if i lie on either of my sides I experience breathing difficulties. It's like I'm gasping for breaths and yawning constantly. I can also feel my heart pounding in my chest. However, if I lie flat on my back, the symptoms tend to decrease or go away entirely. I should note that I have had breathing issues similar to this in the past, as I've been diagnosed with anxiety. But the circumstances this time just seems really peculiar. Thanks for the assistance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1483650425 [info] test
RobAlly [info] Similar to me. I've had anxiety for 10 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety. But it wasn't until recently that I realized I have agoraphobia. I've also know that I had it,  just didn't know it had a name.  [info] None [info] 1451284914 [info] train
itstheamandashow [info] First I wanna say thank you for sharing. It’s okay to admit you have Aspergers. It’s okay to feel like a fraud at first. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like “oh great another college girl with anxiety I’m such a cliche” but after a while I came to terms with it and advocate for anyone who suffers like we do. It’ll take time, but you were strong enough to seek help, so you’re definitely strong enough to continue on with your new outlook. Remember= mental illness doesn’t define us, it refines us.  [info] None [info] 1552036486 [info] train
Rsubs33 [info] Hijacking your comment. I am diagnosed with anxiety and deal with it through medication and coping mechanisms. It sucks balls when you get an anxiety attack. I thought about this example for a while because my wife asked me and the best example I could think of is that feeling you get when you tilt too back in your chair before you fall forward and resettle yourself or if you are unlucky and just fall backwards. Think of that split second feeling, but imagine that it lasts way way longer than a split second. Now think of trying to anything never the less playing a football game in front of tons of people. Glad he was able to get diagnosed. Before I figured it was fucking horrible.  [info]  [info] 1481769645 [info] train
arizonaicedgreentea [info] I am an exotic dancer/stripper diagnosed with autism. AMA! Thought I'd do an AMA to pass the time :)I'm 21 years old, been dancing since 19. I've worked at 4 different clubs in New England since I started. At a young age I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and then later on, Aspergers Syndrome.Feel free to ask me anything about my work, future plans, my life, interests, or whatever else you'd like, be respectful though please! [info] None [info] 1560494801 [info] train
billbobb1 [info] So once you have anxiety, does it ever go away? I had my first anxiety attack, in my mid thirties, five years ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety soon after. I dived right into therapy, doing all the work I was told to by my therapist. I had successfull results.  I thought I was fine. Then had another anxiety attack two years ago while swimming. I just had my third anxiety attack driving across a bridge that I have driven over at least 100 times throughout the years.  I was with my family and in laws and it was humiliating. As my mother in law is old school Peruvian and no considers me as less of a man and calls me a scaredy-cat. We’ve never had the best relationship. I am use to living an active life. Before this happened, I was studying to get my pilots license, now I’m heartbroken and afraid to follow through with my training because I’m afraid of what might happen in the air. My point being, once you have an anxiety attack is it just a matter of time before another one hits?  Once you have anxiety, do you always have it?  For the rest of my life, is it just about managing anxiety?  Does anxiety ever completely go away? [info] None [info] 1514868267 [info] test
theSuperCyberCat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same time as adhd. I'm only on medication for my adhd but my anxiety has improved a lot just from the adhd meds. You might not be the same, but it's something to consider. I don't know how taking both anxiety and adhd meds works but if your adhd is properly managed you might have less anxiety and be able to not take a second medication. This is something that you will have to work out with your doctor/prescriber. Having a therapist who is knowledgable in both these areas would also be helpful. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1558146393
AlexKTuesday [info] No, mine do not necessarily trump their conditions. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and if I could pick to have one or the other, I'm not sure what I'd choose. They're both crippling in their own ways.However, there are been a lot of reputable studies showing the benefits of MM (specifically, strains high in CBD%) for epilepsy patients but the evidence isn't as concrete for the other conditions I mentioned. [info] None [info] 1457014888 [info] test
zekobunny [info] Had a serious anxiety attack last night Hello guys, I think this is an appropriate place to post.Some info about me. I am diagnosed with anxiety and deppression and take SSRI meds daily. I also enjoy smoking a joint every few days and never considered myself as someone who has a problem with weed.Last night, after a one week long t break, I decided that I shall smoke a joint before bed and chill a little bit. It all went well, I listened to some music, everything was nice and all. At one point I decided to go to bed and try and sleep, so I did.I successfully fell asleep but at about 5 in the morning I was woken up by the most dreadful feeling of fear, panic, shaking... I felt like I am the only person in World feeling like this and that I am fucked. The feeling is very hard to describe but it used to happen to me when I was younger (back when I wasn't even smoking). This time it felt serious though, my body felt like it was in grave danger but I knew there was no reason to feel like that, I was shaking head to toe and was seriously afraid for my life. I guess this is what they call an actual anxiety or panic attack.At the end I had to tell my dad I was feeling bad just so I could have someone comfort me and tell me that I would be alright. I decided to take my perscribed Lorazepam and tried going back to sleep, later the feeling went away. I don't know if weed triggered it somehow, I've never had problem with weed before. Maybe it's the combinaton of SSRIs and weed and even some caffeine. What are your thoughts, this was seriously a scary experience that I really want to avoid in the future. [info] None [info] 1549796932 [info] valid
redrebellion [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychiatrist and told my mom (who does not work in the medical industry at all). "No, you don't have anxiety!" Oh, what a relief! /s [info] None [info] 1469549616 [info] train
hushxx18 [info] Tips for anxiety? I been having really bad anxiety for the past two weeks. It feels like I’m going crazy (when I’m not) Some background info; I have been diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 14. I’m almost 20 now. I have these rough periods every couple years but usually I’m okay. I haven’t had anxiety in over a year- maybe two, so it hit me really hard. It’s the same old same old, cant breathe, intrusive thoughts/ thoughts that don’t make sense, can’t sleep, feels like I’m going crazy, but the newest one is derealization, where it feels like I’m not in control of my body. I don’t have many friends so I can’t do things or talk to people to get my mind off. And my family is extremely abusive and won’t be much of a help to speak to. Advice would be welcomed [info] None [info] 1559624660 [info] train
ZT20 [info] 5 visits to the ER later: Healthy EKG, Blood Test, and X-ray indicating no heart problem... But my palpatations are now occasionally waking me up, and this morning I felt a non-painful but paralyzing sensation in my chest for about 2 seconds. (31/M) Height: 6'0" Weight: 302 lb Race: WhiteSo this is something I am continuing to battle, I had previously posted about this before but its continuing to worry me. This morning at around 7 AM I woke up to a single, noticeable heart palpatation but no other signs or symptoms of anything. I felt fine, and quickly calmed down. Since I was wide awake, I went on with my morning as normal before deciding to lay back down around 10 AM. After drifting in and out of consciousness multiple times and having a number of very brief "dreams" of getting up or talking to my roommate (which I quickly realized was a dream as I came to), I finally had this weird feeling, almost like a very pronounced tingling in most of my chest. I couldn't move or say anything for about two seconds, and then it passed completely. Heart rate after both incidents seems normal, though the wave pattern on my heart monitor app is occasionally weird looking when I hold it for 60 seconds (I have no idea if this is normal or not). I feel absolutely fine now, a few hours past, and as I said in the title above, the ER has run 4 EKG which all indicate no abnormalities, 2 blood tests that didn't pick up anything, and an X-ray that showed no signs of heart damage. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and given  0.5mg Lorazepam for it, which I've been taking irregularly because they only gave me 20 pills and was instructed to take "as needed".Again, I feel completely normal now, and had several days where I felt fine all day, but when this happened I was quite shook, to say the least. Could anxiety induce some kind of sleep paralysis or anything of the sort that could feel like this? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1572627395 [info] test
AverageRedditorMaybe [info] Dunno if 1 in a million but here goes. When I was 13 I smoked some spice not sure how much a little over a bowl of it. This is the same shit that killed otherwise healthy adults. I was born with Marfan syndrome so I have heart issues. Now immediately after smoking it this time I noticed something was way wrong compared to the other 10 or so times I’ve smoked it. Not sure what it was as I don’t completely remember but I rushed home and said I need to go to the hospital and told my mom everything. My uncle said to sleep I was having a bad trip I’ll be okay. Mom took me to the hospital where they rushed me in put me on an iv and oxygen to purge stuff out of my system everyone was clambering around and I remember taking a look at the heart monitor thingy. I saw my bpm rising 140,150,170,180,190 I started to think my heart was gonna give out completely at that moment and just flipped my shit. I managed to calm down due to this cool nurse talking me through it. At the time I was completely detached from reality and felt like I was in a dream. No exaggerations everything felt fabricated. My hearing felt distorted and had a ring to it. My vision was cloudy and tunneled. I pulled through when 10 mins later a cop came in to ask me some questions. He told me “yknow you got really lucky, when they called me down here they told me I would be here to arrest your mother and I wouldn’t be able to ask you any questions” implying that the doctors thought I wasn’t gonna survive. Still alive today with ptsd related toward any drugs. Took me 2 or so years to recover from that dreamy state. Imagine 2 years of feeling like you’re still in a dream. After that I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder but at least  I’m still alive. [info] None [info] 1550745655
logictoinsanity [info] Not really, I mean I have been diagnosed with anxiety so it's probably just a part of that. I probably should mention it to my therapist though [info] None [info] 1489204081 [info] valid
MaBoiMarki [info] I told my EX about my anxiety I'm 15 and very homosexual for some context.So I was diagnosed with anxiety recently(and I'm getting treatment sorted) Me and my EX are good friends so i asked if i could rant to him because I trust him. So i ranted and he seems annoyed with me and just telling me to "calm down" and "get over it" during a break down. I don't often talk to people about how I feel and now I feel shit because I feel like I have just annoyed him. I love being a burden. And now I'm panicking even more. Please help me! [info] None [info] 1566939118 [info] train
oddestowl [info] Yes!I have been diagnosed with anxiety because I actually was anxious. I felt wrong and I knew it was stemming from my mind. It was absolutely a mental issue because I was worrying about things for no reason and I couldn’t stop it. I have also been to the doctors and said “I feel anxious, I am not anxious, but these sensations are anxiety. I am a fairly self aware person and I do not feel anxious in my head, these feelings are stemming from my body it is happening symptom first what is going on?” and I was told I was just suffering from anxiety and was not actually self aware enough to be making that call, my head and body were tricking me. I didn’t really think it was true but I am really used to being brushed off by doctors so I sort of went with it. But those sensations make me anxious through association with anxiety and make me feel like maybe something is horribly wrong with me and doctors are ignoring it because anxiety is such an easy diagnosis (especially once it’s already in your records). Since being diagnosed with hEDS this yearI suspect it is POTS or something because I have a lot of symptoms and I am currently awaiting referrals so we shall see! [info] hEDS [info] 1571647708 [info] train
thatwaffleskid [info] I'm exactly the same. I'm 27 as well, diagnosed in the 6th grade, which is also when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Even though I have a job and a family I still feel as though im being dragged slowly by a rope through life instead of using that rope to lead my life where I want it to go. I'm also in a constant state of panic that I'm not doing well at my job even though I haven't had many issues there.It's a good thing the stakes are high though. That's what keeps me going and gets me through it. Use that to your advantage. It's ok to be freaked out when things change, but don't let it take over.  [info] None [info] 1467697119 [info] valid
cant-fall-asleep-247 [info] Finally cried to my mom, felt nice I've been having a rough week. Ever since I stopped drinking, I've been feeling incredibly intense emotions, mainly sadness. I'm diagnosed with anxiety (both social and general) and I realized that my drinking was actually used as a crutch. I ended up having an anxiety attack during class this week, left early and cried in my car. I felt so overwhelmed. I have not had an anxiety attack for a while. I felt that I couldn't handle anything. Coming home didn't make me feel better. I woke up this morning feeling so dejected. When my mom started to talk to me about my moving day (I'm moving to my college campus in a couple weeks), I rudely snapped at her. I then started to cry because I just felt so alone and helpless. I finally told her about my struggles and how I stopped drinking (which she was surprisingly proud of). The thing is that my mom and I were never that close. We always have had our differences. I never thought that I would be divulging things about myself to her nor cry to her. It felt really nice to be comforted. [info] 161 days [info] 1576136678 [info] train
LGflower [info] I’ve tried. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood I reached out and spoke to them individually. spoke about wanting to be close visiting often. I would text and try and call but no one would confirm a day or time to meet even for a cup of tea. I am always the first to text any of them and my self esteem is being affected. I feel like I’m trying to be in a clique I don’t fit in with. I’m not surprised mum is being defensive, when I’ve brought up how I have felt in the past I get told I’m being silly, it’s all in my head. I just don’t feel welcome there.  [info] None [info] 1526321337 [info] train
Sausagesanga [info] I didn't realise so many others thought the same things. I was diagnosed with anxiety after I lost my first daughter, and after my second daughter died in September it got really bad! I have the "intrusive thoughts" all the time. Maybe it's not an anxiety disorder I have after all. Maybe it's just a broken heart. Stolen innocence. Seeing life and death differently. It seems so cruel now, so different. Through the eyes of a bereaved mothers :(  [info] None [info] 1389025555 [info] train
hal4019 [info] Bad health anxiety flare up. Try to help reassure me. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year in November. Fought meds and help for 4 months until I finally caved after ending in the ER with a panic attack over a brain tumor. So far, I've survived brain tumors, MS, Heart disease, thyroid cancer, and lymphoma. My latest is bone cancer. I have this pain in my rib cage. Ive had it since last April. Now the doctor has looked at me multiple times and assured me it's nothing serious. But now I'm wondering if I should have had a test done or something. I want to google the stuff so bad but I know that will make it worse. We have said before it could be a muscle strain inside the rib or just anxiety pains. I've seen anxiety cause some crazy stuff, but not this. This pain has been on and off, and I can't pinpoint it. I can't make it happen or anything. It just comes and goes. I started to try and attritubue it to stress (I'm a teacher) since I would normally get it at work. Over the summer, barely had it at all. In fact I thought it was just completely gone until it came back in October.   Please help reassure. Can bone cancer symptoms come and go. This is probably the worst anxiety I have had in about 6 months. [info] None [info] 1483660240 [info] train
cooliorama [info] Yeah I originally got addicted my junior year of high school when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I began self medicating a lot. Now I have medical marijuana for my anxiety! Got it prescribed like 2 weeks ago. Now I've been back in school and soon I'm moving to my own place again, I'm ready for it all.  [info] None [info] 1532712026 [info] train
unfromageluv [info] i'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. got hospital records-suicide.also got hallucinations in my case files [info] None [info] 1446251311 [info] test
Sophie_Amelia_ [info] Wait what about the NHS?Does the fact that I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and given anti-depressants exclude me from their treatment? If so then I guess I might as well not delay and just go private. Who needs money right? [info] MtF | Am I really trans though? [info] 1560081618 [info] train
Smitty89 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I currently take various herbal supplements for it, but is a prescription something I should look into? [info] None [info] 1383775442 [info] test
ducksflytogether_ [info] Has anybody else deleted all of their social media? I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but haven't taken my meds in a year or so. I have my bad days, but cope with it fairly well. A couple weeks ago I had a really bad day, and just didn't want to interact with anyone I knew. I deleted all of my social media (except Reddit), and told myself I would download it again when I'm feeling better. Except I didn't re-download it. I haven't felt the need or even a desire to. These past couple weeks have been so stress free. I've accomplished so much more around the house and in my life.Anyone else who unplugged themselves, do you feel the same way? Care to share your story? [info] None [info] 1503946675 [info] train
superfantasticclub [info] How Do I Talk to My Dad About His Comments Starting this off, I don't hate my father or my parents for that matter. However, something about him as bugged me for a while. He has a tendency to be very judgemental when it comes to my tastes in pretty much anything. This ranges from my tastes in shows, clothes, and probably the biggest one music.The main problem is these comments stick with me for a while and I have a hard time enjoying things because he comments on how stupid they are. I also have a hard time because when i try to enjoy things he doesn't like my mind replays his comments over and over. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I don't know if me replaying these things in my head is normal or not.I want to talk to him about this and figure it out because it's making it hard to enjoy things like music and movies. I don't really know how to go about bringing it up. How should I start a conversation about this? [info] None [info] 1492927411 [info] train
sammij [info] Advice was given to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety: if it is impacting your life or others lives in a significant way, you should seek help. Is he seeing anyone about his mental health? He needs other tools to use when he feels anxious. [info] None [info] 1555314707 [info] train
HarleeeQuin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and acute stress disorder after going through an abuse relationship *(before opiate use even started)* and one of the main reasons I continued use was because my anxiety just disappeared and I could finally function normal again as weird as that might sound?i got to week 2 clean and my anxiety started to get bad again, really bad and that was the reason I relapsed. I couldn’t take it anymore.That’s good that they know and you can be honest and not feeling your hiding anything. I feel terrible for hiding it but I know it’s best this way.Yeah if it wasn’t for the sub and the people who I’ve talked to then I’d definitely be in a way worse place. I think I actually need to make posts or talk to people here when I am going through withdrawals or feeling like my mental health is really bad. I think it give me a higher chance to get through it being able to talk to people who can relate / understand what I’m going through. Edit - I got to 15 days being clean before my anxiety started to get bad again  [info] None [info] 1544659274 [info] train
MommyNeedsATimeOut [info] SSRIs I have been seeing a therapist for the last month and she is recommending that I start a SSRI. I have no previous experience taking any medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD and PTSD. I would also like something to help with my lack of motivation and focus. I am afraid of a medication making me not feel/act like myself or lower my already low libido. Any suggestions on what worked for you and why would be appreciated greatly. Thank you lovely BroMos! [info] None [info] 1502489332 [info] test
albob [info] It was something my psychiatrist told me back when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  A quick google search found this article with a link to the study at the bottom - https://adaa.org/living-with-anxiety/managing-anxiety/exercise-stress-and-anxiety [info] None [info] 1564863195 [info] train
thechikinguy [info] Any solution for severe grinding/clenching beyond mouth guards? I've been aware of my teeth grinding/clenching for about six years now, and have been wearing a mouth guard at night off and on, consistently in the last year as I've noticed my gums are receding. I find myself clenching during the day, and though I try to catch myself, it happens often and subconsciously. Despite using a mouth guard, my gums have still been receding. At this point my teeth feel more sensitive and I'm worried I'm getting near the root/nerve. After tearing up a boil-at-home mouthguard with a six-month warranty in less than three weeks, I decided to make a doctor's appointment.I'm pretty wary of consulting a doctor on this; I mentioned this problem during my last physical, and the doctor only suggested tensing up all my face muscles regularly to relax them. My dentist offered to custom-fit a mouth guard, but it would cost more than $1,000, and I simply do not have that money. Now I have no dental plan, so I had to go to my family doctor.Already from the get-go, I got a bad vibe off the doctor. The nurse weighed me and asked about the problem and suggested a mouth guard. I told her I chewed the last one up, and explained how I've cut down on caffeine, changed pillows, tried to get more sleep, exercise more to try and reduce stress, do yoga weekly, everything. She just said "it looks like you're doing everything right!" laughed, and left.So then the doctor comes in with his laptop, barely looks in my mouth, and tells me I should get a mouth guard."You can get one at a sporting goods store," which seemed very suspect, as I imagine there's a difference between a mouth guard for grinding and a mouth guard for field hockey. When I told him I've been using mouth guards consistently, they're not working my gums are still receding, and I don't want to buy a new one every month for the rest of forever, he just said he'd call a dentist friend and call me the next day.He also asked if I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I haven't, but I'm a very anxious person. I fret about everything. But he just asked if my job was stressful, and I said no, and he dropped the subject.I've heard muscle relaxers are an option, and brought that up, but he gave me a very dubious look. I felt like a chump.So he's supposed to call me today and tell me what brand of mouth guard to buy as though that will solve this. Is there anything I should do? Should I be following this anxiety thing further? I'm super cautious with my insurance and don't know what I'm covered for; once I got charged $100 on top of a copay because I had to take my shirt off for the doctor to look at my bacne. [info] None [info] 1394659504 [info] valid
snowfarts [info] I had the exact same symptoms when I got diagnosed this year. I was honest with my doctor and told her I had tried adderall, and it worked well when I did. My therapist is also in the same office so it helped. I am diagnosed with anxiety as well, and we were all concerned it would worsen my anxiety. I told them that no matter what the outcome was, I didn’t want to try anxiety meds and I’m willing to risk my anxiety being worse. If I know what’s causing it, it’s typically not an issue anyway. My therapist also said it was worth a try because either my anxiety was caused by my ADD, or they were two different things. I’ve been on it for 3 or 4 months now and my life is completely changed for the better. My anxiety was 100% caused by my ADD. I don’t get overwhelmed with all of the shit I have to do, and I’m actually able to do it instead of procrastinate. My doctor keeps me on a low dose, and I no longer get the feeling you experience at first (at first I was sad but then realized I cannot want to feel that ‘high’ feeling). I just feel like a normal person, which is weird because I thought I felt like that before. Except before it felt like I was living life with clouds in my brain and eyes, making me sleepy and unable to care about anything. I also have insomnia and it hasn’t affected it, if it does your dose is too strong. For a while I could NOT sleep and surprise, it was because of my anxiety. My therapist told me I was so worried about my sleep I was making myself unable to do so. Now I just lay down and if I’m laying for a minute, I don’t care. I just lay there. I’ll take melatonin every once in a while.Sorry for this literal essay.. I still have add, its just managed. [info] None [info] 1566853854 [info] train
RedWhiteAndBlueMoney [info] How long does fluoxetine take to take effect? I've been on fluoxetine 10mg for 2 weeks now but I've seen neither side effects or effects at all. I was diagnosed with anxiety brought on by OCD. How long does it usually take to have an effect on my anxiety? I'm thinking that maybe the dose is too low. [info] None [info] 1566538729 [info] train
Fiva1609 [info] This might be long so please ignore any grammatical Errors thx. When I was 9 one day before my then the birthday I got Bell’s palsy. So half of my face became useless it couldn’t move and my eye could not blink half of my mouth would not open and I could not taste of one half of my mouth. One more story when I was twelve in one week my dad got in an accident I could not walk for weeks and needed life altering surgery my grandma got cancer again and my mom found out my brother collage money was gambled away like wtf I also had like 20 panic attacks that week ( I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was like 3 due to the many surgery’s I’ve had and stuff like that I still think that I have my problems like I have sociopathic tendencies ( I used to make up problems to make my mom and dad to make problems like my dad yelled at me and tell my mom even if he did not so my mom would be mad.  But that was when no was younger today my grandma is healthy my brother is better and I love my mom and dad guess how old I am. Am 13 🤫 [info] None [info] 1562726370 [info] train
Ukiyo-Ikigai [info] I quit my job.I worked at an education dept at the time so I had a job where I was looking after a team of 9 senior peoples diaries, booking meetings and organising 40 different courses all at once. I was dubbed as the 'headless chicken' by my department because I was running around everywhere. Obviously I was stressed being the only person doing this for my team. When I asked for support my team especially my manager became vindictive and started micromanaging me (to the point I had to tell them when I was going to the toilet - no joke). It was the straw that broke the camel's back. I quit my job and went to my doctor for some support because I didn't wanna go to work anymore, was crying every day and then some - I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood and went to therapy for a period of time. Eventually I found a part time job that was less stressful and was luckily in a team that was so supportive, they were the best team I've had to date. However, I still deal with anxiety over how I was treated in my previous role but learnt coping techniques from therapy which helps me be calm and put things into perspective. Lesson learned: never will I bend over backwards and stress myself out over work, it's not worth it. [info] None [info] 1569661466 [info] train
homebythefence [info] I haven't had a proper period since I was 12 and I'm now 22. I was diagnosed with anxiety early 2004 and they put me on BC that I've never been told to stop taking. Wasn't until I started getting ovarian pain that they found out I had PCOS when I was 19.  [info] None [info] 1393313833 [info] test
TheSauceSupplier [info] Crippling anxiety on reading section. I need advice... During the reading section of the exam i freeze up and start shaking. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders but I'm scared to apply for extra time because of how colleges may see it. This only happens during the reading section of the exam and it really decreases my english score. I have a 600 English and an 800 math. I only have one month to study since I am senior. I will take any advice [info] 1400 [info] 1571448449 [info] train
Whelpers__ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, But it was just social anxiety. I’ll tell someone this, thank you. [info] None [info] 1563149096 [info] train
matilsal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before it was cool. Come at me. [info] None [info] 1551897485 [info] valid
kariroxygirl [info] I feel the same way and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I still feel out of it and crazy :( idk how much longer I will feel like this. Also I got sent to a physicist  [info] None [info] 1548400505 [info] train
justanizfamouz [info] Constant pressure or tension in my right temple with no pain in that area. Is this normal? I've been diagnosed with anxiety since April and over the last two months I've began to develop physical symptoms such as forehead tension, headaches on my left side, neck tension, and the biggest concern is a pressure/tension feeling in my left temple that doesn't ever seem to go away occasionally briefly or when I go to bed is the only time it stops it is painless but very uncomfortable and triggers health anxiety even though my Dr is led to believe it is tension related to anxiety.My question is does this happen? And if so what are some things to help rid the problem? [info] None [info] 1540241575 [info] valid
littlebits23 [info] Cause of anxiety My husband and I have been married for 10 years. A few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and I know what the cause is...it's himWe work together, live together, sleep together, eat together, shower together and I never have time for myself to just breathe.I tell him I'm taking a bath and lock the door, he is texting me. If I unlock the door he is sitting in the bathroom with me. If I need to go anywhere he is right next to me. If I have headphones in or am reading a book, he wants to o have all of these nonsense conversations.He is constantly seeking reassurance of our relationship because I've asked for some time for me, months ago. I've given up due to him needing constant attention. I'm going to explode and I don't need that to have him further up my ass. I'm at a point where Xanax isn't taken as as needed (once or twice a week) and just becomes part of my daily routine.  Please help. [info] None [info] 1548806070 [info] train
DeathZombi [info] I keep thinking I have brain cancer even though I'm also pretty sure it's anxiety I've been having ice pick headaches as of late. This already got the anxiety going about why it's hurting. I've also had trouble with my memory, though this only started soon after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.The thing that sent me into total panic was when I was pouring milk in a jug into a glass cup. I went to put the milk jug away, but as I was about to open the refrigerator I snapped and realized that I was about to put the glass cup into the fridge, not the milk jug. It's probably because I was just kind of dazed and not paying attention, but now I'm totally convinced I have some sort of brain disease and that I'm slowly dying and doing nothing about it. I'm seeing a doctor in a few days, I just need some comfort so I can wait without worrying about it too much. [info] None [info] 1528424037 [info] test
ako19 [info] I was talking to a friend. He mentioned that he was really nervous a lot of the time, and might have an anxiety disorder. Later I thought to myself, man, it'd be tough to deal with that. I'm glad I don't.A month later, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder [info] None [info] 1534608606 [info] valid
01394927371729391 [info] Anxiety or something else? Age: 19 Sex: Male Height: 5'11 Weight: 85 KG Race: Indian Duration: A few hours (6) Location :Canada, Hi, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I think I had a little panic attack, but I feel my heart beating wired and feel a little weak/lightheaded, this has been going on for about 2 hours, I am 19 and have also done an EKG test last month.I also felt little loss of sensation/ numbness in my feet when I walk and now feel like I am losing control, but my heart beat is not racing so I just want to know if this is a panic attack/Anxiety or not. Thanks in advance, I have been looking into CBT, but I dont know if that will cut it, can anyone chime in? [info] None [info] 1551497954 [info] train
Jessicash [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past so maybe it is something I need to revisit. Thanks!!Also that it one of my favorite quotes. [info] None [info] 1510100906 [info] train
Bunny_Larvae [info] I feel overwhelmed I have had problems with anxiety for years but lately it’s crippling. I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago during my husband’s first tour in Iraq. Which is so absurd he was the one in actual danger but I fell apart. I was afraid to answer the phone, the door and eventually go outside. I got treatment and a puppy. It helped. Over the years I had bouts of anxiety again but never so overwhelming until now.  Three-ish years ago I had a son, he almost died when he was born. He’s everything you could want in a child; loving cheerful, and confident. I feel like my anxiety is going to ruin his life. I’ve started smoking again, I feel so much shame. I need to get him into school but the idea of leaving him with someone else makes me feel like I can’t breathe. We’ve had to move repeatedly over the last several years (multiple continents type moving) for my husbands work; I’ve lost my support system. I’m lonely and isolated and I don’t want that for my son.  I don’t want him to have a mother he’s ashamed of.  I don’t to be burden to my husband and I know I am. I can’t sleep at night, I’m tired and scared all the time lately.I need to do some things that scare me today.  I guess I just need to hear some kind words from people who’ve been there and are getting through it. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1546019891 [info] test
Prostitwat [info] I went through this when I was 11, it turned out to be anxiety related although at the time I didn’t know what I was experiencing was anxiety. It would usually happen at night that I would wake up with bad anxiety or in the midst of a panic attack and go get my parents. I was diagnosed with anxiety soon after. Just a factor to consider.  [info] None [info] 1548946745 [info] train
Freshman50000 [info] I told my boyfriend Last night I finally told my boyfriend that I’m almost positive that I have OCD. I was diagnosed with anxiety and Tourette’s, but I’ve suspected for a while that I really have OCD. After research, reading (the book “because we are bad” by Lily Bailey is amazing) and combing through this subreddit, I’m sure, and looking at next steps. So last night, I finally told him. I told him that when I said I’m anxious, that’s not even the half of it. I tried to explain intrusive thoughts, which is hard because I wanted to get across to him how seriously they affect me, but I didn’t want to scare him- and I didn’t want to make them seem like normal intrusive thoughts that people without OCD have. I talked about how I worry all day that the gate is open and my dog is gone, or that when I don’t finish a conversation with “I love you” I see my parents getting hit by a car, and that I’m nauseous constantly worrying about this stuff and it never goes away. I was so scared, but when I explained it all...he hugged me 😊 He was so surprised, he kept saying “holy shit, no wonder you’re always so tired,” and hugging me and reassuring me that he understood and that he’s glad he finally gets it. We were a bit stoned so I really hope he remembers all of this today because it was an insanely good moment in a time where I haven’t had many 😊 [info] None [info] 1558207032 [info] valid
Younce-Davis [info] Oh gosh! I had that problem with some neighbors a few years ago. The guy would literally beat his wife on the front lawn! Luckily they moved. My neighbor is considered lower middle class— but it is full of retired folk and starter families. It’s not a friendly neighborhood since everyone is moving in and out constantly. I was raised by boomers— the pick yourself up by the bootstraps mentally is still very prevalent in my society. It’s not realistic. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and had to go on meds it shattered my parents world 😭. Luckily they are very understanding. I used to make morbid jokes out of situations. My bf is from the Philippines and over there, people who aren’t optimistic and see the joy in life usually lose hope and don’t make it. It’s a poor country so starvation is widespread. After I stopped making morbid jokes, I became more optimistic. That only happened a few months after meds though. It was a rough transition. It’s good your friends can read you well. Curious, are you a high school or college student? Or working? If you are an adult, that will probably open up more treatment options for you since you won’t need your parents permission to receive it. If you are an adult, that will also give you the possibility of moving out and into a better environment. Trade school, if you do not have the resources for college, can get you some very nice jobs— look at welding— salary of $100,000 USD. Edit: background info on me. Biomedical engineering student at a University. I live in a mixed cultural neighborhood. There are the conservative folk here and the more liberal. My family tends to be more conservative. I am more liberal/ moderate.  [info] None [info] 1554504669 [info] test
rough_lovely [info] I have been using CBD for about a year. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic attacks and major depressive disorder after my husband passed from brain cancer at a very young age. It has worked better for me than all of the prescribed pills combined. It gives me an overall sence of calm and I sleep immensely better, which allows my body to recover.  I am not longer taking my prescriptions and let me say..the fog has lifted and I am overall feeling like I can tackle (most) everyday. The only downfall seems to be the high price of the oil. It runs me about $80/month (1 750mg bottle). It's definitely worth a shot if you can afford it. [info] None [info] 1548279310 [info] valid
starshine33 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety pre-trauma, but I definitely agree that my anxiety has gotten a lot worse since the event. I'll ask my therapist about it, thanks so much :)  [info]  [info] 1552927046 [info] train
Othmaneabf [info] 22M. 63Kg 176cm. Strange heart feeling I feel my heart. It's not a pain but I feel it from time to time. My pulse is normal. I am diagnosed with anxiety.This feeling is amplified when I put my laptop on my chest for hours, and it goes away when I take my Xanax or light up a cigarette (I barely smoke 3-4 cigs a day )Is it an anxiety manifestation or another underlying problem? Last I checked this feeling didn't fit the palpitations description.Thank you in advance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1587578901 [info] test
gretta25 [info] Yay (Questions) I've tried adderall a few times, thoroughly enjoy it (I am too euphoric to work), and am considering getting some coke off the DNM.I am diagnosed with anxiety, and I always worry about my health (often my heart) even though my GP has told me I have a "one in a million" chance to get a heart attack.Basically, what I'm asking is this: does cocaine REALLY put you close to a heart attack level of a heartbeat or is it "not as bad as it seems"? [info] None [info] 1494606656 [info] train
RepressedThot [info] A lot of my childhood I can't remember either. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder also known as dysthymia. I grew up with my father in and out of my life but always in a very toxic way. I've thought I had PTSD but am not sure. I was seeing a therapist for a few months but then moved and haven't gotten insurance back. I remember a lot of verbal abuse and traumatic stuff like spending Christmas visiting my dad in prison but it's hard to think there is worse stuff that is repressed. I think it's messed up how the environment we grow up in can follow us for so long. My and my bf don't want kids ever due to our childhood, we don't think we'd be good parents.  Im sorry what you have gone through I hope you can find ways to cope and improve yourself. [info] None [info] 1556037211 [info] train
katiethephoto [info] Having Bad Trazadone Side Effects I take Lexipro for normal day time anxiety which usually helps me until bed time. So at night I can't sleep for my life because of that darn hamster wheel. I was diagnosed with anxiety induced insomnia and first prescribed Trazadone. But I have a slow metabolism so if I take any amount of Trazadone at 9pm, I won't feel drozy until 3am, then get caught in this fog of grog for the whole day. After telling my doctor, she then gave me samples of Rozerem. After taking it, within 20 minutes I could fall asleep and it didn't leave me groggy. But Rozerem is extremely pricey and I can't afford it. After a few weeks of no sleep medication (money and time problems kept me from getting anything), I went back on Trazadone. Now I have no drozy effect whatsoever and it doesn't help me sleep through the night either. Also when I wake up and through out the day I have horrible mood swings. Usually I'm grouchy person, but with this stuff I'm demonic (boyfriend's words). Also I believe I have gotten hives around the start of re-taking the meds. I have a doctor appointment on Tuesday about this. Has anyone else dealt with a similar issue? Does anyone have advice?TLDR: Prescribed Trazadone for insomnia, now I can't sleep well, have horrible mood swings, and hives. I would like advice. [info] None [info] 1454748959 [info] train
givemecookies456996 [info] Got me braces sooner, had my wisdom teeth removed when the dr said to, Dad to not have drank so much, Mom to have gotten me a decent mattress when my orthopedist said to, took me to a real therapist when I was diagnosed with anxiety, took my animal allergies seriously instead of getting more dogs, offer me the same monetary help in high school and college they offered my other siblings. However I love my parents. So much about my childhood was amazing. I don’t blame them. Being a parent can be fucking tough.  [info] None [info] 1514235793 [info] train
laurandisorder [info] I used to get this so badly as a child - starting very young and it lasted well into adulthood. As an adult I was diagnosed with anxiety, but this was a different sensation. An overwhelming urge to be with my cat (sorry parents), my things (books)’and in my room. It was a physical, gut wrenching pull for the familiar. I could only overcome it through distraction. Boy, did my folks get sick of picking me up early from sleepovers and camps! [info] None [info] 1514373802 [info] train
femalefaceless [info] yeah i feel so tired all the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well and while i try to manage it best i can i do feel tired...psychologically, emotionally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1538146371 [info] train
Alphurna [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and then autism in middle school. I’ve been given a 504 plan for school (a list of accommodations) and multiple therapists for different things over the years. I find that surrounding myself with things that make me feel comfortable is a great way to cope. For example, blankets are a godsend for me. I’m actually pursuing a service dog as well. [info] None [info] 1554258612 [info] train
aquaboyh20 [info] [this is Gus](https://i.imgur.com/vn6SkRI.jpg). He is a plott hound and was a rescue from a pit bull breading and fighting house. They pulled a few of his front teeth. So eating is a challenge and messy. He is the sweetest boy though. My kids climb all over him. Me 1 year old pulls all over his ears and lips. All he does is lick her face and walk away. He typically chooses which one of the older girls he wants to cuddle with at night.He became my ESA dog back in December when we rescued him, as I was diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things. He is about to go to training to be a service dog. He loves all people and he'd rather be with me than be home by himself. He loves to run in the open field behind our home and be a turd and jump the fence and run off for a few minutes, then come back proud of himself.Upon request I can upload more pictures. He's a very serious dog. Rarely smiles lol. Except when he's running off in a field or riding in the van [info] http://www.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/2B4KFFIWZZWC [info] 1550984241 [info] train
tuxedolux [info] If it’s not absolutely something you have to take then you can ask them for other alternatives. I did this when I was diagnosed with anxiety and was immediately prescribed Xanax. However, In my opinion, therapy should be done in place of medication. Therapy gives you the tools to handle what’s causing the problems in your mental state. It can be scary to go that deep into yourself but once you learn to deal with things it gets better. If it’s too scary though there is also group therapy.  [info] 28 F 5’4” SW: 161 CW: 152 GW1: 150 [info] 1552508832 [info] train
NightOwlMordecai [info] I honestly just love this game. I got into D1 right between Crota and HoW, which happened to coincide with when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm a huge space nerd and games like Mass Effect always really chilled me out for some reason so I decided to check out the D1 demo for the 360, and bought it the next day. For some reason this game is like a meditation for me, I'm really able to relax and lose myself in it.  I actually convinced my entire crew (I was working at a Papa Murphy's at the time) to get into it and we would just spend most of our work days talking about Destiny and not getting anything done. I'm from Northern Colorado. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1561617834 [info] test
Elzahex [info] Don't know if these are symptoms of this or not. I've had these "tics" where my jaw, finger tips, joints would feel weird and I have to touch them to relieve them. Or even things I'm not touching, I feel like I have to feel them or do something to get that feeling to stop. These have been present for the majority of my life and my dad has major ocd and anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. Not sure if these feelings are correlated with ocd or not. Just would like some of your guy's thoughts. [info] None [info] 1461098559 [info] test
Trueidentity08 [info] Me? I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. That’s it lmao [info] None [info] 1559883446 [info] train
layer11 [info] How old are you and what country do you reside in?I'd press it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some stuff and my quality of life has increased dramatically. [info] None [info] 1534294395 [info] valid
positive-stuff [info] Good for you for working to get better :) Just a couple months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and it's much better now. If I can do it, you can too. [info] None [info] 1483316628 [info] train
OliveWildly [info] YTA. People are looking at her and making comments about her behavior -- not yours. It's easy to assume that people are judging you when you have anxiety (which it sounds like you have a dose of), but if she's the one creating sound and movement, they're not looking at you.I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago, and I can see where your frustration would come from. Here's something that changed my entire outlook (from my therapist) *"People are inherently selfish."* We approach every situation thinking more about ourselves than about the people around us. So all of that embarrassing stuff? Most people don't even notice it because they're too busy thinking about themselves.She also pointed out that it's **instinct** to look at something/someone when they create movement or noise (e.g. walk into a room) but it doesn't mean anything. We do it because (even tho we've evolved) we are still hardwired to notice changes in our environment and check to see if we're still safe. So when you walk into a room and 20 heads turn to look... or when your GF starts dancing in the grocery store... they're just checking the change in environment. They don't care as much about what she's doing as you do.I'm calling YTA because your anxiety is YOURS to own and deal with. When you push her to alter her behavior to placate your anxiety, you are making HER deal with your anxiety. Recognize that it's yours to learn how to manage. It's okay! There are plenty of us out here still figuring it out. [info] None [info] 1558476318 [info] train
Kafke [info] I don't think I've experienced trauma, but I definitely get it. And I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wasn't aware there was a link. Interesting... [info] My toucan is also trans [info] 1478961937 [info] train
Ghosttownhermit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, that is the thing. I appreciate your advice. Thank you.  [info] None [info] 1544124099 [info] train
AbrahamLure [info] Okay, this makes so much sense. I've been diagnosed with anxiety every doc I've been to, with off the chart scores of anxiety and have never understood why, I never "feel" anxiety and I have an unusually low BPM (45-55)One of my doctors theorised it's because I've spent so long in a highly volatile environment growing up that having constant anxiety in the background has been essential for survival, but boyyyy is it useless when working in an office. [info] None [info] 1565207623 [info] test
CandyceCox [info] I, too, became a "maniacal bitch" and was even diagnosed bi-polar 6 or 7 years into our marriage. I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds when we met....I wonder if I'll be off the bi-polar once he's no longer a part of my life....I was/am/always have been "the problem". If it were not for my fits of rage that are "abusive" and "psychologically damaging" to him and our children, he would be more attracted to me and want to have sex with me....at first I thought he could be right. After all, psychological disorders run in my family on both sides...well, same for him. I did scratch the shit out of his neck that one time and his co-worker and ex commented on it......in response to him breaking my pinkie. But what about when I pushed him?...oh yeah, I was trying to keep him from peeing on me.....the whole in the wall? Wait! That was him! I ducked in time. ....... He trained me to react with rage because I expected physical abuse from him. However, now he's made me look like the narcissist because he will remain calm or finally yell back once I've verbally hit below the belt. I shared all of it with my therapist and she is the one who pointed out that I respond/react to him in this manner as a defense as I autopilot my offense at the hint that a defense is needed. It's just so sick and fucked up. Now I'm "crazy". I'm the "narc" yada yada...this ALL a planned and strategic part of the narc's "grand cycle scheme". Now that I recognize it, he is having to push even harder to elicit a response out of me.....ugh! And more often than I like to admit, I engage but it's getting easier and easier to let it roll off because his mask will be torn off in court. ... You're not a narcissist! He wants you to think you are so he can play the victim. You're not the only one. [info] None [info] 1550496224 [info] train
myfairlady45 [info] Awful Stage Fright I’ve been singing since I was 2 years old and right about the time in high school when I developed anxiety, I also developed stage fright. It’s many years later now and worse. It’s not that I don’t think I’m a decent singer, It’s that every time before a performance, my crippling anxiety comes out of no where and I shake, I feel sick, and my vision gets fuzzy. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I didn’t have much of an issue. What do you guys do to cure this? [info] None [info] 1527454642 [info] train
Kannazhaga [info] I have a little Texas on my wrist and "We're all mad here" on my calf. My Texas, well clearly I'm from Texas. And I think tattoos are an opportunity to outwardly show parts of our personalities that matter to us. Then my quote, I was diagnosed with anxiety in college and for some reason had trouble dealing with it -- I thought I was crazy and stuff. Talking to my mom about it, she said that we're all crazy in some way or another. I realize I should have known that, but it was important to me to remember that, so I put the Alice in Wonderland quote on my calf. And I love both of them and wouldn't change them for the world. [info] None [info] 1532277315 [info] train
Mispict [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1524468204 [info] train
ReturnedAndReported [info] I did this for 20 years. In 4th grade, I would go to bed at 9 and get to sleep around 12:00. My mom wouldn't let me get out of bed, so I would literally lay there for 3 hours, silent, and horrified I wasn't going to get any sleep.Fast forward to my 30's and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take a pill once a day and I can sleep like a baby. Oh, and I take ambien on Sunday nights so I can adjust my sleep schedule from late weekends nights to early mornings in the week. [info] None [info] 1483205606 [info] test
hnsnghyk [info] Recently I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder after resigning from work. Nag-decide ako na mag-stay na lang muna sa bahay hanggang December. Pag nag-apply ako ng trabaho sa January, ano bang pwedeng isagot kapag tinanong ako na bakit mahaba ang bakasyon ko? My psychiatrist said I don't have to disclose my mental health condition kase posible akong ma-reject ng ina-applyan ko. [info] panic! at the office [info] 1570634053 [info] valid
holmesrjk [info] What modifications should I make with Armodafinil? I have been using armodafinil 150mg only on the days where I need some extra boost. Perhaps mostly 3 - 4 times  a month. However I have found that now I feel more sleepy or lack of concentration on armodafinil. Here's a little history I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder my signs and symptoms are as follows : 1.) Cold extremities 2.) Leg movements while asleep.3.) Daytime sleepiness ( it reduces down by evening and I gain my full cognition after an intense workout) 4.) Palpitations 5.) I'm unable to complete studying for an upcoming exam and I happen to procrastinate a lot ( feeling lack of motivation and sleepy even on doing things I enjoy) 6.)Extreme stiffness in my body particularly my back. Medications I am on currently : Flouxetine drops 0.6ml and Atomoxetine 18mg per day since 2 months. Magnesium glycinate 450 mg, Vitamin D3 sachets every week 6000IU. B12 is in normal range. Omega 3's 1250mg EPA. Ahswagandha 250mg and L theanine 200 mg a day. I drink 2 cups of coffee and I do'nt smoke or drink. My diet is extremely clean,however not OCD over food do indulge with some cheat meals here and there. However I feel lacking confidence studying for my exam and clueless and feel very stagnant. Question : What modifications should I be doing? Lowering and adding daily dosages of armodafinil ? Lifestyle particular changes? Dietary inclusion ? Please Help&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1543902533 [info] train
DrJonathanCrow [info] I have to stop listening to metal for awhile. A couple months ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and recently I figured out that when I'm under high stress, metal is a trigger [info] None [info] 1487849899 [info] valid
SurturOfMuspelheim [info] Man, I get angry so easily.  I used to just be prone to it, went to counseling for it as a kid.  Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety... it's even worse.  I never take it out on others, I mostly just wanna beat the shit out of soft objects and scream, maybe throw something (like a plastic water bottle) but never anything more.  My moms BF used to literally punch shit, break shit and throw stuff at my mom when he was mad, so that made me control mine a lot better. [info] None [info] 1509171800 [info] train
megangigilyn [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety around five or so and have been on it or a similar antidepressant since.What is atopy? Is there treatment? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1422478722 [info] train
zangerberg [info] Rolling after being diagnosed with anxiety? hey everyone!Dumb post probably, but I maybe want some input or advice! :)So I've rolled plenty of times, the last time being end of September. Shortly after that, and after a bunch of panic attacks that I thought at the time were heart attacks, I was diagnosed with anxiety (yay). I was offered meds by my doctor but declined because I have a phobia of getting addicted, but that's another story, so i'm not taking anything for it. At the end of this month i'll be going to an nye function where i plan to roll, but ever since my diagnosis(lol) i'm terrified that when I take some, I'm going to flip out and send myself into a panic attack, which i fear will only be exacerbated by the mdma, which is obviously not wanted at all. I guess my question is are there any tips you guys have that could possibly help if this does happen, or should I just not roll at all? I've never had any problems with anxiety while rolling before, but I guess now knowing i have it, and how horrible of a feeling it is, it's gonna be on my mind after taking and on the come up.Thanks :))) [info] None [info] 1576236526
Thealtruisticpoet [info] Pisces sun, Leo moon, Sag rising.I can cross my legs in a very difficult way that others can’t, and my feet don’t have any arches. i am pretty sure I’ll develop some kind of arthritis when I’m older. I think this is in due to my Pisces sun since Pisces rule the feet.I haven’t really felt anything going wrong in the aspect of body parts associated with Sagittarius. Leo rules over the heart and spine system... I have been diagnosed with anxiety and i tend to feel emotional pain as a physical pain. I’m anemic, so i guess my heart isn’t getting as much oxygen. My posture could definitely use some work. [info] Pisces Sun, Leo Moon, Sag Ascendent [info] 1564839877 [info] train
itaraki [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder pero true to my illness... naiilang ako humingi ng recommendation from my psych for a pwd card.. pano to ?  [info] None [info] 1546172362 [info] test
t4mmi [info] It’s different for everyone, and can manifest differently for individuals at different times so I can only tell you how I experience it. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I am a rational person and I know my “concerns” are nonsense but something in the back of my mind just overrides all sense. I fret about everything and overanalyse situations thinking of every possible thing that might go wrong. “But what if...” is my brain’s absolute favourite. I catastrophise. Minor things feel much worse than they are. This all causes me to take extreme and irrational precautions against unrealistic threats as well as to avoid ...  a lot.As far as panic attacks... For me, sometimes I feel like I need to hide (at times I literally have) for no good reason or escape. Sometimes I am paralysed with it and just freeze. I cry. Sometimes I have difficulty breathing, my heart races, I have excruciating pain in different parts of my body (usually my neck), pressure in my head, sometimes dizziness. Basically all the things you might imagine being an appropriate reaction to immediate extreme danger with either minimal or no stimulus to justify it. See a therapist, it helps. ETA see a therapist sooner rather than later, I know the money and time is an issue but it is really, really important. I wish I had addressed my anxiety sooner, not doing so led me to habits and thought patterns that made it much worse.  [info] None [info] 1543285006
ODB247 [info] Female. The doc was male. It’s pretty typical for me to be diagnosed as having anxiety first and then I have to convince the doctor to test me for things. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turned out to be cardiac issues -occasional arrhythmias. Same diagnosis when I lost my period for 9 months and then had bleeding for 6 months straight. That turned out to be a polyp. Same when I had insane dizziness for a few years. That one was actually a Chiari malformation. I don’t make up symptoms and I don’t present as panicking or looking for medication. I just want to know what is going on. I’m not sure if my symptoms are ignored because I’m female, because I look healthy, or maybe because the doctors are all just overworked snd pressed for time. It’s really frustrating. I rarely go to the doctor for anything because it sucks to be dismissed and told I’m making it up when I know something is wrong.  [info] None [info] 1536801216 [info] train
srqnewbie [info] Agree!  My only documentation for my anxiety was the doctor visit recaps for the past 5 years (they pulled it up for me at the doc office, no appointment necessary) that basically just state your vitals and any meds you're on.  Nothing I gave DocMJ stated WHY or WHEN I was diagnosed with anxiety, just that my doc was continuing the anxiety med prescription I've been on forever.  I saw Dr. Glider at DocMJ in Bradenton and was in and out in 2 hot seconds.  Good luck and I agree that their refund policy is the only way to go on the off chance that you don't get approved. [info] None [info] 1568043503 [info] train
pesh527 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. So I'm not using the term loosely... I'm using it to describe what actually happened to me. Where did you get the idea that I don't actually have anxiety?Also, it's my employer's responsibility to protect me from sexual harassment. I shouldn't have to do something I'm uncomfortable with, and I don't have the authority to ban this customer from the store. [info] None [info] 1459569596 [info] valid
SlugHeart [info] Wow this is eerie, I'm going through pretty much the exact same thing. Although I've been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder in the past and am currently trying to figure out if what I'm actually going through is more neurological/medical or if it's just my mental illness going out of wack. My Deja Vu/Derealisation just won't stop on some days though, it's been on/off for the better part of this year. Today is one of my "bad days". :( I recently had a CAT Scan, which came back normal, I still need to schedule an EEG. Just wanted to say you're not alone in these symptoms, hopefully we can both find some answers.  [info] Neurontin 200mg/day [info] 1407944026 [info] train
DavidSmithies [info] Does anyone else not quite believe its anxiety? So, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Specifically health anxiety. I've had it for 21 years now, since I was 15.It changes over time. I've gone from being scared of being sick in front of people, to thinking I had bowel cancer to heart attacks, to obviously, now Covid and specifically having breathing problems. I know I'm a naturally anxious person, and always think I'm ill.But there's an odd thing I struggle with. Like I said, I know I'm a naturally anxious person but I have a hard time accepting that all my problems are down to anxiety.I don't get panic attacks. I don't hyperventilate. I'm quite a confident person at work. I can give speeches. I'm not scared of large groups. I don't shake, go pale or faint. I don't have OCD, or come across as a worrier, to other people.I guess I'm not a stereotypical anxiety sufferer.My symptoms are also subtle, and they change daily. One day I could have chest tightness, the next I'll have sweats and shivers. I don't have a known trigger. It can literally come out of nowhere, for no apparent reason.It makes me think that the symptoms must be because of a genuine physical reason. The doctors have checked me and can't find anything.I guess, in summary, my biggest struggle is - how can this be anxiety when I get random symptoms at times of low anxiety!!Does anyone else have trouble identifying a trigger, or have problems fully accepting it is anxiety? [info] None [info] 1586466574 [info] train
kratos0530 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't realise this was related but now it's obvious to me. [info] None [info] 1567227506 [info] train
GORGATRON2012 [info] It could be. But if you constantly feel that everything is way too much to deal with, all the time, and that you never get a break... you may want to take some time and talk to a psychologist. I felt that way in the middle of $8K of debt, preparing to move out, working full time and driving to see my GF 30 miles away... until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. I'm on medication and currently seeking other treatment. My problems haven't gone away, but they've become a *billion* times easier to deal with. not saying it's 100% the solution for you, but just wanted to retell my experience. Good luck, fellow redditor [info] None [info] 1463749183 [info] test
ImThatMelanin [info] My mother died last year because of a disease called sickle cell and a medicine allergy reaction and I also have a disease called sickle Cell and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I get bullied at school and I was molested by my uncle at age 7. yes I'm a teenager but my problems are far from crying for attention this sub is for support people who don't have it at home but you're here bullying people who are probably already being bullied🖕🏾 [info] None [info] 1513575258 [info] train
futuregovworker [info] You can easily ask for it though. When I was having anxiety issues I just asked for Xanax. Got one prescription, didn’t like it. So I never got it again. I have never seen a commercial either, but if you ask for a specific prescription, it’s actually not hard to get. Especially if a parent was prescribed  to it first. I said my mom got this for this issue. I want it as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd but still, I don’t think I should be able to ask for specific drugs from a doctor [info] None [info] 1542631201 [info] train
TheRealMarkkkkk [info] Tell me about it. I'm told that I'm not ADHD and that I shouldn't need to go for a diagnosis because I concentrated during a assessment (IQ test and career guidance) and I do well in school and despite the fact I have no knowledge of time, inability to start basic tasks (showering and studying), terrible short term memory (compared to all other parts of the test), a habit of drifting off and losing focus (can't even get told where my dad is parked without losing interest and drifting off), no organization skills and constantly misplacing stuff and losing them. I forgot the rest thinking about the grammar of my previous point. Like they all just say 'You're brain thinks too much' and I was diagnosed with anxiety (which is an ADHD symptom). I don't want to take OPs thread I'm just kind of annoyed.  [info] None [info] 1473183337 [info] train
MoistTowlette19 [info] Looking for a sample of Jack Herer in San Diego/SoCal I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. I have exhausted all my options. Various forms of therapy, drugs, hypnosis, exercise and diet, vitamins. I don't smoke weed and haven't in about 10 years, but I would like to try it. I hear the Jack Herer strain is amazing for PTSD and anxiety. I just want to try it and see if it works for me. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1435527046 [info] valid
HellaUwU [info] Heart palpitations after exercising on 0 calorie intake for 2 days? Hi there, 19F, 100kg, non smoker, non drinker, only medications I take are inhalers for asthma.Hi there, I've eaten absolutely nothing for the past 2 days, I've only drank fizzy flavoured water. After doing some very mild exercise (40 squats and 30 sit ups) I started to get really bad heart palpitations, it lasted for about 3 minutes and then calmed down. I have had palpitations before as I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Is me being overweight having too much strain on my heart? Will this go away when I lose weight? Should I just power through the palpitations? Should I wait until the palpitations pass then carry on? Do I need to stop altogether?Just to be clear, I am aware that eating nothing for days at a time isnt great, but I am currently in a position where I can't eat. Any help is greatly appreciated :) [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1586078478 [info] train
BlackOmegaPsi [info] Found myself in a career trap I landed myself in a really shitty spot concerning my career, so this is going to be long post.&amp;#x200B;I’ve had a successful journalism/PR career of over 10 years. Started as a journalist, then an editor, then transferred to working as a press relations officer in a large IT company, where I’ve worked for almost 5 years. I was in charge of all press-related communications, did some branding work, a lot of copywriting. I had a great boss, and was the public figure of my company. We had free gym, the commuting was nice, and I had friend there.The only downsides - no room for promotion, and the pay could’ve been better. I’ve a small credit, but it still entails monthly payments. In November, I was approached by another IT company with an offer of almost 2 times my salary at the last place and the position of a PR Director. I was to manage all of the company’s PR as a lead. This other company belongs to a much more prestigious holding than my last one, I was promised interesting press and brand strategy projects, so, with a heavy heart, I took the offer.See, my mother is battling a serious illness, and even though me and my family (father and mother) are financially independent, I figured it’d be better if I had additional security just in case. Well, the job turned nothing like was promised. I’m not a lead - there’s no PR team, and the tasks are on a level, if not lower, as with on my previous place. I’ve risen the question of the team, and I was met with a resounding “no, we don’t have the capacity”. The worst part, is that this company’s PR slant is in a whole other direction - instead of press/branding, the company is focused on events and HR-related communications. I’m forced to do the full-spectrum work of a whole PR AND event-management department. I have to do a shitload of buying and coordinating purchases, something that was below my position and pay-grade at the other job.Ergo, there’s an overwhelming amount of entry-level, menial stuff, instead of the promised lead and creativity. My boss is chaotic, heaping an inordinate amount of tasks, forgetting to set deadlines for half of them, then demands accountability.The cherry on top? In 2011 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, was successfully medicated. The next bout of the anxiety happened in 2015, that too, was successfully dealt with. I feel like the illness is returning - the combination of a lot of stress, surgery in late 2018, my mother’s problems, house renovations, etc, coming to all of this.Now, I feel horrible. I hate not only this new job and feel like it’s a mistake (I cry every day before and after work), I hate my career prospects and the whole profession as a whole. The mere thought of doing what I do makes me physically sick (I even had full-blown nausea and vomit over it). Even thinking that I somehow change and apply to a new, but similar job, gives me the same awful response. I dread every day, and what’s worse, I’m saddled with a huge amount of guilt:\- my parents were very happy with my new job. I’ve tried to talk to them about my feelings, and well, it amounted to “suck it up, everyone has to deal with not liking their job. What can you do other than PR for a respectable pay and your credit obligations? Nothing”.\- being unhappy about my career makes my sick mother unhappy as well, and I don’t want to contribute to any possible negativity my situation brings to here health.In 1 month my probation ends, and I almost want to fail. Sure it could hurt my reputation on the market, but thing is, I don’t want to do this anymore. I feel utterly trapped. [info] None [info] 1579499762 [info] train
tsar73 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; depressive disorder as a direct result of my migraines. It’s definitely a thing. Was on antidepressants for about 18 months, I guess they kinda helped but they sucked the life out of me all the same. I weaned off them about a year ago and picked up exercise. It’s definitely improved my morale in general but do understand that there is no universal solution to this problem, but I would think being healthier in general would help for sure. Take care! [info] None [info] 1505180456 [info] train
funessen [info] Disclaimer: I'm really really tired, and English isn't my native language, so I appologize for my poor spelling and grammar, but I'm too tired to think clearly, and to read this through and check for errors. I'm sorry :)When I was diagnosed with anxiety and social-anxiety more than 10 years ago, the first shrink I spoke to said something, that at the time wasn't something I liked hearing, but turned out to be true. What he said was "You'll never be cured, but you'll learn to live with it." At the time, I took this as "Im going to feel like this forever, and how can I live my life like that?".But "you'll earn to live with it", didn't mean that I would never get better, and just adapt to feeling like I did. I ment that you learn to accept it, and stop trying to fight it like a disease.Eventually, I learned to ignore my anxiety almost completely. When I was diagnosed I was afraid of riding the bus, or any other public transportation, I didn't speak up during classes, or any social gatherings if there was just one person there I didnt know, I feared calling people on the phone, even my good friends, and the list goes on.At some point along the way, I decided that my anxiety could go f&amp;"% itself. I learned to tell myself that these things weren't scary, and I could convince my brain of this after a while, but my body to this day, still reacts sometimes, by shivering when speaking to people I dont know, or my heart races if I do something I once were scared of. But now I do things, and instead of being scared of doing so, I kinda look forward to doing them, to be able to give my anxiety the middlefinger over and over again, and show it that I'm in charge, and making my body shake, or giving me nousia, isn't enough to let the anxiety win. I even manged to convert the feeling I got when my anxiety starts kicking in, to a "positive" feeling. I kinda feels like an adrenaline rush, so when I get I, I just play pretend that I just got a free trip on a rollercoaster, and I didnt even have to pay for it, or go to the themepark to get it.When you get to a point where you can actually do some of the things you're scared of doing, even tiny things, the feeling afterwards is amazing. You feel proud, even though you think it's silly to feel proud of things like taking the bus, or other "normal" things. But allow yourself to be proud of every little thing, and it will help you in the long run.I'm still not cured, but like my shrink told me, I learned to live with it, so it rarely bothers me at all. I can do all the things I didn't use to, like using public transportation, making phonecalls to anyone, be it friends or the buscompany to file a complaint, you name it.2 years ago I decided to give my social anxiety the definitive f&amp;#-finger. I started researching, studying and preparing, and a year later, which now is about a year ago, I went to an open mic in the capital of my country, and preformed stand-up for 5 minutes, in a room with 70+ people (which went well btw), and I felt on top of the world. Now I don't feel theres anything I can't do, cause I can't think of anything more scary, than stading infront of so many people, and trying to be funny, and I already did that. So when I get nervous, I just think of that, and suddenly, nothing seems that scary anymore :) [info] None [info] 1433630346 [info] test
Shraamper [info] Oh thank you! I work on philosophy quite a bit. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I philosophy my way out of it. [info] None [info] 1562597327 [info] train
Ballistic87 [info] It's pretty much on my record so any doctor I go to will see that I've been diagnosed with anxiety. But it's really wierd and affecting my day, for some reason it's worse when I keep a regular sleep scedule.  [info] None [info] 1478028210 [info] test
EllaCOfficial [info] The first step in losing weight is accepting that it is *your* fault. It was hard for me to do. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made it very hard for me to find my fault in how I got so big. I blamed my anxiety, I blamed the abusive relationship, I blamed everyone but myself, and it really was my fault. I over ate, my anxiety did not make me, it was something I chose to do. [info] F22 | 5'3" | SW: 174.0 CW: 119.9 GW: 109.0/sexy af 💥 [info] 1489275300 [info] train
coverwatch [info] What you describe are panic attack symptoms. I am talking about anxiety symptoms. I've never had a panic attack in my life but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder without any heart symptoms. [info] None [info] 1554289305 [info] valid
Vegan2321 [info] Anxiety and women’s period I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder I get panic attacks and I know this is not an anxiety forum I believe my periods really make it worse, the first day of my period I feel like I’m going to die, I feel like my vagina and lower back are going to fall off and I feel like im fainting the first day does anyone who does struggle with anxiety notice it’s during their period [info] None [info] 1565387859 [info] train
Jperez06 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. And if I tell them, I have a feeling theyle say its cuz i dont do anything and play video.games all day. [info] None [info] 1564282934 [info] test
kawaiisailorbabe [info] Thank for your advice, the problem is that I know I’m safe and that nothing can go wrong if I don’t let it, it’s just when that time comes my brain just automatically goes in to panic mode and I can’t get out of it. Maybe it’s because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd so makes it harder for me to focus positively? Just a hard thing for me to get there I guess, pretty frustrating  [info] None [info] 1523213061 [info] valid
phoenixink [info] On the other side of the coin, being pregnant and struggling to give up that last one or half cigarette a day is fucking hard. I had anxiety in the first place, add in no support and no way to calm myself down, yeah I'd take part of an organic cigarette over me wailing locked in the bathroom for an hour. Next go-around though, now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety ill seek out a different alternative. But yeah until you've been in that position it's really hard to speak for everyone else.Edit: in response to the whole organic cigarette bit...this was my reply: &gt;"Yeah, it's still a cigarette. I am not nor was I under the delusion that because it was organic that it was somehow totally fine. But yeah, if I'm gonna smoke tobacco, I'm gonna make sure it's of the highest quality I can find." [info] None [info] 1431539785 [info] valid
fl33twoodmacs3xpants [info] I've had many if these tendencies my entire life and never even thought about it. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety at 28 and realized how weird it was. [info] None [info] 1570112834 [info] valid
efogs11 [info] Vent/Question about maintaining and navigating relationships Hi friends. I (23F) am struggling with maintaining meaningful relationships in my life and I am wondering if anyone else in this community can relate and/or help me gain some perspective. **Brief background**: I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD about 4 years ago. I feel very fortunate that I am able to say that with the help of meds and the tools I've learned through therapy, I have found what works for me to function comfortably for the most part. *Here is where I am struggling* \- I feel like I get so hyper focused on a new person in my life whether that be a new friend or someone I've gone on a few dates with and am interested in romantically.  I have come such a long way from the anxious, terrified, self conscious, little girl that I once was - the little girl who hated herself so much that she truly was a bigger bully to herself than anyone else ever could have been. Thanks to many many years of therapy and listening to Lizzo on repeat (*Soulmate* = a banger), I have grown to love myself and am constantly reminding myself to be nice to me. I think some of the residual affects of this is very evident in my struggle to form meaningful relationships with people. If someone doesn't respond to a text I send, for example, there's this persistent and very loud voice in my head that loves to poke me relentlessly and freak out, saying things like "shit. fuck. What did you do wrong you idiot??? obviously its your fault that they aren't responding. They hate you for sure. You always ruin these things" - you get the idea. *For the record, I'm not actually hearing voices or whatever - sometimes the best way I can describe my ADHD brain is by giving it a character who is trying to have a conversation with me. This seems to help neurotypicals understand how I'm feeling.* &amp;#x200B;**Here's my question: How do I navigate the early stages of a relationship with a person I really like?**I feel like I go all in way too fast when I am seeing someone new. I really value feeling comfortable to totally be myself with a person that I am spending my time with - I want to jump to the "old and married for 50+ years" stage of a relationship with people I legit just met. Do other people with ADHD/anxiety feel this sort of dilemma in relationships? **TLDR**: I feel like I freak out and rush relationships because I am so scared that the other person is going to become uninterested. How do people navigate the early stages of a relationship with an ADHD brain?? [info] None [info] 1563912747 [info] test
iYNS_55 [info] I act non-anxious, confident and "the tough meat", even though I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1565182607 [info] train
Mephistophellatio [info] Man, I can relate to this so well.  I'm at the very beginning steps of trying to build a reputation for myself in the art community.  As I eventually would like to be able to support myself with artwork.  No plans for anything extravagant, just want to pay the bills with it.  I'd like to think that having three bachelors degrees in various fine-art related subjects shows that I'm not a slacker, and that I'm both talented enough and capable enough to use my art to achieve something.  Even if that's just being able to pay my bills with it.The issue is that I have a full time job now.  And I love it.  Been with the company for almost three years, wonderful benefits, love the people I work with.  But it's like 50-60 hours of my week most of the time, accounting for commute and everything.  And the job itself is really fun, but I've found that I think it's fun because it uses the same...energy? that I use when I'm being creative.  But I don't get the same reward/satisfaction mentally from working as I do from finishing a piece.  So when I get home each night, or on a rare day off, I'm just mentally exhausted, and given that I average 6-8 miles of movement every day also pretty tired physically.  So there's so much desire to work on something productive.  To draw or paint or render something.  I want to do it so badly.  But when the time comes, I just feel like my brain is recharging from work and I have zero motivation or inspiration to complete anything useful.  So I do spend the sparse free time I have getting high and watching Netflix or playing video games.  It's frustrating.  Because ostensibly the answer is "Just stop doing what you're doing and do the other thing" but it isn't that simple.I don't know, maybe it's because I've been diagnosed with anxiety and depressive disorders so my wiring just isn't up to spec or something.  But even with medications, I haven't noticed much of a difference in how exhausted I am after work, or how much spare creative energy I have.And I would love to even just take fewer hours at work and have the spare time to work on personal stuff.  But I can barely make ends meet as is, so making less money and losing part of my benefits isn't an option, at least not until I'm making enough money from art to supplement the lost hours.  But you have to build that kind of clout.  And since for much of the past three years I've been producing a whopping 0 pieces a month, I'm obviously not going anywhere with that just yet.So I feel like it's a weird catch-22.  Like I can either lose the money for a while and not be able to pay my bills until I start making more money on my own.  Or I can give up on the dream that I've had since I was 8 and take a more lucrative, but entirely inflexible, position at my current employer.I don't know.  I'm sure that a comment on a 5 hour old r/quotesporn isn't the best place for me to vent about this, but whatever, it just struck me.If you've read this much, [here's a treat for you](https://www.instagram.com/snoopybabe/?hl=en) [info] None [info] 1471809696 [info] valid
floodimoo123 [info] I developed early and when I was 12, I had 18-20 year old guys screaming and yelling at me every time I was out. It wasn't funny then and it's even less funny now. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since then with loud and/or sudden noises as my trigger. Rude guys acting like animals isn't funny, has never been funny, and will never be funny. I feel you, OP. These people need to learn how to act like decent human beings. [info] None [info] 1405976252 [info] train
hellohealthyliving_ [info] I've officially been un-diagnosed with binge eating disorder. My therapist told me my eating habits no longer qualify me as a binge eater and that I now fall into a "chronic overeater" category due to anxiety. Instead of working on improving my binges (which aren't binges anymore!), we're working on ways to better manage my anxiety so that the overeating happens less frequently (about once a week right now). I broke down in tears in her office yesterday, it just felt so liberating to officially be "cleared" from being a binge eater. Her and I agree, the switch to Keto played a huge part in the whole thing because I am no longer eating the foods that would have originally triggered me to binge.I thought this was something I would have to deal with for the rest of my life, but I feel as if I'm finally free of my emotional tie to food. (Edit: I worded this poorly. What I meant was having someone tell me that my eating habits no longer qualified me as someone who suffered from binge eating disorder made me feel free from the Black Cloud that is BED and has been hovering over my head for quite some time. I would feel guilty every time I took an extra spoonful of peanut butter out of the jar and ate it and every time I had a piece of candy because the BED that had consumed my life for so long told me that if I ate that stuff, it was bad and I was bad. My therapist broke down my last several “binges” and what I ate and she said to me “Just because you eat more than you should sometimes doesn’t qualify you as a binge eater anymore.” So to me, that is emotional freedom not from the food, but from the BED.)***EDIT: For those of you asking, [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/keto/comments/86smg6/ive_officially_been_undiagnosed_with_binge_eating/dw7w6zt/) is the eating habits I was dealing with that originally got me my BED diagnosis. My most recent overeating sessions have stayed well under 4,000 calories at their worst (but that is absolute worst, usually now it's like eating a total of 2,000 calories in a day). No, I'm not diagnosed with "overeating while stressed" I'm diagnosed with anxiety right now and we are hoping to resolve it without any medication. Everyone copes with anxiety different. Some people don't sleep, some have panic attacks, some physically harm themselves, I overeat and by treating my anxiety and finding ways for me to cope with it, it should help reduce the amount of overeating that I do.I also noticed a lot of people writing and saying that it's something that they're struggling with as well, I'd just like to put out there that my therapist gave me [this](https://www.barnesandnoble.com/p/the-dialectical-behavior-therapy-skills-workbook-matthew-mckay/1008150072/2679449628496?st=PLA&amp;sid=BNB_DRS_New+Marketplace+Shopping+Textbooks_00000000&amp;2sid=Google_&amp;sourceId=PLGoP164997&amp;gclid=CjwKCAjw7tfVBRB0EiwAiSYGM6R-ME0VJ6Cd3vdgcVjroPeAmVXp6uA_joAfbsecLtRXqA8s5KIv3xoCi18QAvD_BwE) book and we have been working through it and talking about different coping mechanisms together to help me to regulate and better handle the overwhelming emotions I deal with when anxiety strikes that is not overeating. [info] F23 | 5'3" | HW: 174 SW: 127.8 CW: 125.1 | SD: 03.07.18 [info] 1521893264 [info] train
Hansungani [info] Depends on your definition.I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social skills disorders.Now that I've moved to a new town, therefore a new mental health agency's catchment area, I'm still needing to take a 5-hour long battery of tests to determine some new diagnoses. [info] None [info] 1469324926 [info] train
ElenyaRevons [info] I’m always sick and I don’t know why. I am 22F. I am constantly getting sick. Like, if there’s a bug going around, I get it. If I get sick or even get allergies, I get a sinus infection. It’s affecting my relationships, my job (obviously), and I’m just really tired of being “that girl.” I eat pretty healthy, try to avoid sugar, I don’t do drugs or smoke, I don’t go to the gym but I’m pretty active in general, I’m a healthy weight (5,4”, 130lbs) I drink a lot of water. I take vitamin d, iron, and Zoloft. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD.I’ve been to an allergist since I was very little (born early, asthma, mild allergies) and he just put me on Flonase to see if the sinus infections would stop. I had my adenoids removed when I was four because I was always sick, and until later in high school it wasn’t this bad. Anyway, I’m just really tired of this. I know I’m on thin ice with my boss because I’m frequently sick with fevers and symptoms that render me unable to work. Any advice or thoughts? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1583377759 [info] train
The-Bunny [info] Like everyone else has said, it is possible and you are worthy of being loved. You aren't ruining his life and he is with you for a reason. I have been with my boyfriend for four years and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, I believe my boyfriend has anxiety as well but he hasn't been formerly diagnosed. We recently had a heart to heart and we both discovered that we have the same worry of being bad for each other- I actually giggled a little when he told me cause it was kind of funny we both had the same worry and could have talked it out and gotten support from each other. Communication, communication, communication. This is the key to making it work. Also, I learned it kind of helps me to joke about it in a way. For example, there are times when I realize I get irritated for no reason and make a big deal out of nothing cause of my anxiety but he realizes he handled the situation wrong and let it spiral into something worse. and after we make up, the fights become a weird inside joke between the two of us that is kind of like play fighting to make fun of ourselves. Talk to your significant other, I guarantee you aren't ruining but enhancingEdit: also know you aren't alone. Sometimes my anxieties get so bad I contemplate breaking up with my boyfriend to relieve him the trouble of being with me. However, once the anxiety passes I remind myself if I was truly a terrible person than he wouldn't be with me. Just keep reminding yourself it is your anxiety [info] None [info] 1435264841 [info] train
amie0401 [info] Did I have a panic attack? So basically, I am currently in my last year of high school and completing my trial exams. I was sitting in one of my exams and reading over the essay question so that I could plan it out and begin writing, when suddenly my heart started beating extremely fast, I began to sweat, felt light-headed, dry throat, restless and sick in my stomach. I had to sit still for about 5 minutes in order to stead my breathing, regain my composure and continue the exam. The restlessness and dry throat might've just been from my ADD meds, and I assumed the other symptoms were also because of them. Looking back to it I'm wondering if I could've potentially been having a panic attack as I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. However, I didn't have any feelings of 'choking' or feeling like I was 'going to die' as I've heard are usually symptoms of panic attacks, so I was wondering if anyone with experience in panic attacks could tell me if I had one or if it was just regular exam stress? Are there typically varying levels of the severity of panic attacks? Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1565511482 [info] train
calmajuh [info] Hallucinations and crazy heart-rate - am I dying or is it just anxiety? Female, 27 y/o, 158cm/70kg - English teacher, crazy routine yadda yaddaSo, for the past couple of years I've had some really freaky symptoms. I wake up in the middle of the night a couple of times a week with my heart pounding like crazy and sometimes I see shit (random shit floating in the air in front of my wide open eyes) and it freaks me out. I'm doing some heart exams (got the electrocardiogram done and it's all fine and am waiting for my echocardiogram to be ready for pickup). I have been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes take medication to help me reign it in when it  all gets too much (rivotril, my bff) but I try not to make it a habit because every time I've been on meds the side effects would kick my ass... These symptoms happen kind of randomly though but no doctor seems to find them particularly worrying. Should I not be worried, then? [info]  [info] 1520907477 [info] test
gazork_chumble_spuzz [info] That's the spirit! When I was diagnosed with anxiety and was talking it all over with my doctor, he told me that it was going to be hard to deal with it and it would take a lot of time, but that we have to *fight*. That really stuck with me. It is a fight. [info] None [info] 1423062126 [info] train
Oniguri [info] What? It's not subjective, I have cysts scans from before my diet and a year after and the cysts on my ovaries are literally gone. It's insulin related so being ketogenic stops the progression, but carnivore put it into remission. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a practitioner, I'm not self-diagnosed, I know what it felt like and the fact you're telling me 'it's denial' shows a significant lack of empathy and bias on your side.Why are you so against people getting better? Who cares how it's done, lets just acknowledge something positive is happening and try and understand the mechanism. Maybe I'll die of CVD in 20 years, who knows? But at the moment I feel better than I ever have in my life and my mental clarity is something I thought I'd never achieve.Science is about seeking truth not your predisposed dogmas.  Also, what you don't seem to understand, I didn't do this diet first. This was literally my LAST course of action after trying every single diet that was supposed to improve symptoms, none of them helped. I didn't wake up one day and decide to eat lamb fat and rare liver lol, it was slow progression and following the things that made me feel good and lessened my symptoms. Digestion being the most impactful. [info] None [info] 1561388123 [info] train
666bich [info] Hey, this is long... Just to warn. But if you don't want to read the whole things... Shut gets better but you have to let it get better and work at it to make it better. 'It' being whatever it is that's tying you down. So, first of [TRIGGER WARNING] this involves my sexual abuse as a child and how it affected and still affects my life.I was a happy kid. I wasn't perfect, my family weren't perfect. We were kinda poor, always struggled for food and to pay the bills. I never went on school trips and I always had holes in my clothes. I was picked on for being weird, having glasses and all round just not fitting in. However, this never really bothered me. I had my own fun and my own friends who liked me and a family who, dispute their troubles, loved me. And this part come in handy later on. I was eight when I was sexually abused and almost raped. It was by a family friends son who was 17 at the time. I trusted him. And his brother. I don't want to go into details because it still hurts to talk about but I shouls have spoken about it when it happened. He touched me (a girl) and hurt me and made my whole life begin to spiral out of control. I didn't speak to the police. They came to my house but I couldn't speak to them. I was ashamed and embarrassed and scared. They sent two male officers and I didn't even want to sit next to them. I started self harming almost instantly. I started having panic attack that got worse and worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety at ten. I felt so disconnected. I was at an age where I needed to be able to talk and share my feelings but, I couldn't, I didn't know how. By 11 I was acting out daily. I needed a way to get these emotions out of me. I got into fights at school. I caught with my parents and my siblings. I even tried smoking because I thought it'd make me look cool and I thought people would like me. When I was 12 my parents broke up. And I had been suffering a lot of the arguments and lashouts they were having. My self harm was daily by this point and somehow, nobody knew. Nobody asked. The cuts didn't really leave scars because I was just using sharp plastic or wire, things I could easily access. So nobody could even tell I was hurting myself. Thirteen to 16 were really, really hard. By now I was constantly hurting myself. Skipping school. I was sexually harassed by a boy from school and then again, forced against my will do give him oral sex. At the age of 14. And then things started going around school. I was a slag, a white, I was asking for it. People even found out about what happened when I was a kid and it tore me apart. Home life was horrible. School life was horrible. I had no friends, nobody to talk to. So when I was 16 I tried to hang myself. Again the details are hard to talk about. My sister saved my life and she never told anyone but she forever me to go to therapy. I did for about six weeks, then I started lying to her. I wasn't going anymore. I fell into a bad crowd with some even worse people who showed me drugs and alcohol and that giving a fuck was for idiots and people who had reason to. They were not my friends but they took my mind off of things. I started sleeping around, stealing, fighting... Again. But I liked it. I was happy for a while. I started dating a 19 year old (I was 16) and I thought he was the love of my life. I think I was addicted to MDMA at this time. The way it made me feel was amazing and I didn't have a comedown the next day. Oddly I was actually going to school. In my final year. Constantly smoking weed or high on MD. In school... I was an idiot. But I got my GCSEs. All but my maths and history. I decided I was going to fail them anyway so I studied harder on everything else and got mostly B's and A's. I was proud of myself for once. That happiness and that pried was quickly torn away though. My dad wasn't overly upset when he found out about my grades but he was fuming when he found out about my boyfriend and what we had been doing together. And all of this happened on the day of my final exam. For some stupid reason, after like six months of not hurting myself. That night I cut myself. And I didn't even intend for this to happen but, it did. I bled for an hour straight, no stoppage. I was using my bed sheets as a bandage and the blood had soaked them through. I stumbled down stairs and fell into a bookshelf. My dad rushed over to me. Asked me where I had cut myself, called my mum, called an ambulance and that's all I remember. I woke up in hospital that night and I just cried and cried and apologized to everyone. Even my nurses. This now meant that I was gonna be forced to get better. And I was glad. I kinda had that attention that I needed now. And no this isn't attention seeking. Well it is. But not how you know it to be. I wasn't doing these things for attention. I was doing them for help. And this was the help I needed. The months after were horrible. My "boyfriend" left me and my "friends" didn't even text me a get well soon. I was alone again. And I was in and out of hospital constantly. If not for check ups it was because I had hurt myself. If not that it was because I was under weight. If not that then something else. My therapists were shit. But two of them were amazing. They actually cared. And it was one on them who made me realise something. And don't get me wrong I was 18 when I realised this. That was like two and a half years of therapy and constant eyes watching me. He reminded me of something I told him in the begining. Something I said at the begining of this story. When I was a kid I was strong. Things were tough and things were shitty but I knew that people around me loved me and cared about me. And for so many years I had forgotten that. I didn't realise that what I was doing was hurting my family. Well I did but I guess I didn't care. I realised that maybe I had been selfish all those years. And maybe my fear had turned me into this defensive horrible person that could never see the light at the end of the tunnel. He told me things might not get better but they will even out. And he was right. Things were and are still hard and I still think about killing myself when things have been too much to handle. I haven't hurt myself in almost a year. I've spoken about my problems and I've helped others who have felt the same. I've been into schools and spoken to young girls (and the boys who wanted to be there) about rape and sexual abuse and where to go and who to talk to. I know that what happened to me wasn't my fault and I know now that punishing myself will never stop the cycle. Just make it stronger and harder to break. I live with my fiancé, he knows everything and he loves me all the same. And I only present myself to people who love me for who I am... Warts and all! Oh and my parents went on a date last month... That made me real happy. They still aren't together but they changed as people, for the better, and anyone else who is struggling can also change for the better. Not to be cringe but recovery starts with you. You have to accept help, ask for help, help others, do what makes you feel good!!! [info] None [info] 1568723000 [info] train
Rhaski [info] I hope I can help you a little here. Your experience sounds almost identical to my first year, and even now in my second year those feelings have come and gone. I discovered that the issue is not the career, or my ability to do the job, rather, it was more to do with how I deal with stress and my unrealistic expectations of myself. I ended seeing a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety, which is something I am now working on and making a lot of progress with managing stress. I would recommend is seeing a therapist about what you're feeling. Stress is part of the job, but it isn't normal to feel dread, fear and panic. This doesn't necessarily mean you also have anxiety, but it's clear that something is not right in the way you handle stress. You have worked hard to academically and professionally prepare yourself for this career so don't pull the trigger on leaving it behind too readily, give yourself a real chance first. Seek advice and tips from colleagues, mentors, etc as much as you can. Learn from them, find out how they deal with everything (I guarantee it doesn't involve them getting through every bit of work all the time). But seriously, book yourself in too see someone about how to handle your stress levels, and give yourself some credit. This is not an easy job,   it if you stick with it, it WILL get easier as you learn the tricks and everything stops being so new. In the meantime, acknowledge the progress that you HAVE made, and stop being so hard on yourself for not being a veteran in your first year [info] None [info] 1512435908 [info] train
burnsrado [info] There's a chance it could be anxiety. I've had symptoms for a few years, and what you described partially aligns with my early symptoms, especially being a few minutes late for class and deciding to bail. Just see your physician and talk about your symptoms. He/she may refer you to a specialist. In my case, I was treated for everything it *could* be, once that was ruled out, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Good luck!Have you always been this way? Because what stood out to me the most was I used to love being in crowds and talking to new people, but when that changed I knew something weird was going on. [info] GAD [info] 1362199588 [info] test
curiouscat1092 [info] I set up my first appointment with a therapist! For context, I'm a twenty-six year old young woman living in Upstate NY. I was diagnosed with anxiety and borderline personality disorder when I was twenty-two. I got out of a three-ish year long abusive relationship almost three years ago and have been rebuilding my life ever since. I spent almost a year single. Got a new job. Paid down debts. Spent time practicing self care.In February of '17, I met a wonderful young man who decided to join me on this journey we called life. We've been through A LOT together in these two plus years: his dad had two heart attacks, his mom has a history of breast cancer and has had other complications as a result. His little sister has had multiple dance related injuries. My grandmother was diagnosed with lung cancer. My brother underwent bariatric surgery. I say all this because the other day, I realized how stressed I've become. I realize that for the sake of my sanity and the health of my relationship, I need a healthy outlet to process my feelings. A place to go to work through my ish. So, I put together a list of therapists in my area, talked with my insurance, sent some emails, and waited. As luck would have it, there is a therapist who's practice is nearby me. So, we've tentatively scheduled a first session for a week from today!&amp;#x200B;Is there anyone else who, like me, took a look at their life and said, "Woah. I'm going to need get some help and get myself in order!"? (I mean, I know there are, it would just be nice to not feel so alone.) Besides seeking professional help, what else did you do to take care of your mental health and well-being? [info] None [info] 1559745308 [info] train
fgsixtynine [info] This happened to me. I didn't eat for the first month of a 3 month internship because I just didn't have the appetite. I was diagnosed with anxiety induced gastritis when I got home and saw my doctor. Apparently the longer you let it go, the worse it gets. I was able to not starve by drinking a lot of my calories. Smoothies, chocolate milk, milkshakes, etc. Probably not the most nutritious but it helped me hold on! [info] None [info] 1500089897 [info] train
Throwawaychocolatem [info] Have any of you suffered from mental health issues? I am curious to see if any of you had hardships growing up with mental health.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8, even though working out, CBT and meditating helps. My anxiety (GAD) still creeps on me everyday. My mother told me as a teenager I was cured. I also have a really short attention span, I am really curious to do some ADD testing. However, my partner and my mother have told me I just need to "focus more". Which I have tried but my mind wanders.So, have any of you suffered from mental health issues and what strategies have you used to cope? [info] None [info] 1551102424 [info] train
shinsoo [info] Nofap and keto are two giant anxiety hacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders when I was younger. Keto stabilized the anxiety. Nofap gave me the testosterone, confidence and stoic nerves. Time to take ur manhood into ur hands and leave the anxiety for the chicks waiting for u to call. [info] None [info] 1551483067 [info] train
joyke [info] I'm day 7 on quitting, I've had anxiety attacks just about every single night for the past 6 days. I've been diagnosed with anxiety last year, I grew up as an anxious child but 4 years of daily blazing made it way worse. Anxiety is definitely a side effect of t-breaks and quitting. But i can tell you that it gets better. It's been less and less. On the first three days, my face would twitch and I would have constant muscle spasms (heavy anxiety causes that usually). But on day 6, I stopped having as much spasms. I have crazy thoughts at night but it's been getting abit better. last night at 3AM i had a panic attack, I took a shot of whiskey and fell asleep within 5 minutes haha. good luck to you my friend, it will get better. [info] None [info] 1447784062 [info] valid
mikachuu [info] This all sounds like really wonderful advice.  I just don't know if I'm able to do it.  I'm in my (technically) last year of college, and I'm the biggest procrastinator.  I've not been diagnosed with ADHD, but I do feel like so many of my thoughts/actions are out of control, even though I seem very calm on the outside.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety big time, but basically my GPA is a 2.3 and I don't think I have enough time to even raise it up over a 3.0.  I feel like I'm too far gone, and it's definitely the electronics.  I'm surrounded by them.  Like you said, they can eat up hours at a time and you don't even notice until it's too late.  With me, I do notice and I mess around on my laptop or phone anyway.  So it all comes down to willpower, which I don't have any left.  The only way I've made it this far is by forcing myself to wait until the last minute and then cramming everything in while I'm at school.  That needs to stop ASAP, but I just can't break the cycle.  Sorry for rambling, but your post just really made me think about where I am in actuality, not where everyone thinks I am.  I tell people all the time that I'm just a fraud, but they laugh it off.  They don't know how difficult it is... or maybe they do and don't believe me.  Either way, I know I need help and there's too much standing in my way to even start.   [info] None [info] 1396268185 [info] train
Karmagirl1 [info] You’re an amazing parent, screw the hatersMine are 5 and 7 and I call those days mental health days. Sometimes kids, like adults need a day to recollect themselves and especially if the day prior was a bad stressful day for them. My mom forced me to go when when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t remember learning anything those days just remember the torment of having to be there. I promised I’d be kinder to my own children. And mine are model students that love school bc I let them take breathers when they truly need one. You’re not modeling laziness, you’re showing them that your love for their well-being is more important than an attendance record [info] None [info] 1572355434 [info] train
lillyccs [info] Nothing wrong! I’m the same exact way. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however. I do find it easier to talk to people online rather than in person, so you may just have slight social anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1535062550 [info] train
poppycola [info] Hallucinations and delusions or just over active imagination??? I was diagnosed with anxiety induced psychosis and my doctor said that the only reason i wasnt diagnosed with schizophrenia was because of my age and that i just have an over active imagination??? does that sound right?? im too scared to ask my parents to get a second option. help?? i cant tell the difference between my "imagination" and the real world. its really scaryyyy [info] None [info] 1564565861 [info] train
Evergreen19 [info] I had the same problem until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Prozac. You should probably see a doctor. [info] None [info] 1559847382 [info] train
thekojac [info] Just had the worst panic attack (I hope that's what it is...) I've ever had... Little bit of background...When I was in high school (about 10 years ago) I was officially diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder after sitting in class and thinking I was having a heart attack, but what I now know was a panic attack. Had an MRI done, wore a holtor monitor, had a complete work up with nothing out of the ordinary. So I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder.Recently things have been good, save for a panic attack once every few months, though my baseline general anxiety level is higher. But very few actual panic attacks. Well, today I was at work going about my business when, out of the blue with literally no build-up, I noticed I was having a hard time swallowing. Immediately (like, within a second) upon this realization, my palms got sweaty, I got dizzy and light headed, I had "brain zaps", my heart was pounding, I felt like I was gonna black out, yet I wanted to get up and run. I don't know what from, but I needed to get away from where I was. I honestly felt like I was dying. The attack seemed to last with varying intensity for a good 30-40 minutes (though it was by far the worst when it first started) before slowly dissipating (with the help of some emergency Ativan I took). I'm not quite 100% back to normal just yet, but way better that I was. Oh, and I checked my blood pressure and it was quite high while the attack was ongoing, but seems to have returned to near normal. But... This was probably the singular most intense, awful, terrifying panic attack I've ever had. It scared me. A lot. I dunno why I'm sharing this. Maybe I just need some reassurance that I'm not dying right now and it really was just the worst panic attack I've ever experienced in my life. Ugh. This stuff sucks. [info] None [info] 1440962688 [info] valid
alkatori [info] Unexplained Chest Pain - Doctor's at a loss, any ideas? Hi I am (running down the list):31 Years OldMale5'10200 lbsWhiteComplaint lasting 5 years, last 2 (going on 3) fairly severe at times.Location: NH, USA Body: Upper Chest, usually on the left side. Along with arm, and sometimes back/jaw pain.Relevant Medical Issues:AnxietyGERDMedications:CitalopramOmeprazolXanaxPhysical Activity:I use a stepper for 45 minutes daily once I get home. I work up a good sweat but rarely get winded. On the flip side I spend most of my time in front of a computer at work.Family History:My grandfather died of a heart attack, as did his brothers in their late 60's and early 70's.Also I'm a non-smoker and overweight but slowly adopting a healthier diet. I just need to work on portion control.Basically I just went to the ER for the first time this year. Which really sucks, as I had been there previously about 7 months ago. I was there because of chest pains that didn't respond to my normal method of treatment.When my chest pain is bad I do the following:1) I try Ranitidine, if that doesn't work2) I try Advil, if that doesn't work3) I try Xanax, If that doesn't work4) I exercise.When my chest pain is light I usually start with Exercise, and feel relieved after 5 or 10 minutes. That was a recommendation from my therapist as I am diagnosed with anxiety. It generally lasts about as long as I exercise and comes back slightly worse after 10 or 15 minutes of rest. I spoke with a cardiologist that told me that indicates it's not a heart issue and all the normal tests they ran are clean (stress echo, echo, blood work, ekg, etc).In this particular case I did 45 minutes of cardio, and it didn't get worse or better. So I went to the ER and they diagnosed it as most likely skeletal or muscle pain. My primary care doc confirms, but he's also sending me to consult with the Cardiologist again as I get suddenly fatigued and dizzy on occasion. He said it could be cardio or it could just be stress.Anyway, my question is: If it's a muscle or skeleton problem, who the heck could I see to get some answers or relief? My primary care doc couldn't think of anybody and neither could the ER staff. At this point I don't even know what questions I should be asking.I don't really believe it's a heart issue, but I can't get it out of my mind that it might be. I've been told it's anxiety, GERD, Costochondritis but the patterns don't seem to quite fit. Either the medication they try doesn't have an effect (anxiety, GERD) or it's lasting far too long (Costochondritis).So any suggestions who to talk to next? Apart from a cardiologist, because although I don't think that's my issue. I still have an appointment coming up next week just to be safe. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1468864841 [info] test
wicked_wisdom09 [info] Help me I have been diagnosed with anxiety . I feel not getting . Shortness of breath . Fear of attack. I have got like three instances when I was rapid breathing like not getting air with rapid heartbeat [info] None [info] 1574543622 [info] valid
susandeschain9 [info] I definitely think pelvic PT can help you retrain that clenching over time, I hope it works out for you with insurance this next year. For anxiety I’ve found help with Cognitive Behavior Therapy and Dialectical Behavior Therapy. I still clench my pelvic floor sometimes during times of high stress (&amp; I am diagnosed with anxiety as well), but I’m able to notice that it’s happening and try to implement skills and therapies to relax it again (and to also try to de-escalate the anxiety in general). Good luck  [info] None [info] 1543023713 [info] train
hlangley1996 [info] I can't say for sure because I'm not licensed. But I would say you are probably starting to show some signs. I know this because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and those are some of the things that I do.  [info] None [info] 1513949191 [info] test
38hunnid_ [info] How can I get diagnosed if I can't express myself? I have been seeing specialists about my mental health for a while, I am not good at all at talking about myself and expressing my feelings. I have been feeling like the progress isn't what it should be, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (I feel like that is a relatively easy diagnosis.) I feel like there is something more tough. If i bring up autism during one of my sessions, is there some kind of test? Or is it only depending on the way you handle yourself with the person that's evaluating you? thank you for your time. :) [info] None [info] 1564615839 [info] train
pobalita [info] Was this a panic attack or did someone drug me? TLDR:  Ended up in the ER last weekend.  Not sure if it was a panic attack or something put something in my drink.&amp;#x200B;Background:I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 30 years ago following the death of a parent.  I have minor and manageble panic attacks which happen maybe once or twice a month.  Most of them are caused by something obvious; however, sometimes they come out of nowhere.   I take a few xanax per month as needed.  I've been on longer-term meds a few times in the past 30 years when anxiety is super high (divorce, family death, job changes...big stuff) and causes 4 or 5 panic attacks per day.  I'm not on meds now and have not had any panic attack other than the one discussed below in around a month.  My panic attacks are always pretty much the same - a blast of adrenaline and then crying for a few minutes as the feeling subsides.&amp;#x200B;The story:Last week SO and I went to a bar.  I ordered 2 martinis over the course of about 4 hours.  After about half of the second drink, I went to use the restroom and on the way back everything around me started spinning.  I became very disoriented and had a hard time making it back to the bar.  When I got there, I put my head on SO's shoulder and I noticed that I was mildly hyperventilating.  SO asked me what was wrong and I couldn't answer.  I threw up in an ice bucket and when I tried to sit up, I passed out.&amp;#x200B;SO took me to the lobby where I kept blacking out over and over and had a very hard time breathing.  I felt like I didn't want to breathe and every inhalation was an effort.  I remember thinking that I was most definitely dying.  When emergency help came, I could hear them ask the bartender if anyone had tampered with my drink and asking SO if I'd taken any drugs before taking me to the ER.  All vitals good, blood sugar fine. I threw up again in the ER.  They didn't do much after they found out that I have anxiety disorder other than let me rest.  I fell asleep for a little bit and when I woke up, I had what I would consider a very typical and recognizable panic attack.  I was given a valium for it and discharged shortly after.  My release papers said that I'd been brought in for a panic attack.&amp;#x200B;Does what happened to me in the bar sound like a panic attack??  I had only 1.5 drinks which should not cause me to throw up or pass out from drunkeness.  In fact, I felt fine until I tried to return from the restroom and became disoriented.   I am wondering if it's more likely that someone put something in my second drink?  Something wierd did happen: when I started feeling disoriented, the stranger sitting next to me (we'd been talking him for a while) asked for the rest of my drink and took it.  I don't know if he drank it.  Who asks for the rest of a strangers' drink at a bar?&amp;#x200B;While I don't want to believe that I was drugged, I'm even more afraid to believe that was a panic attack because it was really scary and I don't ever want it to happen again.  No panic attack has ever left me disoriented or vomiting or passing out.  Not ever.  Also, this was absolutely out of the blue - nothing had upset me or scared me.  In fact, we had been having a really fun evening.  Nothing about it was familiar: no adrenaline, no shaking, no crying.  Just fading to black and back.  No panic attacks since the ER visit either.&amp;#x200B;Has anyone else had a panic attack remotely like this before or does it sound like something else?  I'm not sure how to cope with the feeling that this could randomly happen to me again.  Any advice appreciated.&amp;#x200B;edited to add:  the period of time that I was blacking out and vomiting was about 3 hours. [info] None [info] 1550105174 [info] valid
ChocolateFixesAll [info] \*hugs if you want them\* I can totally see how that image would set you off. A good mom wouldn't rely on a stupid meme to "apologize" for making mistakes. She'd be in front of you, doing it for real and trying to actively change to make things better. &amp;#x200B;Are moms going to make mistakes? Yup. Do real moms feel guilt for that and try to do better? AbsoFUCKinglutely. My kids are 8 and 12 and I apologize to them when I make mistakes or when I mess something up. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks and it's been a rollercoaster. I hate that my kids are having to see me struggle with this and that my anxiety messes things up for them sometimes. Having your 12yr old daughter find you in the kitchen in the middle of a panic attack is probably the worst thing that has ever happened to me and yo know what she did? She put her arms around me and hugged me until the attack was over. That's not something I ever wanted my daughter to have to do,but she did and I apologized to her for it and I apologized for how messed up I've been and that I've been trying to do better. She told me she could tell.&amp;#x200B;If your mom had ever apologized and worked on fixing things, things would be different. But she didn't. So I am here to tell you that you are NOT worthless. You are a wonderful person who deserves to be happy. You are worthy of being cared and loved and I, an internet stranger, care about you. (not gonna say I love you cuz that would be creepy and weird. &gt;.&gt; ) [info] None [info] 1557724890 [info] train
lalka808 [info] I am just like this too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and it manifests itself in this way.  I'm not socially anxious either but like you I spend the whole time worrying that I'll loose my alone time.  Recently I've now started to worry about the worrying.  Not nice.  I've always tried to schedule my alone time: plan it and then accept the social times when they inevitably come along if it's not during a scheduled quiet week.  I'm trying to accept that I can't control everything and let it happen.  Sorry I can't give better advice!  [info] [F/33/INFJ] [info] 1441361918
FrankieJoe15 [info] Experiences with psychological assessment? Hi everyone! First time posting so a little bit nervous. I’m based in the UK so I’m aware some information may be a little bit different from other places.Basically, I have struggled with my mental health for a long time, some pretty traumatic things have happened to me and I’m basically fighting everyday to keep strong for my daughter. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 and PTSD after my daughters birth in 2014, I wasn’t actually offered any help for these things other than pills that I never really took. I referred myself to the NHS Well-being service where you can refer yourself for psychological help. I have my first appointment in the morning and the letter states it will be a psychological assessment. I’m a little bit unsure of what to expect and would like some advice/experiences of what other people have had! I’m also very proud of myself for finally speaking out and admitting I might need a little bit of help, I want to be the very best version of myself for my little girl, I don’t want her to grow up like I did. Thank you for reading and any advice you may be able to offer. Best wishes guys! [info] None [info] 1537723926 [info] train
PreposterousMurmur [info] Honestly, I was diagnosed with anxiety and paranoia in my teens and have tried my hardest to work through it. Weirdly, I've never felt calmer about anything in my life than the health and safety of my babies. Haha, I still get startled when the wind hits my front door, but I know deep down inside the babies are okay.  [info] 35 wks with b/g twins [info] 1337781033 [info] train
Aloha456 [info] How I realised my own nmum was a narcissist. I'm on mobile so formatting might be slightly off I guess.I'm 17 and currently still living with my nmum. I've been aware of her being an N for around two years. The thing that really kicked it off was when my brother a year younger than me kinda broke from her tactics and ruined his life. He was a 14 year old kid smoking weed and not coming home at night. We never knew where he was, and our nmum roped me into helping her, he ended up hating me after it. During that time I realised that some of the things she was doing to try and keep him under her were a little extreme. She began getting the police to escort him around, she tried keeping him locked in our room (at the time I shared with him and one of our other younger brothers.) Eventually, he moved out to live with my dad and I thought that that part of my life was over and we'd go back to being a happy family or whatever.Of course, we didn't. Things got really difficult for me mentally and I couldn't keep up. I was aware of everything she was doing to me now and it hurt. The pressure of it caused me to break and I stopped going to school a lot. The previous year I'd missed a lot of school because I'd had a really bad bout with my asthma, so that year I'd pretended it had surfaced again because I was struggling to do anything that required any energy. Of course it didn't stop her, she'd still make me do everything for her. Clean the house, pick up my younger siblings from school, look after the siblings, put them to bed. And then she'd yell at me for never helping her, for being useless and not doing anything ever. The most fucked up part was I kept telling her that I loved her.What drove me to realise she was an N was that because I was aware of her shitty behaviour and suffering from it, I vented to my friends when I felt like I couldn't hold it in. First time I did, one of them immediately said that it was abuse and neglect that she was doing. I didn't believe her and began making excuses for my N. I said that my brother had broke her (funny, isn't it?), that she was still suffering from the death of my nana/her mum, that she was really a good person going through a bad time. This spell of me thinking that she used to be a good person didn't break for a long time, but me believing that she would get better did after my suicide attempt in march of last year.I'm keeping this part brief because I don't like talking about this. Last year everything got too much and I attempted suicide. Obviously, I survived and my nmum knew about my attempt. She took me to the gp who referred me to therapist. She made sure I went to the first appointment which is where I was diagnosed with anxiety. I thought originally that this had jolted my nmum into going back to the nice caring person I thought she was. I was wrong, she refused to take me to any of the follow up appointments. There was always an excuse, she needed a nap, I had to pick the kids up from school etc. The excuse that made me realise was when she chose a day trip to the seaside where my brother now lives over my appointment. I knew then that it wasn't getting any better.It wasn't until last September when I realised it had been abuse my entire life. I'd been in college for about a week or two at this point and we got into a particularly nasty argument. Me, my elder sister and my mum. I don't specifically remember why, we have so many that they often blur into one but this particular fight was one that made me and my sister say to each other that we never wanted to go back. We talked a lot around this time, and I mentioned my ideology of her going back to how she used to be. That's when my sister told me that she was never like that, I had just been manipulated into thinking that she was. I'd been the most open to this manipulation because I was the most dependent on her. I have autism, dyspraxia and asthma, I spent a lot of time as a kid in the hospital or needing help with school or every day things. When she stopped me from seeing my dad all the time it was for my health. When I wasn't allowed out with friends it was because my autism made it dangerous for me to be out without supervision. She made me think my dad had been abusive to her and that was why they split up. She told me worse things about my dad that I'm not going to say here in risk of trigger warnings.I'm going to tell you two stories. One is my memory of what happened, one is what actually happened. First, the memory.This one happened when I was around ten. My dad often picked us up from school and he would take us out for dinner and spend time with us. This particular day, my nmum was out with my younger siblings and told my dad that he was allowed to take us back to the house. She had given my sister the spare key for the day to let us in. For dinner that day my dad bought us pizza, but instead of anything big we got a ten inch pizza to share between the 3 of us. That's not a big pizza to start with, but between three kids it becomes even smaller. We were starving that day, and when my mum got back later all the other kids had been fed pretty well and she said that because it was late and we didn't have any food in she couldn't do anything for us. This was my dad's fault for being a cheapskate and not letting us eat anything big. What actually happened isn't too different except for one big thing: she told my dad to not buy us dinner at all because she woulf feed us when she got back. He still got us a little something to eat for a snack regardless when her intent had been to starve us so she could manipulate us into hating him.That's the sort of things I figured out that day, and it's when I made the decision to live at my dad's half time when not in college and on weekends.The point of this rant is that some days I still begin to believe she never did anything wrong and I needed to relive all of this to bring myself back to reality. She doesn't love me, she never did and never will. The things here don't even scratch the surface of what she did and still does but it was all that I needed to force myself to stop being a dipshit and reliving the time I thought she was a good person. Sorry if the post is a bit of a mess, as far as timelines go it isn't the neatest [info] None [info] 1560347221 [info] train
Ailouros_Venom [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I was livid reading all of the demands and then the NEED for the spotlight.  Holy shit. I was almost seeing red.  I got such a justice boner when you called her out.   [info] None [info] 1503721929 [info] train
djsnek69 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last week lmao. Just relax man. Try talking to your school counselor [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1552984062 [info] train
NYCParis7 [info] Hi I've been through the same. Just a quick intro, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, agoraphobia and obsessive compulsive disorder when I was 16. I stayed home a lot, had 0 friends and felt unhappy and low all the time. And yes I totally understand how you are feeling now. First off, try considering medication for your anxiety. Because for me, my doctor told me that I have too much receptor cell in one of the parts of my brain, so I get super anxious over even the small stuff. So yea, the medication can calm you down and help u in your work and daily life.Next, your living situation. It seems to bother u a lot. So, start to work on it. Try to post more ads online on local forums, Craigslist, uni forum, etc. Maybe work extra hours or get an extra job. Further to that, start saving up. Yes I know u barely have enough to live by now, but just make sacrifices and save up a little every month. Why? For college/ emergency. It's already a good start that you want to go to college. 😃👍🏻 I know people say that degree is not the only way, but in many times, degree is the easier and safer way. Next, your job. But first let me tell you about my fear which caused my OCD, anxiety and agoraphobia. I was afraid of using the public bathroom. I fear people will judge me for doing number 2. I fear people will think that I'm abnormal and dirty. My main problem was MY FEAR OF HOW PEOPLE WILL THINK OF ME. In short, I gave too much sh** (lol nice pun). So yea bak to ur workplace, don't care so much. People do not think of u as much as u think they do, for real! Like kuroky said 'don't give a f**k!' If u really dislike ur existing job, it's time to look for a new one. Stay up, play less dota, and start looking for jobs. Try to attend as many interview as u can. You never know which job has the best opportunities for u until u get to compare them. Finally, I'm not sure if u have been through this. But for me, I do a lot of self-pity. I looked at my situation and started comparing myself against my friends who are doing better, then I start to feel very down and feel pitiful for myself. That same cycle happens so often, I didn't get to my problem and solve it, instead I was just there gloating and getting all sad about my problem. BUT I HAVE GOTTEN THROUGH AND OVER ALL THESE NOW. 7 years later, which is now, I'm 24, graduated, have a full time job, have a gf (which helped me alot in my shitty 😂 Problem). As my father always tells me, 'son, you just need a breakthrough, and things will change'. And it did! You can do it my friend, I wish u all the best. Nothing comes free in life. Treasure ur family members and friends. Help while you can, because u never know when u need the same. All the best, looking forward to seeing you overcome all these and make a post of your victorious breakthrough on DOTA 2 REDDIT. Best regards,Samuel.  [info]  [info] 1537316884 [info] train
BabyGotBantz [info] Honestly, it probably is. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but crouching down in the bathroom as an elementary schooler, and hearing the roar overhead of the tornado as it passed while hiding under my desk has fucked me up forever. I remember there was a small window in the gymnasium and I saw the sky turn a greenish color before we had to go hide. Terrifying. [info] None [info] 1556660785 [info] train
CrocodileHearted [info] Hey if it helps by all means. I'm just personally afraid of them because of past traumas with relatives... even when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and had to take meds for that I was afraid of it every time... they helped... but what do you think happens when someone who already lacks empathy cranks that lacking up to 11. I felt like a god damn drone. They also managed my anger which was a 'bonus' to those I lived with. Didn't like it.I've been off the meds for a long time now when I realized they became worthless and the anxieties came back. Developed a (healthy) coping mechanism, haven't had a panic attack for the longest time. My favourite emotion came back though. I too want to get better with whatever the hell I have. Lacking empathy, it really does leave some kind of void in you. It's like being thirsty but you just keep drinking seawater. I never turned to drugs to fill it because of my fear of them.. so I fill it with porn. And memes. Lots of porn and memes. It works. [info] And a dash of cold blood. [info] 1565333512 [info] train
opal_ann [info] I've suffered stomach problems since I was in elementary school and in middle school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I attributed any issues I had to my anxiety. It wasn't until I was in university that I tried cutting out gluten and everything was better. I now think that I'd been suffereing from the same thing as a child but no one around me thought it might be because of food. [info] None [info] 1572890662 [info] train
firfetir [info] Well, I can relate to your symptoms.. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and breathing has been a problem more like every once in a while, usually when a specific thing is stressing me out, but not always. I sometimes, very suddenly, will start feeling terrible and realise I've forgotten to take a breath for a moment. Sometimes it's because I'm so lost in my thoughts but sometimes it can be because I'm so lost in whatever I'm watching/doing. Then, I take a breathe and my heart races and I'm focused on not just breathing but taking good, deep breaths.It really sounds like anxiety to me - even more so because you're so worried it's something worse. And it makes sense, since your vacation plans got fucked up. I hope you can find an alternative to your plans and I think you should read up on anxiety some more - it manifests in many ways. I've never had a lump in my throat but I have a bad habit of picking at my skin. If it is anxiety, it's important to learn how to relieve your stress day to day - without the vacation. Diet, exercise, hobbies, therapy, medication... There are a lot of ways to improve.I don't feel like my response was very helpful but it's all I could think of. Trouble breathing is a common problem with anxiety so I'm surprised this doesn't have more comments. [info] None [info] 1496444243 [info] valid
Fiyet [info] I would recommend it. I originally started stitching when I was 9 years old because my aunt would babysit me and she taught me how. I stopped stitching when I got a job when I was 16 and didn't take it back up until 2 years ago, when I was 30. I started stitching again after my brother-in-law died. He fell and it took 11 days for search and rescue to find his body. I was going crazy and my aunt, who I'm still very close to, overnighted me a kit. While I was still in a lot of pain keeping my hands and mind busy was very helpful. Cross stitching still helps me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. So having something to focus on that keeps me busy but not too busy has been amazing for me. And when I'm done with a project I have a sense of accomplishment that makes me feel better about my life and my situation. Also they make great gifts and seeing someone get one of my cross stitches as a gift feels amazing because I'm lucky and my family appreciates the work behind the craft. What has also helped me was discovering the cross stitch community online. It is amazing! I've made some great friends through Facebook groups and Instagram. In fact one of my friends that I met through cross stitch literally lives down the street from me. it's fun to have in jokes with people about cross stitch and have people understand how it can get frustrating sometimes. There are a lot of great fun people and it elevated my craft from being fun to being part of my life. [info] None [info] 1540927510 [info] train
iliveinablackhole_ [info] Worry of developing obsessive thoughts causing me horrible anxiety. (Don't read this if you're scared of developing obsessive thoughts. I don't want to put ideas into any anxious minds that might cause them to experience what I am going through.) I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, which was mainly caused by a paranoia of stomach bug. I've brought my own anxiety down a whole lot in these past few years and have become less paranoid of the stomach bug. I am proud of my progress, however this flu season has been really pushing my limits. People throwing up at work sick, my sisters children getting sick, and some kid threw up on my carpet. This stuff still bothers me but I have become far less paranoid than I used to be. Anyway I feel like all this stress on my anxiety has caused it to resurface in different ways. A few weeks ago I had this thought "what if I can't yawn?" and for a few days I couldn't! Then I was able to  yawn again for a couple weeks and now it's somewhere in between. I can yawn but I have to try hard. The other night I smoked weed (last time I'm doing that) and I thought "if my anxiety can prevent me from yawning what else can it do to me? What if every time I see this person I think of _____? What if everytime I do this I think of ______? What if everytime I eat I think of ______?" It drove me into a really bad panic attack. The following morning I felt better but the same "what ifs" came back later that night causing me another panic attack. And I've just felt very off and on edge since that last attack. Scared of going crazy...I know its just anxiety but I'm scared it could turn into something worse like OCD. I don't have health insurance so these things are tough for me. I try to stay positive thinking and it helps but there's just this part of my mind that I'm terrified of right now. I'm afraid to go near it or I'll go into another panic attack. I've felt sick all day. Hoping someone might have had a similar experience and could give me advice on how to overcome this. [info] None [info] 1391926894 [info] train
swivel2369 [info] How do I know if my issue is anxiety or not? I've been to a couple doctors and told them I think I have anxiety bit they seem to think it's more of a small case of ocd instead. What medications would I be given if I was diagnosed with anxiety. Probably a mild case. I bite my nails constantly even while telling myself not to. I'm always driving myself crazy about being late to anywhere. Even if it doesnt matter what time I get there and I seem to have no patience at all. For anything. I always seem on edge. I can be in a great mood one minute and the second something goes wrong or didn't go exactly how I planned I'm almost in a rage. Internally anyway. Rarely do I ever explode by hitting something or throwing something but I get so tied up inside and get pissed sometimes in a split second. So I have anxiety or is it something else? [info] None [info] 1473026202 [info] train
sigbox [info] You're acting as though all anxiety is the same.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and yet, I'm capable of interacting with people normally on a day to day basis and it's quite manageable. Every single person is different. [info] Toronto Blue Jays [info] 1498325518 [info] test
dragon__eggs [info] My medicine is working! A month ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and given medicine for it, during the week I didn't notice anything different. But yesterday something changed! When I embarrassed myself I laughed it off instead of freaking out about it. Also Im less scared to talk to people! Im sorry but I just had to post this because Im just so happy! &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1567281997 [info] valid
mollyrhi [info] To me this does sound like anxiety but probably not as a side effect of drinking. Did you have anxiety before drinking? I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and OCD later on in my teenage years and my psychiatrist said they often go hand in hand.  [info] None [info] 1501442714 [info] train
meeseekstodie137 [info] I forgot to mention the abuse and I'm worried I got misdiagnosed I've slept maybe 4 hours in the last couple of days, I'm burned out on a full course load of schoolwork and I practically only function on caffeine (on top of anxiety) and I just kind of robotically answered all their questions without providing much information in return, talking about my current social situation instead of my past, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and am starting medication for it tomorrow (currently waiting to pick up the prescription) but I'm certain there's more going on that I just never mentioned to them and I feel like I massively fucked up by not doing that [info] None [info] 1579214840 [info] train
RyanJKaz [info] I’ll start by saying that I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/panic disorder about 4 1/2 years ago. I also was found to have a vitamin D deficiency about three years ago and my question is this: [info] None [info] 1576678024 [info] valid
KingBaby87 [info] Hello and welcome!Anxiety can feel like it is overwhelming and taking control of your life. Your job is to remind it that you are in charge.When I was diagnosed with anxiety, the first thing I did was read a book called DARE, by Barry McDonagh. It really calmed me down AND helped me better understand what anxiety is. It's an easy read, I finished it in one evening.I'd start there and see how you feel!  [info] None [info] 1524462918 [info] train
BCD195 [info] I’ve had anxiety for as long as I can remember and I can tell you this feels very similar to an anxiety attack (for me) but it feels slightly different, which makes me worry that it’s something worse. Last time something like this happened I stoped smoking for 2 months and it seemed to fix me but I don’t know what caused the issue to come back, or if this is even related to what I experienced about a year ago. Like I said it’s very similar but slightly different so I cannot tell if it’s related My best guess is the weed is making my anxiety get worse for some reason (or in your case, making it so you notice your anxiety) but it’s never safe to assume and move on I’d much prefer to know the cause For future reference I use nicotine, caffeine, and weed on a daily basis (wow, shocker I have bad anxiety huh?) I occasionally use cocaine when I’m drinking which isn’t that often about once every three months or so. And I drink on average 1 time a week. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am prescribed Wellbutrin for it (for some fucking reason) Cross reference that ^ to your day to day life, if you see a lot of similarities I’d say we’re having the same issue and it’s most likely panic attacks brought on by smoking weed. [info] None [info] 1573586584 [info] train
clarissagilmore [info] I agree with this so much! I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and one thing that made me feel so much better was googling and reading about all the famous people who have come out and talked about their anxiety. Seeing those people in the public eye, being successful and trying their best despite what they’re going through makes me feel like I can do it and survive my simple little life.  [info] None [info] 1553242482 [info] train
TheDrunkPrincess [info] The "this isn't right" feeling. Am I alone? I'm diagnosed with anxiety but my anxiety ranges a lot of issues I don't think others deal with. I obsessively shower (anywhere from 2-8 times a day) cause I feel dirty. I am a tragically picky eater and have many times looked at food and if my my tells me "this isn't right, something bad is gonna happen if I eat it" and the feeling doesn't go away even if I'm starving. If interaction with others goes on for a bit too long I get very irritated and feel panicked until I can be comfortably alone.I can't explain why it's so intense or why I quickly feel uncomfortable to the point of digging my nails into my arm or ripping out bits of hair. It's so illogical and I have no clue how to deal. I've never met anyone who has felt the same kind of unease and stress as I have.Am I alone in this experience? Am I crazy? Could it be more than just genera anxiety?I appreciate any feedback. [info] None [info] 1522564260 [info] train
Olvenya [info] When is it useful / necessary to disclose that you have a mental health issues? I (27/female) started seeing a psychiatrist over Whatsapp since last month and I think it's going pretty well. He's a good listener and he's helped me understand a few things about mental health. I'm only 3 sessions in, we talked about possible treatment (medication, MBSR and MBCT) but I haven't technically started any form of treatment.I have been diagnosed with anxiety (I was fairly certain of it but never had confirmation from a professional). Once the current lockdown is over and things go back to semi-normal (I'm in Europe), I will be also checking for adult ADD with a neuropsychologist, and for autism.Most people around me (family, friends, coworkers) don't know that I'm seeing a psychiatrist (except for 2 very close friends). They don't really know that I have sometimes been struggling, mostly because I've never had any major issue or incident in my life so far. At best, they probably just think that I'm a naturally nervous person.There's stigma associated with mental health, so if either ADD or autism are confirmed, I'm not sure I want to disclose it to friends, or to coworkers. I started a new job 6 months ago, so my colleagues / boss know me only superficially. I don't want them to think of me differently because I have diagnosed anxiety or possibly autism.That being said, is there a general "rule" on when/if you should disclose such things, especially regarding work? My issues haven't greatly impacted my job (I have good reviews), but you never know what could happen.Thanks! [info] None [info] 1588177241 [info] valid
Dsg1116 [info] I’m 24 and have a bachelors in psychology. I have been diagnosed by a psychiatrist. Taken meds and seen counselors. I was diagnosed with anxiety and minor ptsd. I’ve contemplated borderline too but my dr said I had the symptoms and he said  there was not much need for the label. I guess cuz only a few were displayed. He said I was a bit histrionic. Medication didn’t work well, I dunno what to tell you all. I’m sounding like a monster. [info] None [info] 1562378449 [info] test
TheWallTheVeil [info] In 2012 I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was a heavy pot smoker back then and because of the anxiety I started having horrible panic attacks when I smoked it. My friend suggested synthetic to help me quit. I tried one and it was ok, went to buy more from another shop and all they had was something a little more harsh than what I was getting used to. I got home and smoked it while cooking dinner and when I stepped back into the house when I turned my head it was like my mind took a picture each time. My heart rate was through the roof and I was sure I was about to die. My son, who was 7 at the time, was the only one there while I quickly called 911,then called my mom to come over. They sent the cops because they thought I was doing hard drugs and then when they realized it was synthetic weed they all laughed at me. The ambulance bill was 500 dollars to take a trip to emergency and it probably took them less than a minute to drive down the street, because that's how far the hospital was. It was all a huge nightmare. Later I started to hear people were actually dying because they were smoking it. The paramedic read the bag and he's like "it literally says not for human consumption on the bag" apparently that includes smoking it. [info] None [info] 1510987519 [info] test
Swaggy_splashy [info] Hi I am new here. This sub is awesome. I am on day 10 I’ve been struggling for the last 5 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder then. Also was diagnosed with benign twitching syndrome at age 14. I tried an early recovery group aa, naltrexone. Couldn’t stay sober more than five days. Now thanks to my family and another dose of pancreatitis. Yes another. I am at day 10 and am finally feeling normal again. Still some night sweats but the anxiety and twitching I masked with alcohol, the rebound was always worst making me drink again soon after work. It feels good, and you are all an inspiration. Thank you all and good luck. [info] 22 days [info] 1542171387 [info] test
Anonymouse290 [info] Ok, so how do you go about getting a service dog or a therapy dog? I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder,  runs in my family.  I didn't know about this before I joined the army.   Now my anxiety is so bad it's damn near debilitating.   I know ppl probably think it's dumb,  but I can't get up in the morning without getting sick.  I've gone from 136lb to 112lb.  I have been seeing a doctor,  I've asked about it,  but they just keep giving me pills.   Now,  you have to see a specialty psych dr and there's only one place here.   You also have to sign a consent form,  saying that no one else will treat you for mental issues if you are already being seen. (So nothing from your primary physician is allowed). So  I have one place to go and the only thing they say when I ask about a dog is,  "try grounding techniques. " I'm so sick of that.... obviously it doesn't work. [info] None [info] 1556036602 [info] test
sparklingicekiwistra [info] Health anxiety I’ll start off by stating that I have been diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, but am currently not taking any medication. My anxiety has been terrible the last few months. I started having panic attacks which I’d never really suffered with them before. I’ve been skipping classes because I become so anxious when I have to sit still for too long and I start to think too much and stress. Recently I’ve been extremely hyper sensitive to anything that I feel physically. My head has had so much pressure in it and My muscles have been twitching. (Mostly in my toes and sometimes my head jolts) so this made me believe I was going to have a seizure.  earlier this week I left school with a terrible headache which later resulted to me pulling over on the side of the road to vomit. Now I am convinced i have a brain tumor.... I’m just so mentally exhausted from not just being like “oh the pollen count is extremely high I prob had a sinus headache which made me feel sick.” But my thoughts are more like “I have a brain tumor the cancer has probably spread through my entire body and I’ll be dead in 6 months” [info] None [info] 1553787117 [info] train
Treeseconds [info] That description seems like me but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety?  [info] None [info] 1531321324 [info] train
syllu [info] Worked as an administrator at hotel. Told my direct boss that i had panic attacks while working and took what we call a "sick-leave" in Estonia for a couple of days since I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking new medicine. He completely ignored my doctor's orders and wrote a really angry email to me.  [info] None [info] 1531605679 [info] train
Cabbages-and-Queens [info] [Help] Just Adopted My First Dog, My Anxiety is Out of Control I love dogs. I've always wanted a dog. I pet sit frequently. Since moving out of my parents' house in December, I've been planning on getting a dog. I went through the whole adoption process, forms and phone interviews, paid an exorbitant amount of money to a rescue to adopt this critter, and woke up at 6 in the morning to pick the little guy up. He is a 13lb Jack Russell mix. He is so sweet. The way he looks at me is with so much love. He just wants to play and snuggle. I was diagnosed with anxiety three years ago. I take medication, and thought I had everything sorted out. I hadn't had a panic attack in two years. But since bringing the dog home four days ago, I have been in a state of rolling panic. The worst of it was sitting on the corner of my sofa, sobbing and punching myself in the forehead while the dog stared at me. I cry every morning waking up. I wake up in the morning feeling so limp and frantic. My knees and elbows feel like they want to buckle. My hands shake. I can't eat. My throat is constantly clenched. I am having trouble getting work done at my job. I only feel properly safe when the dog is crated. My roommate and my boyfriend have both been trying to help me, taking him out with me and making sure he's got water and food, and trying to make sure he's supervised, not peeing or destroying things. I don't want them to be taking the responsibility for my pet, but I just freeze up. Every time he starts sniffing around, my entire body clenches with fear that he's going to pee. I can't keep him leashed to me because I panic. I don't want to leave him in his crate while I'm with him in the house because that's not right and not fair. The shelter wants me to keep him on lockdown for two weeks, but I need other people. I go totally to pieces when I'm alone. He's a sweet little dog and so good, and mostly all the way trained, but taking care of him just flings me out to sea. I don't know what to do. Part of me wants to keep him as part of my family, and another part of me wants to grab him, put him in the car, and drive screaming back to the shelter. People tell me to give it time to adjust because this is a major lifestyle change. It is, I know that. But didn't think it was going to ruin my mental health like this. I'd feel so guilty bringing him back, and I don't know how to explain it to everyone I told about the dog. I feel like a terrible person who's made a terrible mistake. [info] None [info] 1526487620 [info] train
roleoco [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety order by a doctor (i have to specify since many tell people they have anxiety lately when they don’t know what it is really like)So yeah.. probably a reason why i feel like this [info] None [info] 1561057836 [info] train
djmor [info] Great post, thank you very much for your explanation.What about "fun" things? When you're doing something you find enjoyable, are you able to focus? When I went to college in Biotech, I absolutely loved it. I loved being in the lab, I always memorized every step of everything I needed to do. However, when it came time to writing down lab reports, english papers, math, it would take hours to get a few pages done, even if I did nothing but sit in front of the work. I'd start thinking and writing, and then my imagination would just slip in and start singing music, or slideshows of what I did in the lab, or play situations over and over in my mind and before I realize it ten minutes passed by and I'm only a sentence further. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues, and I hear that those are often symptoms. Unfortunately, my anxiety meds that would quiet the voices would also cause me to become incredibly lethargic, enough that my creativity was stifled and I was unable to write anything other than short robotic sentences.I find it quite insulting that people would claim you had "an easy button" for work. But that's the nature of humans, they don't normally understand something without living it themselves. Mental disorders are horrible and complex things, and being "lucky" enough to have to take ritalin, or in my case valium, is a common thought for people who have no qualms abusing prescription drugs. In a way, it's also unfortunate that the drugs are so good at what they do that those that don't need it feel they want it. [info] None [info] 1402318091 [info] train
Vermacian55 [info] Just diagnosed with NOT having ADHD, what now? I have been speculating for the past 3 years whether or not I have ADHD, and after half a year of sessions with a psychiatrist I am diagnosed with anxiety (and maybe avoidant personality disorder if I was older). While I definitely have anxiety, I do not feel like it is the reason for my lack of focus. I am currently in 2 year of university and am now two subjects behind. I have been self-medicating with nicotine with some success, and am basically only able to learn the subjects close to the exam date.I do not really know what to do now, as I have been kinda fixated on getting adhd medication to see if they help me. I am sort of planning on quitting nicotine and then basically see if I am even able to study in the next semester. Sort of like "I told you I had ADHD, look at me failing all these subjects!", but at the same time that feels stupid and is self-destructive.I do not know why I am writing this, as you guys can't really diagnose me... I just needed to talk about it with someone... [info] None [info] 1545067579 [info] train
LupeTheKiller [info] [HELP] Understanding purpose of medicine: Geodon and Lamictal I went to the doctor today and I've been diagnosed with anxiety and obsessive and delusional thoughts. I was on Seroquel but I asked to switch cause of the weight gain. He told me that seroquel is the only medicine certified to treat the ups and downs, so I need to take two medicines. He said to think of it like an Oreo. I need medicine controlling my highs and lows in order to meet in the perfect middle. He prescribed me geodon, which I've read is the best for weight gain, and lamictal. He was kinda frustrated about my request and didn't believe seroquel effects metabolism. Anyways, can anyone explain the time of the two medicines in simple terms. Does one help lift my mood, while another control my mood/thoughts from spiraling out of control? Any advice would be greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1405632249 [info] train
StuckInBed4Ever [info] I had my Gall Bladder removed when I was 12 after two or so years of chest pains. A few months later I had the same pains.I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years after my surgery. [info] None [info] 1571428483 [info] valid
bk513 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 14. I’m sure I do have anxiety, but it took until my senior year of high school for a doctor to say i might have ADHD. I’ve had trouble with time management and focusing since I was 6 years old, but I was always led to believe I was just a “slow worker.” I’ve never had problems with hyperactivity and I had good grades, so I guess that made it harder to see. Most of my anxiety stems from issues that have been caused by ADHD this whole time. Sometimes I wonder if I would have anxiety at all if I was diagnosed with ADHD as a kid. [info] None [info] 1548874515 [info] train
girlwiththebeetattoo [info] I'm not sure how this would hurt your app? Schools won't have access to your medical records. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was a non-issue because I didn't have to disclose it anywhere. If its really something you're struggling with, you should seek out a diagnosis and help, because its better to treat things like this early than to wait for it to get worse.  [info] MS1 [info] 1536799756 [info] train
idontknowanymooooore [info] Magnesium! I was diagnosed with anxiety but, really, years later as things got worse it came to light that the blood circulation through my left shoulder was being constricted (thoracic outlet syndrome) due to repetitive stress injury. It caused vague nausea that progressed to anxiety "for no apparent reason." Magnesium did wonders! Massage fixed the rest.   [info] vegan newbie [info] 1437851135 [info] train
MrsTheJones [info] Never apologize. This is what this subreddit is for. I'm a woman too and I know exactly how you feel. And the multiple headaches? Yup, I've had a headache every single day since I was diagnosed with anxiety a year ago. This subreddit is here anytime you need to vent.  [info] None [info] 1406094087 [info] train
thatsnuckinfutz [info] Any advice on trying to gain a lil bit of weight? Ok so let me start by saying I have not officially been diagnosed with ARFID reasoning is because my therapist is trying to give me a chance to get my eating (or lack thereof in my case) under control before sending me to an ED therapist. She agrees I definitely have it but that's not her specialty. I'm in therapy as part of a rehab program due to an injury unrelated to my eating habits however it came up as a concern since I've lost weight due to me restricting my food. I'm already slim so dropping more than 10lbs is very noticeable on me.Here's the issue, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and the more anxious I am the less likely I am to eat anything. For ex: I was stressed about my day so all I had was iced tea and 2 cookies for the day. I'm a vegetarian and also very picky, it's getting worse oddly enough. Is there any suggestions that those of you who are managing this better might have for me? I know it's not an easy fix but idk I don't really know where to start and I don't know anyone who struggles with these type of things. I'm trying to plan my meals but it's not going well lol [info] None [info] 1564006534 [info] train
barelyonhere [info] It would depend on the severity of their disorders. I was diagnosed with anxiety (by a real doctor) and have mostly just learned to live with it. I have days where it's a but much, but I don't do medication.Fun fact: every medication the military gives you for anxiety apparently makes sex *really* hard, and not in the good way.   [info] None [info] 1466953515 [info] valid
olioster [info] Thank you for the reply. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so this makes sense. Research time! [info] None [info] 1528914014 [info] train
jcannawithya [info] No longer doing this, but when I was in uni, I’d commute for 2 hours to go to school, then after a full day of school, I’d do the two hour commute back.. just to rush back so I could attend officer’s meeting, choir practice, bible study, etc. I was at church almost every day for some kind of event. By the time I got home, I’d have to choose between doing my homework, sleeping, or eating.. I’d usually chose homework first, sleep second. I ended up loosing about 20% of my body weight before I got into grad school and moved out of my parent’s house. Not healthy, and my grades definitely suffered.  If anyone else is resonating with the statement above, I’d recommend readjusting some of these priorities or reaching out for help!! I was diagnosed with anxiety because I was so brainwashed that I would panic if I missed any church events. You are not alone!!! [info] Done with EVM [info] 1556150626 [info] test
kawaiiyummycum [info] You're home alone and you hear a sound, you feel that sinking feeling. You're afraid, you try to calm yourself down, because its all in your head. Right? but you grab onto the closest hard object and listen closer just incase. Your heart pounds and so does your head in unison. It's that feeling but it crawls up on you with no reason. Anxiety is being afraid of nothing, your brain creating chemicals it does not need, your heart beats fast and you feel sick, you sweat and you can't think properly. It's crippling, it's so hard to deal with day in day out. The worst part is few people understand so when you start crying or hyperventilating, people just leave you and point and say things. It's hard, it feels like they are all against you during that small moment. I was diagnosed with anxiety 4 years ago, the medication did not suit my brain chemistry. So I just deal with it. It's difficult, it won't change or go away because I'm sick. It's just who I am.  [info] None [info] 1521952436 [info] train
gateface970 [info] Getting ready to do something I never thought I was capable of! Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 12, it’s ruled my life in one way or another. As a young teen, I had a hard time going out to eat, as I was terrified at the thought of my food not being properly prepared. Traveling was always really difficult, and I’d almost always have panic attacks on the way to the airport, as well as on the first morning of my trip. As a high schooler, I didn’t ever consider going to college out of state, as the idea of being more than three hours from home was too much to handle. In college, studying abroad was always something I dreamed of doing, but I was too afraid to go to another country all alone. I failed a lot in college too- my anxiety stopped me from admitting that I was struggling, even though I knew that I would do better if I just asked for help. I’m 22 now, and in less than seven weeks, I will be packing up my car, driving 1,100 miles away from home, and starting my dream internship. I’ll be living in a new house, in a new state, with people I’ve only talked to a handful of times. I’ll be away from my family, my friends, and my pets for three months. I’m leaving everything I’ve ever known behind, and I couldn’t be more excited! If you told me four years ago that I’d be doing this, I would have laughed. Never in a million years did I think my anxiety would allow me to do something like this! When I received the email offering me this position, I started crying, because I was so proud of myself for the progress I’ve made. I know I’ll still have my anxiety when I’m down there, and I know it won’t be easy, but I refuse to let it rule my life anymore! [info] None [info] 1574241252 [info] train
dirtyhippyguy [info] anxiety help Hey everyone I've been following a few anxiety subreddits for awhile now and I've been having a rough couple of day, I just want to know if anyone else has had a similar experience and how they dealt with it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and it has recently become more of a problem. so in short as ive said ive had a rough couple of days, if I had to boil it down I'm terrified that I'm not going to make anything out of my life, I'm scared I'm going to end up in a dead end job, with no one to love me and be just an over all disappointment to my parents. Today I've been so paralyzed by my anxiety that I couldn't leave my house accept to at least try to get something to drink (nonalcoholic). I'm 24 in my 7th year of undergrad and I'm scared im too dumb to do what i want to. I'm scared I don't know how to be an adult. does anyone else have similar experiences? how did you cope and push past them? [info] None [info] 1539989200
jamagut [info] I used to smoke a shit ton of medicinal weed (20-24% THC), like full joints to myself with no tobacco in them, definitely too much looking at it now lolI figured I might not be able to enjoy weed the way I used to, but I was diagnosed with anxiety as I became a hypochondriac at the peak of my anxiety, I’m back to the way I was now but it was briefly pretty bad. I think I may have given myself a form of PTSD with that experience, is that a possibility?  [info] None [info] 1532158317 [info] train
Ky303 [info] Any tips for anxiety dreams? I apologise of this is a bit long...I have been diagnosed with anxiety for 4 years now and within this past year I noticed I've gotten a lot of anxiety dreams. Now I'm not talking about  nightmares but really bad one can be. Some of the dreams I've had included things such as being late to things, being ignored when warning people of a dangerous situation, not being able to escape a room or building, not being able to get ahold of someone, ect. Every time I have one I'm mostly able to handle it but it mostly sets in anxiety for the rest of the day. It's never bugged me too badly till last night when I had one that included me having multiple anxiety attacks and a family member getting hurt. Does anyone else have this? If so does anyone know some tips on how I can calm down after waking up from one? [info] None [info] 1534226943 [info] valid
potterssuperhero [info] Volcanos.I was 100 percent convinced my house was built on an undiscovered volcano. Thanks "Volcano".I was also terrified of my house burning down to the point where I would get up four to five times before bed to double, triple, quadruple check the stove was off.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a teen. [info] None [info] 1567319254 [info] train
HaxusPrime [info] Hake taken Wellbutrin/Bupropione for 3 days So I haven't been diagnosed as ADHD yet but will next appointment. I had to fill out a questionaire in order for me to be diagnosed. So I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed wellbutrin. The wellbutrin has helped with anxiety, hyperactivity and focus. However, I feel like a zombie on this stuff. I feel tired and don't have the increase in motivation that I think adderall might give me. Due to me feeling and becoming a zombie. My dad literally said I was a ghost or zombie when I took it. I was initially surprised that wellbutrin would help adhd symptoms because I never even heard of it nor it isnt officially an adhd medication. However, it is designed to work on the same exact neurotransmitters as adderall! Norepinephrine and Dopamine! Also, studies show that wellbutrin works just as well as adderall for adult adhd! I was excited when I heard this.At the end of the day though I don't want to feel like a zombie and feel tired yet not feel the need to actually sleep. So I stopped it 4th day in. I believe from my results, adderall will be a better alternative giving me all wellbutrins benefits plus giving me the awake feeling that wellbutrin doesn't give me. [info] None [info] 1526773124 [info] test
imconfusedhelpp [info] I was having a panic attack and for the first time, my sister actually thinks that it would be best for me to go to the doctors. I have shit attendance and their gonna give my parents a fine because if we don’t show medical proof why my attendance was shit so would they let my parents off if I was diagnosed with anxiety (if I do actually get diagnosed) because that’s the main reason why I miss(ed) school.Edit: The second line did NOT make sense sorry but idk how to fix it I don’t wanna use my brain to hardSecond edit: I just need to get rid of the words ‘of’ and ‘that’.Third edit: It still doesn’t make sense lmao Fourth edit: Why tf am I writing out my edits? [info] None [info] 1562830287 [info] valid
TimeWasting992 [info] I have quite bad anxiety, can this lead to other health problems that aren't necessarily mental? For example, I have been diagnosed with anxiety (only anxiety), but I find that I now have other problems, like vertigo (diagnosed today, only happens when I'm calm and relaxed), I've also ended up with pleurisy in the time since the anxiety diagnosis... basically, is my anxiety causing these things or am I just unlucky with my health? [info] None [info] 1570795369 [info] test
EvilSeaWitch [info] Then I don't.        I was diagnosed with anxiety almost 15 years ago. I don't bend for other people anymore.      The hardest thing for me is going to a doctor of any kind. If the idea of going is too much, I reschedule.           Don't let anyone pressure you. You know your limits. There's nothing wrong with taking a pass to protect your mental health.  [info] None [info] 1544770603 [info] train
MightyShiba [info] Good on you for going to therapy, that's a great step. I was diagnosed with anxiety during college so I understand feeling overwhelmed or just down in general. Try going hiking and visiting lakes and stuff. Being by yourself isnt a bad thing and being able to enjoy your own company will invite others in. Try talking to people at the lake or at a place you like, open up and invite some people to just hang out. It's a process for sure [info] None [info] 1556728709 [info] test
HamiltonLBBH [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. I'll have to schedule an appointment. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1567238818 [info] valid
Feifaye [info] Feeling intimidated by speaking up in big classes Last fall, I transferred into a big university (30,000+ students) from a community college where all my classes had maximum 40 people in it - usually way less. It’s been pretty nice and I enjoy my school life here, but I’ve noticed that I’ve developed an inability to speak up in these large lecture classes. My heart starts pounding out of my chest and I start feeling really hot.Now, I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, but in general I used to be generally fine in this type of environment. I like sharing what I have to say and discussing with my peers, but it’s a lot scarier now I suppose. I even had a professor who asked me why I was so quiet in class when I was so thoughtful in my written responses, and it made me feel bad since I do want to contribute more.Has anyone dealt with this before? If so, how did you do it? [info] None [info] 1581057871 [info] train
captaincupcake234 [info] Heya, I also read some of your other posts on here. This one really stuck out to me:&gt;Well for one I don't know what I want to do anymore. I was in nursing school when I had my injury but I look back and am like "why the hell would I want to be a nurse. I'm a jerk" lol but there are things I want to do, but I don't really know what I'm capable of doing.&gt;I'm just a completely different person than I was then. Although I still relate to a lot of nurses and nursing students.&gt;Secondly, my friends all either graduated college or moved away. I've tried reaching out but I just don't feel relatable with them anymore and they most likely feel the same about me. I'll be real.&gt;There just feels like a whole lot of bs in my way and I don't know how to fix it.Six years ago I was in a sort of similar spot as you, so I'm going to post my story. It's really long so you don't have to read it. I'm hoping you can glean something out of it if you do read it. All I want to do is help, maybe provide some advice because when I was going through my ordeal, I wish there was someone who could have been at my side for me. Anyway, I was in my 3th year of undergrad as a microbiology major. My goal was to get to medical school but I wasn't feeling it. All of my life my parents and family (I'm Korean-American) told me I had to become a doctor so it was ingrained inside of my mind that I needed to become a doctor. Becoming a doctor also resonated with my love for helping people. At the time my ultimate goal was to work establish a Doctor's Without Borders presence in North Korea (where I'm pretty sure lost parts of my family still reside, they were separated during the Korean War). From age 13 to 21 I dedicated my life to taking pre-med classes (like chem, calc, physics, ALL the Biology), making pre-med students (yes even in HS). I read books on becoming a doctor, watched TV shows on doctors, etc. When I began undergrad this feeling started to wear off. I hated all of my pre-med classes, I didn't know why I had to slave through them. I began to fail all of them. My pre-med friends were soaring through these classes and I didn't understand how they were doing it. My pre-med friends somehow got jobs at biology labs and were excelling at them (some even got published as early as their junior year). I began to ask myself "do I really want to become a doctor? Or was it something forced on me? If I don't become a doctor, then what can I do? I'm not good at anything else? What's the point of life if I cannot become a doctor?" At this point I had also ruled out other medical professional fields like becoming a pharmacist, dentist, or nurse. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on Citalopram that year.The hard part was, I could still mostly relate to my pre-med friends and friends in med-school. Like them, I wanted to use science to help people and make a difference in the world. But my drive to become a doctor had fizzled out. I tried reaching out to them but I discovered that I couldn't relate to them any more. If I asked for advice all they told me were variations of: Oh you're just hitting a rough spot, you'll get through it, I know I did; maybe take some time off?; just man up, we're all suffering here, just do it; maybe become a pharmacist, dentist or nurse. They just didn't get what I was going through. The worst part was, no one told me something like "maybe becoming a Doctor isn't for you, maybe look at another thing to go into? Here let's take a look at other options outside of medicine." So at this point I didn't know what else I was capable of and there was a lot of BS in my way and I didn't know how to fix it. A part of me still wanted to become a doctor, but I didn't want to do it anymore. On top of all this, I had ALOT of parental and family pressure from home to become a doctor. Anything else would have literally brought shame to the family. I'm not kidding about this, I know it's very stereotypical of Asian American families, but I was from one of those stereotypical Asian American families. I can go on-and-on about this, but that's another story. Anyway, I had been lying to my family about my grades. All they wanted from me was to get to med school. To tell my family I was failing my pre-med courses and/or losing my desire for med school would have devastated my them, they would most likely yell at me for hours over the phone, humiliate me, tell me I was hurting them, tell me I was selfish, I'm a failure at life, I'll die homeless and poor, just guilt trip me into oblivion. The summer before my 3rd year and the following fall semester was when I just gave up on becoming a doctor. I stopped going to all of classes, I slept all day, played board games with friends, played ALOT of video games, did anything that wasn't academic related. Maybe I had cracked? I don't know. I felt like I was only living one day at a time with no plans for the future. I was like this until March of my 3rd year in college. I went on a volunteer summer break trip to a state park in Virginia where I helped construct dams using rocks on the Potomac River and other labor intensive landscaping stuff. Being able to work with the earth while being surrounded by it helped me (yes this will sound super corny) connect to our planet for the first time in 15 years. I say 15 years because the last time I felt this way was when I was 6, that summer my parents took me to the Chicago Field Museum where I fell in love with the volcano and geology exhibits (there was a dark room with a glowing Hawaiian lava flow exhibit that frightened me at first, but I slowly become fascinated by it). Later that summer I took my first nature walk at forest preserve. Flash forward 15 years, back at the state park in Virginia, there were some other volunteers from my school who were geology majors. I overheard them talking about river delta systems while we sat on a bridge that over looked a small sandy river delta emptying out into the Potomac. I was drawn to their conversation as my memories of falling in love with geology and volcano exhibits from age 6. After talking with these geology students I became hooked. When I got back to school I scheduled a visit with the geology dept at my school. All of the professors I talked to were kind and saw in my eyes a passion for rocks slowly reigniting. Switching into geology was easy to do. But psychologically it was difficult. All of my friends told me I was crazy and stupid for changing to a completely different major during the spring semester of my 3rd year. People told me things like "just suck it up and finish your degree, you only have 1 more year", "it'll be a waste of your parents' money", and the worst "how selfish of you to waste your education like that, if you wanted to do geology you should have started as a freshman!". I also knew I had to tell my parents what I was about to do, and they would not take it kindly. Remember all of the things I wrote earlier on what I thought my family would do if I told them I had lost interest in becoming a doctor? Well it all happened on a Sunday in April when I finally made the call. I didn't talk to my family for 2 months. But at that point I had already decided to become a geologist no matter what anyone else told me, I had to right to be selfish about my life by that point because my passion to become something had been re lit. Now this didn't mean things got easier for me. From then until now things have been difficult. I barely finished my geology degree, wasn't sure what geology subfield I wanted to get into, had to suffer the reality of student loans, deal with the BS my family gave me for giving up becoming a medical professional, took 3 years off and worked for AmeriCorps, then finally somehow got into grad school for geology where I am now. Currently I am stressed beyond belief about my grad program, but I know I have the drive to force myself through the stress because I'm passionate about it. So long story short, it takes a lot of time for someone to discover a new passion for something when their old passion fizzles out. My story is vastly different from yours because I never had a severe brain injury that completely changed my life. But our stories are also related because I went through a phase of confusion and disillusionment and I wanted you to know you're not alone. I read you loved hiking and snowboarding with friends. Keep on doing that. If you love it and makes you happy, don't stop. Life is more than just having a career. I know that's a corny phrase, but it's true. And I deeply wish one day society will change where life experiences are valued over how much money someone can make. Finally, a little shameless pitch for you to consider pursuing geology. You seem like someone who loves the outdoors. Ever wonder how the mountains you snowboard on formed, study geology. Ever wonder why some mountains are volcanic and some are not, study geology. Ask any question about how a natural vista formed and geology will be able to provide fascinating answers. Come drop by /r/geology if you're interested. Lot's of nice people there who can answer any questions. And if any one is a jerk to you there, they'll be met with angry geologists armed with rock hammers, dynamite, and bottles of acid (we drop acid on limestone to see if it fizzes, helps us determine if a rock is limestone or not). I hope all of this helped. If you want any advice or have questions (about anything, us geologists do more than just look at rocks all day), feel free to reply to this comment or PM me.  [info] None [info] 1444243312 [info] valid
Butthole_Berserker [info] Anxiety and Adderall I was diagnosed with anxiety over 12 years ago, in my mid 20s.  Recently ive finally started visiting a psychologist.  One night i was up and couldnt sleep so i made a list of all the things that make me anxious.  Turns out 90% of them are the same as ADHD symptoms.  Anyway, after 12+ years on lexapro/xanax they want to try adderall and im extremely anxious about being put on a stimulant.  Is it possible to have both GAD and ADHD?  Do any of you have experince with anything similar?  Thanks! [info] None [info] 1486520845
sonicfreak360 [info] Hi op, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and keto have been my life saver! The reason simple Carbs help with anxiety is because of how sugar acts as a comfort food. Keep calm and keto on, because keto starts to be more comforting than comfort foods and simple Carbs!  [info] None [info] 1453137649 [info] train
obladi- [info] To completely simplify the whole situation and get down to the basics: you should never be with someone who doesn’t want you to feel your absolute best at all times.I was diagnosed with anxiety long before I started dating my boyfriend. He doesn’t suffer from any mental health issues whatsoever and sometimes has difficulty in understanding how I’m feeling when I’m at my worst, but he is ALWAYS supportive and does anything he can to be present and sympathetic when I need him. Everybody deserves that. You deserve that, OP. If you’re struggling and there’s an option for you that could potentially improve your health and quality of life, fuck whoever wants to keep you from going down that path.  [info] None [info] 1533360579 [info] train
ConfessionStation [info] My mother's hall BACKSTORY: I'm from a country in the Balkan peninsula. I am diagnosed with anxiety, which is sadly very common today. My mom lives abroad and is currently facing some financial, professional difficulties. I am very close to her, despite living so far away and I am very saddened and stressed out about her situation, and I'm unable to help her out and it drives me crazy.In a dream I had, two nights ago, I was in a tall room, with dimly lit arched ceiling. At first on the linoleum floor there were few small stacks of gold and treasure. The golden coins seemed old and faded. Then there were books. From old, leather bound tomes to some cheap paper back books printed in the 80ies. The paper back books, looked like textbooks and instruction manuals of sorts. I explored the room, and in the middle of it there was an old plaid 70ies style couch with small tables and lamps on either sides. There I found a black rope with big, dice sized black lettered cubes. (like those lettered cube beads but bigger). They formed a word but I could not read it for some reason. I was notified by an inner voice that "ALL THIS BELONGS TO YOUR MOTHER". All of this did not amaze me or amuse me. Neither the sight of treasure, nor anything else.And as I was fixing to leave, a large panel opened, containing filigree jewelry of all shapes and sizes, most made in the traditional Balkan and middle eastern way. Then I woke up. Any interpretation would be welcome. Thanks guys! [info] None [info] 1547992731 [info] train
LindemannO [info] Haha I was diagnosed with anxiety and desperation a couple of months back. It definitely doesn’t help my situation, and in fact, it probably holds a lot of weight as to why I am feeling this way. Thanks very much for your detailed comment - and I’m truly sorry to hear you suffer as well - I hope you’re doing okay. :) [info] None [info] 1528821899 [info] train
JessicaRoyy [info] I do this all the time. Certain sentences get stuck in my head too and I get frustrated trying to remember it exactly as it was said or what I should have said. It only started after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I figure that's what it is. [info] None [info] 1548510529 [info] train
SquidYurt [info] Hi everyone,So a back story: for the last 6 years I have had a strong feeling of brain fog and fatigue and I am now trying to put things right. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and was on Citalopram for around 5 years, but during this time the brain fog still persisted, despite the anxiety symptoms lessening somewhat. I have now been off of any medication for 2 months but still feel exhausted and apathetic from the moment I wake up to when I sleep at night. I went for a blood test last week but it came back fine. Is there anything on this test that I should be looking into, or anything else that could help?For the last few days I've also been supplementing Vitamin B Complex, Vitamin D3 &amp; Magnesium. I'm only 26 years old and have no real cause of stress in my life to make me feel exhausted. Any advice or suggestions of what to say to my doctor or any other routes to go down would be greatly appreciated, as this is affecting my ability to work and my relationship. Edit: Just to add, I have tried CBT three times, which made no difference to my fatigue or brain fog, so I am leaning towards it being a physical issue. [info] None [info] 1499019687 [info] valid
theoneeyedpete [info] After I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was very much like this.  I think that was the turning point of us going from constantly having sex to weekly-ish.  Now, I have the higher labido which is infuriating as I don’t feel we’d have lost that rhythm if it hadn’t been me ruining it in the first place!But, it’s good you’ve got others to satisfy you! [info] None [info] 1524179743 [info] valid
jesssrhee [info] I think I have tinnitus? Hi everyone, I’m 21 and am in college rn. Just as a background before I get into things: I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago, but it’s been a lot worse these last two months. It’s always the worst when I go to bed because I have an irrational fear that something bad will happen while I’m sleeping. Over the last two months, random aches and pains in my body set off my anxiety into thinking there was something wrong with me, when in fact there was not. So, this brings me to last Sunday when I heard a faint ringing noise in my left ear as I was trying to fall asleep. This immediately set off my anxiety, and I became paranoid about what I was hearing. Suddenly I felt as if I was hearing a faint ringing noise. Eventually I was able to fall asleep and when I woke up I didn’t hear the ringing. As the week progressed, it felt like every night when I tried to go to sleep, the silence was too loud. Last night, I only got about 1.5 hours of sleep, because it seemed that the ringing was louder. I don’t know if it’s my mind playing tricks on me since my anxiety tends to do that, or if I do have tinnitus. The ringing seems to be very noticeable at night. During the day I can only hear it if it’s quiet and I’m focusing on the sound.I’m starting to freak out that it might be tinnitus. I recently started taking anxiety medication and have a fear that may have caused it. Also, I’ve abused the volume on my earbuds/headphones for way too long now, and am thinking that may have caused this.I’m mostly just writing this for sanity lol, but also to get some insight from others in this group. I plan on meeting with my doctor to get things checked out.Thanks so much for reading! [info] None [info] 1581768729 [info] train
ackthisisamess [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however I also find it a bit difficult to understand where the line is between "normal" and not-"normal" anxiety.... I personally see it as a bit nuanced? [info] None [info] 1569980247 [info] train
mrtrollstein [info] I wouldn't go. Simple as that. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I have asthma anyway so I couldn't be picked,  but even if I was, nope, cya, bye. I'm a scrawny anxiety filled woman whose coping mechanism is drawing cute fluffy pictures on myself while I hide behind my long hair, which I would not cut off for anything.I would rather be homeless in Canada than in the military. [info] Erin - 21 - MtF HRT 8/22/17 [info] 1505343206 [info] train
dora_not_the_explora [info] During college I went to see my doctor about some stomach pains and breathing problems. She told me there was nothing wrong with my stomach and that it was all in my head, and that I was having breathing issues "because my lungs were resting on my spine and rib cage in a way where a rib would poke my lungs to tell me I needed to sit upright and breathe". Wtf? I was a biology major and took only one anatomy class and knew that wasn't it. I went to a different doctor and turns out I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS. When I told her about what the last doctor said she had the same "wtf" look on her face I did.Reading everyone's comments, can someone tell me how the hell these kinds of people make it into medical school? And make it past medical school? It genuinely worries me that the med school interview process isn't doing anything to omit these idiots from making it through and potentially killing people from incompetence.  [info] None [info] 1534264057 [info] train
AggravatingCupcake0 [info] I've definitely experienced some of the same issues as your wife. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and my PCP and I suspect I may have ADD although my psychiatrist refused to formally diagnose me with it for stupid reasons. What happens is, you have a task or two to do. Then one day you don't get anything done because you went on a trip into the city, or had a day out with friends, etc. Then the task or two has doubled and now you suddenly have four tasks. Ok, so you try to tackle the four tasks in a day, but you only manage to get one done. The next day comes, now you have five tasks. And very quickly, it reaches a point where you have so much to do that it's overwhelming and through flawed logic you figure it's better to do nothing at all than try to plow your way through this mountain of tasks that lie before you because you'll never finish them anyway. I suspect that maybe your wife is going through this as well? So, on to solutions: I went to a therapist for a while, and while I don't do this all the time it does help when I do - he told me to schedule out my days in advance. As in, make an hour-by-hour list of things to do, and give a finite amount of time to each task. For example, your wife can say "Ok, tomorrow I'm going to pack my Etsy sales for two hours. At the end of two hours, that's it. I move on to the next task that I have scheduled." This way, she gets stuff done - it may not be as much as she hoped, but it's something, and makes things more manageable and less daunting than going "Ok, I have to get ALL these Etsy items packed TODAY" and feeling exhausted and defeated after four hours of packing and having gotten nothing else done. It also puts pressure on her to finish her tasks in a timely manner. Perhaps you guys can work out a schedule for her like this? I know that when I employ this method I'm like "Oh shit, I got five things done in two hours instead of the one thing I would have normally gotten done."  [info] None [info] 1543320419 [info] train
anasasis0321 [info] Is it normal to pretend that the worst possible outcome is happening/has happened even though there are no real signs of it being true? I’ve noticed that I work myself up, thinking about the worst possible outcomes of situations. For example, I pretend my mom is dying/dead, like she passed in a terrible way, and believe it’s true for a few moments and end up crying for a while. It’s like I’m preparing myself so I won’t grieve as much when it actually DOES happen, and I won’t be totally surprised. Its like I catastrophize everything. I think about my boyfriend leaving me, although our relationship is very calm and comfortable. We communicate extremely well, and there’s no “red flags” that indicate even in the slightest way, that our relationship is headed down a bad path. I think that isn’t a very good thing to do, because it means I’m telling myself lies, and I’m not paying attention to reality, and I don’t want my fears to dictate how I really act in real life. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so maybe this is normal because of that? I have no idea, I’m just wondering if anybody else does the same. [info] None [info] 1553704167 [info] valid
rationalomega [info] You're my fiancée! Well, I was her in senior year and my husband was you. I was/am pretty "Type A" and I would drag him to the library, make him get off slashdot, and put down the damn phone. He still barely graduated after failing a necessary class (somehow the prof passed him anyway after I wrote to her begging). I also made friends with the other people in his major.  Basically I was absurdly micromanaging his academic career. It was exhausting and after graduation I was diagnosed with anxiety. But he got through the major with almost a 3.0 If a court ever asks, I am absolutely entitled to half his earnings at least!  [info] None [info] 1446000837 [info] train
Combine5 [info] Medication? Hi, I was just diagnosed with anxiety even though I've had a feeling for about 3-4 months now. I'm going to talk the a psychiatrist soon to talk about medication I might take. Just wanted to ask if anyone knows any medication that doesn't make you feel weird? Feeling unusual is one of my big stressors. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1389297871 [info] train
GnomeMadness [info] I had the same thing happen to me with the sunlight. As the sun was setting and I was in the shaded area, I felt like I needed to run to catch up with where the light was still shining. Also, the breathing part sounds like minor hyperventilating. I can only say that I was diagnosed with anxiety having experienced what you describe.Don't freak yourself out trying to diagnose yourself with anything further because everyone finds something if they start researching symptoms. It's hard to not think all sorts of things to worry yourself about everything you feel, but do your best not to.  Just talk to your doctor, and if he/she thinks it's anxiety, they will point you in the right direction, probably to a therapist.  [info] None [info] 1531053432 [info] train
Lordkeravrium [info] I never said it does. And if you look down upon me that much why do you feel you need to go and be an ass? Also, you didn't read the comments of that post either. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 8 and I've had it my whole life. I'm not attempting to say I'm entitled. You just don't need to go and be hella rude about me making a tiny ass mistake. It doesn't affect you in any way.  [info] None [info] 1546039406 [info] test
geekybrunette [info] Really poor body image after changes over past year From about age 16-22 I was consistently 120-125lbs, size 1, 34C. I had a slim build, with average muscle. I ate healthy but didn't make a point of exercising. I was also using estrogen-based birth control during this time. A year ago, I moved to a new city and got a new family Dr. She asked me more about my medical history, and since I get migraines with aura, took me off estrogen-based birth control. I then spent 5 months using no birth control while waiting to get a Mirena IUD inserted.  During this time, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Around the time that I was diagnosed, I underwent extremely rapid weight gain of about 20lbs in 6 weeks. I am still unsure if this was due to going off of the previous birth control, the anxiety itself, or the anxiety medication. When I went on the Mirena 6 months ago, I also went up to a 34D. I am now off of anxiety meds for a couple months now,  and am going to counselling for anxiety, and have been eating extra healthy and trying to exercise 3 times a week. I still have not lost any weight/fat at all, and my boobs often feel swollen and tender.  The changes to my body have completely rocked the my body image. I feel very chubby, and many of my clothes no longer fit. I have lost my sex drive as well, as I just don't feel attractive and my boobs hurt half the time. I don't know what to do. I feel like there is something hormonal (either sex hormones or stress hormones) keeping me from being able to lose weight. I know it sounds shallow, but it's actually so upsetting to me...like to the point that I cry about it like twice a month aha. Does anyone have any advice for either getting my body back, or at least regaining some body confidence? [info] ❤ [info] 1470105233 [info] valid
icantfindaun [info] Among other things I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years back but I hated how the meds made me feel. Yes there's days where it's bad but overall I've learned to manage it. Exercise, eating right, trying to get at least 7 hours of sleep every night, and having a mentally and physically challenging job have been the keys for me but everyone is different. If you're having trouble please reach out. Even if it doesnt feel like it there's people around you who care. [info] None [info] 1531750031 [info] valid
doctorwhom456 [info] I was thinking that too, but if my aunt picked up on it, she didn't tell me. Is it weird that I see a lot of myself in Rimmer? Not really 1 or 2 or 8 Rimmer, but once he started getting less annoying and his neuroses really came out I felt like I saw myself on screen. Considering I probably have OCD and wouldn't be surprised if I was diagnosed with anxiety, this isn't too far off... [info] None [info] 1533093332 [info] train
SgtZabka [info] The old anxiety problem Hey /r/AskLEO so about 2 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. At first it was bad, and I was given a mild anti-anxiety medication to use at night, every night, for 2 weeks. Well since then I have had very mild anxious episodes now and then (could go months with out having one) at random, but I can still function through them. About 4 months ago, my GP wrote me a script for a stronger anti-anxiety drug, Lorazepam, for those 'emergency situations', luckily I have never had to use them. Since then, I have been working in the Loss Prevention field in a somewhat violent city and have had no problem confronting shoplifters or 'throwing down' when the time calls for it. Now that I have had some college and security experience, I want to continue on my career into law enforcement so my questions are, should I follow my dream of being a cop even though I have mild anxiety time to time, and will the agency accept me with that inconvenient medical history?Thanks for your help! [info] Aspiring LEO [info] 1431821580 [info] train
Tatasmmm [info] Labor attorney HR questions I was just laid off by my employer reason was paperwork that I never filled out. It's a medical device company. Nothing life threatening. The day of the incident I had a panic attack unbeknownst to me. I had never had one before but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm on medication for it. It's also documented in my medical work profile. I had 2 interviews with the HR department and I was still freaking out about and I really had no answers. Any chance of getting my job back? [info] None [info] 1584973985 [info] train
ThatGuyNoOneRemember [info] Vision problems Age: 20 Sex: Male Height: 5'9 Weight: 160 Ethnicity: Hispanic For a little context, this problem started about two weeks ago. I spent the past year (since last August) worrying, obsessing, fearing over my health. And just recently have I been able to finally accept that I don't have certain ailments that I convinced myself were overlooked or missed by my doctors. I've previously gone to my primary doctor(s) and hospital multiple times, done different tests--x-rays, blood tests, urine tests, ekg's--and it's always coming back negative, which includes blood pressure and blood sugar. I was diagnosed with anxiety and vitamin D deficiency. I thought for almost a year that I had diabetes, but after so much denial I come to terms that I don't have diabetes. Whenever I stand up it feels like my vision is going black and I'm about to pass out, I see these white floating stars and like a blue dot in the corner of my eye or a streak if I stare too long at a light source. Sometimes it feels like my heartbeat is nonexistent but when I calm down, stand up and feel my chest, my heart is beating like normal.My diet is poor. I just barely started eating again, and when I do it's usually a burger or chips. But I'm eating sandwiches now, and soup and drinking almond milk. I drink plenty of water, but I don't work out or exercise. Please help. [info] None [info] 1564632889 [info] train
jakalarf [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety not to long ago, I didn't even know that there was anything wrong with me, I don't even know how long I've had it. So i guess it doesn't effect me in any way i notice. [info] None [info] 1435552892 [info] train
JimsSFWaccount87 [info] Anxiety and low self worth are ruining my life I've reached a point where I need to reach out and ask for help and advice. I'm in a 2-year relationship, heading towards a wedding in November. I love my fiance more than words can describe. If she were religion I'd convert is what I usually say. But at the same time I'm so terrified of losing her. It's driving me crazy and I think it's driving her crazy too.Absolutely horrified that eventually she's going to realize that she's not happy with me and either leave me or stay and be miserable. That I'm somehow not what you thought I was and that she's hitched herself up to be unhappy. I just can't think of 0 reasons why she would want to be with me. I don't have high opinion of myself at all.This is something that's always in the back of my find it but sometimes it's better than others. This morning I woke up and it was so intense I broke down crying in front of her. It set off because last night she wanted to mess around and I was too tired oh. I didn't want to disappoint her though so I didn't tell her to stop and as a result we had a rather disappointing sexual experience. So I felt doubly ashamed and upset. On the one hand up I was upset that I had satisfied her but I was also upset that I hadn't been in the mood when she wanted me to be. I should point out that she's not pressuring me or telling me anything bad about me. She told me that I don't need to worry so much about it. But I just can't stop.A big part of this stems from a previous relationship I had that was very long term it emotionally abusive. The woman I was with made it very clear over a long. Of time that she wasn't happy but she still stayed with me and I was so afraid of being alone that I stayed as well. All the while knowing that I was the cause of her unhappiness. She never stopped telling me. I was just terrified that is going to happen again.A few relevant pieces of info I've been diagnosed with anxiety, with obsessive compulsive characteristics as well as aspergers and adhad. Currently taking Cymbalta, and adderal. [info] None [info] 1565966102
kateesaurus [info] Honestly that sounds a lot like what happened to me in high school. Teachers called me lazy because I’d miss chunks of class and not know about assignments due to seizures. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and guess what? I don’t actually have either of those or get medicated for them now. Feel free to pm me if you want to talk further but I don’t want to take up your whole post. [info] None [info] 1549033341 [info] test
becbecmuffin [info] Anxiety and ADHD So I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. Today I had a lot of work to get done, so I took one of my as needed adderall. Of course, I forgot to set up my usual system of something to snack on so I don't forget to eat. So I finished working. And then I was starving. And getting too hungry is one of my anxiety triggers. And adderall is a stimulant so my anxiety got bad way fast. So now I'm lying in bed, post-xanax, trying to fall asleep so this hell will end. And I'm just so frustrated that it's so difficult for me to deal with both of these issues. I just had to get that out. [info] None [info] 1525140530 [info] train
doom2286 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd at 8 I am now 19 and no med for 8 years can I join the military? [info] None [info] 1492896629 [info] test
Gopnik_Cat [info] Automatic breathing troubles Hey lads,I'm new to this sub and I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 3 months now,it's been meh until.about 5 hours ago I felt like I couldn't breathe anymore ,and now I can only breathe manually and can't sleep [info] None [info] 1574375940 [info] train
morganafiolett [info] I do this. I get really upset over pointless things. I know I'm doing it. I can't help it.And yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and yes, I have medication to help. [info] None [info] 1538123640 [info] test
bakedgoodslover [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and agoraphobia years ago. I'm doing much better now but still have some places I avoid going. The worst one was restaurant, I didn't eat outside for almost three years, the few times I tried I left the place before I finished my food, sometimes right after giving the order. Thankfully I overcame it, now the worst one is traffic on a busy day. Just last week I almost threw up in a taxi and got dizzy when we got stuck in traffic on a highroad. [info] None [info] 1450189889 [info] train
crazyisthenewnormal [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  Anxiety and insecurity are not the same thing.  And just because I have anxiety doesn't mean I have to let it stop me.  There's therapy, there's medication.  It's okay that you're anxious or scared or insecure, but you can still act anyway.  I've asked guys out even though my stomach was in knots and I was sweating through my clothes and almost threw up.  Some weren't interested and some were and I got less afraid to do it.  I am in control of my life, my anxiety is not. [info] None [info] 1513330652 [info] train
beesbeme [info] Hello! I am not a doctor, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety for most of my life now. What you are describing sounds like a panic attack. You don't necessarily need a specific trigger to have a panic attack. Sometimes it's just the expulsion of pent-up stress, or maybe you do have a trigger but you haven't noticed it. Panic attacks always happen for a reason, but sometimes that reason isn't very clear. Try to remember how you were feeling, what you were doing, and where you were before and during each panic attack. If there are any similarities between each situation then that might be the cause!In my experience, some of my panic attacks come from not breathing enough and having lots of tension, which is something that I've only realized very recently. When I'm stressed or concentrating very hard I tend to take slow and short breaths. The body goes 'woah, that's not enough oxygen,' so it makes you panic. So, whenever I feel a panic attack coming on, I force myself to take a step back from what I'm doing and breathe. A great and easy to remember breathing exercise is to breath in as much as you can, hold for a second, before breathing out slowly. It works 9/10, if I catch it fast enough. Of course, all of that is my personal experience and there's no telling if it will work for you. The best advice I cam give you is to talk to a psychiatrist. Seriously, they will help a lot, even if this is a rare thing. Panic attacks are scary enough without having a support structure. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1536995447 [info] train
Lalaloey [info] I'm terrified. I never thought, I would have to post something like this. First up, I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I have never thought of school as a good place, but honestly, now, it's not hatred, it's fear. I am afraid to go back to damn school. That's something, that really shows what are earth is coming too. Of May 2018, there was 23 fucking school shootings. I honestly, have a genuine fear, someone will burst into my school, aim a gun and shoot. Sure, I've never been the most full of life and all, but this is not how i would want to go. There hasn't been a school shooting in my state....yet. 21 weeks into 2018, and on average there would be 1 school shooting a week. My only question, is what is the president doing about this? Oh, no sorry. NOTHING. Should I be scared for my life going to a place where I am supposedly supposed to learn and grow? Honestly, If a school shooting does happen, and someone I care about, dies because our fucking government isn't doing anything, I'm not sure i'll be able to live anymore. I'm so scared...and honestly, August, 26th, yes so recently, there was a mass shooting in florida, what the hell is america coming too? I might be dead before, I even get to college, or sooner. [info] None [info] 1535353080 [info] train
OpSecLead1 [info] The Wonderful Dr. Lloyd Had a great visit with Dr. Lloyd from Veriheal today. I haven't been to a doctor in 5+ years and talked about this upon first meeting Dr. Lloyd. By the end of the visit, I was diagnosed with anxiety and told him that if all doctors were as friendly, caring, and funny, I'd visit them more. Total time from walking in the front door of the office building to walking out the same door was 9 minutes. I'd be happy to answer any questions anyone may have. But, there really shouldn't be many. Just book Veriheal at KOP or Allentown (I think Dr. Lloyd even does Philly for them) and you'll meet the best doctor you've ever seen. [info] None [info] 1567810526 [info] train
NCTrumpFan [info] Does anyone else use desipramine? Hi. I was diagnosed with anxiety with obsessional features (after getting diagnosed with IBS-mixed). My new PCP gave me 25mg desipramine (once a day before bed). I've had an easier time getting out of bed in the morning and getting on with my day, but I've also been getting constipated. I'm also still my usual self (agonized over a $9 meal at McDonald's, finally ordered, then chickened out after they took so long to get to me, and walked all the way to Dairy Queen). Does anyone else use desipramine? If so, what are your experiences with it? [info] None [info] 1571514412 [info] train
Merchanting [info] I've tried it, and wouldn't recommend it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, and had tried 1mg k-pins and propranolol prescribed for me. The only one that really helped me during high anxiety times was the k-pins, so I pursued other benzos when my doctor got stingy on the prescriptions.I bought 80x 4mg bars because they were cheap af, less than 150 for all. My intentions were 1mg a few times a week, for some chilling and some high anxiety situations. I lost that regimine basically the day I got them. Day one I took a quarter before school. It was nice for my anxiety, and didn't have me fiending for more. Still, when I got home I wanted another quarter for relaxing and sleeping. When I woke up the next day, I was still a bit unrestrained and decided to take another quarter before school again. This cycle of lowering inhibitions and taking even more kept happening. Within a week I was taking halves and skipping class. This ended in me sleeping in late one day, only about a week after buying the bars. I walked in half way through class, and it was a fucking test I had forgot about. Sat outside and filled with social/school anxiety and so I took more bar. I got really depressed and no longer had control of my drug use because I was too emotional. I took a cocktail of drugs/alcohol and ended up getting sent to the drunk tank when I refused an ambulance. This doesn't happen to everyone, but it's not super uncommon either. Xanax is too much too fast for most people. It worked for anxiety, but it's easier than you think to get addicted. Almost a year later and my anxiety is a lot better. Not sure what clicked, but it wasn't from continued benzo use.  [info] None [info] 1541101472 [info] train
JLeww69 [info] Earlier this year I was diagnosed with anxiety after a long conversation with my parents. After two therapy sessions I met with a doctor to discuss what my options were. I explained to her that a few of my friends have anxiety and that they've gone through a variety of different medications with no avail. They were finally prescribed gabapentin which worked the best out of all the medications they had tried. I told her that after researching all of my options I decided that gabapentin would be the best choice for me since I didn't want anything addicting like a benzo or a ssri because of the wd horror stories. She acted like she had never heard of gabapentin before and prescribed me propranolol which doesn't seem to work at all. Prop's main use is to reduce the physical symptoms of anxiety such as rapid heartbeat and sweating which I never even reported experiencing with my therapist prior to the meeting with the doctor... The whole spiel about my friends getting prescribed gabapentin was a lie but I truly did believe gabapentin would be the best option for me. Plus I knew it would be useful for the kratom addiction I had at the time. Oh well. I just had to get all of that off my chest.  [info] None [info] 1506879015 [info] test
ToriBeth214 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I can confirm. My Aunt even asked me how I move my legs so fast, and didn't even realize I was doing it.  [info] None [info] 1511244250 [info] valid
babisaurusREX [info] Yes anxiety can definitely mask symptoms. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, but not until 19 was I diagnosed with ADHD. I started to realize I was anxious BECAUSE I was forgetting things,  running late, procrastinating, unfocused and then trying to catch up in school after I zoned out for entire lectures. I also was a straight A student through high school because I had what I now know to be hyper focus (and a little OCD which I'm happy to say is 99% under control now) on my schoolwork. But that started to change junior year of college and I started barely passing in my major. it is always best to seek the guidance of a specialist, but keep in mind many people don't believe ADHD is real. They think it's that we live in a distracting time or that you want to get amphetamines or whatever. But if it is affecting your life in such a negative way that you can't enjoy most things or your work or school or hobbies or relationships are suffering, you need to do what's best for you! [info] None [info] 1439609708 [info] train
IThinkThingsThrough [info] Ugh, this is always my dilemma. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know that catastrophic thinking is a symptom of it. That makes it really hard to distinguish between "Anxiety-driven hypochondria" and "important alarm bell I'm ignoring."  [info] None [info] 1552179705 [info] test
MemeGoddessAsteria [info] Oef 2 is the lie I have two cats ones named Apollo ones named Salem for 1 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at age 10 and for 3 once a astrology hoe always a astrology hoe [info] :S3Hange: [info] 1564958750 [info] test
DarkKnightCometh [info] Hmm. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and even prescribed Xanax for it... "Lazy" is not the word that comes to mind when I have an anxiety attack. [info] None [info] 1548388451 [info] train
douga_17 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/ocd. My symptoms have dramatically improved since I stopped attending church! The shame from the church was truly hurting me mentally and emotionally. [info] None [info] 1542595285 [info] valid
Artisticbutanxious [info] I always felt that the reason I been feeling tense on my throat is because I'm the type of person who stays quiet and doesn't express how I feel ( I been receiving therapy for this issue). And maybe my throat chakra is unbalanced as well. I seen a video about Theresa Caputo discussing her anxiety during her 20's. In my early 20's I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS, I guess things happen for a reason?Yes, I would like to book a reading with you, I seen your videos before! Please give me the info on now to book it. [info] None [info] 1438979106 [info] train
ItIs430Am [info] I would say go to the DAV, yes. If someone wants to chime in and correct me, by all means, but the DAV is literally there for helping veterans with disability claims. In all facets. At first I was worried about making the switch, but they've made it so much easier. My first representative was the American Legion and my first claim went through pretty fast, but since I moved and was told about the DAV, I have done everything through them. Got my appointments set up and everything has been easy. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and the psychologist who did my evaluation basically confirmed it. With PTSD, I'm sure you will get the correct diagnosis. They wont look at you and think "oh they're lying." Itll be taken very seriously. On that note, and remember this, the evaluation does not mean you will be treated. For disability, you are getting evaluated to confirm your condition. You need to either get referred to or see the VA psychiatrist/therapist (I see the VA ones). They will work with you to determine how often you need to go and what you need to do to be successful down the road.  [info] None [info] 1523117839 [info] train
CrypticEmpress [info] Silence can be nice, if you just wanna hang out that's great you don't have to talk.I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and I'm not so sure that's true anymore but silence can be really comfy and I'm just glad to have you there with me.So people in general, especially those with anxiety, please don't feel like you need to keep coming up with things to say. I enjoy your company regardless :) [info] None [info] 1542946821 [info] train
Abman117 [info] Can brain chemicals be measured Can seratonin and other brain chemicals be measured if so, why aren't psychologists suggesting that we take such a test.Although I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and its been hell. how do you physically prove that I have it. What comes to my mind is irrational but, ( at this point  I stopped writing because I was having a conversation and when I came back I forgot what I was writing damn it. I'll come back to it when I remember lol) [info] None [info] 1499049997 [info] train
CuteThingsAndLove [info] Is it really bad to be addicted to xanax? My doctor and family were all very concerned about me when I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago, and my doctor did give me a prescription of xanax, but made sure my dad didnt give me any unless I absolutely needed it (in full panic attack mode, basically).Now that I'm older, I'm just thinking about it more. When I take the xanax, I feel a type of calmness I never have had in my normal life, its very peaceful. So I always said, I can see why people would become addicted to this, I would take it every day if that wasn't an issue. The bottle of 60 pills he prescribed me at 16/17 is still on my desk at age 22.My question is, how bad is it to become addicted to xanax? What are the side effects of it, is it dangerous, and what are the withdrawal symptoms? Do you become immune to the effects after a while and need to make the dosage larger, or do the effects stay the same?Hopefully someone with first hand experience on it sees this question. I would post this in a medical sub but I much prefer this sub as I feel less embarrassed asking on here.Edit: Thank you everyone for the answers. I wasn't planning on getting addicted to xanax, I was just wondering about the side effects as the people in my life were always very nervous about it without ever really explaining it to me, so I was simply curious. There is addiction in my family so they were incredibly cautious with me. But again, I only very rarely take it.Thank you again! [info] None [info] 1506090986 [info] valid
heyuhhhdrigs [info] This happened to me, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and the abilify made it so bad, it also made my anxiety make me incredibly angry so I was cuddling through aggressive anxiety, to sad boy anxiety. It literally made new ruin my life and destroyed my relationship. You need to talk to your pdoc right away about this because it's not worth staying on it if it's making you gave really bad anxiety [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1566405468 [info] test
Flightxx [info] Advice to Those With Anxiety in Maintaining Relationships? It happens whenever I start to get close with a girl. My anxiety flares up for days thinking about them, and then the paranoia starts. I start thinking actual reasons are excuses. I start feeling that I’ve done something wrong when I haven’t. I usually keep these to myself, but with so many thoughts some are bound to slip out. I know these thoughts are false, but with the absolute worse outcome continuing to surface, j still feel horrible inside. I’ve lost so many friends and interests by doing this, and I just want it to stop. It’s unhealthy for me and unhealthy for the other person. What tips do you have for me to stop this toxicity? I thought I was just crazy until I was diagnosed with anxiety only 2 weeks ago. [info] None [info] 1542470473 [info] test
AwareAerie [info] Yes, just a few seconds, it's gotten a little better today- I was diagnosed with anxiety in December and given a prescription of ten lorazepam tablets, they helped a bit, but made me feel really depressed and out of my head. but haven't gotten any help farther than that, my dad doesn't believe that anxiety is a real thing, and it's made me shy away from seeing a doctor or therapist out of fear that they won't believe me either. [info] None [info] 1562165717 [info] train
Tazbio [info] Thank you for the kind words! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I've started medication, I'm curious to see the difference. I will keep in mind the name of your medication, it sounds very relieving! Thanks again! [info] 7 Days [info] 1505751478 [info] train
Chrispat91 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19. I still struggle with it from time to time, but seeing somebody has been the best decision I have ever made. I still see my guy at least once every 2 weeks, and I can manage the anxiety and paranoia very well. [info] None [info] 1378905691 [info] train
MrsNacho8000 [info] Do you guys think there's something wrong? Hi internet parents,I lost my mom last year and I've been having a really rough time lately. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes I see a therapist, but I'm starting to wonder if maybe something else is wrong.It's a struggle for me to get up in the morning. My alarm will wake me up but I just lay in bed and have no motivation...I wait til the very last second to get up for work, and I do that reluctantly. Every day I consider calling out of work and don't care about getting in trouble.I'm a big girl and I've recently lost 60 lbs, only to put it all back on. I hate myself for it.I used to love going out and doing things, anything really. Now I cancel plans to sit at home in my pajamas.I'm turning 32 next month so I'm not sure if I'm depressed or just getting older. Can any internet parents weigh in here? [info] None [info] 1583750246 [info] train
space_boat [info] This is true but I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Smoking probably doesn't help at all. [info] None [info] 1339640011 [info] valid
YoloReally [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I just didnt see talking as something that would help me. I spent entire summer living in this peripetual state of hell. Magnesium helped control it, but it was still there. I also have insulin resistance. At one point I decided to measure my blood sugar before and after eating sugar. 45 minutes after eating this I got a really strong anxiety attack. It was something that I didnt expect. Over the next week I realized that I would get these anxiety attacks almost 45 minutes after eating something high in carbs/high GI. I researched reactive hypoglycemia and adapted my diet and since that point, I didnt have a single one. Its so weird that this is overlooked by some doctors when bodies reaction to sudden lowering of BG(because hyperinsulinemia in my case) is to produce adrenaline as it then increases BG. [info] None [info] 1514558221 [info] train
ilivearoundtheblock [info] YTA.I was a regular smoker of cigarettes by 16.  (Ocassional drinking and marijuana also in high school but not much by comparison to my peers.)In my FORTIES I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Ohhhhhh.Nobody knew enough then to know I was "self-medicating."  But we sure know enough now, asshole. [info] None [info] 1573361078 [info] train
Fuckingplasticbag [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I really can't stand it when people say they have because it's so "cool and quirky", like, no sir it's a mental illness that can ruin your life. [info] None [info] 1574790468 [info] train
8thful [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have gone through an intensive outpatient program where I learned about an amazing philosophy called ACT (Acceptance and Commitment Therapy). Might be something worth looking into if your worried are getting in the way of enjoying life. [info] None [info] 1477406095 [info] valid
EclipseAnon3 [info] Would this qualify for FMLA? Ended up in ER. Due to work stress and outside life factors the past few weeks have been horrible for me. It progressed from going to urgent care, to primary care, and yesterday I ended up in the ER. I've been at my job for several years and while it has it's stressful moments it's taking a toll on my mental health over the years. Last week I woke up with respiratory issues and went to work the following day. The breathing issues got worse at work and I had to go to urgent care. This had not happened before. Urgent care said tests were normal. I was given an inhaler. Then I went to my doctor and he couldn't find anything physically wrong either. Tests came back normal. I don't have allergies or asthma. I'm relatively healthy, work out a few times a week, watch what I eat. The respiratory issue never really went away and I had a trip planned. On the plane I was having a very hard time breathing, gasping at some points but trying to stay calm while I was freaking out on the inside. But as soon as I walked off I was very fatigued and gasping for air. My ride took me to the ER and they ran all the tests including a CT scan. Could not find anything physically wrong which was frustrating. While at the ER I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks. They said I was hyperventilating from all the stress. I have never had panic or anxiety attacks so this was news to me. I'm dreading going back to work and feel like my mental and physical health are at risk now. How do I proceed with FMLA or do I just suck it up? [info] None [info] 1567139241 [info] valid
AlexasBitch [info] ADHD cause you to be unable to focus, fidget and not really comprehend what you read/hear? Hey I really don’t know much about ADHD but it has been suggested a few times by friends and family members.The only things I honestly know about ADHD is the same as I probably knew when i was like 10 (“ADHD = hyper”) Which I’m sure isn’t accurate...I have been diagnosed with anxietySo maybe symptoms overlap a little and ADHD isn’t something I have, idkBut can you please help me understand if there’s can be symptoms of ADHD or maybe just anxiety• Finding it extremely difficult to behave in classroom settings... even in training at a job (I’m 24) I couldn’t not be silly/misbehave• Not being able to focus on what teacher is saying - You could ask me what she just said I chances are I wouldn’t have any idea• When I read, most of the time of you ask me what I just read, I wouldn’t be able to tell you• interrupting people as they talk - never been aware that I do it before so could just be a bad habit?• Spending money impulsively and in excess • Not being able to control over eating  I could have the thought that I should stop after eating X amount but I’ll always eat the entireIf these are symptoms, is there anything else I should look out for like common symptoms? [info] None [info] 1570032987 [info] train
atruehomie [info] I am a freshman in college. I was diagnosed with anxiety and potentially mild paranoia a few years ago. The paranoia was mostly as a child throughout grade school. [info] None [info] 1400275801 [info] train
kR4in [info] Maybe it isn't the ADHD, but perhaps anxiety? I have been diagnosed with anxiety-panic disorder, inattentive ADHD and massive depressive disorder....and I am not sure what bits and pieces of my life are affected by each one of those [info] None [info] 1567968136 [info] valid
LemonCandy123 [info] Getting back to activities Hi everyone&amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with anxiety in November. I've been in Cipralex since then and just tried to change my dose recently. I have an awful time sleeping being on it so now I'm on sleeping pills.&amp;#x200B;How has everyone gotten back into the groove of doing things? Mainly the gym. I was never really a gym person but I think that is because of my anxiety and I want to get back into it. I'm paying for a membership I don't use.&amp;#x200B;Any tips would be great! [info] None [info] 1560441510 [info] train
AceLibertarian [info] Tips to calm down? New to the sub, and I was just diagnosed with anxiety. Any Tips for calming down? [info] None [info] 1585539316 [info] train
ChaviChavChop [info] Having heart palpitations when relaxed or laying down. Happens every five minutes or so. Literally just came from the doctor and they ran several tests and all was fine. The doc saw some PAC/PVCs on the monitor but said it wasn’t anything to worry about. But they still happen. Any advice? 23, male, 250lbs, 6 ft tall. Propranolol 10mg, Buspirone 5mgSo, yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was taking Celexa 40mg but my doc said prolonged use of Celexa can have some side effects she did not like, so she wanted me off it. I was getting tremendously better anyways. Earlier I went to the ER because my heart was “skipping beats” like once a minute. I know it’s not actually skipping beats, PAC/PVCs are really extra beats and twitches of the heart muscle. But you know. Anyway, doc does a short ECG, attaches me to a love heart monitor, does a chest X-ray, and a blood panel. He comes back and says everything’s fine. But while I waited, I got some palpitations and PAC/PVCs and could see them on the heart monitor. Big, pronounced heartbeat lines and they are kinda squiggly instead of sharp and even. The doc said he saw them too, but wasn’t concerned. He told me you can have up to 30 palpitations per hour before it starts to get worrisome (he did say that of course a cardiologist may say 10 per day, let alone per hour, is worrisome for certain people, but my tests are good and my heart is healthy, that’s not worrisome for me.)So he said it’s all in my head, all because of my anxiety. It calmed me down a lot, and the rest of the day was good. I have an appointment with my family doc on Monday, and she’s going to take a look at the test results. But I’m still left wondering. These PAC/PVCs (I say both because I don’t know which they actually are, may not even be those could be something else) but anyway they feel so weird and disconcerting. But my doctor swears I’m fine, and I’m inclined to believe him and my family doc both. But, why are these heart palpitations occurring?Does anxiety really have the ability to cause stuff like this when you’re otherwise fit as a fiddle?Are there medicines I could ask my doc about that could reduce the occurrence of these palpitations?I know I’m not at risk of any serious issues now, but it’s still annoying. Especially when I get an episode of them where it’s like one every other minute. Also, it seems to happen the most when I’m relaxed, or trying to lay down and sleep. What gives? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1567935209 [info] train
FromTheBetween [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and insomnia and was given klonopin for anxiety and ambien for the sleeping. You can take them together and I've found the klonopin works 6/7 times a week and then just use the ambien as needed. Been great so far! [info] Anxiety / Insomnia [info] 1484878162
lonelyanxiousfreak [info] It will be difficult to type me since my medical condition influences my emotions and hobbies. It is a mobility-challenged related disability. And my other medical condition gives me self esteem issues as a female physically.• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 17 year old soon to be 18 girl. I play video games, read on science, and love human anatomy.• Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. And my disability (condition) makes me bitter toward abled people.• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was abused as an infant, my feet tied together and never given toys or talked to, only when I needed food and water (poor orphanage). When I was adopted at age 2, I became part of a Catholic family. We rarely practice and only pray on holidays. I personally don’t believe in a higher being.• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I have none.• If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be refreshed despite wanting friends for once. I need my alone time often since I am energetic in public or am overwhelmed by crowds, smell, touch, sounds, etc• What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I like video games and drawing but due to neck pain they are burning out fast. I want to like sports, but am banned from the ones I’ve always wanted to try (why I resent those who play them). I would love outdoor walks if my skin wasn’t hypersensitive. But for now I am an indoor person due to medical reasons. I love music though. Music sparks my vivid imagination and distracts me from my pain.• How curious are you? Do you have more ideas than you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?Let’s just say people are extremely annoyed by me because I ask “why” to everything. And I do have more ideas than I can execute. My curiosities are why people are being nice, ask how I am, how the universe works, how animals relate to each other, etc.. My ideas are conceptual and about the universe and the far future of it and earth.• Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?No. But yes, I think I would be fairly okay. I first would assign a task for each person and expect them to do it regardless of circumstances unless physical problem.• Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I seem to get into arguments a lot, so probably not. And I enjoy playing with clay. It makes my sensitive skin feel nice. Ceramics or simple clay is the activity.• Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I used to be very artistic but am not anymore. I draw my original character, a transgender shapeshifter trying to fit into a human society.• What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I think of the past and future too much. I hate thinking about the past and can never move on until I get closure. And I think about the far future because it’s fun and you get to make up depressing scenarios of the earth ending. The present is fine but I believe in those who are competent should be alive and anyone who fails constantly should be discarded. If I was a ruler I would be like the government in the Harrison Bergeron short story.• How do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I hate when others ask for my help. It’s not my problem. I do it anyway to appear good or expect something in return.• Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. Dear god.• How important is efficiency and productivity to you?It is not that important unless I was a leader of a company.• Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I correct people or point out flaws, but that’s as far as I go unless someone’s incompetent in-game sensitivity is pissing me off because it’s too high.• What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?I play video games, draw, and read online. I honestly don’t like them that much besides video games. It’s painful to do pretty much anything except breathing, so video games are the least painful hobby therefore I’ll do it.• What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I memorize. I am too stupid to truly understand a concept. Math, I struggle with a lot and hate. Numbers shift or disappear in my head, even like simple 5+7 I can’t solve in my head unless I use my fingers. I prefer classes that use memorization and logic like biology, chemistry, physics, any science or history related class. People say I have an abnormally good memory for my academics or trivial facts.• How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am good at it but never take action using it. I break up projects according to what I think I can do in a certain period of time. This is for school only. For my own projects I improvise.• What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to be a radiologist! I find anatomy fascinating. And personally I want to be happy and true to myself.• What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?A lot. Tardigrades, spiders, ants, etc.. But seriously, those who are younger than me and smarter, abled people, girls (have another medical condition that makes me kind of jealous of “normal” girls), and anyone who makes me look handicapped or stupid. I heavily rely on what my mind is capable of since my body is useless. I hate fake people who just smile to be nice. I want a damn conversation where someone replies with something other than “okay” or “cool.” And who won’t mind my partial hearing loss and repeat something maybe four times.• What do the "highs" in your life look like?Video game victories unfortunately and also overcoming 17 surgeries. In general though, figuring on my own what medical condition someone has from an image alone, getting a math problem right because of possible dyscalculia, and being called “smart” to boost my nonexistent self-esteem.• What do the "lows" in your life look like?I never talk about negative emotions. At worst I talk about anger. I have never discussed deep sadness with anyone in my life. I put emotional walls up and bottle up my feelings since I don’t think crying is rational. And I get annoyed by those who cry anyway (could be projecting). I would prefer to keep my funny, outgoing, friendly and happy image alive.• How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am attached to it fairly well, but only due to hypersensitivity and easy distraction externally. If I wasn’t then I would be daydreaming endlessly. I wear music for sound sensitivity and usually I start daydreaming. And I am aware of my surroundings usually. But I get startled if someone touches me while I daydream.• Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?When will we all be killed and what will our dystopian civilization look like?How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?If important, a few days. And usually I change my mind and have endless alternatives I worry about.• How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?I do not process them. I reject any hint of sadness and put it in the back of my head. I hate emotions. But if a subject intrigues me I will be grinning the entire time shouting about it.• Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Never. It’s not my problem if you disagree. I will argue until I get closure like a good discussion and conclusion or am declared right.• Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?No. They should not be challenged usually. If I do break rules, I want to experience what others do on a daily basis like doing sports I am not supposed to do (basketball or dodgeball are examples). Or I break rules ironically to do academic work like homework during school mass in the bathroom secretly. Hey, free hour and a half study hall, okay?• What is the ideal life, in your opinion?The ability to exercise and play sports without pain, middle or higher financial class, having friends but also mainly being a loner, and being happy in your own skin. [info] None [info] 1565092019 [info] train
Dango223 [info] Ty for writing this, it is very helpful but you got me so confused tho. I was learning about asexuality lately because I think I am somwhere on the spectrum. The think is I hate touch but I love hugs from people I trust. Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety and I have trust issues. I have no need for any physical contact with others, more I need trust. Because of this I thought of me as a demisexual... I feel like I need to first be romantically attracted enough to somebody to be able to feel sexual attraction..So I would love to have second opinion on this. Do you think my case could be demisexuality or I am wrong? Or I have to first experience some serious relationship to know? [info] None [info] 1560029090 [info] valid
Offthepoint [info] Have they ruled out hyperthyroid on you? I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was treated as such, but found out years later that it was thyroid trouble all along. You really need to have that eliminated as a possibility. Get a full panel done, not just TSH. [info] None [info] 1439304279 [info] train
Hoodwink [info] That doesn't sound like Anxiety.  The extreme weakness is probably damage to tissue along your small intestine.  (Take a massive B-complex vitamin that you can find in any Walgreens, btw, it will probably help a ton if it was similar to what I had).I suggest going to a doctor (a different doctor) immediately and tell them you think you have a bacterial infection or something in your gastrointestinal system and you would like some antibiotics.  Don't tell them about sweating and losing sleep.  And you don't need a fever for infections in your gut.  My guess is that you have a bunch of bacteria causing vascular/epithelial damage by their growth and then death.  There are strains of bacteria that can live in your system that when they die, they release contents that may harm your body after death (or while living).  Certain strains of e. coli or staph are two of the most common.  Both can be gotten rid of by macrolide antibiotics (penicillin, amoxicillin/clauvanate) or Zmax often.  Although, it could be harder to get rid of and you might something that isn't resistant.If you can't get a course of antibiotics because doctors can be a pain with a previous diagnose of anxiety, try to get some online.It sounds related to what I had.  I don't actually have anxiety, but I was diagnosed with anxiety immediately when I presented with diarhea (and heaving, but only vomiting once a month) and a whole host of symptoms like twitching and abdominal pain/twitching, extreme weakness, and more.  [I think I was diagnosed because I had such a long list.  Keep it short - and try to concentrate on only certain points like your pain, weakness, and vomiting.  If you experienced twitching, don't tell them that because that was blood finding new routes to get through my body.]  And it would come and go and got worse over time - and then suddenly plateau, and then continue.  My body has scar tissue all over and my liver and kidneys have some damage because I was like you - just suffering through.  If you were diagnosed in April with anxiety when you went to the doctor, I suggest a new doctor.  Especially if a stomach or colon problems weren't ruled out.  Technically, it could also be IBD/Crohn's - but do that after the anti-biotics. [info] None [info] 1502927790 [info] train
paralogisme [info] Anxiety from wearing my spiffy new back brace So today I finally received [my back brace](https://www.orliman.com/en/product/semi-rigid-lumbar-back-support-2/) for 2 disc hernias and peraminal stenosis. I of course expected to be uncomfortable for a second, I wore corsets in my uni days. But what I got was unexpected. I put on the brace (well, the medical professional did, but I also did it myself few times) and half an hour in, terrible anxiety kicks in. Now I am diagnosed with anxiety and all that jazz, but this was horrible. I started shaking, nausea, extreme discomfort in limbs, a full size anxiety attack. I've tried it 2 today for half an hour and basically rage quit at some point on the verge of tears and even took a Valium to calm the heck down. I just took it down 10 minutes ago and I am still dizzy. I'm so unwell that I am actually worried that it's not just anxiety but a consequence of a tight brace pressing on lungs or something.Does this routinely happen with new brace wearers, something that I have to slowly get used to or could this be a case of a brace that doesn't fit and I should ask for a refitting?I was very excited about getting this brace because I am in a lot of pain and want to get off painkillers, so I'm really sad that this is my reaction to it. [info] None [info] 1586283283 [info] train
MilkMyHonkey [info] Thank you so much for sharing your story!I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ocd prior to children, so like you, I expected it to heighten as well. I think you’re absolutely right about the circumstances surrounding our births. Every story is different. My first, was traumatic and I had no help. My mother left for a different province 16 hours away, 4 hours after I gave birth. My in laws created an embarrassing scene, just impacting my trauma even more. My sister had just had her second child 2 months prior, so she did her best to help, but I was in no position to ask much more of her. I feel like this time, I can prepare better.  [info] None [info] 1546467993 [info] test
Caymerr7 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I've had to go to the emergency room for panic attacks and other health anxiety issues. Old me would drink to make my anxiety go away. Since I've been about a month sober my anxiety had improved greatly. I still can feel the uptight feeling at times but I haven't had a full blown panic attack. I always felt like it was worse when I was hungover. Anyway sorry for the ramble but drinking only makes the symptoms worse. I think anxiety contributes greatly to a lot of people's issues with alcohol.  [info] None [info] 1391655326 [info] train
Cutel1ttlebutterfly [info] I can see how the relationship with my dad left me feeling lonely and anxious as an adolescent and later on as an adult.  My dad was violent and aggressive with me (a boy) and he was never kind when I showed even the slightest feminine mannerisms.  I adored my mom and women in general: singers, teachers, classmates, and my dad made me feel like there was something wrong with that.  Reading this article, I can see how our relationship greatly influenced my feelings of loneliness and anxiety.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and stress disorders and I lament that I had to go through what I did and what I am still going through.  I work with young students and I feel sad that some of them may be going through what I went through once.  (Again, another reason why planned parenthood should be taught and practiced in every society!) [info] None [info] 1513829533 [info] train
cuebabies [info] I’m 25, just diagnosed with anxiety disorder, unsure if symptoms are all related to anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder just 2 months ago. In short I had a massive panic attack after smoking some weed 2 years ago since then I’ve been very anxious when I feel a symptom similar to the attack. Fast heart rate, dizziness, chest pains, and muscle spasms all get me thinking something bad is about to happen. I notice in the onset of an attack my bowels get loose as well. I’ve come to accept this is anxiety, a couple of doctors have told me the same.1 week ago I woke up with a headache and it’s been on and off until today, sometimes it’s intense other times it’s just barely noticeable.  Also I’ll feel pins and needles on my chest and what feels like the heart. Does anyone know if this is also related to anxiety?? [info] None [info] 1546571281 [info] train
45MinutesOfRoadHead [info] Anxiety. When I was in college I would start driving to campus, get to campus, and wind up walking into the student center for coffee and stay there instead of going to class. I never understood why I would do this. I knew I should go to class, and when it came time to actually go I would divert and go somewhere else. I still can't pinpoint exactly what about going to class freaked me out so much, because I like people and I'm a very social person. I wound up withdrawing.It wasn't until I had a nervous breakdown that I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on zoloft. Zoloft helped, and while it kept me from freaking out, it kept me from getting excited at the same time. I eventually came off of it and now live unmedicated, but I still experience invasive thoughts of doom daily. I've decided I won't have more than one child because I don't think I could handle worrying that much. I'm always assuming my son is going to die from anything at any second, and I can't imagine what it'd be like if I had another.Also, I have ADHD. That goes like "The dishes need to be done, start dishes, but wait! There's something sticky on the counter, stop the dishes and wipe the counter. Did I lock the door? Gotta check. Hold up, do the cats have food in their bowl? Go check food, then put the laundry in the dryer. Hold on, you have to pee. The counter is cluttered. Start putting things away. Oh yeah! Dishes! Go finish dishes before you do this. But don't forget to dry your clothes!" [info] None [info] 1481902157 [info] train
turtlert [info] Oh my gosh we sound so similar! I’m turning 25 in 1 week, dating a 9w1, and I’m currently in part time ministry. I was pursuing social work and I realized I was not cut out for it, so now I’m pursuing my music. Also I am diagnosed with anxiety and I just went cold turkey off my pills last week because I’m sick of being medicated...so I get that. Anyways, so fantastic to learn about your life!! [info] 4w5 [info] 1554581915 [info] train
Martes_De_Jair [info] Guys I'm afraid and confused I've been randomly having hallucinations, it mostly happens when I'm trying to focus on some school work or stuff like that. It is stuff like tiny black feathers falling in front of me just to disappear when I look at the place it should have fallen, I also sometimes hear people say my name (the voice varies as well as the volume) P.S. If it helps I am diagnosed with anxiety and disperse attention disorder (idk if that's the english name but in Spanish it's called "transtorno de atención dispersa" wich isnt the same as ADD or ADHD) [info] 14 [info] 1569686448 [info] valid
Xyoloswag420blazeitX [info] If you're smoking at a Snoop concert and calling it medicine, you are a part of the problem. Medical marijuana has become an insult to both the word "medicine" and the movement to legalize marijuana and it is because of idiots like you. Smoking five joints isn't medical in any way, shape or form, it's getting too high to function semi-legally and then bragging about gaming the system on reddit.If I was diagnosed with anxiety and put down three bars while I was out for the night, would that be medical use in any way? [info] None [info] 1377715961 [info] valid
whileandout [info] Help? Since I was diagnosed with anxiety I got put on buspar. But this has only increased the occurrence in anxiety attacks alongside with them becoming more intense as they come with even the smallest of things. Should I consider talking to my doctor about these side effect? Because all though my anxiety attacks have worsened other uses have been very effective such as less restless nights and more comfort in social situations. I’m caught at a middle ground and am curious if anyone else has had a similar situation. [info] None [info] 1540917419 [info] train
YaGirlJade [info] Advice Handling anxiety in a more effective way I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years ago and I took meds at first but stopped because I didn't like how they made me feel. My anxiety manifests itself in different ways. Sometimes I try to avoid thinking about anything that makes me anxious but if I can't ill get angry and snap at my husband, sometimes I will just cry or feel like I'm going to pass out, and sometimes I just can't do anything like I'm paralyzed and all I can find motivation to do is lay down and sometimes I can't sleep. I don't want to go back on meds, I'd much rather learn to handle it myself but its becoming a problem especially when I start snapping at my husband for no reason. Is there anything I can do so I don't get so bitchy with him? He really does nothing wrong and I feel so bad afterwards when I calm down [info] None [info] 1463026204
mentilnutz [info] I was called lazy as a kid and teen even though I was a competitive martial artists and softball player. It was very confusing for me bc I tried really hard in school but my grades were abysmal. About 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and a hidden learning disability and since going to therapy, I’ve been doing much better. I learned a lot of coping techniques and got accommodations at school. I’m not saying your kid has a learning disability or mental illness but it would be worth talking to a counselor about. In fact, for all you know, Your kid might even be very gifted and bored with current activities.  [info] None [info] 1533682292 [info] valid
CaterpillarRage [info] This hits me so hard. I went to a doctor's appointment a few months ago and I just made a mention that my anxiety was making it hard for me to sleep recently and that could be why my headaches have gotten so bad and the doctor totally dismissed me. She started saying that she doesn't think I actually have anxiety (even though I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19). This was the second time I ever saw this doctor and she didn't take me seriously until I started to cry and defend myself. It was ridiculous. This isn't the first time that this has happened to me and makes me so angry. I shouldn't have to tell personal, embarrassing details about how I grew up and why I have anxiety to get taken seriously. [info] Ming the Clam. [info] 1527017118 [info] train
burf [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and basically all I felt was physiological symptoms, and therefore thought there was something physically wrong with me, so in my experience it's possible for anxiety to manifest in a purely/primarily physical sense. That said, any weird/new physiological symptoms are worth getting checked out. [info] None [info] 1431406003 [info] train
prone_to_laughter [info] Same. I was diagnosed with anxiety at a pretty young age. Medication helps a lot, but it never stops. Life is good and worth it, but I wish I could slow my mind down sometimes.  [info] None [info] 1538017722 [info] train
RedBeard94 [info] Yeah. There could be something small that causes them, it could be something that you don't really notice. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in second grade, so 7 or 8 years old, and had anxious thoughts routinely until around high school. Right as I returned to school for my sophomore year of college, my anxiety started up again. There was not much that changed between my freshman year and my sophomore year. It just started again.  [info] Our Anxiety Does Not Define Us [info] 1445202381 [info] train
joooh [info] Could it be anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't know why I would be very anxious about a TV show. [info] None [info] 1511287255 [info] train
roselove122 [info] Initially I was diagnosed with anxiety, which she did help with. I felt a lot better when I went. I pretty much had a mental break down and could barely function. I was then diagnosed with ptsd, or cptsd. Which perhaps is not something she's able to help me with as the sessions kept getting worse and worse. I would come home and need to sleep for hours to relieve them. I also started getting more depressed and getting worse thoughts. I did bring it up with her, but in our last session I felt like she's turned it around on me saying that I didn't practise the coping skills enough which is why I'm unable to help myself. I honestly don't know if she's right or not. But my gut feeling just said no. Because of some events that happened to me when I was really young, I had really big issues with telling people how I feel. Sometimes I just shut down and nothing comes out. Like my response is just to freeze instead of flight or fight. That's one of the reasons why I'm feeling like I need a break from therapy as I've never really talked to anyone about most of the stuff from my childhood and bringing it up is making my adult life worse as I feel like I can't function.  [info] None [info] 1511236291 [info] train
YControlHer [info] PA resident here also! I thought about getting my card after they added anxiety to the list, but with this Tom Wolfe stuff going on about recreational use, I'm not sure if it's worth it. Nor and I sure how I would go about that (I have been diagnosed with anxiety). If it's not too much to ask, how were you able to obtain your card? I live in North Eastern PA and am not really sure what kind of medical dispensaries are around. [info] None [info] 1571844783 [info] train
macmoosie [info] One night, being a Good Samaritan almost killed me. “Do you think you could give me a ride home?”It was that innocent and seemingly innocuous question that damn near brought me to Death’s doorstep. It wasn’t a hitchhiker on the side of the road or a straggler outside of a gas station. It was a stranger, sure, but it was one who was fairly close to my circle of friends, and I never saw it coming. My best friend always told me that my kindness would be the death of me. I’ve forgiven cheating ex-boyfriends, abusive friends, and betraying family members. I’ve given friends rides to and from and I’ve stayed up all night to talk an acquaintance out of suicide. I ordered a pizza for someone who’d just lost their job and couldn’t afford a meal. I was always blessed growing up and one day, finally having realized the magnitude of my blessings, decided to start paying it forward whenever I was physically and financially able.The incident occurred about four or five years ago on a quiet Friday night. I’d opted for a night in with Netflix and snacks rather than going out for drinks and karaoke. I was living with my parents at the time and my mother was visiting my grandmother, so it was just my father, the pets, and I in the house. I found myself curled up in bed having a little Guy Ritchie marathon, since my dad was sprawled out on the couch watching some classic Batman films from the golden era. I was about twenty minutes into Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels when I heard the familiar sound of a Facebook Messenger notification chiming on my phone.I reached over and opened the message, seeing it was from someone I knew of, but had never actually met before; his name was Alan. We had a moderate handful of mutual friends and despite never seeing him before in my life, I’d accepted the friend request he sent a few weeks back. He seemed to talk to some people I knew on a regular basis, so I figured he just wanted to expand his circle. He posted some rather funny memes and the often relatable millennial joke posts here and there. I’d never actually talked to him before, but we’ve mutually liked each other’s content. I was a little surprised to actually receive a message from him, especially around 10pm on a random Friday night.“Hey.”Simple and innocent enough, I supposed.“Hey man, how’s it going?” I replied, keeping it chill and casual, plopping my phone back on the bed and resuming my movie.He responded almost immediately. “Good. Hey, listen, I’m at my friend’s house and everyone is drunk and shit. Do you think you could give me a ride home?”Weird. I literally didn’t know this guy whatsoever other than having mutual friends and completely out of the blue, he messages me, of all people, to ask for a ride. I’d be lying if I said I wasn’t a little annoyed at the idea of having to leave the house, but more so for someone who’d have the…audacity…for lack of a better word, to ask me to.On the other hand, it was kind of late and fairly cold outside, buses had already stopped running, Uber and Lyft weren’t a thing in my town back then, and getting a taxi could be expensive.“Where are you?”“55 Spring Road. I live at 93 Juliet Street.”With a quick search on Apple Maps, I saw that he wasn’t too far away and surprisingly lived a couple of miles north of me. I figured it wouldn’t take all that long to do him the favor, and at least he wouldn’t have to walk in the cold or get a ride from someone who’d been drinking and endanger both of their lives.“Give me a few minutes to get dressed and I’ll let you know when I’m there.”“Awesome, thanks!”I had a weird feeling in the pit of my stomach, but I was diagnosed with anxiety and it always made a point to resurface when it came to meeting someone new. I threw on a pair of jeans and a hoodie, slipped into my “going wherever, I need shoes” pair of sneakers, and collected my wallet, phone, and keys before heading into the living room to announce my departure. Despite being an adult, I always made a point out of mutual respect, to inform my parents where I was going and for what reason.As I climbed into the cabin of my SUV, the feeling in my stomach grew stronger and I couldn’t figure out why my internal monologue was telling me to abort mission, go back upstairs, ignore any messages Alan sent, and apologize in the morning saying I fell asleep. I shook the thought and started the commute.When I pulled up to the house and parked across the street, I noticed that the only source of light was coming from one of the windows on the third floor. Even with my windows closed, I could hear the unmistakable sound of drunken youthful banter. I messaged Alan to let him know I arrived and a moment later, a figure appeared in the window and seemed to be looking down at me. In that moment, I was thankful that my windows were tinted as dark as legally possible, so there was no way whoever that was could have seen me staring back, trying to make out his features.A few minutes went by before Alan finally responded saying he was on his way down, but the man at the window hadn’t moved a muscle whatsoever. Eventually, the front door opened and there was Alan, easily recognizable in the now illuminated porch light — probably motion sensors — looking exactly like he does in his Facebook pictures. He hopped down the steps, backpack over his shoulder, and made his way over to me, having been inside the only vehicle on the street with its headlights on.He opened the door and climbed into the passenger seat, dropping his backpack between his feet. He greeted me with an oddly enthusiastic hello and leaned over to give me a hug. Weird, but my masculinity isn’t so fragile as to decline a hug from another guy. I started to drive off and glanced up at the third floor window again to find the man still watching. The fight or flight feeling in my stomach came back twice as hard.“Thanks for the ride, man, I really appreciate it.”“Yeah, no problem,” I replied, forcing a smile.I kept the radio at a low volume and kept an eye on Alan in my peripheral vision. He would occasionally look out of the window, glance at me, and go back to the window. His right leg was bouncing up and down, as if he was nervous about something, and I noticed he kept scratching his thigh. In hindsight, they were obvious signs of nervousness or anxiety, but I had no idea why at the present moment.“Nice car, by the way. What is it, a brand new X5?”I nodded. “Yeah, it is. I just got it a few months ago.”Alan whistled. “Damn, must have been expensive.”I didn’t acknowledge the question. There was something about his tone and the implication of the statement that rubbed me the wrong way. It wasn’t unusual for people to question the cost of the BMW, but there was just something about how he said it that made me think he’d drive off in it given the opportunity.I really wanted to ask him why he reached out to me, of all people, to give him a ride home, but I kept my mouth shut for a majority of the ride. His presence made me incredibly uncomfortable and I couldn’t wait to get him home and get myself home.“I really appreciate you doing this, man,” he said, breaking the silence. “I really didn’t want to have to walk home.”“It’s cool, no worries.”“Do you do this often?” he laughed. “Give rides to strangers, I mean.”I shook my head. “Not usually, no.”Alan laughed again. “Probably for the best. You know, there’s a lot of crazies out here,” he said, in a dramatic, Joker-esque, sing-song manner. It made my stomach turn.Without skipping a beat, I retorted, “Yeah, you’re right. That’s why I keep a gun under my seat. You never know.”I looked at him in my peripheral vision and his expression was emotionless. He looked out of the window and remained quiet the entire remainder of the ride and didn’t look back at me once. As I neared his neighborhood, he pointed out an empty spot a few houses down from his.“You can just drop me off here, man, it’s cool,” he said, hurriedly.I obliged and threw the SUV in park. Alan immediately collected his backpack, said a quick thanks, and practically power-walked toward his house, disappearing into the driveway. I immediately shifted into gear and high-tailed it home.The moment I left his neighborhood, I felt this overwhelming sense of relief. I don’t think he caught on that I was bluffing about having a gun under the seat, but something tells me that the comment deterred him from whatever it was he originally planned to do.A few weeks later, I came home from work and my parents were watching the news. Alan’s mugshot was on Channel 6. He was arrested for brutally murdering a girl in our town after she’d picked him up and gave him a ride home. The girl, Allison, left her Facebook logged in on her laptop and her mother checked it when Allison wasn’t responding to text messages or phone calls. The police went to Alan’s house and found Allison’s grey Toyota, with her body in the trunk. Alan was arrested immediately, with Allison’s blood on his clothes and his hands. Inside Allison’s car on the passenger side was Alan’s backpack, which contained miscellaneous drugs and a bloody machete.I went to the bathroom and barely made it before I vomited. My entire life flashed before my eyes as I was collapsed over the toilet. I didn’t dare tell my parents that he was the “friend” I gave a ride to a few weeks prior. I did send an anonymous tip to the police about the occupants of the third floor apartment of 55 Spring Road, which led to the arrest of a handful of men and a collection of controlled substances.I can’t say what would have happened to me if I didn’t lie to Alan about having a gun under the seat of my car. What I can say is the fact that since that night, I do carry a gun now, and I’ve never given a ride to anyone I didn’t personally know. [info] None [info] 1581023115 [info] train
ghoulcinema [info] Drug abuse. I was 15 years old when I first started abusing prescription pills, 16 when I was diagnosed with anxiety induced psychosis. I tried to kill myself the day before Thanksgiving of that year, obviously failed, asked my dad to have me hospitalized because I knew I'd try again. I swore off anything harder than pot and thought my life was turning around; then mom got sick. I moved closer to her and haven't touched anything pharmaceutical (aside from allergy meds or ibuprofen) for years. What's worse, I followed in my stepdads footsteps, but we're both different people now. [info] None [info] 1530613241 [info] train
Macca_321 [info] I'm on the very first day of giving up alcohol for good I've always had a bit of a tough relationship with alcohol. I would drink habitually and often, because I convinced myself it was my only way to relax. When I was with my ex boyfriend, we would often drink a bottle of wine each on a week night, and continue drinking when we got to the weekend. It wasn't healthy or right, but it was our way to 'relax'. But now, some years later, this has been wearing very thin for me. I was diagnosed with anxiety when my ex and I split, and since then, alcohol has only made me feel stressed, down and ill. So now, with a wonderfully positive boyfriend, I have decided to quit drinking. Last night was, frankly, the straw that broke the camels back, when I sat in a toilet cubicle silently crying to myself, after a boozy brunch with the girls. It doesn't make me feel like me. And I want to be properly happy again. Support would be appreciated, as I know it'll be a bumpy ride! [info] None [info] 1554633741 [info] train
daniellemx [info] Thank you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety which goes away and comes back. My life currently isn't very functioning. [info] None [info] 1417211164 [info] train
SpecificDuck6 [info] Getting a prescription for the anxiety medication, ativan?? How do i go about asking my PC dr to write me a prescription for Ativan?  I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well as a few other things.  I've also been prescribed before but it's been a few years.  And in this day in age and the area i live,  it's not easy to get.  It helps me.  I want to ask him without seeming like a drug seeker [info] None [info] 1586118479
maq0r [info] Former blue badge here: no I didn't. Worked in retail, on the tech side of things. It was a ruthless environment where only whites and Asians would thrive and create their fiefdoms and kingdoms to go for that L6, L7+. Further, frugality is fine when you need to be conscious about resources you use, is another thing when SLU is being rebuilt from the ground up with 40 story high buildings and not one gym for the employees or subsidized food. "There's plenty of options around town" said Bezos during an all hands, but what they don't say is that most of the gyms and restaurants around campus are owned by Amazon execs so of course they're not going to offer anything for free. It felt too mining town for me. Also, crying under the desk? Yep, checked here, 11 hr days, sev2s (like FIX IT NOW tickets) left and right. I did NOT have a good time. "oh but it depends on team" sure, but the gym/food story isn't team dependant. I left a year ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety due to work. Can't recommend.  [info] None [info] 1528870578 [info] test
RandomGenericName4 [info] I worked through an anxiety attack all on my own! I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and even though I see a therapist I've struggled with it a lot since then especially when it comes to school. Today in class I guess the stress finally got to me and I got that feeling I usually do when I'm about to have an attack, so I excused myself to the bathroom (it was empty too!) and managed to calm down. Typically I have to be picked up early and my mom has to help me relax when I have my attacks (which I realise I need to grow out of) but this time I did it completely alone! Not as spectacular as others but I'm proud of myself for once. [info] None [info] 1569900060 [info] test
Datchcole [info] I will look in advance at stats for sure for stat 50. I still have most of my notes and homework, so even though the professor is different, should still help.I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past by Kaiser, but I'm not sure extra exam time would be necessary, but I'll look into it. Thank you! [info] Computer Science [info] 1527306910 [info] train
ScaryLikeTerry [info] How do I reclaim my memory from anxiety? So I went to an on-campus therapist and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I mentioned my failing memory and she said a lot of people with anxiety tend to have bad memory because of stress and overthinking.  I’m no longer seeing that therapist, but I need some advice. Is there anyway to fix my memory? It’s really bad and I have to write down nearly everything to remember it. [info] None [info] 1569263274 [info] train
OW2000 [info] I went to CBT also when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It seemed like just having someone to talk to about things really helped a lot. I had basically hit rock bottom before I decided that something was wrong and I needed help. [info] None [info] 1573067238 [info] train
Emerald_Alpha5 [info] I’ve had anxiety my entire life and it is only now effecting me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for years now, I’m 16 and recently I have been super anxious and paranoid. I have mostly been anxious about my health thinking I have cancer or something bad, it has driven me to having to go to the hospital and getting blood work done to ensure I’m okay, and two doctors have both said that I’m physically fine. I still can’t shake the feeling that I’m dying or something, has this happened to anyone? [info] None [info] 1583889111 [info] test
ivapeNyQuil [info] Interesting, I was diagnosed with anxiety and didn’t fall into the “poster child” levels of ADHD but was close. Called it anxiety and told me to read a book and see somebody. It’s been about a year now and I feel like it’s time to revisit that diag:/ thank you for sharing :) [info] None [info] 1528402915 [info] train
WINTER_1S_COMING [info] This is nuts....ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I've found myself in constant need of mints as well, tic tacs specifically (white ones :P) [info] None [info] 1396249237 [info] test
quietanatomygirl [info] "you have nothing to worry about." - exact words from my mom when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1404855457 [info] train
UndeadTana [info] Sleep deprivation = anxiety ? In the past 2 days I’ve gotten 3 hours of sleep . Today I woke up feeling crappy and I’m a bad mood ... fast forward to now currently I am feeling general anxiety and butterflies . I just feel off and anxious for no reason . I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD . Could I be feeling this way today due to getting no sleep ofor the past 2 days &amp; do you think a decent nap could fix me up . I’m just a little concerned and wanna know if that would be the reason I feel like this today . Thank you [info] None [info] 1559241632 [info] train
kyaanureeves [info] I didn’t crack under pressure and cry today! It was my first day of high school EVER and I’m a very nervous person. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and that hasn’t helped when it comes to meeting new people and trying to make it to class on time, speak in front of everyone, etc.I was SO prepared to cry that I packed tissues in my bag. But all of my worries were irrational. “What if I don’t make it to class on time?” I got to all of my classes with no issue. “What if I forget my locker combo?” I got in all four times with NO ISSUE!I was super glad to find that I could get through something really stressful without my natural response-fetal position, crying. I’m really proud of myself, which is rare for me. But hey, I could do it and that got me a lot more self-confidence. [info] None [info] 1567564139 [info] train
idntworkinthisvan [info] I used to cut my hair every time I felt overwhelmed, joke was on me when I was diagnosed with anxiety 🙃 [info] None [info] 1565076141 [info] train
reallysadjpg [info] Face App???? HI! Sorry for the quick post!!I need reassurance bc I’m panickingI KNOW the Face App thing isn’t as bad as the media is making it bc I read the companies statement but I’m just panicked. I tried to remove my data from their servers by sending a bug report which ends up being an email that you send to the company (this was the way the company’s statement said to do it) and it bounced TWICE. i’m so anxious.A little background, I was diagnosed with anxiety. It’s bad and things like this make me jittery. I don’t even know why I’m scared I just don’t like the idea of someone having all my data. But I guess it doesn’t matter bc FaceBook has all my info anyway... I don’t know I’m so anxious I’m so sorry! Does anyone have any suggestions to cope?? Or any reassurance? Is anyone else feeling this way??? I don’t want to scare anyone else but I’m so panicked. [info] None [info] 1563416445 [info] train
Benzroller [info] Anxiety, and a lot of bad habits during college.I've always been super stressed out throughout my life. Tenfold more than most people that are diagnosed with anxiety.I remember as a kid, way before I even started smoking, I'd get worried sick about the smallest things. I'd be over at my friends house, playing on his dad's computer with him(windows 95 era), and we'd accidentally change the monitor resolution.We didn't know how to fix it, and I started crying. I was worried sick, even though I knew I wouldn't be the one to get in trouble. Just irrational fear over small things like that over the years have caused the muscles in my heart to deteriorate slowly.After eating like shit in college(fast food 5x a week), drinking a lot, and smoking cigs every day, I woke up one night and just started vomiting blood.I left college during the middle of the semester, and came home to live with my parents. I was bedridden for a month; I couldn't keep ANYTHING down, I'd wake up and take a sip of water and immediately throw it up. I had more procedures done on my body than anyone my age should ever have. 2 endoscopies, 2 colonoscopies, ultrasound on my gallbladder and many other areas of my body, and a plethora of blood tests(they probably took a liter of blood from me combined from all the tests).Turns out I have celiac disease, crohn's disease, GERD, gastritis, they found ulcers in my stomach, polips in my intestines, and over the past few years(this happened in 2011), I've lost 40lbs.I went from being 5'11, 170 in great athletic shape, to weighing 130. The doctors at one point told me that if I don't gain weight, my other organs would start to fail and I'd ultimately die.Well, it's finally starting to happen. I eat as much as I can; smoking always helped alleviate the symptoms of my stomach problems, but I still couldn't/can't gain weight for the life of me. I'll stuff myself every day and eat as much as I can, as unhealthy as I can, and I wont gain a pound. I can't even have sex now; after I have sex, I experience the same symptoms that I do after I smoke. Most recently over the past few months, every time I'd smoke, my heart would start racing at 170 bpm or so, I'd start sweating profusely, and if I took a few steps, it felt like I was going to collapse and either have a heart attack or seizure. I remember smoking at my friend's house one time a few months ago, one of the last times I smoked, and I honestly thought I was going to die. My heart hurt so bad, every area in my chest hurt, it was incredibly hard to breathe; yet, I didn't tell anyone. I went to the bathroom and looked at myself in the mirror and thought, "this is the end...this is the last time you're ever going to see yourself in the mirror." I was 100% convinced I was going to die -- it's hard to describe that feeling, knowing death is coming and just waiting for it, it's almost surreal.I've seen a cardiologist, and he did an EKG and basically told me the events of my past(my stomach problems and what not) have caught up to me; that my heart is in terrible condition, and any more stress on it could be fatal.There's hope that if I miraculously gain weight over the next few years, exercise(I don't exercise much though because it causes me to lose weight, when I really need to gain weight), and improve some other aspects of my life, my heart can slowly recover.Most will attribute my symptoms to a panic attack, however, I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I've had panic attacks, I know how they feel. When I smoke, it doesn't cause a panic attack; my body is weak, and it jolts my heart to the point where it feels like I'm about to fall into cardiac arrest, and very well may.Sorry for the long post, it's 4am and there's a lot of rambling in it, but that's a little insight into my situation. Feel free to ask me any questions, I've had these problems for a while now, if I could be of any assistance to anyone I'd be more than happy to help. [info] None [info] 1425203467 [info] train
fallenbutrisen [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (GAD) and panic disorder and he reckons my other symptoms are caused by insomnia, regular caffeine overdose and ptsd from abuse in childhood. [info] None [info] 1520122351 [info] train
Hybernative [info] Thanks for the welcome! I was diagnosed with anxiety last week or so, I've been suffering all these years because I didn't even know anxiety was a thing that could be treated; people usually just drink alcohol here (the UK) to temporarily get over it. I'm totally in the dark about what medications there are available out there that can help. My doc has given me amitriptyline, but I also use it as a sleep aid, so you can imagine taking a sleeping tablet in the middle of the day, isn't the most conducive thing to productivity...  [info] None [info] 1456741113 [info] train
BrownAndyeh [info] For me, I am glad I figured out my triggers.  I did not mention that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, which presents when I am angry or unreasonable during arguments.  Turns out this is how I dealt with insecurities related to health issues I had growing up..my mind was blown when I learned this.  You are trying to get this figured out, that is the first step.  Hold yourself accountable and let people in your circle know you are trying..be vulnerable.   Those closest to you will understand and support you. [info] None [info] 1566603065 [info] train
vampirecafeinomane [info] I dont know what to do.. I posted it under venting but Id appreciate advices as well.I am 23, F, from quebec, canada. I've been diagnosed with anxiety 3 years ago and panic with agoraphobia about 2 years ago. I am currently medicated on citalopram 30mg and bupropil xl, as well as clonazepam for emergency ( i almost never use it). Im always up and down and I never know when a down can happen as I have absolutely no triggers for them. The only thing is that they always happen in the morning when I wake up. I've never had trouble sleeping ( exept because of anxiety but its been a while now) and I am a big sleeper, I cant get enough sleep. I honestly suspect hypersomnia. As I said i've been diagnosed about 3 years ago,, and ive been working on getting better since then. Heres what I have tried and/or im currently doing :-meditation-tarot, not as a divination tool but as food for thoughts.-sport-seeing a psychologist-seeing a few social worker-support groups-psychoeducation groups-regular routine and healty habits -taking concrete actions to fix what is bothering me.I have to admit that I am living a very good life : I have a loving boyfriend, a supportive family and friend circle, a nice job that I like, I study something that I love and that Im guarantee to have a job when im finished, I have pets that I also love...As I said, Ive seen a psychologist and a few social workers and they all say that I seem perfectly healty and dont understand what is going on. Ive had past traumas but I went over them with all of them and they all agree that they are indeed in the past and not the cause of my current anxiety and panic. My doctor has ruled out brain problems and my blood tests were perfect. I am currently laying in bed and I should be in school but i am so very tired and my head hurts. Ive been feeling very discouraged these past few days as I dont seem to find the end of it..Has anybody lived anything similar or has some advice for me ? [info] None [info] 1543508890 [info] train
AsaKurai [info] Hey, not that you're an expert, but is feeling "foggy" also a symptom? I definitely feel like insomnia, heart palpitations and feeling bloated have been prominent since I first felt like I was diagnosed with anxiety and I guess those symptoms come and go depending on when I take Xanax, but this foggy feeling has been persistent for weeks now. Almost feels like i'm tipsy or have done an all-nighter, but I kinda push through and go about my day anyway. I'm assuming it's because of my sleep? But I try at least on the weekends to catch up on that, just wondering if it's a symptom people go through... [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1535173681 [info] test
Melodictrash [info] I'm An Teenager That Is Diagnosed With Extreme Anxiety. AMA! Heya! Just like what the title says, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I have gone to a doctor, and after some testing, I have been proven that I have the mental illness. It's taking me a lot to type this out, but AMA! [info] None [info] 1581810881 [info] train
Im_Tripping_Balls [info] &gt; when you know you need to do something but can't remember what it isHoly hell, that feeling. I know it. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I remember getting this for no apparent reason (and it terrified the crap out of me) back from when I was about 10 years old. [info] None [info] 1381295377 [info] valid
CellarDooranon [info] The same thing happens to me. I justify it with the fact I'm diagnosed with anxiety and chalk it up to a really bad attack. [info] None [info] 1567111472 [info] train
becausepuppies [info] When I was about 17 my anxiety got really bad seemingly out of nowhere and I struggled really bad, in pretty much the same type of way you described.  Here's the good piece of advice that my mom told me: if you have the capability to think that you're going crazy, you're not going crazy.  People who actually "go crazy" aren't mentally capable of differentiating the way they're acting and what's actually normal.   You thinking you're going crazy is scary, I know because I've thought the same thing many times, but rest assured that it's just anxiety, not something more severe. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I saw about a zillion different doctors because I just felt "weird" and I knew something was wrong but I couldn't describe it, that was the scariest part.  Once I was finally diagnosed with anxiety, I was able to educate myself and find ways to help myself.I won't lie, I struggled for years, some worse than others.  But my best advice is to educate yourself on anxiety, it's symptoms, and treatments as much as humanly possible and keep advocating yourself.  Don't let people tell you you're being dramatic or it's all in your head, and  most importantly DO NOT BE ASHAMED. You will get better, you will learn to manage the anxiety, and hopefully along the way you'll learn what I did - that more people than you realize struggle with anxiety in some form, and most people are willing to help you out if you just ask. You may have to go through a few therapists who you don't get any help from, but you will eventually find one that works for you.  Also, don't be afraid of medication--it's what really helped me out.   [info] None [info] 1471628038 [info] test
LivingMeme101 [info] Anxiety, Passive, and Lack of Confidence.. Which should I fix first? Some things about myself that I have noticed lately is, when I'm in a situation that I'm in and should stand up for myself in some way, I don't do it. I just let the situation pass because I don't like confrontation. I've always had a lack of self confidence, ever since I was a kid. To make matters worse I've been diagnosed with anxiety since a very young age. I don't make decisions on something until I am 100% sure they are the right one. Well, that's what I tell myself I think, just so I don't have to deal with the situation. I also over think/overanalyze just about every situation. One example is this girl hung out with me before classes ended a few weeks ago.. Lets just say that she was into me and I didnt listen to my gut, which resulted in her moving on  after that and kind of ghosted me. I've been over thinking the situation since then, some days it won't even be a thought, other days it messes with me. Its something that happens to me every time an opportunity comes to me and I just let it pass.  I tend to beat myself up for stuff like this. I avoid making mistakes constantly, or try too.Anyways, what stuff would you guys try to fix first ? Felt like I was a little scattered with my writing. All of these problems seem to interconnect so I don't know exactly how to nip it in the bud. Thanks to everyone ahead of time! [info] None [info] 1527025716 [info] test
sorosa [info] Decision making and falling asleep? Hi guys I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I'll be starting medication soon. I was wondering what tips you guys have for the following. Decision making: I have so much trouble making decisions from the small things to the big. Like I've been going back and fourth on some subjects for over a year which has cost me a lot of time.Falling asleep when bored: whenever I have to study I do tend to get bored and I then begin falling asleep despite being fully tested, the same goes for meetings at work, but as soon as the meeting is done I'm wide awake again? Any tips? Or do you guys think this is more than just anxiety? [info] None [info] 1562536947 [info] train
RockinMadRiot [info] Does anyone Have issues with loss of appetite and feelings of throwing up when you try to eat? I've been getting the feeling lately of being sick or not being able to eat due to the sickness. I just have this feeling in my stomach that I can't quite describe but anytime I try to eat I just gag or feel like I'm going to go ill. The issue is I'm also finding it very hard to sleep at time. I don't know why I am but I just seem to lie there awake or when I do sleep I wake up a few times in the night or get waken up. Then went I get up in the morning I feel too tired to eat and it's a like a circle now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (I have social phobia issues. I've had them for a long time) but this feels not like that. Does anyone have an tips or advice on how to help? I have tried pills before but they seem to make me a lot worse in other ways and not better. Many thanks. [info] None [info] 1504872832 [info] train
leahnopants [info] I mean like most universities, if there is something that you are challenged by or something specific that was out of the ordinary that prevented you from reaching your full potential, they'll listen to you. Ex. "I  have had anxiety for 10 years"..Well maybe by then you should be trying to manage it / making a difference vs "I was diagnosed with anxiety in my 2nd year and as you can see by my transcript I've been improving my management of it". If you think its extenuating...might as well toss it in there. I'm sure lots of people try and bs their way through it. [info] None [info] 1568760441 [info] valid
scaredboi_0 [info] hey ok this is a dumb question but how can i tell if i feel envy or actual attraction to a girl i don't think im envious of women, i don't have any desire to be one.i'm very comfortable being a cis guy and would be uncomfortable being any sort of girl. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my therapist suggests that i might have ocd considering how much i was freaking out about the "possibility" that i could just turn transbut now my brain has moved onto something else and im scared it means im secretly transi'm into girls sexually. no specific body part really, like face is the most important part for me. but after that initial attraction i feel a need to be closer emotionally with them. like its not just sexual feelings its a desire to be with them and spend my life with them. ik its incredibly strange but i just want us to love each other deeply and meaningfully. now i've read some trans people's experiences with this on here as being indicative of envy and now every time i look at a girl i get scared and anxious that like, what if i secretly want to be them and thats why im into them. i literally say to myself every time i see an attractive girl "i dont want to be them" in my head but honestly that doesnt helpthis doesn't mean anything does it?&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1537320748 [info] valid
lowsodiumcrackers [info] I guess I read that as minor children acting out, but maybe Therapist doesn't see any difference between little kids and grown adult children. I've seen two other therapists, one for several months, within the past few years. Neither of them mentioned PTSD to me, but I was diagnosed with anxiety. I can't think of any reason why if they thought I had PTSD, they wouldn't have told me.  [info] None [info] 1514180455 [info] train
Caliboy50124 [info] I'm kind of similar. Last year, I really enjoyed weed, then one day the day after smoking, I felt Dr. Thing was it didn't go away.  Months later I still "think " I have Dr, but only when I think about it. When I do things I never consider it there.  I've also thought I'm just paranoid and I convinced myself I had it ( I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I am the type of person to think he has a fatal disease from the slightest pain). Anyways I started smoking slowly a few months after and I'm fine. But I know how dp/Dr feels and I don't want anyone to experience it, especially the months I did. The only thing I can say is, and this worked for me, start smoking with a small amount, in a good environment, and if possible not alone. For me, getting high with friends takes away most of my paranoia and bad times during my high because you are having more fun and having a  conversation. Anyways, good luck, and if you do start smoking again, don't rush into it. Baby steps. [info] None [info] 1514349307 [info] train
saareadaar [info] Experiencing mental illness. Don't get me wrong, it's absolutely horrible and it's not really something I wish on anyone, but it wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that I realised just how hard doing even basic things can be when you have a mental illness, even though I previously thought that I understood. And I think it would make people just a little more empathetic towards people with mental illnesses rather than viewing them as lazy/crazy/dangerous/etc. Also I am so sick of the triggered jokes. People who joke about it have no idea how horrible being genuinely triggered in the clinical sense of the word actually is. [info] None [info] 1498877886 [info] train
KayRayK [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and high blood pressure within the last year and I have had to learn a lot about myself and how to improve myself mentally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1427338577 [info] train
ChadleyDooRight [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13. Originally it was just major life changing events like my parents divorce that induced it. Then graduating high school. Then starting college. It’s not the job itself, but the things going on within my own life and I’d like to focus on bettering my anxiety coping skills  and slowly ease into testing them and not start at a disadvantage. I love the job, super friendly people (employees and customers) and I can talk all day about computers.  [info] Computer Sales Associate [info] 1544228840 [info] train
GiraffeJaf [info] HIPAA violation? Recently I went to a dermatologist for acne treatment. I ended up just seeing his RN, who wanted to put me on Accutane. After I agreed to it she got started on the process was asking me medical history questions, including mental health. I told her I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past. She then paused and told me I needed to see my psychiatrist and get permission from her before starting Accutane.  I complied and my psychiatrist told me it was fine. I thought that the nurse wanted my psych to send a note to the dermatology dept but then I found out that she instead went through my psychiatric health information to check if my doctor wrote anything down that would indicate if it was okay or not for me to take Accutane. Is it a violation of HIPAA for a nurse to access my medical records like this? I don’t feel comfortable having a derm nurse looking through my psych notes, but I’m not sure if it’s an actual violation.EDIT: I am located in California! [info] None [info] 1571161547 [info] valid
plan_with_stan [info] I suffer from anxiety disorder and on some days I have the exact same symptoms... except for the difficulty swallowing... it was weird reading your post because I have gone through all the tests including my thyroids and they said all was fine. I also have had testing heart rate they went through the roof, lost 10KG in 2 months without trying was nauseas as heck and had difficulty focusing on any task.. this started at a very particularly stressful period of my life, so I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I wonder now if this is all that it was....I still sometimes suffer from an elevated heart rate, especially when I try to fall asleep, and lately I do feel nauseous for no reason... I may want to visit my doctor again... [info] None [info] 1574906255 [info] test
PaperCats4 [info] Finally went to see a doctor. I have celexa questions I thought the way I was feeling would go away on its own. I've never been depressed before but I've always been someone who is anxious. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a teenager. But, for the past two months it's like I've been living in a nightmare. I'm always tired. I feel numb most of the time but when I do feel emotion its irritability or intense hopelessness and fears of being stuck like this forever. I feel heavy and like I can't do anything I enjoy. Lately, even making and eating food has become a huge chore and I'm eat a lot less. I can't do my research or my writing and I fear what will happen when the semester starts, I go back to teaching, and I can barely get out of bed. People told me not to see a doctor. They said medications aren't the solution and that it will just mask my problems. Some have said that the meds change who you are as a person and that you become addicted. But, I feel so miserable that I finally bit the bullet and went to see someone. Herbs, essential oils, and yoga don't help. Someone told me to take up a hobby to cure my sadness but the thing is that this isn't sadness. I'm aware that I have a pretty good life. I have a career that I love and it pays well. I have a supportive and loving spouse, a house of my own, and three amazing cats. I have hobbies and friends. It's just that I can't enjoy any of these things lately.   Anyway, the doctor referred me to psychotherapy which I will definitely do. She also prescribed Celexa. I'm starting on 5mg per day for 2 weeks, then 10mg per day for 2 weeks, and then 20mg. However, I've sort of scared myself looking at side effects. I've read that it can cause fatal heart conditions, liver disease, libido loss, low salt levels in the blood, seizures, etc. How common are these side effects?   Also, my doctor said I can expect to notice some change at 4 weeks. Does that sound correct? What do I do until then? [info] None [info] 1564441808 [info] test
TotallyNotSurtr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but in the context of this post it stems from me fucking up with tipping, since I always try to tip people in the service business; because in the country I'm currently living in they get a low base salary and mostly rely on tips. Also over-thinking it, now that I look back at that time, I guess. Did you ever experience something in the past that you feel really embarrassed about, even though it actually isn't something that terrible if you look at it objectively? Well, it's one of those moments for me.  [info] None [info] 1530044947 [info] test
Peach_Muffin [info] All my life I've kinda been super anxious about stuff. You know, the worrying and blowing things out of proportion thoughts. I remember in sixth grade I was being bullied, I then started worrying that it would happen for the rest of my life and that my family might disown me for being weak enough to let myself get bullied. I would become an absolute wreck due to unhealthy thought patterns, the kind of person who would freak out that their partner had died in a car crash because they didn't pick up their phone and were running late. Our worry that every time somebody wants to talk to you that you are in trouble. That stuff might be familiar to some people. Occasionally as a child/teenager I would have trouble getting enough air and supplement my oxygen with deep sighs. This condition (called air hunger) got way worse when I was 24, in 2012. Eventually I was diagnosed with anxiety. For me some days are easy, others I seem to worry about every damn thing. I did everything I could today to avoid a 5 minute conversation with a colleague that would simply involve inserting a USB stick into her computer and running a program. That scared the shit out of me. The air hunger is on and off too. There was one night I thought that I would die, and imagining my parents finding a corpse the following morning didn't help matters much. What helps is meditation when I am exhibiting symptoms; air hunger is pretty good for cuing me into when I'm stressed. Coloring helps me too :) [info] None [info] 1455004475 [info] train
itsonlydrizzling [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I agree with what you say 100%. Sometimes, even in an out of body situation, a clear voice in the back of my head realizes it will all be okay in the end. And then it is okay. [info] None [info] 1471313959 [info] train
sarty [info] Exactly the same thing happened to me.  Was diagnosed with IBS and they gave me something called Levin/SL (a little tab to put under my tongue that basically makes part of your nervous system chill out and stops the cramping).Later, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, the SSRI and/or the benzo that I took made that symptom go away.  It was always worse in the mornings and always if I had to go somewhere (no pun intended, ha!).  If I were to stay home, it wouldn't happen.   [info] None [info] 1364011813 [info] valid
sedatedzombie [info] Seeing a psychiatrist soon. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but never been tested for ADHD, do you think she might? [info] None [info] 1551104031 [info] train
jimbob320 [info] Anyone else experienced this or have any advice? Hi guys, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes have panic attacks where I can't move my limbs. I also feel sick, dizzy, and dissociated all the time, but never anxious. I have no feelings of worry or anxiousness in the traditional sense. This makes it really hard for me to target the source of the anxiety and try to tackle my problems. Has anyone had experience with similar symptoms? How did you overcome them? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1557950539 [info] train
corialis [info] Anyone else have major life changes as a trigger? I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 9 after a big change (well, for a kid, anyway!) - I spent the summer at the babysitter's with 2 toddlers who wouldn't leave me alone when I was an only child and not used to kids at all. It was like my brain just short-circuited when confronted with such a drastic change.So far in my life I've had 2 more major meltdowns, one after I graduated high school and one when I moved to a brand new city for a brand new job. If I'm unprepared for such huge change it's even worse. The anxiety just takes over my life and I can't think of anything else! I'm okay with smaller changes, like when there was a semester change in high school or being moved to a new room at work. I'm moving this week for a new job, but the job is on another team in the same department, I've lived in that city before and I'm moving in my friend's apartment building. Hopefully I won't have a huge meltdown, but I still feel like this is consuming my life and I can't think about anything else. Bonus rant: So the last time I had a meltdown, a psychiatrist prescribed me clonazepam and quetiapine temporarily (I'm on Paxil maintenance) to help me make it through until I acclimatized. Those were life-savers! Anyway, this time around I was proactive in getting the prescriptions, but the psychiatrist would not give me clonazepam because I was moving and he wouldn't be able to monitor me. He told me that if I need it, go to a walk-in clinic. Seriously? I'm asking for the benzos to *prevent* a meltdown.  I would have lost my job last time if my boss wasn't so great. Why yes, let's tell the person with an anxiety disorder triggered by changes that she can't plan ahead to mitigate the change, that'll help! [info] None [info] 1439860454 [info] valid
rooroo999 [info] I feel like I've finally moved on from a girl that I tried and failed to start a relationship with. So I started talking to an old classmate that I had a minor crush on in high school. We made plans to go see a movie one night last week. I stayed up till eleven and never heard from her, and now she's avoiding me. On top of that, I'm getting tired of my current job in retail, but I can't find anything in my town that would be any better. I can't really afford to make a big move to another town though or to go to college without going into debt. On top of that, I think I have the onset of either thyroid problems or anemia, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety problems in the past.  My current insurance is crap, and l can't afford to pay out of pocket to see a doctor about it. I just kinda feel like I'm stuck. Like I graduated high school and am ready to move on in life, but I can't really get out of my current situation. My health is going downhill. My job is going nowhere. I'm 20, and I've never had a serious relationship. I just feel worthless right now... I don't feel like I'm living my life; I feel like I'm just waiting for it to end.  [info] None [info] 1537475852 [info] train
biomech36 [info] My issue is/was I would bring up to people that I thought I had an issue and I always got "there's nothing wrong with you, mentally" and I would just write it off.  Maybe I was just being an asshole for no reason.  Maybe I was wrong about something.  I dunno.  But, I was diagnosed with anxiety by a physician last year.  And in true INTJ fashion, I decided to do something about it a year later. [info] None [info] 1509980760 [info] test
LippyLibrarian [info] Hi, friend! Honestly, once I'm in a flare up, the only thing to do is take it easy until it's gone. Your path sounds identical to mine. When I was diagnosed, I gave myself a year to find a natural way to manage it- supplements, herbs, acupuncture, diet, exercise, etc. That was an immense help, especially for the daily pain, but it just wan't enough. I got on the lowest dose of Lyrica and noticed an even bigger result pretty fast. About a year ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Paxil for that... Maybe it's a coincidence, but I noticed an even LOWER number of painful days after that kicked in. Anyway... take care of yourself when you feel good, and it should at least reduce your flare ups. This sounds vague, but it's all about knowing your limits. My go to for self care during a flare is a hot bath and lots of laying in bed with a book. I hope this helps!  [info] None [info] 1471631976 [info] train
Loveoutloud22 [info] How do I stop crying? If I think I’ve done something to offend, inconvenience, or hurt someone, I sob. I can not handle even the smallest conflict without breaking down into tears. If my boyfriend sounds annoyed with me I start bawling. I have made such huge progress in my self esteem the past few years but I can’t seem to break this weird emotional response. * Update to address some reoccurring comments/questions: I’m 27 years old, I am diagnosed with anxiety and taking medication for it, and I have had trauma in my past. Thank you for the amazing comments so far! This is an amazing community ❤️ [info] None [info] 1549936805 [info] test
address-unknown [info] I’m so sorry you’re going through this. This isn’t really advice, just an anecdote. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a very young teenager and took various benzodiazepines pretty regularly (never more or more frequently than prescribed) until I was in my early 20s. I went off of them due to headaches that gradually developed after taking them for several years. My dosage hadn’t increased, and it was consistent between Xanax, Ativan, and Klonopin. Without fail, as soon as the effect of the benzo ended, I would get a CRUSHING headache. My GP and psychiatrist both insisted it wasn’t the benzos but were happy to help me get off of them. Immediate relief. I still get migraines but after that medication change and identifying a few triggers they’ve dropped from 1-3 per week to once a month. I still have an Ativan prescription because sometimes the beastly headache is better than the panic attack but I take it extremely sparingly.  [info] None [info] 1554311432 [info] train
Azcardsfan26 [info] Me!I was diagnosed with anxiety at least five years ago, and fibro a couple of years maybe? I definitely understand where you are coming from about doctors not believing you and blaming in on something else. I begged my doctor for help and she flat out told she wouldn’t do anything for me cause there was no physical proof of my pain. It’s rough, but know that you aren’t alone. There are so many others like this as well. [info] None [info] 1517787654 [info] train
Omars-comin [info] Curious..did your doctor(s) specifically tell you that the reason they are skeptical of you is because they have so many other people claiming to have POTS/dysautonomia? Personally, I may have never gotten an official diagnosis if it hadn’t been for my own research and some level of self diagnosing. I’m actually shocked to see that some people have gotten diagnosed quickly/easily because that couldn’t be further from the case for me. I’ve been highly symptomatic since I was 11 years old, but I had no idea that POTS even existed until a few years ago (I’m currently 30). I had a fainting episode and wound up in the ER because I hit my head on my tile floor. I noticed that every time I went from lying down to sitting up in the hospital bed, the heart rate monitor started going off to alert the doctors that my hear rate had gone above 120bpm (no one checked on me). The next day, I typed in “tachycardia upon sitting up” into google, and POTS was the first thing to come up. I have since been diagnosed with EDS and POTS, nearly 20 years after becoming symptomatic. One issue is a lot of doctors aren’t referring people to get the proper testing done. I didn’t have any ANS testing done until I got insurance that doesn’t require referrals to specialists. I was never referred to anyone by my GP. I quite literally was my own doctor and referred myself and demanded the tests that I felt I needed. It’s not *our* job as patients to request specific referrals/tests based on our symptoms, but that’s the experience I had. My primary doctor(s) should have looked at my symptoms and told me **everything** I should get tested for based on those symptoms, but instead I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and sent on my way time after time. I feel that anxiety should only be diagnosed after tests are done to rule out any and all conditions (no matter how uncommon/unlikely said conditions are) that have similar physical symptoms. Unfortunately, that’s not typically how it goes. Anxiety is diagnosed despite no tests for other conditions being done. Actually, if I’m being honest, I don’t think primary care doctors should be diagnosing or treating anxiety anyway. Leave that to psychiatrists. I agree that people who have had *negative* testing should accept the fact that POTS/dysautonomia isn’t their issue and keep searching for other possibilities. I also agree that people shouldn’t necessarily be recommending specific medications to people who are undiagnosed, but at the end of the day, that person is going to have to see a doctor in order to obtain medication(s). I think the majority of POTS treatment is harmless and isn’t going to have any ill effects on people who don’t have POTS. There are *always* going to be illness fakers. There’s nothing that can be done about that. That doesn’t give ANY doctor the right to dismiss symptoms just because an illness is “trendy”. Doctors who are doing that need to be fired by the patient. Period. I actually think part of the reason this particular condition is so popular amongst fakers is because it is *known* to be misdiagnosed and get blown off by doctors. Perhaps if doctors took *everyone’s* symptoms seriously and did a better job at getting dysautonomia patients diagnosed in a timely manner, people would be less inclined to fake this condition. Edited for spelling and grammar [info] None [info] 1566068655 [info] train
blueboy1095 [info] This is not the right thing for here. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I hear “it’s not that bad,” and “just get over it,” all the time. [info] None [info] 1548951587 [info] train
floppyweewee [info] I thought misophonia was a quirk until I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD. Obsessiveness and extreme reactions could be a symptom for some of you. [info] None [info] 1513266023 [info] valid
Hexacorpus [info] [Help] Struggling with Anxiety &amp; Phobias I am 19 years old. I was diagnosed with anxiety in late 2013, Asperger's in September 2014, and have gone through therapy for Emetophobia (which caused frequent anxiety/panic attacks and still affects me on a smaller scale after therapy).I'm due to see my therapist soon about Thanatophobia (fear of death) / Chronophobia (fear of the future - I don't think there's a better term?) / health anxiety.My therapist unofficially diagnosed me with health anxiety during my last therapy sessions, along with official diagnosis for social and GAD. My anxieties are contributing to and drawing from my Thanatophobia, Chronophobia, Emetophobia and God knows what.Since this is my first post, I thought I'd sort of introduce myself, because I'm not coping, at all, and I want to know if there are others with these phobias and mix of anxiety disorders.Does it get better? Are you struggling with any of it too? [info] None [info] 1429216823 [info] train
Vadermaulkylo [info] Does this sound like a heart problem or a blood clot to any of you? So I’m 17, have always had a terrible diet, but am not overweight, and last month I noticed that the left side of my heat was hurting, so I freaked out. I went to the doctor and found that I had perfect blood pressure and pulse, so he sent me home. Two days later I felt a slight pain in my arm and panicked, so then sure enough I started having pains that shot down my left arm into my pinky, just like with a heart problem and rushed back to the doctor, where he did an EKG and found it to be “perfect” , so I was diagnosed with anxiety. Some time has gone by and it’s gotten worse and I’m feeling other symptoms, such as back pain, abdominal pain, extremely hard heart beats, fast heart beats, the pains I described before, and the main vein in my left hand is hurting very very bad, but it only started that when I noticed the vein slightly bulged a little(which I’m pretty sure it always has). I’ve had all those symptoms for weeks on in now. Then the other my parents called the doctors office and told them to test blood I had taken 4 months ago(another story there) and they did and found it to be normal, which I don’t think blood from 4 months ago would pick up on a heart problem or blood clot I may have gotten since, but oh well, my parents says it can. Now that hand pain I described earlier is hurting extremely badly and I’m worried it that I have a clot in that arm and that’s caused it to hurt right where that vein is. I went to a physical therapist who found a rib on the left side of my chest was poked out and she said that probably caused the pain to begin with and my anxiety made me start feeling all this other stuff, but that sill didn’t convince me. What do you guys think of this, I’m beyond scared and want to have an updated blood test but my parents are NOT happy, as the EKG was already pricey and came back just fine. It might just be very bad anxiety but you can never be too careful! [info] None [info] 1528465252 [info] train
shortkid113 [info] No, that's very helpful. I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago, but brushed it under the rug and wish I hadn't.  [info] None [info] 1550029507 [info] test
thegrandkameron [info] Does adderall help with anxiety? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by many different doctors. A lot of general and social anxiety. I have tried different medicines but I never really felt a difference. I have also been diagnosed with ADD before. I tried taking meds before but after a while I just quit because I never felt a difference and I really don't like being on medicines in the first plac. Lately my anxiety has been getting worse due to the fact that I have a 5 month old, my husband got orders for us to move to New Orleans soon and I will be starting college as soon as we get there. This has led to anxiety attacks almost everyday, constant worrying, and absolutely no motivation. Well today I needed to get a lot done, so I tried taking one of my husbands adderalls. I've got to say, I haven't felt this good in a very long time. I actually got up and took a shower before noon! Like I said before, I have social anxiety, but not today! I called my friend and talked and I also ended up bringing my neighbor something that I had been meaning to but was too scared to actually go over there. I want to know if this is common while taking adderall. I don't want to go to my doctor sounding like a drug addict asking for it. I just want to feel normal again and enjoy the time I have with my daughter before I have to go to college. [info] None [info] 1385520520 [info] test
fuckthisthat [info] I HATED the call center. Gave me the worst anxiety ever. (This was Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds so it made it even worse.)I remember a lady I talked to. Can’t remember if it was inbound or outbound. She said that her dad screened and recorded every call made in the house and he would listen to them. It sounded like she was a prisoner in her own home. She had to go and asked if I’d be there when she called back. I had to tell her my “shift” was ending and I wouldn’t be speaking to her again.  [info] Satan's Victory [info] 1542835254 [info] train
midget9 [info] Thanks for the reply1) Just had an MRI, waiting on results2) Each one varies slightly, but I'll walk you through the worst one I can remember.  I was driving when I felt it coming on, so I pulled off to a state park to go for a run and try to relax.  After running for about 10 or 20 minutes, I stop and am overlooking some water with my phone in my hand trying to take a picture.  Then I snapped my phone in half, threw it in the water, ran to my car, and drove till I was in the next state over.  My memory of it is spotty, but I do remember coming out of it about 4 hours away from home, and I turn around and a second wave hit me as I was driving back.  The only thoughts I had were "I want this to stop" and I ended up driving to my mother's house in hopes of her being able to talk me down, but as always no luck, so I drove to a hospital, checked myself in, and they put me in a room where I sat on the ground shaking for about 2 hours until the doctor comes in and diagnoses me with anxiety, injects me with something they say is stronger than xanax(I do now know what it is), and send me on my way. I guess the closest thing I could relate one of these at the peak of its severity is the incredible Hulk, as frustration/anger can bring it on, and I can't really stop it when it's going and sometimes I am filled with pure rage.  I remember having many thoughts and strong pulls to drive my car into oncoming, to stab myself, and pretty much any other opportunity I saw to end my life, which is not characteristic of me at all outside of these episodes.  I do have enough sense in these to resist these urges, however, as I am smart enough to realize that it will pass.  I apologize for the disorganized story, I'm not the best at formatting.3) I have not. The one I am in now has been spent in bed.4) I have been diagnosed with anxiety, mayo clinic diagnosed me with constipation, one therapist considered a weird form of schitzophrenia, other doctors have attempted to diagnose me with ADD, ADHD, Bipolar Disorder,  and currently epilepsy.  5) I usually smoked whatever strain I could get my hands on, but the best I remember was called Blue Dream. Others included Black Widow, Pineapple, and Purple Diesel.  Again, thank you for taking the time to read/reply to my post. [info] None [info] 1417557247 [info] train
virginiajeannemarie [info] Issues with skin picking? (Kinda gross sorry but I really need help) I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while and I get panic attacks that I'm used to. I've just started to realize how bad my skin picking is. It never occurred to me it was a symptom of anxiety till my boyfriend pointed it out. Luckily I am blessed with very good skin so acne isn't a big problem because I rarely get zits. My biggest issues are with biting the skin on my lips, scratching at the skin in my nose, biting my cuticles and the worst (right now ) is my big toenails. I always rip off my toenails and it always fucks up just my two big toes, they turn into ingrown toenails because I ripped off too much. Then I try to fix it by cutting the nail so it will grow straight. Then I end up cutting too much and fucking it up even worse. Then for some insane reason I try to use tweezers to fix it and of course it only makes it worse. Now I'm left with a throbbing big toe that I know is gonna get gross and infected because I can't stop fucking with it. I know I shouldn't touch it or mess with it but it feels impossible. I live alone in a dorm room so I don't have anyone to help stop me when I'm doing it and don't notice. I don't know what to do. It happens too often and it hurts to walk. If someone could please help that would be awesome [info] None [info] 1430977626 [info] train
cheekybrat [info] Is it anxiety or just plain old worry? I’m going to try to make this quick as I’ve just taken a sleeping pill and I’ll start hallucinating soon.Both of my parents are in the hospital.  My dad, 83, had pneumonia.  My mom, 68, can’t take care of herself.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 26, and am now 38.  I am on 15mgs of cipralex and have been for the last two years.I am experiencing more anxiety now due to my parents being in the hospital.  Some days are better than others.  Sometimes I feel good.  Sometimes I have a pit in my stomach but try to stay positive.  Sometimes I’m so anxious I can’t eat and have trouble sleeping.I’m seeing my doctor next week and will discuss this with her.  I don’t want to increase the dosage because I feel like this anxiety is warranted.  My mind isn’t blowing it out of proportion.  But if I did increase, would that gnawing sensation in my stomach go away?  Would I still worry, but not wallow?  What can I do otherwise to minimize the anxiety, without medication? [info] None [info] 1570150068 [info] train
dunkkyyy [info] Require Guidance on Medication I am a 22 year old male recent college graduate. I'm about 5'10 and 130 lbs (underweight i know, but it's the same story with my parents. I am caucasian. I have had issues focusing and having a "drive" throughout my life (probably since I was 14 or so). I used to consider my racing mind as a strength but the anxiety and overthinking and inability to get things done has taken its toll.  This is a medication question. My parents are very against adderall/vyvanse type medications (and who can blame them with all these children being given a drug they might not need, they are just kids. My doctor is aware of my past history of self treatment and i think he would laugh off this request. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take Lexapro. I'm wondering what are my possible next steps to fixing my current mental situation and I thought this was the appropriate subreddit, my apologies if it is not.I have included my location in the post incase state regulation may play a part in this. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1563101973 [info] test
rahbunny [info] You are describing my disposition before I was diagnosed with anxiety, that may not be the case for you, but I would highly recommend talking to your GP about how you feel. [info] None [info] 1442230961 [info] train
SayoSC2 [info] Former Starcraft 2 player, I used to and I still have issues playing ranked.  One of the biggest issues as to why I have problems is the lack of confidence in personal skill to get better or be at the level I'm supposed to play at.  Like SC2 pre-LotV, I recently this year made a new account to smurf and play to fuck around and not give too much shit on ranked.  Needless to say, it still didn't help out at the same time.What I find with ranked anxiety is really to just being confident with yourself.  There has been many times when I feel like I can or can't win, but it also depends on the mindset if you want to try to win or just give up and move on.  With the former, you're investing a lot into tryharding, which can be either a satisfying, or morale-crushing feeling to experience.  The latter is where you just don't give a shit and just keep playing so you don't care about the small shit pissing you off.I think last issue is really the person/player him/herself.  A while ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety so it makes me stress from a lot of external things, whether it was league or social matters.  It's kind of been weird especially since playing has caused my jaw to just tense up significantly (I once actually had my jaw pop, which was painful ;_;).tl;dr - just don't stress too much, work on things that makes you have fun, and just be confident.  and most importantly, fight hard. [info] Gold IV [info] 1476675326 [info] train
ferdous12345 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by my general physician, but I was 14/15 and it was mostly about my stress level and my constant worrying. He said that I should look into non-medicinal relievers, like showering. Needless to say, it hasn't helped in the long run. I kinda just want to try medications. I know it sounds bad, because medication isn't magic or whatever, but I'd like to at least try to feel normal. Deep breathing doesn't always work. I can't leave class and take a shower. I can't stop in the middle of the road to meditate. I just want a chance to feel like a functional human who doesn't need to go through a list of techniques to alleviate 1/5 of my anxiety. But maybe it's selfish of me, and I know medication isn't a walk in the park. I know it can take months to find the right dosage. I know the side effects could be worse than the symptoms. But I want to say I tried, you know? [info] None [info] 1503630082 [info] train
Miiaevia [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and I can say that CBDs help with that immensely. I can't even describe how much. I hate Xanax and almost never want to take it, so having a safer alternative when I need to calm down is huge. While I'm not diagnosed as autistic, I have immediate family members on the spectrum, so i learned a lot of my socialization skills (or lack thereof) from people with autism. Not sure if/how that plays into my anxiety but I can definitely relate to having strong emotions, the way you described. It's definitely a struggle. Don't be hard on yourself when other people judge you, be proud of yourself for navigating through this everyday and taking care of yourself. It's not easy. [info] None [info] 1535808809 [info] test
likestosleep [info] I'll probably get hell for this, but I think it may be helpful. Some points that I would like to note are that I was only in an abusive relationship for 3 years and I am currently I mental health professional. It wasn't until I was with my current SO that I realized that I had turned in to my so hated ex. I would yell and scream and manipulate. It's a wonder he stuck it out, but he also made therapy a must. I didn't want to go at first for many reasons. I was strong and didn't need it, I shouldn't still be affected by the abuse, and because I help people with problems, I'm not the one that has them.  Right? Oh so wrong.I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD along with anger issues. Through the past year and a half I have learned so much about myself and even more so, how to handle my emotions in a healthier way. You can see that there is a problem and you want to fix it, so make that step. I can't tell you how thankful I am that I did.  [info] None [info] 1453754140 [info] valid
michbelles [info] Haha yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was mildly offended by this 20 secs statement [info] None [info] 1513546969 [info] train
cigboy1 [info] How can I get back into college given my situation? I became addicted to serious drugs and after a few months it got to a point where the police found out (after performing a wellness check) and charged me with several counts of drug possession. I was also sent to the hospital because of drug abuse and so the school charged me with violating the code of conduct, although they later found me not responsible for violating it. I have not been expelled, suspended, or even on school probation, however I was told to go on a medical leave by the dean of students office.As for the law they diverted the case and as long as I pass  periodical drug tests, as well as attend therapy they will drop the charges. Also since I never entered a plea at arraignment, I do not have a record. In order to re-enroll after taking a medical withdrawal I have to get a letter saying the issue is taken care of. This I can get from my therapist. I do however need to interview with the schools counseling center. My question is should I mention anything about the police to the school counseling center? Or should I just lie and say I got help on my own?Because I am diagnosed with anxiety, the obvious cover story is that I was self medicating in order to deal with my out of control anxiety, and now that I am on new (prescribed) medication I no longer need to do drugs. They'll definitely ask me if I can complete school work, which I can easily point to my 3.5 GPA that I earned from the years prior. The only issue is that I don't know for sure what they know (in regards to the police). [info] None [info] 1576108762 [info] train
almondsandolives [info] Waiting for 7-week appointment What did you guys do to calm your nerves? I can't take it! It's still two weeks away and I'm driving myself crazy. I am googling every little thing like crazy and am a nervous wreck all the time. I get nervous if I have cramps, when I don't have cramps, when I'm becoming less tired, or my headaches go away. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9 and struggle with it often still, though I'm unmedicated and really living my best life, I just don't remember being this anxious when I had my first...&amp;#x200B;Also, side question, I was so tired a few days ago with headaches, and now I don't have them. Is that normal for symptoms to go away like that or is that a bad sign?&amp;#x200B;Sincerely, Super anxiety-ridden mom [info] STM | 3 year old | Due 12/31/19 [info] 1556301954 [info] test
that_gingergirl [info] I realize that I am perfectly safe smoking trees. The only negative effects have been anxiety attacks, but there were only a few, and they aren't just caused by toking. (I am diagnosed with anxiety, so, the fact that I was smoking at the time is likely only circumstance.) But, because they occurred a few times while toking, my mind wants to take that as my experience all around, and I KNOW I've had plenty more experiences where I was incredibly happy and relaxed. It's just this silly mind game I need to work through getting over. [info] None [info] 1324767291 [info] test
Stell2020 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a child, you sound similar to me study wise, I had to work so much more than my peers to achieve the same grades (I did well but man I worked and worked). Hit my mid 20’s and life became too much (maintaining a home, sustaining a job, attempting to cook every night, exercise, then have enough energy and motivation to socialise or at least be pleasant and intimate with my husband). I went to a therapist because I was sure I was depressed, she suggested adhd (to which I laughed, come on I wasn’t that hyperactive kid who was always in trouble and failing school), saw a psychiatrist who diagnosed me with adhd, started stimulant medication (to which I was worried would increase my anxiety) and within 2 months my anxiety had all but gone! Treat the adhd, so I’m organised, can prioritise, and enjoy life, bye bye anxiety! (It does still effect me when I’m overly stressed/ busy but so much better than before). There is success either way you go, just depends what you and your therapist believe is having the bigger impact on your life.  [info] None [info] 1553320770 [info] train
GunstarGreen [info] I agree. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I show up to work on time every day and do it to the best of my ability. Its a high-pressure job too, although not as high as WWE talent, of course. Lars has been on PPVs in feobt of millions, and in live shows in front of tens of thousands. If NXT id supposed to ease tge transition from developmental to the main roster, then Lars is in an unfortumate position.  [info] I got all the numbers [info] 1547253393 [info] train
tragicinsecurities [info] Geppetto is out of state for work and I made JYDad cry Anytime Geppetto goes out of state or town for work, I call my JYDad a few times during the leave so he’s less lonely and we can talk one on one since Geppetto never shares my news with him. This won’t be a long post as I haven’t had any new drama with her and I’ve been feeling too raw to do more background posts while I’m already stressing over work and personal issues every day. After reading some of my old posts, j started feeling guilty about writing about my mother’s abuse towards me for some reason? Like I know I’m just chronicling the abuse I endured but I also feel bad telling a bunch of strangers on the internet about it bc despite the abuse, I had a relatively good(?) childhood despite the abuse and enmeshment.Anyways. So I was talking to dad about everything in my life, the good and bad, when I told him I’m getting a medical cannabis card. Cue jealousy and a short story of how my mom wouldn’t let him buy an edible when they were on vacation in Europe and also how the hell do I qualify for my medical card but he with arthritis can’t. So I told him I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. Cue confusion. Where did I get my ptsd? Well from mom of course.My poor dad had to relive all the abuse he had no idea about bc after the first incident when she slammed my head on the glass dining room table over spilled spaghetti, he told her if she ever touched me again, she was out of his house(not that he would do that bc that meant she’d take me with me; at this point of the glass table story, I was 5 and a fresh immigrant and my dad was not married to my mom and had no legal claim to me bc he wasn’t my birth father although he is the only father figure I recognize and acknowledge). So my mother, not one to bow down to anyone telling her what to do, started her abuse behind his back.I didn’t tell him every time she hit me or even the gravity of the things she said to me, bc I’m pretty sure if I told him about the abortion comment now, he’d die of a stroke. So he got very upset and telling me he was sorry for not stepping up and doing better. I told him I did not blame him for any of it and that he was doing the best he could under the shrouded circumstances. Then he told me something that shocked me - ever since the children left the nest, their relationship has gotten better. My mom still has her anger issues but he doesn’t give a shit and ignores her so it doesn’t impact him as much whereas when we lived with our parents, her anger and frustrations she would take out on us. So I asked my dad, well what changed? His answer deadass was: we no longer have to fight over parenting styles.Glad my brother and I were literal punching bags bc mom couldn’t figure out how to parent without abusing us. I suspect her own childhood trauma and undiagnosed PPDs played a much larger role in how she raised us but quite frankly I’m not in a position to ask her because I haven’t forgiven her yet for what she put us through. [info] None [info] 1582727351 [info] test
daisiesandink [info] After nearly 2 years NC, a letter came in the mail... I've been NC with my parents since early 2017. After a lot of self-reflection and therapy, I've grown to now finally be able to call what they put me through abuse (in all senses of the word). I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD over everything, but despite this, have been functioning to the best of my ability to pick my life back up again and move forward. In my last conversation with them I told them the reasons for NC, and informed them to stop contacting my husband and I.Over the years my mother has sent cards filled with money. She used to do the same to me and my siblings with previous attempts at NC- it was her way of trying to bribe me back into her life. In these cards she never wrote anything malicious (she's too clever for that)- just a simple "miss you". It used to really bother me, but now not as much. Once I donated the cash to a child abuse charity. Another year I went on a Christmas shopping spree. But deep down I knew, I'd get ["the letter"](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeAfterNarcissism/comments/3wlz3t/how_to_deal_with_the_dreaded_letter_what_it/?utm_content=title&amp;utm_medium=user&amp;utm_source=reddit&amp;utm_name=u_daisiesandink) one day. Today was that day.I more-so would like to just share it and get feedback on the ridiculousness of the letter. It's left me shaken, annoyed, angry, depressed, anxious, and somewhat questioning myself, even though I logically know I shouldn't. Here it is (shortened and names excluded for anonymity):&gt;I hope this letter finds you well. I really do hope so. It's been so long since I've spoken to you.  &gt;  &gt;I wanted to let you know the news before you hear it from anyone else. We've decided to move out of state. How can we do that while I'm still working? In June of last year I injured my shoulder and have been out of work since then. ***(I shortened this drastically! My mother spent 5 paragraphs explaining how this injury occurred.)***  &gt;  &gt;Dad and I have been traveling to the doctor and it seems his cancer has gotten worse. He's no longer eligible for the medical treatment he used to get, so we were hoping he'd be eligible for a new drug. Unfortunately, he wasn't, but he seems pretty optimistic about another new medication he's being put on. When we move, the doctors at this new medical treatment center will be taking on his treatment, so we're looking forward to that.  &gt;  &gt;As far as the move goes, we've found a piece of property in XYZ ***(omitted location for anonymity)*** and are having a house build. We'd found a house elsewhere, but it would have a lot of traffic. The contractor says the house will be complete in 2019, so we'll be putting our current house up for sale soon. We wanted to keep the house and let you guys live in it. Let us know if you'd like to do this. ***(WTF?)***  &gt;  &gt;Also, I just wanted to let you know that I put a stop on last year's Christmas check. ***(She sent check instead of cash- I shredded it)*** I was worried it would be stolen last year and didn't want to risk it, so that's why I chose not to send cash. Since it hasn't been cashed, I don't know if you received it or not. So I'm enclosing cash in this letter to replace it, and decided to send this with tracking so I'll know you've received it. ***(I may be reading into it too much, but this creeps me out)*** I'm also enclosing this year's Christmas card and money.  &gt;  &gt;Also, I have massages on my account at the spa. I'm not using them, so I had them transfer them over to your account. ***(I don't have an account anymore so I'm not sure how she did this, if she did it at all)*** If your husband would like some, I can transfer some to him too. Just let me know.  &gt;  &gt;I think about you and miss you. I respect your wishes to keep my distance, however, I hope someday you show up on my doorstep to give me a hug.The things I've taken away from this so-far:* No apologies, no acknowledgements of the abuse* She's putting the burden on me to make amends and rectify the situation (which I don't want- I just want her to stop contacting me)* She says she respects my wishes for her to keep her distance, but if she did then she wouldn't be sending me the letter in the first place&amp;#x200B; [info] ACoN | NC with both parents since 2017 [info] 1540500873 [info] train
Rynyl [info] I just submitted my thesis to my committee For the past 2 years, I've been driven to the ground because of this thesis. During this time period, I was diagnosed with anxiety, put on meds, and have been seeing a counselor. I just submitted it today. I'm looking forward to a peaceful weekend. [info] GAD [info] 1469248983 [info] train
alexaclmn [info] Im pretty bad at keeping and landing jobs... Do anyone have any tips for me landing a job? I'm 20 years old and i believe I've already messed up my work history a tad bit. I'll like to say that I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and so certain things are harder for me. I had two jobs in 2014 and 2017, both jobs were at the same place. Both jobs were very short term- One job lasted two months, the other lasted 3 weeks. I was forced to resigned due to an altercation for my first job and my 2nd job I decided to quit. Now I don't know know what else can I do to further my chances of landing a job... I'm sure if my job was somewhere other than a call center, I have a higher chance of staying there. What should I do reddit? [info] None [info] 1499782012 [info] train
ModernSocratis [info] I don’t know to be completely honest. I have never experienced ADHD until I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1569333114 [info] test
sammy0415 [info] Thanks will do :)Stress is a really huge thing for me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was like 15. I'm 20 years old, with severe palpitations, balding, and greying hair that's apparently attributed to stress. So the doctors are also attributing the migraines to stress- they told me to just try to regulate my stress. How do you know what frequencies affect you?  [info] None [info] 1419212631 [info] train
InnerMattDemons [info] Contrast:I have been diagnosed with anxiety for around 11 years by now. I've been working on managing it for all those 11 years, with mixed effect.I know I'm "wrong" - in that I'm unable to do a lot of things that should be simple. I hate myself for this. Truly, deep down inside hate myself, for being unable to do so many basic things. I don't want to bother people, so when it's bad I have a really hard time reaching out. I just isolate myself and feel lonely, wishing I could get away from the constant bombardment of thoughts about how awful I am, and how many things I cannot do.So, I'm working on trying to accept myself more. Not hate myself for my flaws and limitations. Not hit myself in the head with all the simple things I cannot get myself to do.Stuff isn't always easy to fix. God knows I'd love to not feel this way; I go to weekly therapy, have listened to innumerable audiobooks, lectures, YouTube videos, ... about it.I'd love to be able to fix it that easily. I haven't managed in 11 years.So, I'm sorry for trying to embrace it and not hate myself for once. No one wants to feel this way, and it isn't always easy to fix.---More constructively: If you see someone who is clearly holding themself in a destructive or dysfunctional pattern, perhaps they don't know how to break it. Perhaps they just don't know how to do it in a better way. Perhaps they get overwhelmed by trying to change it. There can be a myriad of reasons.Rather than look down on them for not fixing it, you might consider talking to them about it. Perhaps even offer to help them with it. That way lies progress; not in judging someone for the things they have a hard time with. [info] None [info] 1556531824
JoyfulStingray [info] Yes.  I had one and found a different workplace.For 3 years, I had a job in a very high paced environment with a bunch of military guys.  If they told you that they needed that product in 3 hours, you had better have it done in 2.5 and NOT BE LATE.That kind of anxiety to give a worthwhile product in such short amount of time was crippling.  I went to the bathroom and just cried or tried to calm down from a panic attack.I started medication when my SO said that I wasn't like myself and I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Medication helped, but finding a slower paced work environment worked wonders.  I started at my new job in January where instead of creating a product in 3 hours, I am given an entire month...or longer. [info] ♀ [info] 1445000173 [info] train
apple_pi_314 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed to start on medication for that. After starting, I started getting some nausea (a totally normal side effect) but the psychiatrist at the college counseling center kept insisting it was my seizure meds and that I should stop taking them. I’d been on them with no issue for THREE YEARS! When I told her that, she kept citing where she got her degree from and that she obviously knew best. My neurologist, who is the most intelligent woman I’ve ever met and I had a good laugh about it later. [info] None [info] 1561210615 [info] train
GreyPokedri [info] I came here so pissed because I was diagnosed with anxiety and I thought you thought it was a joke until I actually read it. I couldn't agree more. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1545198315 [info] train
Throw_IBS [info] I have IBS and your doctor is an idiot. I went to see my new doctor today and even she said that IBS is a diagnosis of exclusion,  meaning that they have to run tests to see if you're deficient in anything or if you have an autoimmune  problem. I'd suggest, if you can afford it, finding a new doctor. I had to do so because my doctor saw that I was diagnosed with anxiety and immediately assumed that my symptoms were in my head and didn't refer me to a hospital.  [info] None [info] 1476733882 [info] train
RobMasterFletch [info] Panic attacks caused by too much magnesium? I am a 22 year old male, about 5' 7", 165 lbs. So some background. I've been dealing with chronic constipation for about a year now. Well a couple of months ago, I was taking milk of magnesia every night for about a month to deal with it. Not until recently did I realize that could cause a magnesium imbalance. Also, within the past month, I've had a couple panic attacks that consist of chest soreness, high heart rate, heart palpitations, numbness in left arm, stuff like that. I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now, last night, I took milk of magnesia for the first time in a couple of weeks to help with some constipation. I pretty much immediately began having panic attack symptoms again. My question: could my panic attacks and anxiety be due to a magnesium/electrolyte imbalance, or was my panic attack just purely a panic attack? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1438792879 [info] train
kateord417 [info] It’s so sad that we’re afraid to talk about having anxiety. If we’re diagnosed with diabetes and have to take insulin injections, we talk about it all day with zero shame. I was diagnosed with anxiety 15 years ago and was told to not tell anyone. Screw that!! The chemicals in my brain are off, just like the insulin levels in your pancreas are. We aren’t different and shouldn’t be made to feel like we are!!! [info] None [info] 1546007648 [info] valid
rufurious [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a physician. Will this qualify as a psychiatric disorder under their rules? Also, the physician who diagnosed me practices in Kansas. Would this be an issue? Would I have to be re-diagnosed? [info] None [info] 1561746656 [info] train
ghghyrtrtr [info] Same here with the faking being sick. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, acid reflux (get my first endoscopy this year to determine the damage due to years of no treatment, it was so bad when I first had it diagnosed in my early 20s the doctor thought I had asthma because of the wheezing), anemia (woohoo for headaches caused by lack of blood), severely allgeric animals (grew up with constant hives to the point I of bruising and trouble breathing but never taken to a doctor, I really thought it was normal to pop benadryl  when your kneck and face were swelling up). I was always just being dramatic!! Oh and when I really needed medical treatment- why didn't I say something? They seriously didn't take me to the dentist until I refused to eat. I had told them when I chipped the tooth, gone through two tubes of numbing stuff that they bought because of tooth pain, had had a headache for two weeks that I told them about. Hmmm how is that not speaking up. Complaining about pain for a month. Then they made me feel guilty about having a $300 filling that was done with minimal novacaine because they refused to pay extra to take me to the pediatric dentist. The dentist was apologetic because he thought I really should have pain meds but he couldn't prescribe them. My tooth needed to be treated or I'd end up loosing it through surgery because it wasn't grown in all the way. He drilled all the way to the root, cleaned the root and filled. He said he didn't know if it would grow in and need a root canal or just need to be pulled out via surgery.  When my dentist I went to as an adult saw it he was horrified to hear that I wasn't on pain meds and only novicain when they did the work. When I was referred to a specialist for the root canal he was horrified too. This was after both had looked at the X-ray and assumed I had been put out for it. Nope white knuckled through the pain. Feeling guilty for costing so much money and knowing if I couldn't handle it I'd have to go get surgery to have the tooth pulled and my parents' didn't have the money. [info] None [info] 1533784822 [info] train
Irlydntknwwhyimhere [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety conditions and it’s extremely anxiety inducing for me. When I used to drink I’m sure I would have liked it more but I’ve quit drinking for many reasons. I’ve done most of the “common” recreational drugs, the only ones I enjoy now are THC, LSD, and DMT. I’m looking to try more psychedelics tho. Maybe ketamine. Stimulants just really aren’t my thing. [info] None [info] 1561945783 [info] train
DrunkenMechanic [info] getting PA medical card Looking to get the medical card in Pennsylvania but have some questions. I guess the first one would be will they even give it to me? I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2015 and was prescribed medications for about a year then I couldn't afford the doctor anymore. I also really didn't like the medications I was on as I had many side effects. So I haven't been to a doctor for that in a while so I don't know if that would count. I also over the past year or so have had pretty bad back pain that comes and goes. I threw out my back pretty bad last year I went to an urgicare for it but they just sent me home with something like ibuprofin. My boss paid for me to go see a chiropractor a few times which got me back to being able to function again but my back still hurts often and has not been right since then. Would either of these be good enough to get my card?  Also I see you can apply online, someone on here recommended [quickmedcards.com](https://quickmedcards.com) but can you really get it through there? i see the card cost is $50 but how much does it cost through them I don't see that anywhere? I'm open to other websites too I just saw someone on this sub recommended it. [info] None [info] 1586631878 [info] train
didi1995 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I've been taking xanax a lot recently but it takes me around one bar to feel it. maybe 1mg? [info] None [info] 1567168724 [info] test
Blue45 [info] I've had those situations where I'm thinking I'm having a heart attack, or on the verge of death, but it's just the anxiety. I've also been to the emergency room for all the tests they did on you and same results, clear. That's when I was diagnosed with anxiety. And I know what you're going through with the diazepam. I usually take them the night after drinking (and it's common knowledge to not mix benzos and alcohol) and I still wait a large amount of time but the thoughts inside my head are "what if I didn't wait long enough" or "what if the diazepam is going to do more harm than help". The meds finally kick in and I feel much calmer. It sounds like it is just your anxiety, and 2mg of diazepam isn't a large amount (I take 10-20mg) Avoid drinking, take it for your flight and you should be fine. [info] GAD [info] 1378161243 [info] valid
FreezeWolfy [info] Agreed. Another issue is, if you think you have a serious issue, get HELP and don't just leave the diagnosis without seeking proper care. When I was diagnosed with anxiety it was my kindergarten teacher who realized my anxiety levels were abnormal, and she talked to my parents/school guidance counselors, she didn't just say "oh, this girl has anxiety, cool".  [info] Shitlady [info] 1424365943 [info] train
Theprofil3er [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, ADHD, and touerrets (I'm not sure if that's spelt right) syndrome. [info] None [info] 1389930489 [info] train
CSnare [info] Apparently I have anxiety So I was enrolling for university and I had to send them my immunization records. On my health record they list that, plus some “ongoing issues.” And one of these ongoing issues was apparently anxiety disorder.So that’s been there since 2016, but no one bothered to tell me I had been diagnosed with anxiety? I had NO idea, for real.I’ve never had a panic attack, but I do worry a lot. I thought the worrying thing was normal. Even the not being able to get out of bed at night out of fear there would be an intruder standing outside my door kind of worrying.Not even my parents bothered to tell me I was diagnosed with anxiety. But I’m not surprised to be fair, my dad doesn’t like the stigma of mental disorders, every time I bring it up he shoots it down.That’s all I really have to say lol.TL;DR I was diagnosed with anxiety and had no idea, and I thought the amount of worrying I did was completely normal. [info] None [info] 1563781598 [info] train
KarebearMom [info] My SS had a different tic when he was younger (maybe 9 or 10) he would blink and twitch his eye. His doctor told BM to just ignore it and he would grow out of it it. He did.Now, take this with a grain of salt because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. But I would ask DH to take him to the doctor, or if BM is always the one who takes SS to the doctor ask DH to have BM take him, just to be sure. As long as your copay is reasonable it's worth it to me to get a medical opinion. [info] SS 17, SS 15, DS 7, DS 5 [info] 1541301066 [info] train
totoro_7 [info] Thanks a lot for your interest in my case!&gt;I don't think there's mucus in the stool but I never checked properly. &gt; Almost all episodes (except one) have happened at nighttime, after I'd eaten dinner and was already lying in bed. &gt;Never tried keeping a food journal. Episodes have happened after eating big and small meals, with and without lactosis, with and without gluten, etc. They once happened straight after eating just a soy yoghurt.&gt;No accid reflux but excessive fatigue is definitely present. I need 9-10 hours of sleep in order to feel rested (and still sometimes don't). I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 8 years ago. &gt;Episodes are very irregular and unpredictable. Last year, I had about 6 episodes over the course of 10 weeks. Then they were completely gone for over a year. Had an episode last May, nothing since. &gt; No weight loss, abdominal pain is only present during episodes, blood in stool happened twice, the morning after an episode. &gt; I had my stool tested six months ago, but I'm not sure what they tested for. I remember the only positive thing was Escheria Coli. The test was done shorly after an episode and after a week of taking Flagyl and Oflocet. &gt; No fevers, no eye redness, no joint pains, some mouth ulcers but not often. &gt; Stool looks solid and brow, not greasy. Frequent gassiness, frequent bloating, frequent gurgling sounds. &gt; I have had iron deficiency anemia twice before, it was attributed to my vegetarian diet. &gt; Haven't tried completely eliminating lactose not gluten nor sorbitol. Doctor said he didn't think it was food-related. &gt; Still have my gallbladder. &gt; No swollen lymph nodes (that I notice).&gt; Never travelled outside of Europe.&gt; No HIV.&gt; No stool incontinence.&gt; No history of bowel disease in the family. &gt; No known thyroid issues. &gt; They did biopsies during the colonoscopies. I don't know the results.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1511881166 [info] train
comawhite_ [info] A mix of bpd and social anxiety ! long post, and might be totally pointlessI've always been shy since I was a kid, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety among other things, and some extent of social anxiety (although i'm off meds now, by my own choice) I mean, of course, due to the bpd I always have a wavering sense of self... not sure if the rest of you would put it this way - but i think of it as different personality "suits" i slip on when i am with different people.  Lately it's been feeling like I'm getting increasingly out of touch with the personality "suit" I'm wearing.. it's like watching someone else saying/doing/reacting when it's really me. Like I'm so many people in one container, and my "core self" is just buried so deep, unable to control, but ever so self aware. So anyway, today during lunch at my workplace of 3 months, some of my colleagues started to talk about intro and extroverts, and one of my colleagues said to me "she's definitely an extrovert". I was stunned for a while, but I didn't argue much with him nor did I agree. Not that being an extrovert is a bad thing or anything really, I've just never thought I'll be labelled as one (as mentioned I have an extent of social anxiety and I THINK i have mostly been an introvert all my life) At the point, in fact, it just made me feel SO out of touch, between my "core self" and my work personality "suit". Like the people looking into my eyes are seeing someone that's not me, while I stare out from my eyes like I'm someone trapped in a body that's not mine. I have to admit, I'm really almost borderline obsessed with how people label me, to get a grasp of who I supposedly really am. It was a horrible feeling. Not the fact I was an extrovert, but the fact I don't even know the person my colleagues know as “me”. To them I probably seem outgoing, cheerful, and maybe even carefree. The fact they can't see through that supposed "facade" is really causing my anxiety to kick in. Might be because I, who should know myself the most, don't even seem to know myself, or this me, who is writing this post right now, is disappearing from the eyes of others. Like no one is ever going to accept this version of me. I hate this feeling so much I came home and I am just letting myself drown in all these thoughts and I feel suicidal and alone and can’t stop crying and just... shit. That feeling of who the fuck am I? Anyways this might sound dumb or whatever but I just had to tell someone and there’s nobody in my life who’d have a chance of understanding. Not sure what kind of advice I’m looking for either. :( [info] None [info] 1530730884 [info] train
jeremyfirth [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. My doctor prescribed wellbutrin to see if it would help with both. It helped a lot with the anxiety, but not so much with the ADD. after a month of that, I talked to my doctor about it and he kept me on wellbutrin, but added methylphenidate ER for the ADD. i think I've lucked out and found a really effective treatment on our first try. My life is considerably less frenetic and overwhelming. I feel so much better, and I feel so much more control over myself. It's very empowering. [info] None [info] 1410625435 [info] valid
HannahBAnderson [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety in 4th grade my dad came up to me and started ranting about how "all [I] need is Jesus," like I'm some sort of depraved sinner and he (my dad) knows better than me. [info] None [info] 1492320613 [info] train
MattTheProgrammer [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but before I knew that's what it was, the first time I had a panic attack, I had my wife drive me to the emergency room at 2am because I thought I was going to go into cardiac arrest. It happens. [info] None [info] 1473941698 [info] test
localTXmom [info] I used to be like this until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started on an antidepressant, try talking to your husband but also talk to your doctor as well, I feel so much better and in control now that my hormones are balanced [info] None [info] 1572844260 [info] train
Charming-ander [info] I used to LOVE horror movies! I was diagnosed with anxiety in my twenties and now I almost have panic attacks when watching them. 😕 [info] None [info] 1526632191 [info] train
lechino3000 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago. It is hard not to worry about things. Slowly though, with the help of others just watching them being so easy going and fun has helped me calm down.I don't know, I think you need to start rationalizing things in your head whenever you start freaking out. For example, whenever you feel anxious, ask yourself "why am I feeling this way?" and.."can I let this feeling go? if so, when?"..that helped me calm down.  [info] None [info] 1343721198 [info] train
walee1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, and still haven't started therapy. Spent one of the most memorable birthdays of my life by spending it with an insanely smart person I highly respect in a gorgeous place. Had a lot of screw ups, followed by failed attempts to put myself out there in terms of dating. So, all in all, considering how the last year went, I would say it's going like normal? The bad sprinkled with the good. [info] None [info] 1564929815 [info] train
xrked [info] How do you deal with RSD? I’ve recently been learning more about RSD and how it’s affected me since I was a young child. To put a background on it- I had such severe anxiety about rejection and social situations even though I was extroverted that I was diagnosed with anxiety.Looking back I think the symptom could have been treated better by understanding it was a side effect of ADHD.I’m now an adult and really looking for other ways to help myself realize that my brain is hypersensitive to these issues [info] None [info] 1553002247 [info] test
fatcattastic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as an adult, and looking back on my childhood there were a ton of signs similar to what OP is describing. I wish I had communicated to my parents what I was experiencing, because early intervention would have saved adult me some money on therapy. [info] None [info] 1556111684 [info] test
divinecore [info] Physical appearance, usually. And yes, I do get worried that I might owe them something or that I’m leading them on simply by being nice to them :( or that they have ulterior motives. It makes me want to go home and lie down. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before. Not sure if I just don’t like that kind of attention. I’m fine with attention if it’s because I’m being funny, though. I get scared that people might get too close to me. It just makes me sad for a reason I can’t explain! [info] None [info] 1528085283 [info] valid
ChickenPupper [info] I'm a POS HLM My SO has denied me sex for a year since I don't clean everyday or earn as much as her. I don't have a drivers licence and I'm unemployed. She says her friends tell her that it's understandable that she withholds sex and tell her to leave me. She also today said that I'm mentally abusive.She's a person that thinks that problems in relationship lead to no sex, while I think that no sex leads to problems in relationship. She is depressed also.Now the reasons for these things comes from the beginning. I stayed a lot at her place when we didn't live together and she wanted me to clean there or pay rent. I was diagnosed with anxiety that year. I didn't want to pay rent since I didn't live there amd she wanted me there, but cleaning was tough since coping with anxiety wasn't easy Also we did have sex then and my anxiety medicine made me LL and she really made me feel bad about it, so I stopped taking the medication to regain libido.Then she found a place really far out in a small town, which was affordable and had space for us. So I decided to move there to make her happier. Now I didn't have a license and getting one is difficult while having anxiety. The busses have poor connections over here. Now it's really hard to get work without having a car out here. I'm in a program where I do carpentry and sorts for 5 hours a day from wed to fri. I get paid for this and I pay half the rent and the internet. It's still only half of what she earns. She pays her half and also our home insurance. But she feels that I don't appreciate her enough and don't do enough around the house. This is why she doesn't have sex with me and doesn't desire me. Now I have tried to reach terms and do as she asks but I can only keep it up (no pun intended) for a week or two and she won't have sex with me ever. It was my birthday yesterday and the last time I had sex was last year on my birthday. I tried to ask her to have sex with me to make me feel like 10x better and maybe that would motivate me to keep the pace up and hopefully fix our db. But she just won't do it.When I do get stuff done she rewards me with not fighting and arguing as much and hugging or being near me.The reason why she called me mentally abusive was today while arguing with her, I said that maybe I'll have to take advice from this subreddit and leave her. She said it sounded like blackmail and it is abusive to say.Now I really don't know if I actually am a POS or does she just make me out to be one. Right now I feel like crap and don't know if I should apologize to her for saying that I might take your advice or what...Thanks if you read all this and sorry for no tl;dr.EDIT: I also wanted to mention that me moving away from my friends and family to near her family and friends means nothing to her since I did it myself and wasn't forced with a gun to my head.EDIT 2: Forgot to tell that I cheated on my SO by kissing a girl and texting with said girl. This made my SO not want sex even more. [info] None [info] 1530660757 [info] test
Leopandas [info] As an adult, I've been diagnosed with ASD. Very mild. As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Not to dismiss people on the ASD spectrum but having been in classes with children on the severe side of the spectrum.. as we were all grouped in the same class... what used to be called classic autism is nothing like the disabilities I had/have and they dealt with a lot more severe issues. That said, mild autism isn't a joy ride either as I still have meltdowns but sometimes I think classifying both as the same makes people not understand 'autism' has always been around and aspergers or mild autism isn't the worst thing that can happen to your child.  Know what is?  Death from measles, polio, the flu... [info] None [info] 1540233184
DFJ17 [info] How do you even cope with it? Some days it makes me feel like I'm going insane, it's horrible. It's not like I've been diagnosed with anxiety or anything, I just feel like I have some strain of it. I hate it. I feel like it's turning my life upside down, making me feel afraid and inadequate of doing basic things. I'm honestly starting to get worried about what my future is going to be like because of how I am now. I don't know where exactly this all started, but it feels like it's gone haywire in the last few years [info] None [info] 1568920176 [info] valid
lotsofdmg [info] Beta Blockers and Epinephrine Tolerance Break Hello r/drugs how are you guys doing at the moment? I haven't slept in two days, but my lexicon remains partially intact. I am intensely sleep deprived, and I could sprint a fucking marathon anytime of the day. My brain is working in over time and I can't stop. I have taken numerous sedatives to no success. Gabapentin, mirtazapine, cannabis, hydroxyzine, and CBD. Usually this combo would knock me tf out, and kept me sleeping through the next day but this is bad. Nothing is working and Im only getting more stimulated and my heart can't take it. While my current situation appears to be dire, I am guilty of enjoying this euphoria... I feel alive for the first time in years. **Backstory:** So you are wondering how I got into this situation in the first place right? Back in highschool, I was diagnosed with anxiety. My GP prescribed me propranolol, which is a non-cardioselective sympatholytic beta blocker. This means it blocks both β1- and β2-adrenergic receptors. (Epinephrine and noradrenaline) This seemed to help to relax my veins and my ~~impulsive thoughts~~ anxiety. I have taken it everyday for a few years (60mg ER). Back to present day. I ran out of my propranolol, and didn't bother to pick up more because,**I felt it... I felt.. Alive.**HOLY SHIT this feels too good. I imagine this is what meth would be like, after trying addy. I'm sure everybody knows exactly what I'm talking about. I never relized how amazing Epineprine was. Your body becomes so acclimated to your brains natural level of adrenergic receptors that you are tolerant to it. ☆ So this is my purpose of dictating my pool of turbulent frustration ! ☆If you can build a tolerance to adrenaline, previous activities will prove less stimulating eventually. So then, if I was to reduce my tolerance to adrenergic neurotransmitters would I have an elevated enjoyment of activites due to more stimulation and euphoria? To try out my theory, I loaded up a game of League of Legends and blasted some Travis Scott. AND HOLY SHIT, I FEEL LIKE A FUCKING GOD. I have never felt my heart beat this fast or felt so engaged in the moment. Best way to describe it is a constant runners high on dexamph or good ass expresso and without the fatigue.When I focus on my body while laying in bed, I can control the rate at which im stimulated. It feels like all my body becomes cold and vibrating except for my gut and I just feel comfy but like I could still fuck your bitch and steal a fridge on a bike on some crackhead shit.If yall have anything you want to add down below, by all means. With this strat you could make a skydivers heart skip a beat while hes resting in bed. Edit: Sorry for ranting this was such an interesting topic and I was gonna talk about the chemistry of it but got caught up in the moment and fucked it up. *Bonus Question:* Is my tolerance psycological or physical? [info] None [info] 1534321244 [info] test
illdoxyou [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I am fortune enough I can support myself to see a therapist each fortnight who has assisted with helping me deal with stressful situations.  My first sessions waere at a public school and was enough to get me my first job.  As far as I'm aware anxiety does not qualify for NDIS and therefore if her condition (often self diagnosed BTW) is anxiety then she would not qualify for NDIS. Would be good to know what disability she aimed to qualify as to get on NDIS and why she was rejected.  Why only apply once over a 10yr period? [info] None [info] 1555817767 [info] test
Willow_Queen [info] I (18f) is away from home for 2 weeks staying with boyfriend’s (22m) family and need help managing my anxiety from being away from home Hello everyone! I guess I should start with some back story to give you a better picture. (Also sorry for and grammar issues as English was never my strong point in school even though it’s my first language)Anyways I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago but had it ever since I was a child. I’m taking medication for my anxiety but it doesn’t seem to help too much. I also have disability called dystonia which came on at the age of 5; it basically renders my right side completely useless. My family life isn’t amazing either as my dad has narcissistic tendency. My boyfriend and I have been dating for about 3 months now and we drove up to Idaho from California to stay with his dad’s side of the family for Christmas and New Years. I’ve met his dad and step mom once before this so I am nervous about staying with them especially so far away from home. Last time I traveled far away from home was to my long distance boyfriend(now ex) who lived in Florida for my 18th birthday and that didn’t go so well as his family was very mean to me and I just didn’t feel welcomed. My current boyfriend is really understanding about all this which I’m thankful for but I do want to him proud of me by not freezing up when someone asks me a basic question like “what do want to eat?” How can I get through these 2 weeks and be as social as I can without breaking down? Anything helps. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1577118531 [info] test
Unknown-girl7 [info] I do have to take medication for my anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychologist. I’m also very shy and get anxious when interacting with people. I feel like that fits in the category of social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1550804037 [info] train
orangemochafrap17 [info] Like I said, I don't think the two are exclusive, but anxiety should be treated with therapy, it's not a personality trait, it's an illness that holds you back. Not wanting to interact is far different to being **afraid** to interact.As much as introverts like alone time, humans are social animals, we need it to SOME extent, no matter how slight. You're talking about a minority of introverts who actually need that much alone time, compared to a large number of people with anxiety, that again, gets mixed up with introversion on this sub a lot.I don't think it's perfectly understandable for **anyone** to have no friends at all, it's in our nature to want human contact to SOME extent. Very few people are that introverted that they can't have friends, I'm going off the majority here.It's not that they shouldn't be in this community, it's that they mightnt actually be introverted, if they are solely fearing social interactions, they might very well be extraverted but have anxiety.I thought I was very introverted for years, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety, as I learned to manage it I realised I actually enjoyed social events sometimes, but I did still need to be alone most of the time. A lot of people mix the two up, or conflate them together like they come hand in hand, they don't, you're not stuck with anxiety, thats why I tell people if I think they actually have it, because I don't want to think of them going they're whole lives misattributing anxiety as some uncontrollable part of their personality. [info] None [info] 1551136932 [info] train
vNotrix [info] Looking for advice, most likely anxiety related insomnia Hi, first post here. I’m a college student, and for the past 4-6 weeks I’ve been having difficulty falling asleep. It used to be just once every 1-2 months but now it’s every weekday. I’ll lay in bed around 12am and i’ll toss and turn until 1:30-2:00am when I have to wake up at 8am. The weird part is that this doesn’t happen on weekends (friday and saturday night) and it has never happened to me at home. It also started and has been getting worse when my roommate started snoring. I have tried melatonin, generic Zzzquil, cbd, and nyquil. Nothing helps me fall asleep at a normal time. All they do is increase my heart rate. Is there anything I should try or any tips on how to get over this? I’m assuming it’s some sort of anxiety related. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. Not getting 7-8 hours of sleep makes me grumpy and sad in general so that hasn’t been helping. Thank you [info] None [info] 1583860626 [info] train
lbart00 [info] I [19f] am constantly feeling like I'm annoying my boyfriend [19m] of two months. I apologize all the time, and it is affecting us. Help? TL;DR I ask my boyfriend if I'm annoying all the time, and that's what's actually annoying. I don't know how to stop. It's multiple times within the hour, very frequently.Disclaimer as well: I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so I know it stems from that, so no need to let me know. EDIT: I am not looking for professional help or otherwise lengthy psychological assistance. I would just like some advice or encouragement, or to know if someone has been through this. I know it's a personal insecurity issue I need to work on, but I don't know what to do about it in the everyday.My boyfriend is a great man, and treats me better than I ever have been before. Maybe that's why I'm so insecure about our relationship? I care about him greatly and treasure my time with him. But I always ruin it with my *incessant apologizing*. I've been in some (a lot) of abusive relationships and toxic relationships in the past, so I have some (a lot) of baggage. One ex who particularly messed me up had me constantly saying sorry for the way I said things, the way I did things, the way I unintentionally made him feel, even apologizing for being upset myself. I once had to apologize for hours to *him* because I self harmed. When this ex gave me certain looks, texts, or behaviors I knew I was in trouble and I would start apologizing instantly. It was like when you did something wrong and your parents found out, except all the time if I did *anything*. This has impacted me greatly, likely for life.I've also been bullied in the past and was very suicidal in high school because people told me how shittily annoying I was. This, along with a few other situations and some past friendships, have me in a constant fear of being annoying or rude.I am saying "sorry"s all the time or asking my boyfriend if I'm being annoying (just by existing). I know it takes a pretty big toll on him and our relationship. Still, he is very kind and willing to validate me as he understands I've been abused in the past. He always says "if you were being annoying or I had an issue, I'd just tell you- I promise". I trust him, but I just get a... vibe. Or something. I don't know.I know it's unfair to him, but sometimes the residual fear from exes' "vibes" when they were mad at me think that when he acts that way he's annoyed. Hint: he's not. Sometimes he enjoys just listening, or he has ADHD so he's on his phone instead of looking at me and honestly doesn't know. I know that he is not my exes, but the behaviors that once caused automatic fear still do, even with someone else.What it basically is is that I *know* this is annoying, I *know* it could ruin our great relationship, I am *completely conscious* of me doing this toxic behavior, and I can't stop. It's obsessive sometimes. I apologize for doing things he hadn't even noticed me do, like stepping in front of him. I don't even know how to stop.I care about him so much and don't want to ruin our relationship. I am conscious of my behavior being toxic and unhealthy, I just have no idea how to stop it. I don't know how to believe he would "just tell me" if he doesn't want to be with me or is irritated by me. Help or experience with this is greatly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1553579547 [info] train
fidget4ever [info] Gotta tell ya from the perspective of a 50+ professional woman who wasn’t diagnosed and medicated until I was 40, I made it through and so can you.  Before ADHD diagnosis, I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I had to bustMy butt through college and early career. All I can tell you is be ready to show a doctor the facts. There are certain things doctors look for, the most important being that you have some proof that you have had Symptoms since childhood. They are sometimes different for girls than boys, but not always. If you have a Parent, sibling or teacher who can vouch for your symptoms as a child, that will also go a long way. [info] None [info] 1568684185 [info] train
rdmelo [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. I started taking meds that actually make my crises more frequent and more intense (but shorter, at least). I had my first mid-run crisis yesterday (6 weeks after I started). I don't know about your symptoms, but mine included blurred sight, lethargy, difficult breathing and knee pain. I started jogging anyway, cranked up the volume, and everything went away around the 400-800m mark (I don't know for sure because of the blurred sight). The last 4km were a breeze after it, and I ran on a track instead of a treadmill.My experience might not relate to yours, however. Still, the first thing you should do is setting an adequate mindset for you. Mine is "find a way, not excuses" (I also like the "don't get lazy, get the upper hand"), it helps me keeping motivated. Second of all, think thoroughly about your safety: are you comfortable, have you stretched, are you hydrated, does your phone has enough battery left, do you have a reliable person that knows where you are and what you are doing that you can call if needed, is this person's phone on speed dial. Third, think about who and why are you doing it for. I'm doing it for myself, because I love myself, because I want to be the best I can. I'm not doing it because someone asked me to do it. I'm not doing it for the people around me. I'm not doing it to look cool or sexy in my fitness clothes. And guess what, people around you are doing the same. They don't care about what you're doing, they're just there to do their own thing and enjoy themselves. The first time was hard but it got better by the minute, because I was in control. I knew what I wanted to do, I knew how to do it, I could stop anytime I wanted. Still, check with your psychiatrist if it's ok to exercise. If you control your anxiety without medical assistance, then you can start running, it's a very safe exercise. About your nutrients, download MyFitnessPal (it's an app for smartphones) and it can take care of the calculations. In order to lose weight, you can aim for a 500 calorie deficit, just make sure you eat at least 1200 calories every day. You don't have to eat anything before running, just make sure you're very well hydrated. I like a banana (potassium to avoids cramps) and a whole liter (1/4 gallon) of water about 15-30 minutes before leaving home. After it, it's good to pump in some protein to help your body heal and build muscle. That's it overall. Use the search box and you'll find some more resources. My main advice is to avoid postponing your first run as much as possible. As you progress, your focus will naturally shift from your anxiety to how can you run longer, faster, better.  [info] W9D1 [info] 1433440276 [info] train
streamlinetacos [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 7, and I still haven't learned to effectively cope with it yet.I'm also depressed. I am not on medication, my mother won't allow me.There's a lot to talk about with all of this. My parents suspect I have ADD/ADHD.I'm can also suffer from disassociation at points, especially when I get very low. [info] 17; totally earned this [info] 1452254083 [info] valid
just_1_more_thing [info] Yes! But it's because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. What kind of work do you do? [info] None [info] 1561295750 [info] train
ageekyninja [info] As someone with both disorders, ADD and anxiety have similarities but ADD doesnt cause you to be super nervous to the same extent anxiety disorder does. ADD causes nervousness and irritability for different reasons, especially if its sensory related. Anxiety itself is a bit of a different ballgame. Anxiety is just plain nervousness for no reason. ADD interacts with that in how it distracts me and how it effects me handling it but doesnt cause it. So its really a matter if your experience is something like that where you are irrationally nervous about a lot of things or if this is just one insecurity you have. If its just a matter of insecurity in relationships thats a different issue of course.Any time I was tested for ADD the doctor was only ever focused on what he was specifically testing for, not what other problems might exist. Like the doctor would suspect ADD and so he would just focus on if the test would confirm it. At least thats my experience. It wasnt until later that I was diagnosed with anxiety and that was after specifically asking the doctor about those specific symptoms. [info] None [info] 1523833300 [info] train
georgialouisej [info] No, I wish he would have. I was very young and had (at the time) undiagnosed anxiety. Our relationship didn't start out terrible, at first he was lovely and all that but after a while he started to become controlling and manipulative which is awful anyway but worse for me at the time due to previously mentioned anxiety problems. After finding out he had cheated on me I tried to break up with him but he threatened to kill himself so I stayed. His behaviour then got worse by tenfold and he would openly do terrible things but I would stay because I thought that if I left and he killed himself it would be my fault. About 6 months before I broke up with him I was diagnosed with anxiety and started receiving treatment, we broke up after he did some extremely awful things and I finally realised that if he did kill himself, while that would be terrible, I am not responsible for his actions and it wouldn't be my fault.  [info] None [info] 1509194229 [info] train
MercuryBitt [info] This was a dream I had a few week ago, and it honestly fucked me up for a solid 2 weeks. It's in bits in pieces, but the first scene was a bunch of "people" in a foyer. Their bodies were decaying and exploding, blood pooling in the foyer up to about their ankles. Then they became like decayed skeletons. The next part I remember is a man putting bits and pieces of other bodies onto his own, to a point where he looked more like a walking mass of skin and tumors. He was standing down a hallway, gargling "I am hope" over and over again. It was almost like a flashback, cause then I would see a young boy running around this hallway saying the same thing. In my mind, I assumed the man was actually the boy at one point, but then he became my nightmare. I forced myself awake after that. Every night after that, I thought the man was standing in my room, saying the same thing and licking the back of my neck and stuff. I'm blaming it on the fact I'm in a Forensic Bio class, and I see a lot of dead  body pictures, and the fact I've been diagnosed with anxiety which gets worse at night. I love forensic bio and it doesn't bother me too much, except when it gets in my subconsciousness. tl;dr I am hope.  [info] None [info] 1456697500 [info] train
FloBee82 [info] I certainly do! I started suffering from them in my mid-20's. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and since then I've been able to control it through behavior and meds. I can appreciate the show and T's perspective completely. Panic attacks are awful. I have never passed out but have been on the verge. I literally feel like I'm dying and they would come out of nowhere-just boom! [info] None [info] 1571941717 [info] test
alphagogo_52 [info] I'm the opposite of this...I used to overthink all the time too, day and night. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I had to stop most of these thoughts coming through, as the negativity was triggering my anxiety. I think I kinda shifted my overthinking process into the cigar session. [info] None [info] 1569171867 [info] train
fuckingconor [info] Hoping to find some answers: therapy didn’t work The reason I am reaching out for help here is because I have heard Reddit is a good way to get lots of peoples opinions. I also fear that my anxiety will exclude me from many social events in the future as it has done in that past and lead to more problems developing.Background: I am 18 years old, male, 5 foot 4 from the UK and I go to university. I have had one girlfriend for over 1 year now. I have a group of around 10 friends with 2 that I am a lot closer with. I come from a nice household with no immediate problems. I live both at my house and my girlfriend’s house as we live close to each other and always sleep in the same bed at night.I had “self-diagnosed” anxiety from the age of 15 and suffered when it came to parties, exams, women and getting into fights (I never actually got into any, just the thought of getting into it). My mother always used to say that it’s a teenage problem and it will go away as I get other, therefore she got me Kalms sleeping pills as an attempt to calm me down.I finally went to see a therapist at the age of 17 while I was studying at university and this was where I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was told many techniques such as breathing and thinking but they never seemed to help. When I am having a panic attack I try to think of these techniques to this day but nothing works.At this point, I talked to my mother about some stronger pills but the most she could have access to was anti-sickness tablets and slightly stronger sleeping pills.I met my girlfriend when I was 17. I tutored her in the library, when we were in there I was never scared or anxious. However, when I knew that she was talking to other men (as I hadn’t expressed that I liked her yet) it angered me and sent my anxiety levels very high. As we got closer I went to her house and even then I had to tell her that I was frightened and had to go to the toilet often to vomit or breathe. After a lot of work she became my girlfriend and a lot of the anxiousness went away when I was around her in my general life. However, I still to this day have to prepare and get very scared when we go to nightclubs. I have never been once without her and I get frightened when I am not with her (e.g. if she’s at the toilet). For this reason, I have never been out on a “Lad’s Night” with my friends and continue to miss social events with them to the point where they barely know who I am. I do drink with my friends but only really the 2 close friends that I spoke to earlier and this would be in-house drinking.I was driven to write this post due to an event last week. I went to a pub/restaurant in the city centre with my girlfriend, her close friend that I also know very well and my friend that I know very well. I assumed I would be comfortable in this situation as these are people that I am close to, even if I have never been out to a pub before. I was okay and didn’t experience anything except from the odd shiver over the first 30 minutes. However, when I got to my second drink I could not stomach it and kept going back and forward to the toilet. We went to McDonald’s after this as I ruined the night slightly and wanted to get out of the pub (my girlfriend also wanted to leave the pub as the bar staff kept staring at her as they thought her friend was underage). In McDonalds I did not eat, I only drank water. My girlfriend knows I am bad in these situations so she tries her best to calm me down and swing the night in my favour. So after this we went to one more pub and then home. At this last pub I left the table every 5 minutes to either the toilet or outside (even though I don’t smoke). I would hear things in my ear from other people at the pub complimenting my girlfriend or asking if she was actually my girlfriend (this is because she is very beautiful). But this made me panic even more.At this point, I can’t even go to a small social event such as this without making a massive deal out of it. I am known in my group to be a “ghost” and I am rarely invited to events as I will say no anyway. I want to break this habit and be a social butterfly and enjoy all of these events like all my friends do. I don’t want to panic anymore. I have had enough.My anxiety will give me effects based on the situation such as:• Shivering• Vomiting• Complete Loss of Appetite • Sweating• Fear of No Escape• Headaches• Panic Attacks• Loss of BreathThank you to anyone who gives me help, I am in desperate need of help as I haven’t received anything that has helped so far. I am getting older and with time I will be missing more and more social events and potentially missing important career opportunities as I can’t make new friendships or go to work events due to my anxiety also. [info] None [info] 1565127074 [info] valid
Sh4me [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was eleven years old, and after that did I learn that my dad and grandfather both had it as well. It came as a surprise, and I had no idea. I doubt that I picked it up from them either considering my dad didn't live with us, and I didn't spend a lot of time with my grandfather.  [info] None [info] 1376316684 [info] test
gene1113 [info] It'll be ok.I was just diagnosed with anxiety and had trouble learning to cope with the panic attacks. It was rough.  [info] None [info] 1526345969 [info] train
tinybluesock [info] I made an appointment to see the doctor.. ...and I’m so scared.  All I feel is angry or scared or sad.  For over a month now.  Before that I had a period of feeling amazing...everything was spotless, I was up on all my reading, I hardly slept and got everything done!  I was productive!  Then... it just stopped.  I stayed in bed all day and skipped classes.  I yelled at my son.  I yelled at my SO, I yelled at myself.  I feel like I just cycle through “everything is awesome!  I am the most productive!” And “everything is shit, I fucking suck!”.  It’s been like that as long as I can remember.  My mother used to tell me I was such a drama queen and needed to grow up.  When I was in high school I was diagnosed with anxiety and possible ocd... but my treatment ended and I still had this flip-flop with no in between stage of “things are going well but I’m not insanely pumped”.  I’m never just... living, im always needing to do all the things, or none of the things.  I always believed that my mother was right and i was a crazy drama queen but I’m starting to think that if I know I’m a drama queen.. shouldn’t I be able to chill a little?  I feel like I don’t have any balance in my life... everything is one extreme or the other, never just...  the grey area?  I guess.. I don’t really know how to explain it and I’m worried my doctor won’t understand.  Or worse, he’ll confirm what my mother said and tell me to grow the fuck up... anyone else ever felt this way?  I feel like I’m crazy.  I feel like I’m realizing that all the things I’ve started and failed (in school mostly but also in relationships, sports...etc) always ends because I hit my “sad phase”.  My SO commented that he thought I should see a doctor, and I took one of those online tests from some Canadian psychology centre and it said I have like a really high chance of having some kind of mood issue so.... I’m kind of hoping I do.  I think it would be nice to be able to feel solid and to be able to function and succeed at stuff :/.  Then again, maybe I just need to work harder?  Sorry this is so long and rambley .... I’m just kind of freaking out, I feel like I’m just a big baby who needs to put on her big girl pants... but then again if I’ve tried that for well over a decade and it hasn’t helped maybe I do need to see the doctor?  Idk what the point of this post is... if anyone has any relatable experience I would love to hear it. [info] None [info] 1515163878 [info] test
pkosuda [info] Going to a sporting event. I always worry some emergency will happen and I'll be trampled to death in the crowd. Or leaning against a window/window sill in a 3+ story building. I always think it'll break and I'll fall to my death so I'm nervous leaning against them. I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1393083909 [info] valid
TheLemonMage [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but that's just something I inherited. As a person, yes, I'm emotionally resilient; it's easy for me to not take things to heart, and I'm surprisingly adaptive to big life changes, including deaths of loved ones. My friends can rely on me to vent to, as a shoulder to cry on. I'm not an emotional person, but I'm always there for my friends and family [info] ENTP [info] 1566874283 [info] valid
vandalizmmm [info] Suffering from scruples again. I've suffered from scrupulosity for the past 11 or so years. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I have sought treatment and thought I was doing better, as I was able to space out my confessions and be more confident in deciding whether or not I should go to confession. However, today I panicked a little over something. I watched a YouTube video that critiqued a certain YouTuber for faking the use of an ouija board for clickbait. The video then showed clips of the aforementioned youtuber's clickbait video. It seemed like the whole thing was faked so I thought there wouldn't be any harm in me watching a silly YouTube critique, but now I'm questioning that. I stopped watching the video and didn't finish it.If I'm questioning whether or not I've sinned, it's a venial sin, right? Should I be super concerned about this? Or should I just try to stay calm and avoid these types of videos in the future? Most importantly, how can a scrupulous person like me overcome these types of "relapses"? I'm tired of being so stressed out over these types of things and would appreciate any help and advice. [info] None [info] 1557855952 [info] train
sizillyd [info] Did you see a nurse practitioner or something? You should have seen a psychiatrist. A physician. Not a nurse. The same thing happened to me my first time. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went and saw a primary care physician. However, my issue was my concentration. So I made an appointment with a psychiatrist and told them what my concerns were. I was tested for ADHD and was prescribed medication. [info] None [info] 1474136976 [info] train
masterofnone_ [info] Yes.  My palms start to sweat, my pulse increases, I get very fidgety and I have no idea why.  This usually happens when nothing is going on around me.  Unfortunately I was diagnosed with anxiety only recently, therefore I cannot provide and useful advice.  Sorry. At least you know you’re not alone in this.  [info] None [info] 1514868521 [info] train
LorAu [info] It doesn't automatically mean you've a illness at all however it is an indicator that you might have one.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a form of PTSD. It has to do with the impact on your life but also on how often and how strong/ in what way the symptoms accrue. Self diagnosis is generally not very accurate and I advise against it. [info] None [info] 1573558900 [info] train
urbanwolf [info] Do you have a therapist or psychiatrist? It might help to have someone to talk to, and they can also help you figure out what is going on and whether you do have aspergers or possibly another condition. Figuring that out can be beneficial. If you do have Aspergers or possibly something like social phobia there are things you can do to work on your social skills which could help. A therapist/psychiatrist/etc can help with this. You don't have to struggle alone. I also think I might have Aspergers, or something else going on. I'm planning to bring this up to my new psychiatrist when I see her soon. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and social phobia but I feel like there's something more going on. [info] None [info] 1483783878 [info] train
Uggoface [info] Fired for attendance in CA I've  been working at this employer for 9 months. I will admit that I called in sick A LOT. I had a written warning once. I have had a horrible year, involving many health problems and the death of a family member. I have a diagnosed autoimmune disorder that causes me to get sick extremely easily. I've  been diagnosed with chronic migraines  which was the lost common reason for calling in sick. I've been diagnosed with anxiety which  was another main reason I was absent often. This job caused me a tremendous  amount of anxiety, and anxiety  attacks can also trigger my migraines. I fully acknowledge that i did call in way too many times and it made sense that they fired me...that being said I'm taking some time to focus on my health and apply for jobs in a different  atmosphere where  there's  less social pressure. I'm  wondering  whether I can possibly still qualify for unemployment  while I'm  on the job search for something  different. [info] None [info] 1559890763 [info] train
faruins [info] Should I quit due to my anxiety worsening? I’m really at a loss here. I’ve been working casual hours (even though I’m technically hired as a part time RN) on an orthopaedic surgical floor for the last six months. During this time, I was diagnosed with anxiety and essentially just feel it getting worse and worse. My doctor has even said I appear to be worse and has since upped my medication and I’ve been coming back to check in with her every two weeks. A part of me knows that bedside nursing isn’t for me but because I’m a recent new grad, I know without gaining hospital bedside skills I won’t be able to apply to jobs outside of the hospital. Hence feeling so conflicted. I mean maybe bedside nursing could work for me but I’ve yet to find the right fit. The staff are nice and supportive on this floor, but I can’t see myself working there long term.I had a talk with my family and boyfriend and they’ve even suggested I quit my job now and just look for other positions. It kind of surprised me because they’ve been encouraging me to stick it out and to keep trying but I guess at this point, even to them I don’t seem to be improving and with the few shifts I work, I may be better off finding another job? I constantly feel ill and have GI issues, I don’t sleep through the night well and wake up a lot, I wake up with my heart racing, and the list goes on. It’s just affecting my daily living and I feel like a phoney. I keep being told how I feel is normal for a new nurse but I don’t know how much longer I can continue feeling like this. Because I work so few and far between, I’m a recognizable face on my floor but I don’t really know anyone and they don’t know me. I haven’t even met the new floor manager either so I feel like I can’t bring myself to let them know how I’ve been feeling. My sister who works in healthcare has said to not bother due her own personal experiences which have been negative. Any nurses with anxiety or anyone in general, if you can just give me advice. [info] None [info] 1557927018 [info] train
harperdarper [info] Helocopter parents afraid of adult child camping My parents are not really narcissists but more helocopter parents. But I'm getting sick of this constant worrying they push on me, telling me all the terrible things that could happen to me if I go out.So I'm 26 and my sibling is 21 and we're going camping tonight at a local state park. Mom is totally against this idea; worried about animals and other campers and asked me if we could just camp out in the backyard. Absolutely off the wagon she is. I told her look I'm almost 30 I don't know what you want me to do I can't just spend all my time at home. She's not happy but we're going, I'm tired of her always telling me I'm going to die or whatever everytime I leave the house. I finally started a good job with great pay so I'll be moving soon. They're trying to talk me out of that too but I need to live MY life without them always putting anxiety and their negative outlooks on me. They're not bad people, they've been great parents but I've been diagnosed with anxiety that my therapist has said stems from them telling me pretty much anytime I try to do anything something bad will happen to me. I'm working on being more spontaneous like camping so hopefully moving out will be great and finally get rid of this anxiety. Just needed to vent thanks for readingTLDR helocopter parents give me anxiety about doing anything [info] None [info] 1530640210 [info] train
hollywoodshowbox [info] Believe it or not I was diagnosed as being in a depressive state three weeks ago. I suffered from disordered eating habits (reading: anorexia &amp; bulimia, not at the same time) for four years (recovered now for a little over a year). I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder... last year? My motivation is to be the best possible version of myself (BPVoM), whatever that is. Sitting on my ass crying because life didn't work out the way I thought it would is *not* something the BPVoM would do. Moping about in an eternal grey is *not* something the BPVoM would do. It's really, really hard to develop this attitude and has taken a while to turn it into a habit -- but now that I've locked it in... it's just easier to cope with shit, you know? Find whatever works for you and go off of that. I was never a believer in the "one size/rule/belief fits all" thing. Discover a philosophy, mission, whathaveyou -- and make it your own. Good luck! You can do this.  [info] Female [info] 1398840183 [info] train
highestbird [info] Double vision occurs after pushups, during sex, morning Age: 30Sex: MHeight:  5'10''Weight:  148lbsRace: WhiteDuration:  1 yearMy health:  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks.  I used anti-anxiety medicine in the past but haven't for the past 5 years.  I remember 7 years ago I had weird blurry vision problems that wouldn't go away.  The blurry vision went away on its own.  I also had weird "circulation" issues in my legs, arms but apparently not a vascular problem.  It went away too 7 years ago.  I do sometimes feel chest pain which has been an on-going thing since I was 13.  I went to the ER a few times 5 years ago because of the chest pain, they did some tests, all normal.Symptoms: Double visionStory:I started drinking coffee regularly last year. Maybe about 2-3 cups a day for a month last Oct.  Mind you, I never was a coffee drinker before this.  After one month, I was sitting at my computer and all of a sudden I got double vision out of no where.  I immediately stopped drinking caffeine and it got better.  BUT, throughout the year, I would have a drink that has caffeine in it, and after 2 days the double vision would come back. I would stop again and it would go away.  Did this maybe 4-5 times last year and the same thing would happen.In Sept '15 there was a wedding I went to and had soda with caffeine in it along with alcohol. Since then I have been having double vision whenever I workout/push ups and even during sex.  Seems to happen when I do something strenuous.  After the double vision happens I usually have a headache afterwards.  My face/head feels really warm with pressure.  I'm already seeing a doctor and had my blood tested along with a CT scan.  Apparently they were all normal.Still trying to figure out what is wrong with me.Edit:  I don't smoke and I rarely drink alcohol.  I have been clean from caffeine for a month. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1447080286 [info] train
lima_247 [info] I've had shower anxiety since I was a small child. I had very bad eyesight from a young age, and because i had to take off my glasses to shower, I would get anxious and think I saw things that weren't there. The loud noise also makes me feel vulnerable, because it's another sense of mine compromised. Washing my face is the worst, because it's when I'm the most vulnerable.Showering during the day, keeping showers short, and keeping to a routine in the shower all help. I also like music while I shower, and plenty of light. What you have 100% sounds like anxiety, though. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought I might be schizophrenic, but I looked into it and the symptoms are really very different. I often thought about people sneaking up on me in my empty house, and dwelled on these thoughts and scenarios, which sounds like what you're doing. [info] None [info] 1421013965 [info] train
rcbarr94 [info] It’s possible that you have anxiety. I’m constantly obsessing over whether people actually like me or if they just pretend and then say rude/mean things behind my back. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started seeing a therapist and I’ve been working on it. It’s hard to let it go but you have to learn to let yourself be okay with people not liking you because not every person in the world is going to get along and that’s okay. There are people that I don’t like but that doesn’t necessarily mean that they’re bad people. So I try to think of the reverse. There are people who won’t like me but that doesn’t mean that I’m a bad person or that there’s anything wrong with me. Also some people ARE just mean spirited and it says more about them than it does about the people they’re being mean to/about.  [info] None [info] 1527474147 [info] train
trippingtoadfunk420 [info] Hi all. Don't really know the rules for here but just thought I would check it out. I am starting on Day 1 today. Last used 21 hours ago. I quit last year on 04/09/2016 but unfortunately relapsed in October. Things were going good too just a dumb mistake that led further and further down the road of using again and I got back where I started. MY DOC was prescription painkillers never used H although was around it never wanted to try it because I knew I would like it too much. So I've since came to the conclusion once AGAIN to quit these things. The worse thing for me was that they weren't necessarily affecting my life in the typical sense. Never had money problems because of them, have a nice job, was present at all social events so I more or less used to compensated for something else medically wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, IBS and Gastritis. With painkillers they helped all of my issues in one pill verses taking something for each of one of those conditions. Most of which had side effects I couldn't handle and didn't take the medication.  Painkillers offered me everything I needed. I know this is impart a delusion of an addicts mind but on the other hand it truly helped me in ways I hope to find in other medications for my diagnosis'. I would binge very occasional but would 9/10 times conserve what I bought and use what I needed to get through the day and not be totally blasted from them. I plan to use the supplements and various withdrawal remedies that I used last time in order to kick this away from my life. If anyone has any tips on what has worked for them that isn't found on your normal everyday "withdrawal recipe" feel free to share with me.  [info] 05/08/2017 [info] 1494267492 [info] train
Calisayshey [info] MDMA. Changed my life. But on a more serious note, anxiety. People around me always talked about test taking anxiety, but never were serious about it. Not to long ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yes it sucks but I never thought it'd be this bad now that I have after going through rough times. Though it all it only made me a better person. I feel like I know how to communicate better and It made me want to pursue psychology. I know a lot of people bash it for having little to no employment opportunities but fuck it. I know where I wanna be and what it'll take to get, but till then I look forward to going to my classes and doing my own research. [7] [info] None [info] 1447147052 [info] test
Jack-da-crack [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 12 and now just recently developed panic attacks in my early 20s. Panic attacks are so awful, it's the feeling of impending doom and the sudden need to vomit.  I end up getting hives on my face and do end up vomiting if the panic attack is bad enough. I dread the next time I have another one. They can have my anxiety/ panic attacks, I hate people who proclaim it like its a badge of honor to show how your life sucks ass.  [info] None [info] 1553500328 [info] train
realstonned [info] See I have similar symptoms but I am diagnosed with anxiety and IBS and one of the few things that help me out is cannabis. I find eating a .1-.2 of a gram of rso before bed helps me not feel adominal pain and nausea. [info] None [info] 1441132020 [info] train
Txeas [info] Well,  I was diagnosed with anxiety recently so since then I have been stressed with the subsequent health issues I've experienced.  (I'm not entirely convinced it actually is anxiety). Thanks for that info. . Very interesting that stress could be the cause.   [info] None [info] 1452651977 [info] train
TheRunningMango [info] You sound exactly like me. For years I ignored it and thought it was normal, and that I was just 'type A' personality, and that was that and I didn't need any sort of special help. But, I started seeing someone when I had so much anxiety that I couldn't perform on exams (the LSAT, specifically) without having major panic attacks, and I simultaneously developed severe insomnia. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well as OCD in the form of perfectionism. I started taking zoloft and was prescribed klonopin (a take-as-needed) and it's helped quite a bit (though tbh only on week 6 of that, so take this w a grain of salt). So tl;dr: no, you're not making this up, and I would definitely recommend seeing someone and inquiring about SSRIs and maybe even a take-as-needed if you ever have panic attacks or insomnia. And feel free to reach out anytime if you need help or have questions &lt;3 we gotta stick together us high-functioning-high-anxiety-ers  [info] None [info] 1543779252 [info] test
koeingtony [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety while in the navy. Afterwards I saw some articles online that really clicked for me and my inability to care for myself like a normal adult, and they were all about adhd! So once I was out of the navy I went to an adhd doc who specializes in adult diagnosis. He gave me a sheet and had me and my mom fill it out, and then interviewed me. He agreed that my symptoms indicated a combo of adhd and anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1527627043 [info] train
Locke005 [info] Same here!  I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and I think this is pretty common for people with anxiety.  If I ever look up some symptoms I am having on the Internet I always think I have the worst possible illness. WebMD is very bad for me. [info] None [info] 1270824107 [info] valid
vehiclesshockme [info] My mom has some meds that helped a little bit not a whole lot. I feel like my body has just trained itself to wake up whenever I hear her move (her room is next to mine) especially after the incident in March which is where most of my sleeping stopped. It doesn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety and have been on and off meds for that basically since I was a teenager. [info] None [info] 1558622346 [info] train
appa4494 [info] Getting anxious when weekends are almost over. But then I’m fine when they are. Hey all, first time posting, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, I declined any medication bc I’m in the National Guard. I wouldn’t say my anxiety is severe but it’s bad enough to where I cannot do any kind of public speaking.When my weekends are close to ending I can’t seem to do anything I enjoy, I constantly freak out that “I don’t have time for that”, “I can’t do that” I don’t really know how to explain it but it’s just a constant feeling of uncomfortableness and I feel bad. When I go back to work though I’m fine. Just curious if anyone else has this problem?It’s even worse when I have to go to drill, omg I have this constant feeling of dread like “goddammit, this and this is gonna happen” but when I get there I’m fine. [info] None [info] 1572457668 [info] train
Ptolemy222 [info] Hi, I have felt this way (Although I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16). I have struggled with it for years. But from my perspective what’s happening here is that you have personal insecurities in yourself. You feel although if you were to start talking to someone you would be judged, ridiculed, labelled. THIS is a natural thing that some guys go through. (I have some evolutionary theories that back this up a bit).But this may come from different things. Like times where you feel like you shouldn’t step up. or you think that someone has an advantage over you and you are comparing yourself. Or what I personally went through was fear of talking to people. It’s really “The Ego” which you never want to threaten. Eckhart Tolle - The power of now, IS A GREAT BOOK FOR THIS. But I think overcoming things like this comes with that internal belief that who you are is valuable. What you believe is valuable. You can have confidence in almost any situation. You think what other people say is valuable, but interpret what people say to be truthful to yourself before accepting it as a fact. You need to think less that people are “Higher” or “Lower” than you, and start thinking that we’re all human on the same level, some people make really stupid mistakes, we get over it, and we’re all trying our best. This will come with time naturally because we grow into stronger people everyday if we move in that direction.Some stuff I did to get over my anxiety (Not necessarily what you have), was by taking weird challenges. Like Saying something stupid to see how someone will react. Start making conversations with strangers. Literally going out everyday through my anxiety and socially experimenting to figure out what are good things  and what are not good things to do. Socially experiment, have confidence in yourself.I’m not sure if this helped. But I am trying.  [info] None [info] 1510969498 [info] valid
Tophat_Benny [info] Did I have a panic attack? (ER story) I want to preface this that I have been diagnosed with anxiety but its "mostly" under control as I currently do not take usual anti anxiety meds, just a few for sleeping, trazadone, hydroxizine, CBD oil, though the one that feels does the most is CBD.  I also have been having breathing problems for the last year.  So far it's been mostly allergy related, I'm on a 1 a day control inhaler.  Even though later on my actual Asthma test came up negative, I still take the control because it does seem to help, cold air, dust, are triggers.  So when I woke up today with shortness of breath, dizzy, felt like passing out, I thought it was lung related.  My inhalers did nothing, I felt awful, so I had my wife drive me to the ER.  Blood tests came back normal.  Had a chest CT scan which showed no abnormalities.  My blood is circulating oxygen fine, my lungs are not wheezy.  So they basically sent me home and said to follow up with my primary.  I'm still tired, and little nauseous.  But I'm doing slightly better later in the day.  Is this all in my head?  I've had smaller attacks before but they felt way different, and once I realised I was anxious it went away. They were never debilitating as it was today. [info] None [info] 1579724428 [info] train
brokenjasper [info] I'm used to staying up to 5 or 6 am. Also I happen to feel tired but I have an appointment at 10:30am and it is stressing me out how the time I have left to sleep is ticking away and is getting less and less. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Already tried laying in bed. About to try again, but I'll probably not be able to sleep. It is common for me to either get no sleep or very little sleep when I have to be up in the morning. I'd probably sleep with no trouble if the appointment was somehow cancled. [info] None [info] 1566548544 [info] train
Odysseus32 [info] Yes you absolutely would be screwed.I was talking to my boss the other day and he was telling me about the guy before me who would always have anxiety attacks.  and he said every couple of days they would flare up and he would need to go sit in his car for 20-30 minutes to calm down.  That made him a bad worker.I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  I have taken anti-depressants/anti-anxiety medicine and can't quite find the right one because the meds make my already terrible anxiety so bad before it starts working that I can't handle it.  I told them that anxiety was very real and that every once in a while I while have an attack during the day (most of mine are at night or when I'm sleeping) and they were like "oh he didnt really have anxiety he just wanted to not work" and I thought "how in the world could you possibly know that?"  If I have an attack it won't be apparent because I'm doing everything I can to control it until I can get somewhere private.US employers care about you showing up, and you working hard.  they don't care about anything else, unless you're with a local company with a very empathetic owner.  This is capitalist nation.  Get with the program or live under an overpass. [info] None [info] 1490662408 [info] train
FlacOrGtfo [info] I switched from Vyvanse (40mg) to Evekeo (10mg x 2), since Vyvanse gave me side effects like some increased heartrate and anxiety, as well as agitating crashes and a little acid reflux.For me, Evekeo, which is instant release 50/50 d-amph/l-amph, kicks in after about 45 minutes, (gives me like 15 minutes of euphoria) and has about 1.5 or 2 hours of focus. Then I have a crash a few hours later and causes me to be perhaps worse than before. I actually have worse anxiety, longer periods of increased heartrate, and worse acid reflux. But the effects are going to vary a lot from person to person. Like, for me, I'm diagnosed with anxiety. At first, the crash effects made me feel sick like a cold or something and then settled down after a couple weeks.It is a temporary anti-depressant, I suppose. And it is energizing and helps me focus for a bit. But ultimately I want to find something else since I find the limited benefits and excessive side effects to be annoying... isn't Evekeo just a revival of benzedrine? [info] None [info] 1446471898
dogtale123 [info] Medication advice please : SSRI So I have been given Sertraline HCL 25MG by my doctor last week for anxiety and OCD. I began taking it Saturday. He recommended me taking the capsule apart and taking a bit of the meds for a few doses to see how it worked. I did that for 2 days. I guess I should have done that longer.. I started taking the whole capsule and today is day 3. Today I feel fatigued and a bit light headed. Now I’m starting to give myself anxiety thinking I’m giving myself an overdose or something. I have lorazepam from before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Back when I was having a few panic attacks. Can I take a lorazepam to calm myself down? Or can I not take it since I’m taking the SSRI’s now. Are these symptoms normal?Edit: adding infoI’m also freezing under a blanket and my fiancé is in a T-shirt and says it’s not cold [info] None [info] 1586384432 [info] valid
brittybat [info] I feel like this a lot. I feel really calm most of the time, but I'm also at home most of the time, and not much makes me anxious when I'm at home in my comfy bed. But I've been diagnosed with anxiety by two doctors (just my regular primary care doctors) when I went in for unrelated issues and put on medication for anxiety.Also my boyfriend seems to think my anxiety isn't that bad for me to be on medication for it. But also I feel the most relaxed when I'm with him and he's never really seen me in the situations I get anxious in. But does make me second guess myself, my diagnoses, wonder if the doctors are just pushing medications. [info] None [info] 1556174116 [info] test
dancingfruit [info] PCOS requires 3 things according to the Rotterdam criteria for the diagnosis:1. A/Oligomenorrhea - Minsan lang o walang regla (2 years ako nawalan)2. Hyperandrogenism - Mga symptomas na nagmumukhang 'lalaki' o pagninipis or pagkakalbo ng buhok sa ulo pero nag kaka bigote at pag kapal ng buhok sa mga bahagi ng katawan na di dapat sa babae - chest, belly, back, legs3. Confirmation sa ultrasound (Transv or anal, as previously discussed).What's included in PCOS is insulin resistance. Your body produces more insulin than normal as a result of the increase in testosterone. The consequence is rapid weight gain. I was able to control my PCOS from 180lb to 106lb pero I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this year. Bumalik lahat ng symptoms ko. Ang laki uli ng tinaba ko ng 3 months (30+ pounds).If kukuha ka ng Ultrasound, dapat OB yung taga gawa hindi yung random radiologist. May training kasi na OB-Sonologist. Meron sa Hi-Precision at sa New World. Sure meron sa mga ospital. :)You can PM for other info regarding PCOS. I've had since I was 12. I'm 28 now.Edit: I haven't heard of 3rd cycle. Anong context conversation nun baka we can decipher that. :) [info] 27 | Oily-Combo+ Allergies | Chinese takeout [info] 1573707025
underdogkitten [info] "Well, don't feel [insert emotion here]." My nmom uses this anytime I try to voice a problem, particularly when I use I statements to voice how I feel about a situation. Such as "I feel that you going through my things makes me uncomfortable and it makes me feel anxious (I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues and she knows this)." This would prompt her to brush off what I'm saying with "Well, don't feel anxious. It's not a big deal." [info] None [info] 1421373020 [info] valid
anxietycheesecake [info] Going on Disability/SSI? I'll try and make this short. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 7, it got to it's boiling point at 15 when I transferred to an online high school, I never went to college because my anxiety developed into agoraphobia, I can't even leave the house sometimes for days on end. Currently, i'm diagnosed with generalized anxiety disorder, agoraphobia, panic disorder, and OCD.I'm 21, live with my parents, and I need money to live, i'm not sure what to do at this point. My question is, to anyone familiar with being on disability, do I have enough medical records/evidence to get approved? I'm scared of putting effort into this and failing at yet another thing in my life.In the past year alone, i've seen 6 therapists. Probably 10+ in my life. Most of them, i've only seen for one or two visits, with the longest being 5 visits. They just never seem to help, but, does me only going for a short amount of time contribute to the notion that i'm not 'trying' to get better?I've been to the ER at least 5 times in the past couple of years, due to panic attacks. I've been to the doctor more times than I can count, due to thinking i'm always sick. I haven't tried daily medication because that's part of my anxiety, i'm afraid of almost all medications, even advil.I just don't know what to do at this point, there's seemingly no jobs out there for me. I can't talk on the phone, I have no experience in anything. Does anyone have advice for me? [info] None [info] 1470388075 [info] train
PM-ME-YOUR-TUMMIES [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety this year. To be honest I'm over the moon happy about it. *Finally* having a 'name' for what's been going on with me for so long. I've been starting to get an inner-monologue going when I'm feeling very anxious and thinking '*This is your anxiety, this is what it does.*'    It's nice to be able to at the very least recognize some of the time when feelings of anxiety are present.  [info] None [info] 1512406949 [info] train
JordisTheSwordMaiden [info] Thankfully not always the case. My manager found out I was interviewing somewhere else and told our bosses. An hour later they put through a $10k pa raise. (No shit). That was 13 years ago, I’m still there and now earning almost double what I was. They have their moments where I want to tell them to stick it, but they give me all the time off I need to look after my daughter (single mom with a severely depressed teen), paid for therapy when I was diagnosed with anxiety, and took out income protection insurance for the entire staff (90+) when one fell terminally ill so she could have an income, with no wage adjustments etc. Awesome place to work.  [info] None [info] 1531622281 [info] train
hedgehoggodoggo [info] An autonomic specialist that I saw suggested SSRIs when I was diagnosed with anxiety. They can help the anxiety for sure, but he says they can also help with POTS symptoms in some patients.  [info] None [info] 1546042114 [info] test
redskins98ac [info] Wow that’s very inspiring and also very true! My being a black male in my school,  I get a lot of racist comments and stuff said. While I don’t have autism, I am diagnosed with anxiety and ocd so I definitely feel you on that. And I feel like Target is very accepting of who I am. And I’m glad you also found a place that makes you feel welcomed😊 [info] None [info] 1550210034 [info] valid
jimlas2016 [info] Thanks for the info, I was diagnosed with anxiety actually. [info] None [info] 1460461347 [info] train
cripple2493 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia and I find myself unable to leave the house due to anxiety and asking myself if I'm faking it - so yeah [info] Agoraphobia/panic disorder/emetophobia [info] 1539366138 [info] train
aregularwaterbottle [info] Yeah, I have been diagnosed with anxiety too.  I've been to a couple therapy sessions but they weren't so helpful. I'm quite durable, so generally, I can maintain my anxiety quite well on my own. It's only in social situations that I start to feel really self-conscious and shitty about my anxiety. I've considered medication in the past, but there's still that stigma attached to it that I'm wary of. I don't know if they will actually help me in the way they ought too.  [info] None [info] 1525612478 [info] train
Hanekawa3 [info] Aah this really puts it into perspective for me! I was confused because I also get anxious when socializing but it's because I want to get back to my thoughts, not because I'm shy or any other avoidant traits. So that's why I was diagnosed with anxiety and SPD, but not AvPD.Thank you so much, this really nailed it for me!  [info] Diagnosed SPD + BPD [info] 1522177805 [info] train
Penholder111 [info] I'm scared of my own brain and feel incredibly discouraged. I'll try to keep this short. I'm exhausted, can't sleep, and just need to write my feelings down. I was referred to a psychiatrist in September and have an appointment set up for the beginning of March (yaay mental health coverage..). I'm having to wait so long because it's free care, so it's understandable. I'm kind of scared of what I might discover. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young (maybe 8...) and also medicated at the time. My parents are loving and thoughtful people so I know medicating me would have been a huge decision. So I know that when I go back my anxiety will be brought up and I will probably be re-medicated (haven't been since I was a kid.) I'm scared that there's something...more though. I've recently been through hell in my relationship. We got a dog together and it caused so many problems I wont even begin to explain. In a nutshell, the dog caused my anxiety to worsen severely. I quickly realized that after I got the dog, that I shouldn't have. I knew that in order to look after my own health that the dog needed to go. But my partner wouldn't entertain the idea of giving the dog away. Through this whole ordeal...if been very scared of how I've been feeling. I think horrible things about the dog, and feel completely apathetic towards its well being. I just want it gone and I don't care how. I'm so scared that I have some type of mild psychopathy...like sociopath or something because I cannot find any love or care for this animal. I think that I hate it. And I've never hated anything in my life. It's really scaring me. As to why I'm discouraged, it's typical stuff. I feel called to be a writer. It's all I think about - these stories and creations I get in my head and then write. But, I just don't know how to do it. I work as a waiter and I certainly don't want to do that forever. If I do though, would god be angry at me for not fulfilling my calling? Is a career ever a calling, or is that my own human desire talking? I think that I can really affect and help people through my writing, and relation (I think) is a huge part of what God wants to see in us. It's at the point where I'm rambling. Thanks to any and all who read this. I'm going to try for some sleep. [info] None [info] 1486282544 [info] train
killercherry99 [info] CBD and me. A tale of anxiety. About me- I'm 34, married, 4 kids, 2 dogs, 2 cats. In 2011 I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was manageable then but slowly got worse until it took over my life. 2015 and 2016 were my worst years. I was turning into a terrible mother because I was afraid to go outside. I would finally go outside and drive to the grocery store only to cry in the parking lot and give up and go back home. If I did go in, more than once I'd have a panic attack and just leave the cart in the aisle and go home. I would sit in my house all day long convinced I was dying, it was always a heart attack and I was losing control of my panic attacks over it. I was too scared to even go to the Dr because I was sure they'd tell me I was dying. I was keeping my life together to outsiders, but I was a shell of a person. I declined every invitation and made it sound like I was doing something else so everyone always thought I was so busy. I had zero friends here on purpose- my husband is military so I only have friends and family back home and I could fake phone calls. In 2016 we bought a new home. To keep my kids in their previous schools meant a half hour drive on the freeway each way. I had to get my shit together. My sister told me about CBD and I did alot of research (mostly here!) before I took the plunge,  and I now literally have my life back. It's been about 7 months and the only regret is the years I lost suffering. I have friends, people like me and invite me places- I'm actually busy all the time and not scared to go anywhere! I will be my daughter's Girl Scout leader next year and I'm running for secretary of the school PTA.  Brands I like- Bluebird Classic 6x, I take this in the evening as it's more relaxing. Cbdistillery- I use this as needed if I feel anxiety coming mid regular dose. Just about 2 drops. And my newest I like is Receptra Elite. I take this every morning. My dosage is about 20mg both morning and night. I live in CA and while they have passed laws to legalize marijuana, there are no stores as of yet but I am looking forward to trying THC when I can. My town has a few bids to bring in grow operations and I would love nothing more than to find work there as I feel like I'm a huge testimony to how it can help mental health. [info] None [info] 1495294679 [info] train
sh225406 [info] Those are mine too! I was just diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago after multiple panic attacks (first time knowing it was abnormal). I just though thats how people felt when stressedd or under pressure. [info] None [info] 1551046977 [info] train
SplinterItToPieces [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and referred to “Cognitive Behavioral Therapy” (I didn’t go) because I was “making up an illness” that I didn’t have. 3 months went by of me arguing with my doctor about this and he then “diagnosed” (his words) me with “Denial” because I wouldn’t go to therapy and take Paxil. Got a second opinion and they immediately discovered a 3 month old sinus infection that sat for so long I now need surgery. [info] None [info] 1509567997 [info] train
Maraude8r [info] Got 13 points, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder too. Honestly I feel most of these questions are really difficult to relate to. The schizoid answer to most of them is probably "I avoid getting into a situation like that to begin with, but if I have to I guess I'll do it" and then the anxious ones among us will be concerned with the results just because theyre anxious in general, not because of the emotional rejection. [info] None [info] 1520209401 [info] valid
kindnesscary [info] Obsessive thoughts are very common in anxiety disorders, and although they are also a symptom of OCD, it’s just a symptom and can be found in other disorders. Going to a psychologist will do you wonders :) I was diagnosed with anxiety and have a lot of symptoms of OCD because they can overlap sometimes. Anxiety makes us a little obsessive every now and then, and maybe repeating words is a way your brain found to cope with something or to be rewarded after a conversation. [info] None [info] 1550745918 [info] test
BraveChipmunk3005 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, so not so good ig [info] None [info] 1564175952 [info] train
AlaeniaFeild [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks about 15 years ago. I never felt right with the diagnosis. It wasn't until about 2 years ago that I heard of POTS and went to my doctor asking for testing. She did a poor man's tilt table test and sent me to the cardiologist. Saw a cardiologist, did a 14 day Zio patch monitor, turned out to be SVT (not severe) and POTS (diagnosed after neurologist visit). I don't take meds for the SVT though and no ablation unless something changes. My attacks are only every other day or so and don't last for more than a few minutes (usually less.) So it could also just be something that is monitored. This is only anecdotal of course and I don't know if obesity affects treatment in any way, but I just want to point out that even if it is SVT, sometimes it's just monitored rather than treated with anything. OP, good luck. It can be very scary when this happens. I really do suggest seeing a doctor about this and don't accept a panic attack diagnosis without investigation if it doesn't sit right with you. I know that we shouldn't be diagnosing ourselves, but this is one area where I feel women (especially young women like you) need to push to be heard.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544299452 [info] train
chaimeanstea [info] I agree. It wasn’t until I was diagnosed with anxiety that my dad confessed to me how bad he had it. It made me notice that over the years I’ve picked up a lot of my dad’s habits because of how much time I’ve spent with him. I’m not blaming him for my issues, but it was insightful and helped me identify areas where I needed to change. [info] None [info] 1571326251 [info] valid
dinngoe [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 15 years.  I need Benzos to function.  Panic attacks are worse than death.  Only people who have had them can understand.  There is normal anxiety but then there is something else.. [info] None [info] 1534717563 [info] train
purple10115 [info] Anyone Else Suffering from Pregnancy Anxiety? I was just diagnosed with anxiety yesterday. I have an appointment with a therapist for the first time in a month. I have been dealing with TERRIBLE and completely irrational pregnancy anxiety. I have gotten my period and taken tests and I don’t trust anything. I am even on hormonal birth control and take it religiously. I just obsess over my stomach and worry that it is different. Is anyone else struggling with this? I’m really upset because I’m going on vacation and I don’t want to be scared about being pregnant even though I got my period. I try to stop touching my stomach and let go, but in my brain I can’t risk missing anything that could indicate pregnancy. I am having really destructive thoughts because I’m only 19 and a pregnancy would potentially ruin my life right now, I am so scared.Have you ever dealt with anything like this? How did you get through it? Sending good vibes to anyone who is struggling because I know I sure am. [info] None [info] 1531956533 [info] train
viptenchou [info] Anxiety about permanent choices and getting fixed. In replying to another post, I finally realized something. I'm terrified of permanent choices, thus making me feel uncomfortable to get fixed despite it being what I really want to do. In fact, part of why I dont want kids is because it's a permanent choice that can't be undone so I know I'll never do it.I was quite sure about getting fixed, though. I was a little nervous at the thought of something I couldn't change, but when I thought about it logically it just made sense. I've never wanted kids, ever. I already declared at 14 vocally that I didn't. I feel awkward around kids and have a whole list of reasons why I don't want them. I'm passionate about my CF choice. I tell every man I've ever been involved with since after my first bf who argued about the subject with me that I WILL NOT have kids and I would tell them pretty much right away. I'm tokophobic as well and I have so much anxiety and many other illnesses that I wouldn't want to pass on. I also can't stand too much noise or being in places that have too much "energy". I like staying home, relaxing. I like my space. I've even discussed with my current bf that we need a room to share but also we need our own rooms so we have our own space when we live together. I am 99.9999999% positive I will never change my mind. So of course, I reasoned that even if it made me a bit nervous to do something permanent... It's the best choice for me. But when I told my mom, even though she 100% supports my decision, she didn't think it was a good idea because if I did change my mind, she would be heartbroken for me and that there are a lot of long term BC options I could use instead. Not getting my mom's support really shook me. She always supports me with everything in life; she's been my biggest support for everything. Even when I told her randomly one day that I wanted to go to school across the world in Japan. So having her say she didn't think it was a good idea totally broke me here and now I feel really worried about the idea of getting fixed.I still really want to. I still look it up and think to myself that I will. But I worry that I won't be able to go through with it, not even because of doctors but because of my fear of permanent things. Does anyone else have this issue? :/ Has anyone else had it and gotten fixed anyway? How did that go for you? How did you get over that fear? (btw, I am diagnosed with anxiety and have been since childhood). Any ideas on how to get over the fear? Clearly, I already know it's the logical choice... I'm just still anxious. :/ [info] 24/F/I want to travel the world, not the baby section of walmart [info] 1482568442 [info] test
shlorpwastaken [info] Thanks for the reply! I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but the therapist I was seeing was a bad first experience unfortunately so I haven't tried getting help again. I am highly considering it now that it's becoming such a huge roadblock for me no pun intended. [info] None [info] 1565272678
wackylol [info] Lol I actually have OCD and it's never bothered me when people use it as slang because I'm pretty sure anyone with some level of organization obsessiveness actually is a bit OCD. Of course it's only a disorder when it's actually harming your life but the ritualistic side of it still is valid. It's not some hyper exclusive diagnosis.edit: To clarify I have been diagnosed with anxiety. OCD is one of my many symptoms and I have experienced anxiety induced OCD on a very real level to the point of it invading my life. [info] None [info] 1358913312 [info] train
steel-toedboots [info] Kind of a rant, kind of need help Hi everyone, first post and longtime lurker. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for about 2 years now and have had some ups and downs like everyone. In the last few months, my panic attacks have gotten slightly worse but I'm happy to say I'm seeing a new doctor on Monday and am going to talk with them about it and see what they think would be best for me in my current condition. Recently, I've noticed that I can get out a panic attack really quickly by inducing vomiting. I don't want this to be an easy fix but has anyone else dealt with this? I really hated learning this because now when I have a really bad attack, instead of waiting it out and growing from an attack, I know that I can just end it early on by vomiting. This past Wednesday I had a horrible attack when I was out with my parents and had to stay in the bathroom the entire time. I felt horrible but I knew I had to get out of the store soon so I made myself vomit there and we left but I kept vomiting the rest of the night and really just felt like shit. I know that this isn't a cure and Wednesday really proved that to me. I don't really know what I'm asking for in this post, I guess I'm just wondering if anyone else has dealt with this and what you did to stop yourself from gravitating towards an easy out. I'm grateful for this sub for being a hub where I feel welcome and where I'm not the only one who deals with anxiety. Some of my friends have a hard time understanding what I got through and this sub is a great place for me to go to when I feel alone.&amp;#x200B;Thanks for the comments and help in advance. [info] None [info] 1557022302 [info] train
ajconway [info] Doctor won't talk to me about dosing cannabis for PTSD. Looking for advice. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD after an extreme traumatic event last November. I see a wonderful psychiatrist but I needed medication to be able to function at work without collapsing into tears or have a single night's sleep without waking up screaming. My PCP has cycled me through a variety of anxiety prescriptions, and they have zero effect on me. 5 months of trying and I can't see any method of returning to my happy, creative, functional self. I've only kept the lorazapam for the extreme panic attacks, but it reduces me to a sleepy potato, so I can't take it at work if I plan to do anything other than take a nap at my desk.After the third failed medication, I asked my PCP about medical cannabis and other drugs and they absolutely refuse to hear anything about it. Weed is legal here in Boston but I'm not a recreational user. I've probably smoked less times than I have fingers on one hand. But I know there is **some dosage**, and **some frequency of use** that could benefit me enough to survive through the day. Eating is also a massive part of my PTSD too; I've lost 20lb in the past two months. I've never had an eating disorder before but because the trauma relates to starvation, I've frequently gone days without eating, or throwing up after a meal simply out of the stress and guilt. I'm sure I'm on the right path when I ask my doctor if I would be suitable for cannabis for all these reasons. I know I can just go purchase it myself, but I wanted to know how/when/how much I should be taking in order to remain productive at work, sleep at night, and regain my apatite. My PCP wouldn't give me any information, so I guess I'm turning to the internet.General stats that can help: I'm 130lb (down from 160lb before this happened), work 9-5, don't drink alcohol, have very little experience in drugs. I don't even know where to start in terms of smoking or edibles, and what mg could at least help me begin to regain myself. Any help is appreciated. [info] None [info] 1585272573 [info] valid
tejastaco [info] [Rant] I feel like I'm going insane and my anxiety is creeping up on me again, but faster than ever Sorry if this is inappropriate. I've never posted here before, but I just came out of an anxiety attack and I feel like something is really wrong with me but I have no one to talk to about it. You know how when the tide goes in and out it has a slow rhythm? I feel like my anxiety was going in and out at a slow, low tide, but over the past five weeks it has been out of control. It will sweep in as a flash flood and I'll find myself crying on my living room floor wishing I was dead, then the next day I'm fine. Then it happens again. And again. I just spent the last hour in my bathtub crying and over-analyzing everything that happened to me today. I've always had anxiety and through working on everything myself I was able to get much better. The crying stopped, the anxiety attacks stopped and I felt better about myself. High school was my worst period, when I had to take medical leave because I passed out in the school bathroom during an anxiety attack. I'm terrified that I will go back to that point. I don't have health insurance, so I can't get medical help. When I start thinking about that I just get even more anxious. This morning my tired popped and I missed my first class and I started crying so hard that I couldn't even pick up my phone. I've always been a crier and I HATE it. I feel so weak all the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid and I just feel like there have been periods of my life where it dictated everything I did and now I'm at that point again. Until recently I could "just breath" and everything would get better. But now it's not. I've been having constant attacks that have lasted longer than what I used to have and I'm really scared. I just don't know what to do anymore. I have exams over the next two weeks, internship campaigns to finish, things to do for work. I can't seem to get anything done. Every time I get a good rhythm down I just freak out. The smallest things will trigger me and I don't know what happened to make me be like this again so suddenly. Really sorry for the wall of text. I think I just needed to write this down. I have no one to talk to about what happening to me and I feel so alone.  Edit -- if you have an SO that understands your condition, how did you exaplin it to them? I feel like I need to take time away from my SO b/c I don't want him to feel resopnsible if anything happens to me or I end up in the hospital because of my anxiety. I lean on him so much and he has become my crutch. I feellike he would think it was his fault if something bad happened to me, but he is making it hard for me to explain to him that we need to be apart for a while until I get better. How do I explain this to him? [info] None [info] 1412739154 [info] train
princesskeestrr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2008 and now everything from acid reflux to asthma attacks are “probably due to my anxiety” and I have to push to get any actual tests. It took me a while to assert myself, but my specialist visit copay is $80 so it wasn’t hard to get pissed off that they weren’t wanting to help me and push back a bit. I’ve noticed that when I had a decent family doctor, who I saw regularly, everything was better. Then my insurance changed and now I see a different random moron every time I go in. I still have no idea what’s wrong with me beyond a vitamin d deficiency and probably an auto immune disease? [info] None [info] 1571360622 [info] valid
Bubbline [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety induced IBS. After taking several medications for it with no relief, I diagnosed myself with Endometriosis. I had to quit my job, drop out of college, and pause my life for a Stage 4 Deeply Infiltrating Endometriosis diagnosis. 4 years, 3 surgeries, a radical hysterectomy and 27 doctors later my life is finally starting again.  [info] None [info] 1551676750 [info] train
forloveofscience [info] Oh *man*, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I spent three months only being able to eat from about 10 in the morning until 3 or 4 in the afternoon, because I would literally throw up if I tried to eat earlier or later (when my anxiety was the worst).  I had just switched mouthwash brands, so I stopped using that brand, thinking that might have something to do with it.  When it didn't make a difference, I stopped using mouthwash entirely.  When that didn't help, I tried asking all the nurses I knew (several of my friends' mothers were nurses) if they knew of some kind of flu that last over a month (it had only been a little more than a month at that point).  When friends invited me out for dinner, I would have a mini-anxiety attack worrying over whether I should actually eat or not, and if anyone would notice if I didn't, or if I could get away with just eating very lightly, and, if my body didn't let me, what they would think if I ended up puking in the bushes outside afterward?  Managing my eating schedule felt like a full time job in addition to the full time job I was already working.At the end of three months, the nausea mostly went away because I was having difficulty holding onto thoughts long enough to feel anything about them.  They just whirled around in my mind like scraps of paper caught in a tornado, and trying to catch and hold on long enough to read what was there was a Herculean task.  That was worse than the nausea, but not by much.Stupid anxiety. [info] None [info] 1411271404 [info] train
flozza89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so I guess it's not completely unfeasible. [info] None [info] 1492286101 [info] train
Polaritical [info] People are medication reliant because its cheaper and more profitable than therapy. "Softness" isnt the issue and thats honeslty just offensive. Not being able to handle regular life IS LITERALLY THE FUCKING PROBLEM.  I have anxiety. When its bad, you're correct that I cant deal with normal everyday shit. That's how I was diagnosed with anxiety. Its the only way anybody is diagnosed with a disorder. What anxiety doesnt mean is that I'm soft, and that kind of approach not only doesnt help, it actively hurts recovery.I dont take anxiety medication. Tried them, theyre not for me. I'm LUCKY enough that my insurance will cover therapy. Not everyone is in that position.Don't call people soft for struggling with their disorders. People from the "man up, be hard" are just as fucked up as the rest of us. [info] None [info] 1572187319 [info] test
thelidhathappeal [info] I don't know how I feel about this. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it took me about a year to be able to enjoy smoking. I have had panic attacks so bad they've knocked me unconscious (some when I wasn't smoking and some when I was), I think it might be more of a natural brain chemistry thing that people experience, not so much thoughts. It took time for my body to simply get used to it, I don't feel that it was any change in perception that did it. Regardless of how I got over it though, I am happy I did ;) [info] None [info] 1345433413 [info] train
yumkittentits [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I try to make sure I get enough sleep, and don't go forever without eating. Those two things have helped me a lot. The rest of it for me is a mental game, and talking myself down from my anxiety.  [info] Ø [info] 1384055295 [info] train
YT_BRAMZA [info] PLEASE help me with anxiety and mainly blushing Hey guys, so my name is Brandon, im 14 years of age.  When i was 12 (i think) I joined secondary school and at the end of the year in the summer Holidays we noticed a small Tumor in my cheek, because of that i have not been to school since year 8, im in year 10 now and have been at school for 2 weeks. The doctor found a cyst on the hard pallet. I have not been to school in 2 weeks... As its Sunday i need to go to school tmoz and im so nervous and worried about going in, i have a public speaking exam on Monday which i am nervous to do, i dont want to do it but i have to  because my teacher said its part of my GSCE.  When ever im talking to friends out side of class im perfectly fine and dont go red. When im in class and a teacher asks me a question i instantly go red. Say my maths teacher picked on me and asked me a question i would go red and i hate that.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have a support working helping the school get of our backs.  My life is terrible, school is terrible, i just want to be normal. I'm Anxious to tell people about it, im not that kind of person.  My support working knows i have it along with my nan (i live with my nan). Even when my teacher calls out the register i go red, my life is terrible and i just want to be like everyone else. I just want to stop being anxious about going in tomorrow and stop going red.  I have spoken to my GP and they said they cant do anything about it [info] None [info] 1548011160 [info] train
TecumsehM [info] If all work is constant stress to you, you have no worked hard enough to find a career. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD but I work 10 hours a day, 6 days a week in a career I love. The hours aren't the problem, you are [info] None [info] 1545346099 [info] train
wandering_minddd [info] I can't even go to the mall or to the groceries without being anxious My ex broke up with me a month ago and I can't bring myself to go to places with a lot of people. I was diagnosed with anxiety but I never had a problem going out. I used to love shopping alone. But ever since my ex broke up with me, I can't bring myself to go to the mall. Whenever I went, I start panicking, I start getting sweaty, nervous, my heart starts racing, and I can't seem to catch my breath. So I would start running back to my car and start crying. Now I'm sure the breakup caused this because I never had this problem before. But how can I manage to get over the fear of going out. It's such an irrational thing for me. I never thought this is something I'd go through. [info] None [info] 1489144268 [info] valid
Prairiegirl321 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 20 years ago, and my symptoms are ONLY physical.  Except for the secondary anxiety that results from thinking I might be having a heart attack and wondering if I should go to the emergency room. Again. I’ve been to the emergency room and had EKGs/related blood work, chest x-ray, etc,  at least a half dozen times, despite knowing that I have this condition. Because surely some people with anxiety disorder DO have heart attack’s, right? What if it isn’t a panic attack this time? It’s sheer hell. The attacks come on with no warning, no pattern, and are completely unrelated to anything going on in my life as far as I can tell. I’ve been through various periods of extreme stress related to events in my life with no panic attacks at all. Usually when one happens, I will just be sitting there reading or watching TV, life going on smoothly, and all of a sudden my heart starts racing and I feel short of breath/dizzy, chest tightness, basically all the symptoms that we are told may signal a heart attack, and here we go again. They sometimes last 2  days or more. The only thing that really helped for any length of time was when one doctor sent me for a stress test, which showed that my heart function is excellent. I had such an easy time with the treadmill portion that I felt almost embarrassed to be there. So for a few years after that, when symptoms of a panic attack started, at least it wasn’t exacerbated by agonizing about what if it’s a heart attack, and it would pass very quickly. But that wore off. My original doctor tried a series of different drugs over a 3-yr period, but they were worse than useless because of having to deal with the side effects, so I gave up on that approach. Trying mindfulness now with maybe some benefit. At least I haven’t been to the emergency room since I started with it.  [info] None [info] 1544407662 [info] train
capaldithenewblack [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild OCD that doesn’t feel mild when my fingers are bleeding around the nails. This stuff doesn’t always look like the textbook. A compulsion doesn’t have to mean a full blown Rain man freak out if it goes unsatisfied.  [info] None [info] 1529623588 [info] train
kickedoutofbyui [info] It's not diagnosed. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was wayyy younger than I am now and it was pretty bad. The feeling I get when talking in front of a crowd is just like the feeling I had when I was a kid though. Pretty sure it's not just nervousness [info] None [info] 1542237073 [info] train
youdontknowmeyouknow [info] My last line manager in my current job. She was invested in me as a person first, always listened when I had ideas or questions. Her primary concern was my well-being, and she showed it. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back, and she was so supportive, I really believe her presence played a huge part in my current frame of mind which is so much more positive. On top of all that, she's one of the most efficient people I've worked with and had an amazing can-do outlook. I'm sad that she left, but we're still good friends and she's incredibly happy in her new job. Couldn't be happier for her, she's an amazing person. [info] None [info] 1553180962 [info] train
taft-attack [info] I spent years paying psychologists, psychiatrists, and therapists to tell me I was troubled and give me advice and prescriptions. I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and panic disorder. I totally depended on these people to justify my feelings, positive or negative... It's a really unhealthy thing to do to your mind, in my opinion. If you think you can work through it on your own, please try. Doctors and therapists will give you diagnoses and prescriptions, but if you help yourself or depend on friends (feel free to PM me if you want) you'll end up much healthier, more confident, and self-sufficient. I was a super hypochondriac and it landed me in the ER for a panic attack that I was convinced was really an episode of diabetic shock. (I don't even have diabetes, or anyone in my family for that matter) After that I realized the diagnoses and meds were just band-aids to a problem only I could fix. Sorry to ramble but i feel like you may be in a similar situation and I'd like to help you avoid doing what I did.  [info] None [info] 1461422053 [info] train
alxbailz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and a couple of other things, all of which I have almost completely overcome. Of course, they will probably always still be there, but for me, I literally just said “get the fuck over it”. To myself. I just constantly force my logic to be louder than my inner “but what if-“‘s. It works. When you start JUST DOING IT, whatever it is that’s making you anxious, and seeing that there is almost never a repercussion, you get over it. Especially with social anxiety, and especially in the adult world, shit just really really doesn’t matter as much as you tell yourself it does. Majority of people that you could have a potentially awkward situation with, you never fucking have to see again if you don’t want to. Life’s just too short to hold back. Turn your “what if this goes terribly” into “what if this goes really well”. It’s a conscious effort, you have to stop yourself in the middle of the situation, as it’s happening to really make a change [info] None [info] 1535448463 [info] valid
raeynar [info] I haven't really lived for months. Forgive me, Reddit, for I am on mobile. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and it rears its ugly head whenever anything medical has to be done. On top of that, I've been depressed for most my life and I can't take medication because the potential side effects make my anxiety worse.I was bullied all through elementary, high school, and most of college. Because of that, I didn't graduate high school nor college. I spiralled and honestly I didn't know how to go on. But, my fear of basically everything but my own shadow has kept me from ending things myself. (Good thing too, because when things are calm, I don't want to die). The past two years I've done some intensive therapy and it has helped me push on a little bit. Because of this therapy, I thought I had the strength to get my teeth fixed. So at the beginning of this year, I started the process and saw a dental surgeon. The prognosis is that I'll get dentures and they'll remove my teeth while they put me asleep. The process started in February and I only recently got to know the date for the actual surgery. I've just been in a state of constantly waiting. I spend my days playing video games, trying to tune out the dread and the anxiety, but it's getting harder and harder to do. My family and friends are very caring and they support me. They try to give me pep talks but I'm so afraid I'll let them (and myself) down. I'm afraid I won't be able to go through with the surgery and in all honesty I believe I might not even survive that day because of the stress and anxiety. I can very logically tell me that's unlikely.. but the feelings and thoughts remain. I don't know anymore how to handle this. The surgery is little less than two weeks away and I don't know how I'll be able to last through the rest of the days, waiting. I feel utterly alone, even though I KNOW I have the support of my friends and family. [info] None [info] 1566937966 [info] train
EchoVixen [info] My partner and I have a similar chemistry. I worry a lot about the big things and the little things. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. My partner, on the other hand, is the most relaxed person I know. Everything washes over him, nothing phases him. I love him dearly and I know he loves me, but I still worry that my anxiety is grating on him and I sometimes wish he would reassure me the way you do in your post. That being said, he's never been one for speeches or romantic gestures and just as he accepts me, I accept him. He's affectionate in his own way. You seem like a genuinely great person, I hope you and your partner have an amazing future together. [info] None [info] 1540652289 [info] train
WestCoastKate [info] Anxiety over holding baby. Scared of dropping. I am almost 27 weeks with baby #2. My first is almost 8 years old, with such a big gap I jave forgotten a lot. About 7 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety (which, looking back I am fairly certain was PPA) and have been fighting it this entire pregnancy. Currently I am dreading holding my baby. I have a few more months until she is here and I need to figure it out before then. My SIL just had a baby girl and I can't hold her without extreme anxiety/mild panic attacks. I feel like I am going to drop her (even though I have only held her while sitting). I am already on Celexa and it is working pretty well. Any other mom's with anxiety/fear of dropping baby have any tips? What worked for you? [info] None [info] 1529197378 [info] test
holding_on_to_you [info] While in elementary school as we walked down the halls in lines, if we passed another line of kids, I'd take a look at each one and try and figure out if I could picture them with a gun. Now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety...it makes more sense. Who knew this weird habbit is probably something more kids do now than back in the day.  [info] None [info] 1551417467 [info] train
buttpincher [info] Looks like you're running out of fucks to give but remember don't run out of fucks for yourself. Seriously though and I know it's cliche and it's said time and again... exercise and proper diet do wonders. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder after being rushed to the hospital in September in a state of fear and panic. My heart rate was over 150bpm and before that happened I was very similar to what you have described yourself to be now. My doctor told me "look I can put you on Xanax or something similar but first I want you to try and lose weight and exercise"... I told him I would but initially I didn't. I had an anxiety attack almost 3x a week all of September until I finally had enough.I've been on a Keto diet for 1.5months, down 28lbs and have not had an anxiety attack since I started the diet. Yesterday was the first day I actually worked out after losing weight with just the diet... and it felt great. Hang in there you can get through this, you've made it this far.  [info] None [info] 1479186113 [info] train
Kephrii [info] Absolutely! I definitely need to address my own insecurities. I am diagnosed with anxiety which makes it quite difficult. I am seeing a behavioral health specialist and am trying to work through my issues. Unfortunately, it isn't something that I can just magically get over overnight. [info] None [info] 1531382767 [info] test
lilybear032 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia, when I really have Graves' disease. It got significantly worse early on in my pregnancy. I could have lost the baby because nobody ordered a simple blood draw.  [info] None [info] 1520466519 [info] train
flyawayfromzayn [info] Am I okay? Is it bad that I will feel like actual physical pain before doing something, such as going to work? Like I have been laying in bed all day and i have been slowly getting ready to go to work and I know I should like go and eat food soon but I don't want to. I was just telling myself "okay in 5 minutes I'm gonna go make food and then smoke a cigarette." And then my stomach turned and my chest hurts and I want to cry. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (i went off my meds bc they made me super dizzy, and now I can't afford to get something else) , and this has been happening forever, but it usually isn't over things that I actually want to do. I have also realized that I may also have adhd. Does anyone else go through anything like this? Has it ever been called anything? [info] None [info] 1562357677 [info] train
melbyz1980 [info] Sound and Anxiety I’ve always been sensitive to sounds, I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age. There are sounds that other people don’t notice that are distracting, and drown out other sounds. They drive me crazy. The fan on the stove hood is a regular source of frustration as an example.Shopping can be maddening and I fully understand that feeling of not being able to hear myself think.I’m wondering if anyone else gets anxiety from sounds, and if they have found any effective ways of coping or managing it? [info] None [info] 1552758009 [info] train
lavender_photos [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder at 12. I had always been an anxious kid but I knew my brain wasn't working right when I, a very academically focused, somewhat popular kid, missed over 50 days of school in 7th grade from panic attacks. I would dread going to school and have such a severe panic attack that I made myself physically ill and had to stay home. Luckily I had amazing teachers, parents, and doctors and I was able to pass and get my shit somewhat together but it is still something that affects me. [info] None [info] 1572658804 [info] valid
vanilla_ice22 [info] I love my dog, but she gives me so much anxiety [Vent] Granted, I am diagnosed with anxiety so I get anxiety with everything. I got this dog to be an emotional support animal for my anxiety and so far I only feel worse. Every single bit of my life now is focused on how she feels, and making her feel better. I spend so much time trying to help her overcome her rough past and feel happy in my home. All the while I am so anxious and don’t know what to do with myself. I just feel so much anxiety building up over time I just want to escape. What human in their right mind wants to escape from their dog? It drives me crazy being with her alone in my apartment all day and all night, because she looks to me for guidance. If I don’t give her the right amount of attention, or I yell at her, she is sad and depressed the whole day. When I see her sad and depressed it makes me sad and depressed because I feel like I’m not doing enough or I’m a bad mommy. I just CANT do enough and still feel okay.Along with being anxious all the time I also feel like I’ve completely lost my identity. All I ever talk about is this dog, I don’t even know who I am anymore. Anytime I go out with my dog, I just start to realize how irrelevant I am compared to my dog. No one wants to talk to me anymore they want to talk to my dog. All the focus is on her and I suddenly feel like I am more overlooked than ever before. She is an angel and I do want her to be my pride and joy, but it has taken so much from me I want to cry. I don’t know what to do and everyone in my life has put so much pressure on me to never give this dog up, but no one acknowledges the fact that I am giving up on myself. Everyone just cares about the dog but I am still just as unwell if not more than I was before. [info] None [info] 1546752039 [info] train
2deadhamsters [info] My brother is hateful So I've been diagnosed with anxiety  and have been to a therapist to treat my issues. I'm glad to say that I am getting better. My anxiety is very closely related to my family. I worry constantly about them and if they are ok or not. So I follow them alot and like to stay close/ in my comfort zone . My fucking brother on the other hand likes to make my anxiety worse when he is frustrated with me. Often he will walk off on purpose and push me away. When I become worried and follow him he mostly responds with " go and have a panic attack then" he also threatens to leave the house and go to a random place when we argue. He can never admit when he is wrong and constantly lies to everybody and  himself and blames me lets use a simple example if we are eating he will say I was greedy and ate more. He actually cannot compromise and has to have everything his way. If it's not he will walk away and scare me and also my family. (We are both 15). He's just absolutely hateful but my anxiety means I can not leave him otherwise i will become extremely anxious and have a panic attack. I want to make it clear that I am not a perfect person and I become to angry and aggressive because to be honest I'm absolutely sick of being terrified day and night that he's dead or missing Any time he is scolded he will disassociate and ignore. No emotional reaction no sign that he has changed or recognised where he has gone wrong nothing. It's also like every time I say something he will find a way to disagree with it if I want to go to a castle he will refuse but if I don't he will want to go. If I want to talk to him he refuses. If I don't he will follow me . He has this blunt and emotionless face and is incredibly stubborn. And he knows how to upset me and often insults me and my anxiety even though he has had anxiety an knows what it's like. I'm just done he's driven me absolutely crazy. [info] None [info] 1565899725 [info] test
madmaxturbator [info] He had no clue how much a single pill would affect him, so to take two and then an ambien is intense.That’s a terrible way to prescribe meds.I have taken pills recreationally and also for medical issues / anxiety. In both circumstances it’s good to start with low dosage to understand your tolerance / threshold. That’s what a good doctor will do... When I was diagnosed with anxiety, my doctor told me to take .25mg klonopin. Then work your way up, if it’s not helping with the anxiety.Popping two Xanax and ambien for what was his first time trying those meds is really reckless. Dude is defending his doctor, but she sounds like a terrible doc frankly. Mixing strong meds like that in a fucking airplane (ie medical help is very limited) is insane. [info] None [info] 1527699410 [info] train
tootphaste [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, and major depressive disorder early in life. When I first heard that it was approved by the board I was excited for the news of it being added. Unfortunately the Secretary of Health for PA postponed adding it in the May meeting. As someone who self treats in the shadows because it's better to be at risk of a fine instead of at risk of self destruction, this news has brought me incredible joy. [info] None [info] 1562874912 [info] train
teestira [info] Anxiety disorder affecting job acceptance? Hey guys just joined this sub as I have been diagnosed with anxiety and given some medication for this week. Side effects aren’t too bad. My question is will being diagnosed with this affect my ability to get a job? I am a park and rec major and am planning on going federal and working in a national park or wildlife refuge. [info] None [info] 1572029413 [info] train
BrookieeWookiee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with IBS, so I had been on 10 mg of Prozac daily for several years. I bumped up to 20 about 6 months ago and think it has really helped with my IBS. I've also found that my fast-acting anxiety med (klonopin) helps as well. My symptoms just aren't as bad when I am calm. [info] None [info] 1465751575 [info] train
ramsay_baggins [info] My fiance and I have been together just over five years.In that time he has stood by me as I became physically ill with fear of confronting my flatmates in halls at University, as I stressed and stressed and stressed with Uni work, as I developed anxiety doing my dissertation, as I had really bad worries about getting a job after graduating, as I was diagnosed with anxiety because of the job I got...Just before I graduated I got really sick. Had to go to the hospital at 3am after only developing symptoms about six hours beforehand. He was panicking more than I was, but he sorted transportation, held my hand the whole way through, and then looked after me when I was bedridden for a week, couldn't eat and could hardly move.He held my arm for support everywhere I went when I got labrynthitis and couldn't walk unaided because I had lost all sense of balance.He came literally running to comfort me when I found out my stepsister had been involved in a serious and potentially life-threatening accident.He still talks me down when I had panic attacks and random freakouts.He reads me to sleep every night because he knows it helps me calm down. He even puts up with me when I interrupt him with questions or random observations about the story or character.He always encourages me in pretty much everything I do.He's wonderful. [info] None [info] 1417631451 [info] train
Dr3wcifer [info] *Update* We are unable to establish your eligibility to hold an airman medical certificate at this time... [My Original Post](https://www.reddit.com/r/flying/comments/c0aoa4/we_are_unable_to_establish_your_eligibility_to/)&amp;nbsp;Since the initial letter I received from the FAA specified that my initial medical was not suspended pending review, I decided to go the least intensive route first to see what FAA would request as followup while continuing to fly. I had my primary care doc draft a short letter basically saying I was fine. While I was overseas on a vacation, FAA finally responded to that certified letter stating that after review, they have found that I AM eligible for my current third-class medical and I may now continue to use it as if nothing had happened. No special issuance, no followup request for records or imaging.&amp;nbsp;So basically, here's all I did - I went to my VA primary care doc, since the VA is the only place with an records of my anxiety diagnosis, and the only place I've ever received followup care for my broken back. I had them write a short letter that specifically addressed and answered the exact questions presented in the initial FAA letter. The opening paragraph of his letter stated that he was my primary care doc, and that he had evaluated me previously in the year (February) for a routine evaluation. Second paragraph precisely refuted any inhibitions due to back pain, third paragraph precisely refuted any inhibitions due to anxiety and confirmed I had never been prescribed for the condition. The doc used the same language in his response that the FAA used in their request, and he also specifically stated that my most recent evaluation for anxiety found that the symptoms were "mild or transient." I'm not entirely sure if the VA will be dropping my disability rating for anxiety, and it wouldn't bother me if they did - I made it clear that I didn't think it was an issue during my last VA evaluation, but the doc essentially said "better safe than sorry" and kept the rating.&amp;nbsp;If anyone is in a similar situation to this, especially since the VA has been handing out mental health diagnoses like candy for the last decade, I can post up the entire initial request letter from FAA, my doc's response letter, and the follow-up from FAA.&amp;nbsp;To be clear, I was diagnosed with anxiety a decade ago but never treated/prescribed for it, and it's never really been an issue. I have also never been hindered by my broken back, other than being a bit shorter and fatiguing a bit faster when I go backpacking. Overall, probably not a common situation, but if anyone can learn from it, awesome. [info] PPL SEL [info] 1565706239 [info] train
Arwres [info] I've come across people in my teenage years that did the exact same thing after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, "I have that too" was thrown around a lot it can be disheartening to think you're normal because everyone has the same issue apparently but I do hope you're getting the help you need and I hope that people who do self diagnose see a professional so they can seek the proper help they need too. [info] None [info] 1547658898 [info] train
savorycinnamon [info] At what point should I admit defeat and quit my high pressure job? I got a great first job after getting my license, immediately becoming a director at a small healthcare facility. This was July 2019, and I've been trying to settle in to my new position ever since. I've had a few good weeks here and there, but I'm an anxious person, and I have lost a lot of sleep over small mistakes and demanding projects. We also changed CEO's, and the new one has made extreme changes I don't agree with and continues to do so without considering current staff. I was awake and panicking at 2 am yesterday and I've been awake since 1:45 am today because I'm stressing about a conversation with my boss from 2 days ago and a big event today. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and recently started with a new therapist. I've told her about my job, but we haven't gotten too far yet and I only see her every 2 weeks.I guess I'm just struggling to know how much I should push myself. It's been a long time coming, and I'm finally happy with where I am in my career. I have over $100,000 in student loans and a strong desire to buy a house, so I'm fairly pleased with my income and know I will not make as much elsewhere right now. But the stress is really overwhelming, partially due to my job and exacerbated by my anxiety.I'm fairly young and early in my career, and I could really use some perspective... and a vacation. Thank you for reading. [info] None [info] 1583484750 [info] train
oldpaintunderthenew [info] Oh YES. Perhaps not depressed until hitting puberty (at 9-10, thanks ovaries) but I was anxious literally since birth and I just thought this was how everyone is..? I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16 and laughed at it, me? Anxious? Nooo I am outwardly very calm and don't burden people with my worries so what is the psychiatrist on about? I looked up anxiety symptoms after that and *bam* - it was an embarrassingly high age for me to realize that everyone isn't horrified of everything all the time and doing anything isn't supposed to feel monumentally scary and other people won't obsess about the same little thing for hours a day, every day, for years. [info] None [info] 1530686394 [info] train
lolafh [info] Haha. What is happening to me. Hey OCD sub, I’m a first time poster here because what’s happened to me is... strange. Warning: I do not know shit about brains or how they work so... bare with me? A few years ago I was diagnosed with OCD (early teens), but I found a remedy and it sort of... went away. For years. By remedy I just mean completely ignoring everything (to be fair, I was 11 or 12). Then at 13 I was diagnosed with anxiety and honestly now looking back on it (it being my “anxious thoughts” up until about a week or so ago) that might have been just very lowkey obsessions. Now, as I said earlier, about a week ago the hardcore obsessions have come back and in a big way. I had to miss school because it was so bad the other day. I’m attempting to get it under control and it’s only sort of working. I keep myself occupied during the day but when I get into bed at night they come flooding in and I’m paralyzed by my own mind. I’m willing to go back to therapy but I have a super packed schedule as an overloaded high schooler with too many extra curriculars I tried to ask my parents about online therapy but it’s too pricey. (Side note: did you know Talkspace is 35 dollars A WEEK???? Who can afford that??) I’m sorry this is rambley, I just wanted to get the story of my situation out. Any comments are accepted, just please don’t be mean. [info] None [info] 1541303575 [info] train
loserkidtbh [info] Hard disagree. I've been a picky eater since I can remember. It's been linked to my anxiety disorder about trying new foods, texture issues, etc. I will try new food at home, but it takes a bit of working up to it. Also I can't explain to you the anxiety picky eaters feel when they go out to eat with family and friends. I've had to settle for just a water before because I was 2 seconds away from a panic attack if I got food. I know, all this sounds completely ridiculous to you and it sounds it to me too. But, I don't think you'll fully understand a lot of us don't want to be picky eaters. A majority of us aren't doing it to be "cute" or whatever. Anxiety just gets in the way of it. I've dealt with anxiety disorder since a little kid and I was diagnosed with anxiety around age 6? 7? That's also when I became a picky eater. Just give us a break, dude. We aren't harming you at all by being a picky eater. Like I said, a lot of us don't want to be one. We just are trying to push through it like a lot of the other stuff we have to push through.  [info] None [info] 1541764333 [info] train
AncientPotential [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid. I dont think my mom ever quite understood that I wasnt faking when I said I COULDNT go to school, and I'm not sure I ever explained to her what I was feeling. She even went as far as to tell me I should take a pregnancy test (at 13) when I would wake up every weekday morning dry heaving for an hour or 2. Years later, she tells me my step-father keeps thinking he is having a stroke or some other neurological issue (they had CAT scans done and everything) cause his face and hands keep going numb, and his heart will just start beating out of his chest. I told her to ask their doctor about anxiety and LO AND BEHOLD, thats exactly what he had. My mom felt really bad for all those mornings she yelled at me and made me go to class.Until you think your are legitimately dying because your body goes numb and you might ACTUALLY shit your pants, ya aint had the anxious. [info] None [info] 1559674899 [info] train
alex-smith321 [info] getting accepted to colleges really stressing me out sooo basically im getting my results back from schools one by one. I applied to like 16 different schools (I know, its a lot but my grades don't reflect well on me so I needed all the opportunities possible) long story short I've gotten accepted to 7/16 schools so far without being deferred or rejected. a part of me is really happy and excited because I got into the majority of my reach schools already but the other side of me is confused and it's consuming me. I find myself with 7 tabs open on my laptop all at once researching each of the school's acceptance rates, average sat scores, average GPA, etc. I feel like I don't deserve a spot at these schools bc my grades all fall in the 25th percentile and its so hard to wrap my mind around the fact that they really chose me. I should be ecstatic but my anxiety and need to know the reason behind my acceptance is consuming my happiness. how should I deal with this??I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I always overthink but it's hard to control it bc I don't realize that im doing it until someone says "wow that's crazy you overthink soooooo much". [info] None [info] 1580690639 [info] train
randomuserIam [info] I always had troubles orgasming during sex unless I had toys or put a lot of attention to me, with my previous (vanilla) partner. I never had issues alone, though. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, one of which is ssri and interferes with orgasm. I have a decent libido (or so I found out) and I have a lot of pleasure, but I can't for the life of me climax. My Dom fully understands, he still tries but after it's been hours of play it gets exhausting. I still manage to cum alone, with a lot of effort though, but much faster. So I think there's a part of me that's also stopping me because of the pressure to cum. I do know, however, that I can be forced to orgasm... Provided certain criteria is met. So, my next investment will actually be a wand, instead of what I currently own that is worse than a bullet...  [info] None [info] 1553533076 [info] train
Pokabrows [info] lol I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so I had it then too  [info] None [info] 1548894797 [info] test
Synikul [info] I see, I can somewhat relate.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's more that I worry about everything to a ridiculous point instead of it affecting me socially (unless I let worrying make me stay home, which happens sometimes).  I'm sorry you had to go through all of that, but I'm glad it's getting better and it sounds like you have a pretty great boyfriend.  Some people really suck at committing to plans, and hey, some people might feel as anxious as you do about going to hang out.  There's been a few times where I've ducked plans for literally no reason other than I was feeling anxious.  Anyways, I hope you feel better about this whole thing and hopefully your friends are around more in the future! [info] None [info] 1453578077 [info] train
Bobosanman [info] You need to talk about it. Once you open up you will find out that you are not alone. I had similar problems when I was in high school. Even I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take medication and see a counselor. It has done wonders for me. I am not trying to diagnose your problem but only trying to tell to talk about it and ask for some help. It will take some effort on your part but only can change things but help is available. [info] None [info] 1560639697
FerisProbitatis [info] Ugh! Retail is the worst! I was diagnosed with anxiety after working in retail for a year. Quitting that job to go to school was the best decision I've ever made.I hope you will find the resources and right circumstances to pull you out of that mess. No job is worth your happiness and your life. [info] None [info] 1571345284 [info] train
lipstickchic [info] I had anxiety my entire life since childhood and had no idea it was called anxiety I just thought what I felt was how everyone felt part of the human experience till I was diagnosed with anxiety and all the feelings I had along with it. It’s crazy I used to bite my nails as a kid and that was an anxious behavior. I even told my mother like why didn’t you take me to a therapist or why didn’t my pediatrician never said anything. I’m now 27 F and wish I had more time or more tools growing up dealing with it. I feel now it’s worse though. Lol  [info] None [info] 1547677838 [info] train
EnclaveLeo [info] Just graduated with a BA in Comp Sci and wanted to add to the already great advice here - sophomore year in Comp Sci is definitely rough so don't get down on yourself. A 4.0 your first semester is amazing, and I understand how it feels to have a "slip" but it's okay to slip. Especially after transferring in, Clemson kicked my ass my first semester I transferred in. Don't feel bad about having to withdraw from a class and trying again next semester - most Comp Sci students I know took an extra semester to graduate (like me). I was diagnosed with anxiety my junior year and had to find ways to make my coursework manageable. I definitely know what you mean about needing a routine schedule and reminders, I'm the same way. Definitely get your professors to work with your accommodations.I really hope you feel better and please feel free to reach out to me if you have any questions or just want to chat!  [info] None [info] 1550105193 [info] train
mespdx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety which I think is a huge aspect contributing to this problem. My therapist is out of town but I made plans to meet with her when she gets back. We definitely had a rough (in a good way lol) sex life before, you gave me some good ideas on how to bring that back. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1510002675 [info] train
gvpmahesh [info] Activities that you recommend for the next 15 days? I have been diagnosed with anxiety and stress. I took a break from work for the next 15 days at least. I would like to hit a refresh button and go back fresh to the office. What activities do you recommend me doing?  Just a little bit of background. I enjoy writing, dancing(bachata) - though stopped for the past month and not at all a pro, and sometimes cooking and programming apps.  Interested in meeting new people, do some fun activities like games or community cooking(if that's a thing) or going out. Any suggestions would be helpful     I have the art of living happiness program in the back of my mind, that I intend to join on the first week of Jan [info] None [info] 1577515895 [info] train
Lowbacca1977 [info] Heck, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it still crosses my mind every time that it's a made up excuse. [info] None [info] 1390559148 [info] test
foxpunch [info] Was just about to comment about this. I have what feels like an existential crisis multiple times a day and I can't look in the mirror without freaking out a little because, like. I'm alive? Everyone else is also alive with their own thoughts and experiences? It blows my mind, lol. It started around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564659899 [info] train
BurntPaper [info] It's definitely not, but it's the generation that has pushed the most for other people to change their habits, lifestyles, etc, in order to make them less uncomfortable. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues. I've struggled with it since I was in my early teens, and I'm in my early 30's now. It sucks, but I'm not going to try to make others change to make my life easier. I suck it up, or I avoid situations that trigger my anxiety too much. It's like the ability to just fucking deal with shit has been lost.  [info] None [info] 1539989865 [info] test
janet_snakehole01 [info] Thank you! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and acid reflux issues, and am being treated for those. But it just doesn’t seem to help. I think I need a meal plan and to make myself stick to it. Best of luck to you!  [info] None [info] 1547487428 [info] train
RoseBladeX [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 10 so.. [info] 19 [info] 1575059646 [info] train
Ngonzalez_01 [info] Please pray for me to stop being so scared of suffering for the Gospel. “Whoever is ashamed of me and of my words in this adulterous and sinful generation, of him will the Son of Man also be ashamed when he comes in the glory of his Father with the holy angels” (Mark 8:38).“Yet if anyone suffers as a Christian, let him not be ashamed, but let him glorify God in that name” (1 Peter 4:16).God has put so many people in my life that I believe He has called me to preach the Gospel to. After all, if not me, then who? The problem is that whenever an opportunity rises to mention Jesus, I get scared out of my mind. My brain goes 100mph and my stomach feels like it's about to explode. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid, and by the grace of God I've been able to get better at controlling it and talking to people. But when the Holy Spirit convicts me to tell my friends the Gospel, I lose all sense of calmness. Some of you may remember my post about me being the only believer in my family. Last time I tried to preach the Bible openly, they took away my Bible and even compared my religion to an addiction. Thankfully they've "calmed down" a little and started letting me read and go to church, but since then, the thought of preaching has scared the living daylights out of me. In the parable of the 4 seeds, Jesus mentioned one seed that falls on thorns only to be choked out. Often I worry that I'm the "thorn seed" rather than the "good soil seed". So I ask, please pray that God will make me strong enough to preach the Gospel once more. TL;DR: I want to preach the Gospel to my friends, but I'm too scared. Please pray that God will make me strong enough to overcome this fear. [info] None [info] 1564943821 [info] train
idfkanymore_ [info] My hair keeps falling out when I’m anxious. It has been going on for a while now. I’m not bald (yet) but the amount of hair I lose in the shower is ridiculous. I swear I have accumulated the same amount of hair on my head with the hair I have lost over time. If I stored every clump of hair that sits in the drain after every shower I have had since the moment I was diagnosed with anxiety, I would be able to tell what days I was most anxious.... I could also make a wig. [info] None [info] 1527066005 [info] train
Jacobmarksman275 [info] Please tell me it gets better: Existential Crisis OCD/Derealization Hey guys. I am 24 years old, have an amazing 7 month old daughter and a beautiful fiancé. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and OCD when I was 9. I have had various themes over the years but for the past 6 months I had a clean slate! I was working so much and living a great life! I even was able to drink almost every night without getting anxiety the next day (Not binge drinking and the fact I was ABLE to drink almost every night was a huge accomplishment). Then quarantine happened. It was alright, then my OCD got mild, and now it’s full blown. My theme now is the question: “Where did we come from? What is the point of life?” Even if you’re an atheist please understand (almost in tears) Christianity has been a huge part of my life and my cornerstone when all these questions happened. Also I am having derealization where I feel like I am losing control and I am about to go insane. Has anyone who has gone through this theme help me? I am about to cry my eyes out to think my daughter may never know her father because he lost his mind. [info] None [info] 1587945556 [info] train
zigzagwag [info] Chest pains that go away when I'm occupied with other things So I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Something I probably should've sought treatment for years ago. For about a decade I would get these chest pains in the middle of the night, take some aspirin (because that stops heart attacks, right?) text my boyfriend that I loved him (because those should be my last words to him) and watch a movie to go back to sleep.For the last 2 months, work has been unusually stressful on top of me having to take flights (&amp; what would be a more inconvenient place to have a heart attack?).  About a week ago I was dismissed from my job even though I have a job lined up to start in another week. With that being said I've been home with nothing to occupy myself with but these chest pains. But they go away when I'm occupied like...at a wedding... or playing a game.How can logical me convince illogical me that I am not dying? [info] None [info] 1496023140 [info] valid
danielleidk [info] Break from high school I was diagnosed with anxiety in early January. I'm now on a break from high school, and I will be starting over in AugustI am currently looking for exciting jobs I can work until High school begins again. What else should I spend my time doing? I do want to use my time somehow productive. I definitely want to study on my own, so I'm extra ready for school. What else? I'm sixteen btw [info] None [info] 1456071716 [info] train
Jake257 [info] Mate this is pretty much how i feel. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but think it's something more than that. [info] None [info] 1403433225 [info] train
EziosBlades [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year, but much before that at night I would hear footsteps around the hardwood floor downstairs in my house, especially late at night. One time I thought I heard someone knock on my door, would you say these hallucinations were caused by anxiety or the other way around?  [info] None [info] 1418154923 [info] train
jigenbabe [info] My SO and I have lived together for 7 years, and he's known me since I was 13. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 and severe anxiety disorder at 15. He's never had any anxiety, quite the opposite, and I cannot seem to communicate with him that coping techniques and medication doesn't stop ALL panic attacks. I don't know if I'm not articulating myself well or if he just doesn't get it. Also, he cannot seem to have a single conversation where he doesn't bring up his own emotions and when I ask him to focus on my feelings solely for a  single conversation he gets upset. I don't really know what to do and am in need of advice. We have a counselor but due to temporary financial situations we are currently unable to pay for a session. [info] None [info] 1524154540 [info] train
CantHugEveryPlatypus [info] Last friday, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yesterday, I made it through the office christmas party without making a single excuse to go home early. Yay me! [info] wine is kind. wine is delicious. wine is important [info] 1449340791 [info] train
Dreavok [info] High Blood Pressure. My name is Noah /age 24 /Male/ Caucasian. I went to the ER a few days ago because I was experiencing numbness in my arms and legs that would alternate between the left and right side of my body. It scared me, I thought I was having a stroke. I've been under alot of stress lately and I was diagnosed with anxiety, which was said to have been causing the strange numb sensations in my body. (On top of tachycardia and high blood pressure)  My EKG was normal apart from my fast heart rate (which is usually about 112bpm at rest) when I arrived at the ER and they took my blood pressure it was about 190 over 130. They prescribed me metoprol tartrate 50 mg a day. Ive been taking them for roughly 3 days now but my anxiety is still bothering me. I took my blood pressure at a grocery store kiosk a few minutes ago and it read 129 over 89 with 111bpm. So it's still high but a level that isn't dangerous. I would like to start using relatively low doses of CBD to treat my anxiety in a more natural way. If Metoprol is the only medication I am taking would it be safe for me to take CBD, or does anyone else have any other suggestions for my anxiety? I really want to avoid benzos or anything like that. Thanks guys. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1575181554 [info] train
WookieRubbersmith [info] Any experience with Wellbutrin? Hi, friends!I'm in my late 20s, and have not been medicated until this point (parents "don't believe in ADHD" and are against pharmaceutical intervention, so it's taken a while to work through that).My coping mechanisms aren't enough anymore, so I decided to talk to my therapist about meds. I've been diagnosed with anxiety on top of the ADHD, so he's pretty sure stimulants will be a bad fit for me. He's recommended Wellbutrin, which is an antidepressant that's apparently cross prescribed for ADHD.Anyone have any experience with Wellbutrin for ADHD? Anyone taken both stimulants and Wellbutrin before who can compare how they work (for you, not chemically as a drug)? Anyone with anxiety as well who has had a good experience with stimulants or any particular non-stimulant treatment?I'm a little freaked out about the idea of taking an antidepressant when I'm not depressed, but that might just be my "pharmaceuticals are baad, mkay?" baggage cropping up. [info] None [info] 1541001221 [info] train
strongerthenbefore20 [info] Fresh college grad seeking advice on what to do for a career? * I literally just graduated college with an Associates Degree in liberal arts* I have had a wide variety of part-time jobs, with all having at least some aspect of customer service involved * I'm currently working at a mattress sales store. The job itself is very easy, with most of my time being spent online or watching stuff on my phone* The biggest problems I have is that it is only part-time, and I barely make enough money to cover my essential bills* And because it is so easy, the job is not very fulfilling at all* I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD, so I would prefer a job with a fairly calm environment * I enjoy working with word and excel* **What  I am looking for in a job*** Enough pay that I am making at least $30,000 a year* Decent benefits* A calm environment, but stimulating enough so that I do not spend most of my time bored* Something indoors* A job where I do not have to be on my feet all-day* The more casual the dress, the better* I am fine with interacting with people, as long as I am not trying to sell them something they don't want or need* A job that is not super stressful or high pressure [info] None [info] 1577152335 [info] valid
slimgunner [info] I normally sleep on my side. When I was young I did fall and hit my head but that was when I was 10. I noticed this sensation when I was 18. Not sure if it could be related but I have always been thinking that they have. I couldn’t really say what brings it on because it is pretty much constantly there, just depends how much I notice it. The pain is on top of my head and is always in the same spot. But no sensation in my neck. I do sometimes get tingling and numbness feelings in my body and arm. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I have seen psychologist previously so maybe some could be anxiety related. But if it was a brain tumour or ms, wouldn’t my symptoms be bit more severe considering I have had this for 4 years?  [info] None [info] 1553287904 [info] train
Tmh1988 [info] OCD has all but ruined my life and my relationship I've been with my partner almost 10 years. For those years my OCD was in remission. Late last year I had a mental breakdown. Ended up in hospital voluntairily because I believed I was going psychotic or schizophrenic and would in turn harm someone I love, like my 2 children. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. My partner didn't cope well. Said I needed to pull my shit together, get over it or I'd end up a dribling mess in an institution.Intrusive thoughts and the fear of going crazy had me on the brink of suicide. Benzos 3 times a day is the only thing keeping me functioning at the moment. I'm pregnant but wish for a termination. I'm not mentally well enough to go through with this pregnancy so soon after my relapse. I still struggle daily. Add on top of that my fear of post natal psychosis.My partner is calling me a murderer and said he will never forgive me. 3 months ago I was mentally well, if it were 3 months ago I would be so happy to be pregnant. But I'm not well, and I can't do it. My relationship is ruined, as is my prospect of being a mother again.I hate OCD [info] None [info] 1549267534 [info] test
mizzuus [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I am making a fast recovery, actually! I really need to say, once you find a good friend it really lightens your emotional weight.Knowing to be that kind of person to someone as well, is 50% of the joy. [info] None [info] 1556196505 [info] test
undercover_gk [info] Seeking insight about my own ability to feel when death is near someone I know. As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety. As in I was medicated at 15 for it. I eventually learned that I have 2 very different types of anxiety. One is actual anxiety, which is a pretty mild form of gad. The other is what in the beginning seemed like random moments of feeling like the world would end. Well more of a creeped out impending doom sense. Like someone walked over your own grave, or a demon passed right beside you. I now work in end of life as in a nursing home and have for almost 10 years. I've had plenty of time to test this other form of anxiety. It only happens a few hours before someone I know dies. I rarely know who it will be, how, exactly when or any details. I mean sometimes I do know all the details. It's just rare and has to be someone I'm close to. Until, this past week this feeling has never lasted more than an hour or so. However, for the past 8 days I have been fighting this feeling constantly. I can barely sleep for it, and nothing is helping. My theory is that I'm about to lose someone really important to me, or possibly several people. If anyone has any sort of insight into this sort of thing I would be greatly appreciative. I know my grandmother has the same abilities, she just won't discuss it with me as she's very religious and doesn't like it. It's a crazy case of native American turned pentecostal. [info] None [info] 1568601035 [info] train
Mekchrious [info] A [rant] because not sleeping sucks I was diagnosed with anxiety about a month ago after close to a year of symptoms (specifically GAD).  The opinion of the professional was that meds could help, but doing as much natural remedies as I could before turning to them.  And I have; a healthy lifestyle is something I treasure, and probably keeps much of the feeling at bay, along with a dose of daily meditation.But this last week has really sucked.  I'm a person with very high situational awareness; I sit by fire exits for example.  I always have; being a perfectionist and a lover of the worst-case-scenario, I prepare for it.  But this manifests as bad paranoia when my anxiety hits.  It's not unusual for me not to sleep well; but this past week has been a string of four and five hour nights.  Naps and working out have kept me going, but it's been rough!So today  I ran even further than I usually do and hopefully exhausted myself enough that I will sleep better.I know I am probably a newbie at this compared to many of you and haven't been suffering as long, but I'm truly starting to see what many sufferers of anxiety go through, and it is no me gusta! [info]  [info] 1351663215 [info] train
MereGirl [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last year because things got *really* bad so I had to finally go to a therapist. She diagnosed my symptoms as anxiety and I started looking back through my life and realized it was anxiety whereas I thought I was crazy, abnormal, and lazy.  [info] None [info] 1450801380 [info] train
Thadwater [info] I'm feeling not the greatest. I have a loving wife who knows I am depressed, but I truly don't feel like talking about it at the moment, so I am just going to post here. It may help. I have everything I could ever need, yet feel sad, empty and dull. House, wife, pets, a great job, but I still feel like crap. This last week has sucked. I hope it gets better soon. I take antidepressants under the guise that they help with migraines and anxiety. I would go back and get officially diagnosed but that would just give me another 5 years of being denied extra life insurance. As I try to be a responsible adult, I try to get enough to cover my expenses in case of an accident or something. I've been denied 4 times to have an increase above the minimum my company allows. I think I will be eligible this year. You have to be 5 yrs removed from any new diagnosis and it was 5 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. (What a backwards system...)So I'm a bit stuck in that department. Like I wrote above, just hoping this gets better soon. I am tired of being tired. Haha.  [info] None [info] 1521303014 [info] train
Snapley [info] Can I ask a question about your panic attacks? I used to experience both panic attacks and anxiety attacks (I think they are different but they could be the same) Please ignore the rest of the comment if you don’t want to answer or you think it’s too sensitive a question.It felt like two different things to me, and I am diagnosed with anxiety by a professional, but it hasn’t been a big issue for a while. One type of attack felt like worries were in my head and I would get all the emotional and physical symptoms.But the other type of attack didn’t seem to be triggered by any anxious thought, it would come out of nowhere and literally be the scariest thing. It’s been ages since I had one but from what I remember it felt like my heart was beating out of my chest and my body would shake and I would get the worst tingling in my stomach. This one would come on randomly, like when riding a bike with a friend or walking home.Which one sounds more like a panic attack to you?  [info] None [info] 1534488980 [info] train
Giga-X [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety the moment I finished reading this. [info] ID: 68887019 [info] 1460815358 [info] train
uninventedword [info] How do I tell my crush I like him, and am I a stalker? Around four years ago, a new face appeared at the local gym, and I fell in love with it. He was the most beautiful boy my teenage heart had ever seen. He quickly became a regular at the gym, and was part of the reason I wanted to keep going, if only for the fact that the mere sight of him and his sunny personality brightened my day. However, I never spoke to him. Not once. I regretted it every time. Last fall, he left for college, which I knew because I'd overheard him talking about it to someone else there.    Only the year before that did I hear he was the same age as me. I'd thought he might be older. But, that didn't matter. Everything I knew about him, I knew from other's conversations with him, for my cowardice stopped every impulse to even say hello. I treasured every found morsel. He came back for holidays, and lastly for the coronavirus lock down. The last day the gym was open, for the first time, I heard someone say his name. Just his first name. At first, the name didn't seem fitting. It was too majestic, too rich, too mature sounding. Like the names of centuries long past. When I went home that day, I did something that could only leave a sour taste in my mouth. I searched his first name on Facebook, coupled with the name of the town where we live. The town isn't too big. I found his profile quickly, out of only 13-15 results. His full name was on his profile. I searched it on google. To my shock, I found that he has a YouTube channel. Not a beginner one, at that. I also found his Instagram. I didn't watch any of his videos. I couldn't. It was too far. Knowing details of someone's life, posted online, where those of the home town are likely not meant to... to... I don't know. This is where I become confused. The reason I did all this was to find a way to message him, if I couldn't see him  anymore. I desperately want to know him, but I don't want it to be from afar. If only he knows how I feel, that would be enough. But, there is no conceivable way I can think of doing it without fear of sounding like a creepy, obsessed, crazy woman. Am I just that? Creepy? Obsessed? Crazy? I have all the signs of an internet stalker. Well, just enough of them to be worrying. But, am I? Is this behavior acceptable, or not, in this confusing era of life through a lens?Extra Facts: I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and social anxiety. I've also lived a life as if in quarantine, because I've been home-schooled, and have allergies that may cause my death. Also, everyone says I'm beautiful, but I worry he will not think so, or perhaps everyone is just being nice. In conclusion: Help. [info] None [info] 1587805580 [info] train
faith6274 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and then I guess more [info] None [info] 1586497061 [info] train
julcarls [info] I'm so so sorry you went through that. I can relate slightly, though my illness truly is "in my head." I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder 2 years ago. Basically my body goes into fight or flight mode for no reason at all or if I get too excited watching a movie or something normal. It's very, very irritating and it caused me to be suicidal. Six months after my diagnosis, my husband and I had a mild argument and I started to panic hard. He proceeded to tell me how "convenient" it was that I was having a massive panic attack following an argument and that I was probably faking for his affections. That hurt so badly. I will never forget it. He has since apologized and always comforts me when I have attacks. I understand his point of view because he literally can't see my heart rate ascend 100 more bpm or my vision going haywire or my lungs taking in less air. He can't see that I feel like I'm having a heart attack. He knows it's not convenient in the least for me. I was able to forgive him because of his continued support. [info] None [info] 1568984538 [info] train
EMTechniShen [info] Anxiety? Or Possibly Something Underlying? I'd like to start by saying I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago, and friends/family think this may just be due to a combination of stress and anxiety but let me continue, these feelings are stronger than what I remember any of my periods of anxiety feeling like. I am also 18 if an age helps whatsoever.  Starting last week during one of my college lectures, I started feeling very warm, lightheaded, nauseous, and panicky. I had to rush to the bathroom and it ended up settling down a bit, but when I entered the class again it happened again so I drove home. Over the past week I've developed a feeling of mental fog that's consistently there where it's hard to sort ideas in my head or make conversation with people, and my vision feels weird like I'm not sure if it's changed or not entirely. I keep getting random bouts of the lightheadedness, nausea, and warmness that occur randomly throughout the day, and worsen when I am around people moreso. Laying down seems to help with the lightheadedness and nausea though. I'm curious if this could be due to an underlying illness or if my anxiety may just be flaring up extremely due to chronic stress. Thank you for your help and if anything requires clarification, let me know and I'll try to help clarify. [info] Patient [info] 1581979060 [info] train
mattbernss [info] Yes, I've also been going through this for the past 9 months. Always nauseous in the mornings, I don't eat breakfast, maybe only something that goes down very easily like watermelon. Missed a lot of school, got blood tests, an MRI and endoscopy, and nothing. Noticed that the only times that I got nauseous was at school and around SO. I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 and a half weeks ago, and I've been taking 50mgs of Zoloft prescribed by my psychologist.It's comforting to know that I'm not the only one having this. [info] None [info] 1530770226 [info] train
LameSaucey [info] My third, actually! The first two I had what I would call normal anxiety, now it’s just...awful. And has started pouring into every other aspect of my life. I can’t sleep at night because I’m worried my 7 month old will stop breathing, or that someone will break into the house, or that the doors aren’t locked.  I spend way too much time daily worrying about my husband while he’s at work (he’s a tattoo artist, there’s really not much to worry about, but I’m just always worried) Every time my two year old has a tantrum, I’m worried the neighbors are going to call the police (he’s like...way loud haha) It just sucks, I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager, but apparently it has been a part of me for longer than that, but it wasn’t until I had my youngest that it truly and severely started impacting my day-to-day life, and I just want to feel normal again. Starting EMDR therapy on Tuesday, and I’m so so hopeful that this will help! [info] None [info] 1562385161 [info] train
sadlilzombie [info] Thanks for the response, I am diagnosed with anxiety so makes sense. I just hate to be something negative in anybody’s eyes, but it is sort of inevitable so I’ll just try my best to keep a positive image of myself. [info] None [info] 1564709714 [info] train
bluechupathing2 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and borderline personality disorder, so it that wouldn't be stretch. As for more details, we don't really ever fight, and when we do, we try to talk about it after some space. We spend most nights and weekends together. We're both homebodies, but there haven't been any moments of having a wandering eye, or thinking about how bored I am, which, if I had experienced anything like that, then I could rationally address those, but it was just this wave of fixation on these worries  [info] None [info] 1518554405 [info] train
whostolethesampo [info] Fellow anxious person, and I get this too! At times before I was diagnosed with anxiety I legitimately thought I had throat cancer or a plethora of other horrible diseases. Now, years later, I’m finally able to recognize the feeling of “something stuck in my throat” as a symptom of my anxiety, and nothing else. Once I stop focusing on it, it goes away. It took me almost 4 years to be able to take control of this symptom, but I know how real it can seem. Last year DH and I were traveling in Europe and I was so convinced that I had throat cancer that I almost made us cut our trip short so that I could go home and see a doctor 🙄  [info] None [info] 1544007486 [info] train
PoppaDR3W [info] It is scary. I definitely had/have a bit of it. For awhile, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't know what was going on. So every pain was a heart attack or a stroke or cancer. It was weird, because other people's stories made me anxious and get those feelings.Like someone I know had a benign brain tumor. I never had headaches, but after I was told that I had them within days. I had intense head pressure. :/  The easiest way to get over it, in my opinion, is to see a doctor and get a checkup. Being reaffirmed by a professional definitely helps. Take care of yourself - exercise and diet. :) [info] None [info] 1420838757 [info] test
Seandonjuan [info] I really have nobody to talk to about this situation so I feel like I can get some understanding here. Hello! I started therapy and psychiatrist sessions around November 2018 (3 months ago). My therapist is also my psychiatrist. I personally feel like he has NO idea what he’s doing. Is this normal, or pessimistic thinking? I feel like a lab rat and I can’t even hold a conversation with the guy. He doesn’t even try to talk to me or assist me in breaking me out of my shell during sessions. I said I had an issue with something personal and he literally stated “ see, I don’t have that issue.” WTF??? I felt completely disrespected. He doesn’t engage any conversation, and when he does it’s just about himself... is this what therapy is? Because if it is, it’s definitely not helping. I’ve explained to him the traumatic experiences in my life and the stress I deal with on a daily basis and all I hear from him is “okay we will up your dosage.” Their office is completely disorganized with scheduling on top of this all. I was forced to pay $75 for an appointment I never scheduled. Going to him has literally caused more anxiety and stress than before. I was diagnosed with anxiety but that’s it. The medicine he prescribed made me break out into hives. He won’t return my calls. WHAT DO I DO? I’m honestly losing all trust for anyone in the medical field at this point. [info] None [info] 1550627927 [info] valid
lostineverythin [info] I literally came on here just now to make a similar post, you are not alone.I've never written the MCAT yet, but thought I could self study and work full time this summer and be ready for August 20th. Boy was I wrong. I felt burnt out and tired by July. I also have immense pressure from my parents, so I can relate to the circumstances. It sucks, but I think I have accepted that I probably won't be able to apply this year. It also didn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety halfway through the summer and my doctor and I are still trying to figure out my doses. I sometimes just want to lay in bed all day and do nothing, I don't want to go out, or see people or have responsibilities. It all fucking sucks.But this is not the end for you or me. Many people apply in their 30's even. We will have long (hopefully) and healthy lives, and if we really want it, we will get there at some point. Focus on you and do what you need to do. And don't put too much pressure on yourself, it's not healthy, we are not perfect.Just want to tell you that you aren't alone and that everything will work out in the end.edit: I will probably have to take a gap year too, because I am going into fourth year. [info] None [info] 1471141571 [info] train
unityway [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. tbh it’s probably nothing lol it’s just kinda weird because it never used to happen until now  [info] None [info] 1534554704 [info] train
tourmalineghost [info] Can physical anxiety symptoms last for many hours on end? Hey all. For a few years now I've been experiencing a lot of the physical symptoms of anxiety, and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but recently my symptoms have been lasting way longer than ever before. I was wondering if anyone has experienced this and if this is a "normal" part of anxiety or if I should see a doctor or something.To go into more depth - the specific physical symptoms I feel include racing heart, feeling short of breath/like I can't get in enough oxygen even with deep breathing, shaking, and physically feeling very weak. Sometimes a stomach ache/mild nausea too. It's very difficult to eat, walk around, breathe, etc when I feel like this. Usually I'm not consciously anxious about anything but I can point to things in my life that might currently be stressing me out, so anxiety would make sense but the sensation just lasts so long - I've definitely had days where I've woken up feeling like this, and the feeling didn't go away all day, meaning it persisted for 16 hours. Sometimes it even carries into the next day.Is it normal to feel like this with a diagnosis of generalized anxiety? Has anyone else felt this and found some way to relieve it? I'm going crazy over here spending the entire day just trying to breathe correctly and not being able to focus on anything else but how I feel like I'm about to pass out (even though I never do). [info] None [info] 1566156680 [info] train
brearose [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 14 years ago and with ADHD last week. I was put on citalopram last friday. I've had no problems so far, but it also hasn't helped yet (it takes a couple weeks to start working). My doctor said that ADHD medications can actually make anxiety worse, so it's common to take meds for ADHD and anxiety. I'm not on ADHD medication yet, because my doctor wants me to wait until the citalopram starts working first, but I will be taking citalopram and an ADHD med, so it is safe. [info] None [info] 1521078835 [info] valid
moni_bk [info] The crack-down on opioids can be really unfair to those who legitimately suffer from chronic pain. My mom has suffered with trigeminal neuralgia, has had ovarian cancer, and has fibromyalgia. She has a hell of a time getting medication to treat her debilitating pain. The pain is so bad sometimes she throws up. She's tried everything natural, acupuncture, holistic medicine, and just about every medication possible. She's seen dozens of doctors and had numerous different treatment therapies. The only thing that helps is pain meds. Which she has been addicted to and has gotten clean many times over the course of my life. If she hadn't been able to get pain meds I am certain she would have killed herself a long time ago. It's a shame that something that exists to help people is restricted so much that even people that need it have extreme difficulty getting it. I understand that it's over-prescribed and that we have an opioid epidemic, but people who really need it end up suffering because of this crack-down. I don't know what the answer is really. This is also happening with anti-anxiety meds as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and take Xanax on occasion to help. I probably only use 30 pills every six months because I actually don't like taking it. I hate feeling spacey and sleepy. However, just knowing I have a prescription cuts down my anxiety in general. I have a terrible time getting this prescribed. Years ago my anxiety got so bad I ended up in the hospital legitimately thinking I was going to have a heart attack. Obvious disclaimer, this in no way suggests that killing people to get meds is ok. [info] None [info] 1501521923 [info] train
my-dinner-with-andre [info] People keep staring at me... How to manage? I'm diagnosed with anxiety and ocd. Unfortunately I'm really good looking and I care about my appearance (not trying to brag) which is a really bad combo. Everywhere I go I get stares and looks from pretty much everyone. I'm also very aware of my surroundings so it's a triple threat... I feel like I cant do anything in private, the only thing that I found helps is staring at the ground when I'm walking. Also when I'm anxious I try to hide it which I think comes off looking as arrogant or cocky when in reality I'm not at all. What can I do ? [info] None [info] 1575064382 [info] train
thealbinoemo [info] Thanks...I was diagnosed with anxiety and I'm still trying to get through that, but it's tough.  This helped though, thanks again  [info] None [info] 1469567078 [info] train
mar736 [info] I don’t think it does, honestly. I am currently 28 weeks pregnant. I have worried since the day I find out. Before every ultrasound, every appointment. I kept telling myself that I wouldn’t be anxious anymore after x milestone (like reaching 12 weeks, or the anatomy scan, etc). However, I will say the anxiety has at least lessened. Now that I can feel my baby move a lot, I am at least reassured that he’s okay. Whereas before, there was just no way to know until my next appointment. I was diagnosed with anxiety before pregnancy, so definitely something that I was expecting to have to deal with. I think some of it is that and the other part is the expected being a worried mom. Therapy helps. What helped me a lot and still does is reminding myself that right now, at this moment in time, there is no reason to believe that my baby/pregnancy is not healthy. More likely than not it’ll stay that way. ALSO. Stay off of google. Google made me so much anxious than I already was. [info] None [info] 1569361583 [info] valid
FrekyShadow [info] High heart rate I just need some reassurance right now, for the past couple hours I've had a high heart rate, about 120bpm, I don't have any chest pain or anything just a high heart rate but it's starting to freak me out because it's been high for over 2 hours. I don't have an overwhelming feeling of fear though or anything else, just the high heart rate. Anyone else get this? I've been diagnosed with anxiety but this is just weird to me. [info] None [info] 1446764837 [info] valid
handwritten_emojis [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with anxiety in 6th grade (age 11) [info] None [info] 1557002149 [info] valid
keshi [info] Sounds similar to me, I had bad reflux for months then it went away and soon after I developed chest pains. After several visits to A&amp;E worrying about a heart attack (so many blood tests, x-rays, ECGs, etc.) I was diagnosed with anxiety and given pills.I wasn't doubting my anxiety, but felt that it was the chest pains causing it, not the other way around!Unhappy with the diagnosis I went back to see another GP. She pressed into each of my ribs and sternum and holy shit did it hurt on the top rips (but not at all on some of the others). She offered a working hypothesis of Costochondritis and it seemed to fit my condition.I felt much better after that visit and my anxiety went way down as I could tell myself it was just some rib pain. After having it for about 8 months I have more or less gotten used to it.I too feel it worst when I am hungry/tired/dehydrated. Night times are the worse, I generally use some anti-inflammatory gel on my chest if it's a rough night.I went back to see my GP this morning as a check up and she has referred me to a reoccurring muscular condition clinic for a second opinion and to give me some advice on stretches/how to deal with it etc.I too have wondered if the reflux is related to the Costochondritis and I really should clean up my diet via food elimination to check to dietary inflammatory responses.Good luck! [info] None [info] 1549882407 [info] train
throwaway-1101010010 [info] it’s been more than a month. i am diagnosed with anxiety so that doesn’t help lol. thanks for the input [info] None [info] 1566678664 [info] train
Kehndy12 [info] I've rolled only a few times and I've had edibles only a few times, mostly at music festivals. So I'm not an extremely experienced user, but I've read this subreddit a ton and I've done quite a bit of reading about MDMA.With that said, I don't think that you should think rolling will be like smoking weed. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and edibles make me REALLY anxious and make my mind race. It seems I have to combine edibles with alcohol to get rid of the anxiety. (Note: Do not mix heavy drinking with MDMA or you risk blacking out.)Rolling, however, is completely different for me. Rolling puts users in a positive mindset. It makes people euphoric and happy. Rolling has inbuilt happiness that I do not find in edibles. There is not much anxiety except for the come up, and if you take a small dose, the come up will be minor.I mentioned to my friends how I thought it was bizarre that edibles give me anxiety but MDMA does not. They anecdotally told me that edibles are harder to handle.Some people will shit on the idea and say it's not worth it, but there can be value in taking a small dose. For example, [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/MDMA/comments/8dv04x/prepping_for_my_wifes_first_roll_tonight_wish_us/dxs3bgc/) a user told us about how his wife took only 75 mg of MDMA and "enjoyed every minute of it." (Note that she weighs 60 kg = 132 lb.)If you try it out, make sure to test your stuff with a reagent. If you don't have a reagent, order it soon to make sure you have it before edc. If you're not ready to try MDMA, or if you never will be ready, that's cool too. Only do it if you really want to. [info] None [info] 1524701629 [info] train
sushi-suspect [info] I'm obviously no expert, but I agree, reading this did not give me an ADHD vibe. Though, I coped pretty well with mine for most of my life and did okay. OP, SHS psych diagnosed me with ADHD (inattentive type) last year and the med I was put on changed my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teen, but it's not so bad that I medicate for it - though my anxiety spikes when my ADHD symptoms are heightened, they're intertwined for me. Controlling my ADHD controls my anxiety, but medicating for anxiety never controlled my ADHD.I was seeing my SHS GP who tried to manage my symptoms (treated me mostly for anxiety) for a few months, but he put in a psych referral for me the first time I saw him. My psychiatrist diagnosed me quickly, but said it was obvious. The wait list is pretty awful for psych so if you're looking into it I'd start ASAP, get on the list before the next school year starts. [info] None [info] 1565416643 [info] train
Bmore_sunny [info] Sensory issues at night Hi, a bit unusual situation here. For the past six months I've had what I would call disruptive sensory issues in most evenings. I feel itchy all over, can't relax, feels like my skin is crawling. It only happens at night and I'm fine during the day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it's been pretty under control. I don't have anxiety at night anymore, but when it's 2am and I can't sleep but know I have to get ready for work at 7am, I begin to get very emotional and anxious. At first I thought it was a medication causing the sensory issues and restlessness, but I went off the meds a month ago. My doc has suggested taking Benadryl or another sleep aid, and although I don't want to take more medications, it's the only thing that helps.I've tried things like changing my sheets often, being very picky about shirts I wear to sleep, and even turn my clothes inside out so that the seams and tags don't bother me. It helps a little. I've tried showering at night, body oil, lotion, weighted blanket, nature sounds and meditation music, humidifier. I use a detergent that is fragrance free. It's winter now, so not too many allergens. I use a special mattress cover that helps with dust mites.  Nothing I try helps. I think it's strange it only happens at night, which makes me think I don't have a sensory disorder, but I don't know what else to call it.**All this to say... Any suggestions of what I can use to relieve my discomfort at night? Or anyone have a similar experience? Thank you in advance!** [info] None [info] 1574229794 [info] train
hahabyeeee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9, ADHD when I was 11. I took an SSRI and adderall for 8 years. Adderall never caused anxiety.  I now am 20 and take Wellbutrin and adderall and my anxiety is horrible. I took 25mg when I was younger. The past year I took 15mg, and now I’m down to 10mg due to the bad anxiety it causes me. I can only take it on days that I have to do school work because it just causes unnecessary anxiety for me. It was giving me chest pains at 15mg, the 10 is better but the doctor said that we can lower it to 5mg if necessary. I’d ask the doctor if you could try Strattera which is a non-stimulant adhd medication. It does not increase anxiety, but i think it takes 6 weeks to get into your system. But, if you’ve managed the adhd symptoms for the past 9 years I think an extra 6 weeks wouldn’t be too bad to wait for medication to take effect. Your doctor also might want a new diagnosis. I started seeing a new psychiatrist this year and my adhd diagnosis was 9 years old so he wanted me to get a new one before prescribing any controlled substances. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1553802629 [info] train
Mr_body_bags [info] Oh ya I love football when ever we are practicing or working out I love it it’s awesome to just scream and yell and be with my friends and get stronger and shit. I can’t get a job because of it tho cause track is after school but when ever I’m doing somthing with my team I’m always in a good mood I guess it’s when I’m alone and have to think just for me. I do watch joe Rogan sometimes hahahaAnd ya I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13 and took lexapro for 2 years but stoped so I could cum and actually feel myself I’m gonna stop over thinking tho  [info] None [info] 1548450271 [info] train
lustforwine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they said not adhd, but my testing showed adhd from neuropsychologist [info] None [info] 1567971670 [info] train
Kennyv777 [info] I was once diagnosed with ADHD. Nobody seems to now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that sadly stuck. So possibly. [info] None [info] 1569094845 [info] train
ShakerEdge [info] Nightmares triggered by singular words or phrases? (To preface:I was diagnosed with anxiety due to CPTSD, and a higher than average paranoid personality. So I'm not sure if these dreams stem from CPTSD or Paranoia? Maybe both?)I'm just mildly curious if anyone else has  nightmares like, nightly?Every time I go to sleep I'm basically almost always in for some sort of uncomfortable nightmare.Some are more simply based on experiences:- re-living endless bullying in school- nightmares about being yelled at by my mom- death of family member (trying to keep my great grandmother alive by covering holes in her ventilation tubes. even though I didn't actually see her when she was on the ventilator IRL)Most are a bit more strange:- Dreams of being kidnapped, tortured, abused, pursued- Almost always I am a "fictional self-insert kind of character"And some arise solely out of hearing singular words or phrases in casual conversation:- I watched the funny video of the guy reading all the various misspellings of "pregnant" (pragnat, prefant etc.) Its a FUNNY video. But my subconscious decided to use the phrase "pregnant" in a nightmare where I (as an aromantic, asexual person) had to pretend i got some girl pregnant because she was lying to her family about it but I didn't? And i was really uncomfortable lying to these fictional dream people about it because it's just something that I would never do???Or- my college professor going over my safety training said: "we keep this door locked, but propped open. That way if there is an active shooter, anyone in the area of the building can shut the door behind them and stay safe."And my brain proceeded to use that singular phrase to treat me to a school-shooting nightmare of columbine on steroids.Or- Connor, from Detroit Become Human's infamously famous line: "28 stab wounds!"I then had a nightmare that the only way I could save a child from their abusive home was to kill them by repeatedly stabbing them in the chest while they slept.These latter instances, I have never actually experienced. Yet my subconscious seems to cling to the strangest of singular words or phrases to use as nightmare fuel the following night.Does anyone know if this is more a CPTSD thing, or perhaps more a paranoia thing?I also don't watch Horror movies, and actively have to avoid gore in media because I know my nightmares would just be so much worse for it.My nightmares range from highly realistic to fully fictional scenarios. I write them down daily and have for years. I've got at least 30 of them documented in pretty high detail.It fascinates me, but also kind of worries me a little since everyone ends I talk to seems shocked and horrified by the content when I share my dreams with them. [info] None [info] 1586874953 [info] test
Lost_in_redditland [info] Thank you for commenting. I have been having sleep issues for sometime but it hasn't been this bad since when I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2013. I just was super scared with the suicide ideation because that hasn't happened in such a long time and now that these intrusive thoughts are popping up, I thought I need to write it out somewhere. Reddit has been a lot of help, I made this account in 2012 when I had my breakdown and although I used to post a lot more on my throwaway, the main account reminded me that I was lost and it was okay to be lost. Anyways, I just need to make sure that the part of my brain that is trying to cope is just a little stronger than the part that is trying to drown out any feelings. It feels good to be able to completely honest about what is going on with me. Since I could not sleep last night, I tried listening to a sleep podcast/story on youtube and it did work! Maybe that could help you too. [info] None [info] 1499169637 [info] test
kazoodles [info] I'm not able to empathize entirely nor am I religious, but I can see why you would fear over blaspheming by consuming this kind of content. A lot of SMT concepts are based on real life beliefs and practices, such as the belief that YHVH isn't in fact the perfect creator god or demon summoning. I mention the former solely because it seems like a really common theme in any game that he's mentioned. Anyone on the chaos or neutral side of things hints towards the diversity of gods which in turn is a rejection of monotheism and more specifically, YHVH's rejection of lesser gods. --I experience similar feelings, albeit they're probably not relate-able. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and psychosis 2 years ago which I believe started as a result of me dabbling in the occult as well as already having a predisposition to anxiety and intrusive thoughts. Getting into SMT has helped me by exposing myself to material that would previously send me into panic attacks. I remember playing Persona 3 for the first time two decembers ago and slightly shaking throughout the experience because of the demon names. Now the intrusive thoughts aren't as common and recently I've been getting anxiety about it likely because I just switched medication. I used to think that I was being possessed or that god would punish me(at the moment of the panic attack), although I didn't in reality believe in either of those things. It's easy to develop fears or worries related to these games if you're religious regardless of whether you see it as just fiction. But I doubt any christian would feel entirely comfortable with wanting to punch god in the face, especially considering how close to detail he's portrayed thematically in most of the games. Even if it were blasphemous in some weird, convoluted way God loves you and knows you don't have malicious intentions.  [info]  [info] 1479787341 [info] train
FamousBlueRaincoat37 [info] Hi, I was diagnosed with MS on Thursday after roughly 9 years of symptoms. I only went to a neurologist in October last year because I started falling over. From reading people's posts it seems I'm lucky that a diagnosis only took 5 months and most of that was waiting for various tests. I have many o bands in my csf, lesions in my c spine and too many lesions to count in my brain. My main symptom for the last 9 years has been tingling/pins and needles/numbness in my legs and torso. I also had the occasional episode of feacal and urinary incontinence. I just got used to the tingling feeling and buried my head in the sand, not wanting to face up to what was wrong. For years it stayed the same but last summer it ramped up. I couldn't walk without my legs feeling like they were buzzing or vibrating, my arms would buzz or tingle randomly and I had a few falls at work. Looking back, just before all the weird sensations started I got a really painful left eye. If I moved it (can't stop it moving) it caused such a sickening sharp pain. I also couldn't move it to the left and see at the same time. My vision seemed ok, maybe a bit blurry, except for when I closed my right eye and looked to the left I realised I couldn't see properly. I wasn't diagnosed with optic neuritis but I'm convinced it was a mild case of it. I was prescribed glasses with a 2x stronger lens on the left side. I couldn't wear them because they gave me a headache and made me feel sick. Subsequent appointments at the opticians have shown I don't need glasses at all, let alone a different strength for my left eye! The pain went after a couple of weeks and I thought my vision was back to normal. A few years later when learning to drive I realised I couldn't read the number plate in front of me properly, it was all blurry. Since then I've had intermittent   blurriness which is more noticeable at work. Sometimes I can read the patient board, sometimes I can't. Again I just buried my head in the sand and ignored it. So I guess I've been quite similar to you, pins and needles and blurry vision for years. I would ask for an MRI to get started on finding a cause. Its so easy to ignore things that are wrong with our bodies and we start to believe it's just normal or 'just how I am'.Oh, and like you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and last week I had what my neuro said was a flare up. Numb face, tingling and numbness, burning in my arm, dizziness  and my GP told me it was anxiety! I've known since January that I have lesions in my c spine so I asked " is it nothing to do with my spinal cord then?" And he told me no, definitely not! I wasn't even anxious, just pissed off with waiting for results from the LP and brain MRI!Once you've been diagnosed with anxiety it magically become to cause of all your ailments!Good luck with finding out what's going on with you and push as hard as you can for investigations. [info] None [info] 1553925430 [info] train
PapShmear [info] Getting semi-decent grades in college, living on my own with a fantastic job and apartment, two cats, 5 year long term relationship. I was a fuckup in high school and now I'm 23 and life is great (albeit stressful still 99% of the time). I was diagnosed with anxiety after HS graduation which gave me perspective on my inability to succeed in that environment.  [info] None [info] 1501573780 [info] test
ORLY_FACTOR [info] Why does elevating my side remove my chronic headache? Hello, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and headaches related to anxiety. Meditation and thought journals seem to have very little affect on my headaches, but when I elevate my left side on a pillow the headache goes away. Could I have been misdiagnosed? Age - 25Sex - MHeight - 5'10"Weight - 145Race - caucasianDuration of complaint - 3 yearsLocation (Geographic and on body) - head, usually right sideCurrent medications (if any)  - I use ibuprofen, niacin, valerian root, L-Lysine, and Saint John's Wart each once or twice a week.Ibuprofen and niacin are the most effective. The others are marginally effective at best. [info] None [info] 1414538608 [info] test
lachesepia [info] Oh god I'm 19 and I still have those thoughts. I gotta beat the panic down lol.... Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders [info] None [info] 1560630867 [info] train
AnEmancipatedSpambot [info] If you have particularly bad OCD I'd highly recommend getting diagnosed by a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety. It helped me a lot.  [info] None [info] 1532376944 [info] train
haveanupvote2424 [info] I do this when I am trying to fall asleep. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it sucks.  [info] None [info] 1384628775 [info] train
Daide [info] I'm going to do my best to reply like you're a human being, a courtesy you didn't bother to attempt to offer me.I'm not excusing his behaviour entirely nor am I saying he has anxiety, social or otherwise. I don't know because we only know her side of the story that focuses around one event. Your advice immediately assumes the worst of him, calling him passive aggressive. **If** he does have anxiety, your advice sucks and she needs to recalibrate her expectations on introducing him to some new things and how she does so.As far as the ren faire, I'm going to do my best to try and explain why *I* might begin to shut down in such an environment: Well, for [our] anniversary, my wife wants to go to a ren faire. Okay, it's not something I've been around and I have no idea how to act but I'll go for her. I know she'll like it so I'll give it a try. Once we're there I'm being asked if I want to wear a costume. I'm *really* not comfortable with this. It's at this point where I actually start shutting down. I feel like, unjustifiably, people will be judging me. I'd feel stupid. Everyone here is having a blast doing weird things, people are talking in ways I don't know how to react to. Should I reply trying to do a bastardized version of what they're doing? Will people start judging me? If I don't do it, are they going to roll their eyes at how I'm not even trying to fit in....Everyone around here is having a blast. Why can't I? [My wife] really wants me to enjoy this thing but I'm starting to hit a really bad negative feedback loop. Oh great, she's now in costume and wants me to keep trying these different. Can't she see how much I'm really not having any fun? She keeps trying to involve me in these conversations but I'm really starting to freak out. I don't like it here. I don't like how unfamiliar it is and I don't like how I'm *still* being pushed out of my comfort zone.By this point, I'd likely be sitting by a tree and hoping that the night ends and that nobody even notices me. I don't want [my wife] to ask me what's wrong and I certainly don't want to talk about it. I don't want to drag her down in my own issues...but now she's angry...and the feedback loop keeps going. Do you see how this might really fucking suck **when you cannot control it**. I'm not choosing to do this and I would probably give up a limb in order to be 'normal' in large groups and new settings. It's not always like this, but when it happens, there's no "sucking it up and faking".&gt;Don't even try to make your wife feel special on your anniversary. Trying to take her to a ren faire, which she likes, is an attempt. Just because I suck in some social settings doesn't mean I don't have to try. I'm not excusing him, I'm just trying to offer *possible* reasons as to why th&gt;Since it's not easy for you, why bother?It's not like I decided to live in a hole and stop trying new things when I was diagnosed with anxiety... I'd hope that I could verbalize my issues and also how I perhaps needed to be given slightly different considerations when doing some new things. Anxiety isn't a free pass to just never do things a significant other wants to do, nor is it life ending...This is where adapting her expectations and her method of introducing him can make a pretty big difference. Like maybe going to a ren faire once to try it out. Not going overboard, not trying on costumes or pressuring him to try events if he isn't feeling up to it. Just getting to know it, trying some food and drink and seeing how it all works. [info] None [info] 1376876353 [info] train
brokensocialscene [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety this summer. It mostly manifests as health-type anxiety (was absolutely convinced a had a brain tumor for about three weeks in August), but I'll sometimes get a general "something bad is going to happen" feeling. It's never specific, but it's an incredibly hard feeling to get rid of. It's the worst. But I'm on meds now and they seem to be helping so that's good. It makes me feel good to see someone else is doing well :) [info] None [info] 1381025414 [info] train
Stuckinmyhead13 [info] Coming off ssri s I wrote this is r/antidepressants, but wondering if anyone else experienced this. I've been on and off ssris a good chunk of my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety and pure o obsessions. I've tried just about every ssri out there. One thing I noticed is the widthdrawal and tapering off them., everyone I've talked to says it's the worst thing coming off these meds. I'm totally opposite in the sense that I get ZERO effects. I could stop cold turkey after taking them a year and zero withdrawal effects. No nausea, vomit, sleep, jitters, all the bad effects... Is this normal? I can skip a dosage for several days and nothing will happen. [info] None [info] 1540568691 [info] train
CyanHalo [info] Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety/adhd for 15 years and was diagnosed ptsd from witnessing several overdoses and near deaths of my ex husband. My daughter is only 4 but she does display similar symptoms that I had when I was a child with both anxiety and adhd. I'm not jumping to conclusions with her and it hasn't gotten to the point in which I feel like she needs to be checked out for it. I'm lucky to be able to work from home the vast majority of the time so I would be there to make sure that the animals had exercise and training. I'd also like to have both of them trained to be service animals. I'm willing to invest in it financially for both to get them trained correctly. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled. I have wanted a pig due to the intelligence and longer life span. My daughter has wanted a husky since she first saw one. I hear what you guys are saying and I get it. I am sure that its an imposition to not only have me and my kid there but my animals there for them. Even if they don't have any responsibilities for them, its the principle I think you're really meaning that is the issue. In my brain, I'm all justifying it because I'll be there or bringing them to the office with me 100% of the time. I also justified it because my sheepdog was massive with even more hair and the most hyper dog that I've ever encountered until late in life. I understand by hearing your feedback that regardless of the justifications, its the principle and a respect thing. So, if I was to get 1. The pig would certainly be smaller than a husky and I'd be able to litter box train or adopt one that already is. In my head that means it would be the better option. However, I think the pig word for the parents is an unknown and that is more of a concern.What do you think is the best compromise for the time being? You are right and I should compromise. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled.  [info] None [info] 1523371230 [info] train
orbitofnormal [info] BF (27m) and I (26f) don’t talk as much, I’m still VERY happy but also anxious Basically what it says in the title, but I can add more details. My BF and I met on an app in September, and have officially been a couple since mid-Dec. we both like the same things (same TV shows/movies, same sense of humor, weird science, cooking.....) and have the same general plans/values (wanting to be married SOMEDAY, kids IN THE FUTURE, hard working, close to our families). We see each other multiple times a week when our schedules work, at least one weeknight and one weekend thing, and text through the day. Lately, I’ve noticed that while we’re seeing each other in person more often, we seem to be talking less. In the big picture this doesn’t bother me, because it’s a big deal for me to want to be around someone without having to be “on” for them, if that makes sense. BF has become one of the few people I have where I’m happier having him around, even if we’re sitting on the couch together reading our own books or just cuddling watching GoT. I’d noticed a few mo the ago that he is definitely a bit more of a social person than me, with multiple large groups of friends that he’s always juggling his schedule around. We talked about it when I mentioned giggling a bit when he said something about how we “haven’t gone out in a while” when we’d gone our to dinner 3 days before and a friend’s party last week, and I realized he meant a “just us” thing. So I think our communication and expectations for each other are pretty darn healthy. But there’s a voice in the back of my head that is making me worry because I don’t think we’re talking as much, idk if that’s true overall or just in chunks. I remember when we first started dating that we could talk for 2+ hours without stopping, but then this week we went out to dinner and talked about our crazy work weeks, but I think over 50% of the time we were at the restaurant we were quiet. I was very happy to just with there with him and enjoy the beautiful weather and good food, but I’m also worried that this means something is wrong. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, so I fully recognize this could just be that ugliness rearing its head. And my parents have been married for almost 30 years and can be exactly like this, so I know it’s not necessarily a death knell on the relationship. But this is my first real relationship (I identify as demisexual, I literally haven’t been close enough to someone to want a relationship with them until the current BF), so anything that seems “weird” also scares the pants off me because I don’t want to lose him. Uggghhhhh [info] None [info] 1561262124 [info] test
Zaitlinspf [info] How did yall push past your anxiety to be able to talk to new people? Currently a college freshman and struggling with making friends. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 5 but my family never really did much besides tell me I was just being being anxious and needed to get over my shyness. (Family is better about mental health though as I've gotren older).I had a hard time in highschool making friends till highschool where I found my clique and we all stuck together. Now I'm on my own and have 1 new friend and 1 from my highschool. I try to talk to people in class but feel myself hold back as I feel like the person isn't interested or feel like I talked to much or that they think I'm weird. I also started catching that I lightly stutter or slur my words now and I have no idea how that started or how to make it stop. And I just feel like I'm holding myself back from something so easy. I really want to meet new people so I've tried to join clubs and just didn't like the vibe of the groups. I'm now trying to talk to classmates to try and make a friend. But I suck at keeping a conversation going without feeling weird and anxious.How did yall get over your social anxiety? Or at least push through it? Any tips to stop feeling like the other person isn't intrested/bored when they aren't? [info] None [info] 1582007589 [info] valid
FAM0USL0SER [info] I just found this subreddit. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I’ve bitten and picked since I was a kid. Why do we do it? [info] None [info] 1562703546 [info] test
psychonaut1220 [info] Should I try LSD again? I’ve tried mushrooms countless times in the past, MDMA recently, I smoke weed quite frequently, and LSD once. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. The last time I tripped on LSD I took an extremely massive bong rip during the comeup, and that lead to the peak coming on like a bus which lead to a panic attack. Once the panic attack subsided I still had a great time, and woke up with an afterglow. That was the first panic attack I’ve ever had, and then I had a second one which happened pretty recently from smoking a lot of a very suspicious thc cartridge. I am not prone to panic attacks sober and never have had them from weed or shrooms or mdma except that one cartridge incident. Would it be safe for me to try LSD again? I have been really wanting to drop one tab of 105ug, the same dose I took last time. I don’t plan on smoking this time. [info] None [info] 1584661714 [info] train
Madame_Kitsune98 [info] I can have conversations, but sometimes I do draw a blank. It’s a little difficult at times.At the concussion clinic I was finally referred to? It was explained to me that if you had issues with things like anxiety, OCD, or ADHD before the concussion, they’re going to be somewhat worse afterwards. Well. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. My family practitioner, who is an APRN, and I sat down and filled out a questionnaire, and I likely have ADHD, but we never could get me in to see the psychiatrist to do testing for ADHD. So, I have four thousand browser tabs open in my brain, but jumping between them, there’s lag.I’m easily irritated. I used to have the anxiety dialed in, and between medication and good coping skills, I didn’t have an issue letting small things roll off me. I struggle to do that now. [info] None [info] 1563113641 [info] test
HireALLTheThings [info] Another death to the pile. Was riding my bike with a friend when I got a call telling me that another friend had suffered massive aneurysm and was about to die. It was the first time in my life that some one I really, truly knew had suddenly, without warning, passed away. I was completely numb for the ret of the day, then spent the following day completely wrecked with crying.I'll also never forget the first time I ever had a real panic attack before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Felt like 3 days in hell while the world went on normally around me.Just for a dash of positivist, I have to add the feeling I got attending the graduation of a friend I made while working at  homeless drop in center. He had been addicted to crack for 5 years, but I saw something in him that I hadn't seen in other addicts in the center, and went beyond the job requirement to help him, which is  a HUGE risk for a social worker to take, but since that rehab graduation day, he's been clean for 3 years now. [info] None [info] 1374525900 [info] train
Inanotherlifetime [info] Well I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago when I consulted with someone but had the same "symptoms" growing up. I don't have anxiety around everyone however. I'm actually a very social person and make conversation with people very easily. However, I have anxiety with my relatives since I was a little girl and didn't even know or understand why. I used to make excuses to not see them and still do. I haven't even met my baby cousin yet because I'm afraid to see them. It wasn't until I went to therapy that it was explained to me that I'm in fear of letting in people who I love the most. Because where there is love more, there is more pain. It's a working progress and I hope to overcome this. [info] None [info] 1397458640 [info] train
alexaplaydespacito2 [info] frock no. 6th grade year I got A’s in almost all subjects except for math. I understood the math but I just got all C’s and the rare B. It made some really angry because I knew I couldn’t pass if I kept this up. My teacher pulled me over and gave me an oral test which I got 100% on. I was diagnosed with anxiety that year. Now there are people who are just stupid and don’t study, and that’s different  [info] hating kankens is a popular opinion [info] 1544030185 [info] valid
toccoto [info] I feel you dude. Can also be the people around you. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger and my mom would blame so much of my laziness on it. I'm not saying it wasn't hard but I wasn't working as hard as I could in life.I finally moved away to force myself to take care of myself and my life is really good now. Yeah, anxiety still attacks but I've learned how to deal with it. I think even diagnosis can lead to some using it as an excuse in life. Howeve,r I think people who really do suffer eventually get to a point where they understand excuses don't matter and learning to cope.. Whether through good habits, drugs, etc etc is what matters. [info] None [info] 1524800741 [info] test
JollyGreenDragon [info] Thanks. I'm diagnosed with anxiety already, and have only recently been diagnosed with ADHD as an adult, which creates a lot of problems when untreated for a long time (and is apparently a disorder related to Aspergers!) [info] None [info] 1475583296 [info] test
Cutteone18 [info] Yea, I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd-d at 19. Didn’t get my fibro diagnosis until it was so bad I couldn’t work at 25. It seems to me that the more under control you get your mental health issues the better your pain will get. Just in my experience. [info] None [info] 1517795112 [info] test
dancinginthesunshine [info] First, if YOU are opposed to medication (not your SO...they aren't dealing with this), then what about a natural help? Magnesium has helped me a lot.Therapy isn't your only option, but its a really helpful one. I find going for a run helps too...anything to get me out of my own head.I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 11 years, but this summer was one of the worst yet. I coped through with meditating and magnesium for a while, and then finally I started therapy and went back on some medication. It's a long process of recovery. [info] None [info] 1538521206 [info] train
mr279 [info] Sharing some stuff after years of struggling with anxiety disorder Hello r/Anxiety,TL/DR - tips for getting through a panic attack are after lines like this:________________________________________________________If you need help calming down, or any questions, message meI know there are a lot of people there who do not know what to do, are scared to make any actions to get help, or even tell anybody about how they feel. I have been there, and I would like to share my story, so you can see that it is not scarry at all - fear is very strong enemy, loosing a couple of battles doesn’t mean that we are weak - it just mean, that the war is not over yet. English is my second language, I will try to be as grammaticly correct as I can, but sorry for mistakes in advance.I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder five years ago, after having a „heart attack” while sitting on a lecture as a freshman in college. Suddenly I experienced a warm feeling in chest, not a pleasant kind, pulsating from what I thought was heart, down my spine, then up again. My muscles forced me to straight my back, I felt like I was going to puke, cold sweat appeared on my palms and forhead. It forced me to leave the building, everyone was starring at me, I thought I will fall, lose consciousness, die, everything. I called my father as quickly as I could find a place where I can sit alone and calm down, thanks God for that bench and park. He answered, luckily he was in a car, then after 30 minutes he picked me up. Worst 30 minutes of my life, was starring at a green grass, trying not to puke or die, but slowly I was calming down and feeling better. Boy, I wished I know what a panic attack was back then.After checkout with my regular doctor, monitoring my heart and a long talk, he recommended going to a psychologist. So I did. Couple sessions, couple hundred zlotys later (our currency), havent experienced it ever since, plus those sessions felt like a waste of time and money. But she told me one important thing - that might have been a panic attack - so of course I googled the hell out of it and suddenly it started to make sense. I decided to go to a psychiatrist, because I did not really take the psychologist seriously. Then I was diagnosed, he prescribed me sertralin, afobam and something to help me sleep - I cant really remember what, I wasnt using that because it made me feel drowsy almost whole next day. First week was awful, was feeling nausious all the time, tired and sleepy. Of course the only person who knew about my anxiety was my dad, but we did not really talked much, so I was alone with that. My friends started asking if everything was ok, and I lied to them, but I am sure they know something is up. That was my first big mistake. I am not telling you that you should tell everybody - pick one, maybe two people that you trust, you will be surprised. They will not laugh, they will ask questions. And if you answer those questions, I promise you will feel better. What is most important - they will try to stop triggering your anxiety attacks by avoiding certain topics, and when you will experience another attack, and you will, they will know what to do to help and you will calm down quicker. After couple of months with sertraline they switched me to pregabaline, lorazepam and another funny medicine that worked like xanax - beware, they are addictive, and will do more damage than help if not used properly. Be honest with your doctor, tell him if you fell you are getting addicted.After years, I am not afraid of attacks anymore. I can recognize them, I know the pattern, know my triggers, somehow I can get through. ________________________________________________________There are some tips for all of you struggling just like me:________________________________________________________- know your triggers -   Do not be afraid to think about your last panic attack. Analyze it, write down where it happened, what happened before that, write down what have you done that day, how did those actions made you feel, morning till falling asleep - the devil is in the details, you will not see it just by thinking about the day, but when you write things down, it will become obvious.- recognise the pattern - How panic attacks makes you feel? For some people it is nausea, you have to sit next to the door at public places because you are worried you might puke - and that is okay. Sit next to the door. Look at the door, remember you CAN ALWAYS LEAVE, WHENEVER YOU WANT. Nobody can force you to stay. If you need, leave, calm down, come back. Get some plastic bag and keep it with you - you will be calmer. Tips - look at the celing, count breaths (in - one, out - two, in - Three, out - four, to ten, then repeat) Ginger is your best friend, ginger tea always with you when you go out, little sips, even the smell helps.Sometimes it feels like you are about to lose concioussness, fall on the floor - think about that - your heart is pounding, like 200 bpm right? You can’t pass out when you are in high alert mode, you got plenty of oxygen, adrenaline pumping through your veins. Tips - sit down, with legs spreaded and hands freely on boths sides. Look at something a little bit above you, focus hard. What shape it is? What color? How old is it, start naming the things you see - like looking at bird - „I can see feathers, dark brown, little bit of white at the belly. It is small, two bright colour legs, little black eyes.” - name as many things you can, you quickly will be better. Other tips that worked for me:- pray. I am not a religious person, but repeating mantras is proved to help you calm down, the best for me is praying for someone - I focus on people I love, then pray thinking about them. It reminds you that you are not alone.- count breaths, from one to ten (not really working for me, but I know that it works miracles for some people)- meditate. Lay down on your bed, hands on both sides, get your phone and search youtube for „guided meditation”, choose one that you like and just listen, I promise you will be surprised and quickly hook up. I use phone app „headspace” and it is good for starting- try to put yourself in happy places, funny situations. Watch a comedy. Read a light book, watch videos with funny animals, sports bloopers, stay positive.- when feeling uneasy, worried, call someone. You will experience a panic attack, but if you are not alone, you can talk or just listen, you will recover faster - smells are your best friends. Buy a cologne you only use while at home, (best for me are wood, oud fragrances - nice pick is „by the fireplace” Mason Margela) when you feel calm and safe. After a week/two, start to carry around small bottle of that scent and whenever you start to feel worried - spray a little bit on you wrist and smell it - you will pavlov yourself to feeling safe.- avoid alcohol. It makes you feel better. It calms you down, you are finally relaxed, god bless. But every beer, shot, glass will make your next attack stronger and worse. It makes you depressed in a long run, plus, when you have anxiety, hungover is literally hell for you. Have a glass of wine, beer with friends, but watch yourself. - drugs can be your worst nightmare, especially shrooms, LSD and marihuana. Not telling you how to live, but think what bad trip is when you add a panic attack to it. Try to use CBD instead of THC, it helps with nausea and may fix your sleeping problems.- sleep a lot, wake up early and avoid sitting at night. - do your chores, whatever is going on with you, wake up, take a shower, clean a little bit, dress up niecely, put on cologne and deodorant, eat small breakfast, even a piece of bread - then you can go back to bed if you need. But do it, trust me. - talk with me. If you have any questions, need someone who will help you calm down, send a message. I am not always here, but will answer as soon as I can [info] None [info] 1587400653 [info] train
OldieMarsie [info] I've been getting really upset/anxious lately at the idea that I might have several diseases. Hi guys, well for a little background... I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 years old (I'll be 22 this thursday) and after years of therapy and hard work it has gotten better and most of the time life is really good. But lately I've been really upset because I've been convincing myself I have several serious diseases and even sometimes can feel some symptoms (which I know must of them are caused by the anxiety itself), and even though I know I'm healthy there's always this thought of "what if it is true and I'm going to die?" I'm scared and as time goes by it gets more difficult to control my thoughts. Which also makes me sad because I've worked really hard on my mental health and hate to feel that I'm going backwards. I know I should visit my therapist, I just wanted to feel a little support because sometimes this kind of situations can make me feel very lonely. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1566268362 [info] train
BloodEngel666 [info] Concerned I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger but it was a bit of a gray area because I have mild autism, so random stuff would set me into a meltdown. As I entered high school my anxiety persisted as nausea, Shakes, and a feeling of total doom. My day would be fucked if one happened but it only happened when faced with emotional stress, like seeing an ex.I got kicked out recently and got my meds filled on the first of October. My anxiety was out of control, it felt, and I burned through my "take as needed" gabapentin in two weeks. They barely helped even though they used to do the job very well, they mostly helped me calm down a bit enough to sleep or stop shaking. But things changed. I stopped getting nauseous and the last three days have been very very stressful on me. I'm concerned because now there's something...else? I think it could be anxiety but its not acting the way it usually does.I got wide eyed, my eyes dilate, my focus hits adderall levels, I get obsessive, my thoughts take a negative turn, I grind my teeth, I talk fast, and I shake very bad. I also can't sleep at ALL. Over the last three days ive gotten maybe 6 hours of sleep. It feels like I'm stimmed out from the adderall but that is not possible, I take my XR dose at 6am every day so it wears off at 6pm and I can eat and sleep.I tried everything to get some sleep, melatonin in huge doses and in super small doses. I tried benadryl, kratom, weed, doxylamine, zzquil, chugging beer...nothing can calm me down anymore. I don't understand whats happening. I fucked up bad yesterday because my Gf relapsed and selfharmed, she came to me for help and I ended up getting obsessive about random shit and pushed it, ending in her blocking me. I didn't even know I was in this strange mental state! I couldn't control it at all and it took my best friend confronting me to ask if I had any anxiety meds.I couldn't control myself, I didnt notice I was like that. Then today I went to go donate plasma and got turned down because my heart rate was stupid high. It wasnt the adderall, I hadn't had any caffeine, I hadn't smoked a cigarette. They literally asked me if I was feeling okay and if I was having a panic attack. I can't feel it at all. The only thing stressful about today was that I had to go talk to my mom about babysitting my grandmother. I don't know what's going on and I'm afraid to mention it to my aunt because when it happens, I look *fucked up*. It suddenly makes sense why they keep pushing if I'm on anything. [info] None [info] 1508355685 [info] train
Bananasticker642 [info] Thank you for your comment. I have been diagnosed with anxiety from my doctor a few years ago.  For the most part I have it under control and am no longer taking any medication. But for this, my main problem is just the unknown. I know medically what sleep apnea is, but that doesn't help with the everyday part. I was just looking for real life stories to get a better idea of what happens during a sleep study and how people deal with a CPAP everyday.Like... how are the wires attached to your head? Do they pull your hair? I am very tenderheaded. Do they visually watch you while you sleep (on camera or something), or is it just when the machines go offline they come in? [info] None [info] 1534354503 [info] train
unique_name000 [info] &gt;But I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of my abusive childhood, and Facebook can be a major trigger.Ok, so I have CPTSD myself, also from childhood trauma and Facebook is absolutely a trigger UNLESS you learn to filter what you see.  Block every news source.  Don't follow people who post about stuff you don't want to see (I unfollowed EVERYONE that talked about politics in any way during elections, I unfollow everyone that posts sad animals or crazy news stories).  It CAN be done, it just takes filtering through the stuff you don't want to see.  Right now, I'm down to bird pages, Harry Potter and a few friends.  That's it.Good luck!!!! [info] None [info] 1500990928 [info] train
PriinceV [info] Lol, I came to this subreddit to ask about this. Had unprotected sex 2 weeks ago, now I have night sweats, a runny nose, and a swollen lymph node in groin area and ofc I'm diagnosed with anxiety lol. This post gave me a bit of relief, thanks. Now let me get back to panicing and searching the web. [info] None [info] 1563670895 [info] train
booksareadrug [info] There's a certain anxiety about not doing things that I have had to unlearn (after I was diagnosed with anxiety). I guess the best advice I can think of, besides maybe talking to a therapist, is to try to set aside a block of time, even half an hour, to deliberately relax. [info] None [info] 1546258422 [info] valid
Dokii [info] Unfortunately for me, I was unable to join. I tried to join the Navy and was declined by MEPS. I wanted to join and still would love to, but it's no longer an option. Kind of a story in itself honestly; the only reason being that I had one therapy appointment a few years back and they didn't like that. I never took medication, never was recommended for another doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety, however I believe it was just typical teenage bullshit. Anyway, that got me declined unfortunately, so I'm going with my only other option for an advanced career and that's college. [info] None [info] 1378412166 [info] train
kittychanboo [info] Best I can do is tell you that you aren't alone. I went to get checked for ADD when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately I haven't overcome the distraction issues. [info] None [info] 1441367311 [info] train
ghoulkiddd [info] This fear of fire alarms carried through high school for me, and it got to a point in grade school that I'd ask every. single. Day. Then in middle school I figured out the schedule because nobody fucking else did, and I'd very conveniently bounce that day.Nobody was surprised when I told them I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1544958719 [info] train
gullwinggirl [info] Yep, that's exactly what I was thinking, because I have issues with catastrophic thinking myself. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's a nasty aspect of mine. You get an idle thought in your head, like "what if we got pulled over right now?" Then you run through what might happen, except it's always, *always* the worst endings. In the pulled over example, it ended with me being arrested and put in jail. That example happened tonight, on the way to dinner. The difference between me and OP's FMIL is I *know* this is just my brain being goofy and I can shut it down. I don't think FMIL knows it.  [info] None [info] 1436671422 [info] valid
TheFlood58 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and put on Seroquel. I felt like a zombie all the time. I was never worried about anything but I also wasn't happy, sad, angry, etc... just numb. Started smoking weed now it's not an issue. [info] None [info] 1504393380 [info] test
ramonetothebone [info] help me get rid of this I'm a 17 year old male. I was diagnosed with GERD when I was 11, not long after I was diagnosed with anxiety. At first I took prilosec and other random pills that pharmaceutical companies probably pushed my doctors into giving me, and I realized they didn't work so I stopped taking them. My stomach always hurts and adds to my anxiety, and it makes everyday life more stressful than it has to be. I'm going to cut out chocolate and spicy foods out of my diet, and significantly cut out meat. I'm going to start exercising. I want to do anything to murder my acid reflux. Any tips for certain things i could do would be appreciated. Just tell me how to start and maintain this new lifestyle. I'm not looking for moral support, I'm skinny and tall so just tell me stuff about diet and exercising. [info] None [info] 1562718638 [info] train
dejvidBejlej [info] Nothing to worry about! And I've been diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago so I know exactly how you feel. Pain usually isn't too bad but it's just very unsettling. Every once in a while it'll be actually bad.. Again, don't worry, your comment was helpful :) [info] None [info] 1544407133 [info] test
hellome1 [info] Strange emotional/mental block? Hi everyone, I'm a 20 year old white female, 5'3", 110 lbs, issues been going on for 6 weeks, no predicting medical conditions (though since this point I've been diagnosed with anxiety/depersonalization but I don't believe this specific issue is very much connected), no medications. I'd really appreciate any ideas/advice/answers you have. About a month and a half ago I took an ecstasy pill that had extreme psychological effects on me (many hours of racing, emotionally-invested thoughts that got more negative as time went on), from which I felt that I never fully recovered, and then, a week later, I moved away to college for the first time, from which I suffered pretty intense adjustment disorder, though I don't know if I would have if not for the drug. I felt so strange and scared that I terrified that I'd caused some kind of brain damage, but now I believe rather than structural damage, it's just something badly "malfunctioning". Basically, when I experience any sort of stress, my emotional coping capabilities go completely haywire. It's not that I simply get some sort of upset, but rather it's as if all of these feelings and emotions and abstract feelings associated with memories come flooding in, but the actual thoughts connected with the emotions/feelings from memories aren't there, and so everything begins to feel extremely foreign, and it's very all over the place and confusing and strange... It is incredibly overwhelming and nonsensical and makes it difficult to reconnect with reality when it happens... it's so out of my control, I don't know if I messed up some emotional/memory process pathway, but I haven't seen anything online of a similar experience, so I really don't know how to approach this. When this happens, I cannot think logically, or really think much at all, it's just a massive wave of strange, abstract, nonsensical emotion; it feels like I'm going insane and it scares me a lot. Sometimes things also appear visually overwhelming and difficult to process, such as patterns with varying light depths. I want to note that while it can make me panic, this is NOT simply a panic attack. I have experienced panic attacks before and it is not the same. Also, nothing like this ever happened before the drug. It's completely dysfunctional; I had to take a medical leave of absence for the semester and so much of my higher-level thinking/understanding of my emotional senses are stifled; overall it's not at all conducive to functioning productively in society and is certainly not sustainable, it's really miserable, actually. Can anyone relate/understand/offer other perspectives? Thank you so much for reading. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1475849394 [info] train
madelinewalters [info] How many of you are self-diagnosed, versus professionally diagnosed? I've been diagnosed with anxiety by my GP, but haven't gone so far as to see a therapist. My symptoms line up exaaactly with DPDR, which is what I assume I've been suffering with for the last two years.Wondering how many of you have been diagnosed proper, or have self-diagnosed? [info] None [info] 1435599100 [info] train
artfullyjaded [info] I know. I have been struggling with this lately, too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD in the last year too, and it's especially scary when I'm having really bad anxiety on a day when I am more likely to have a seizure. Also, when my anxiety gets really bad, it is hard to focus on anything, and that's eerily similar to an aura for me. I feel kind of fuzzy and "off", and if it happens at work or somewhere where I am talking to people, I'll notice myself stuttering and slurring my speech. It's so very similar to that pre-seizure feeling for me.When I find myself in those situations, I remind myself that I have had anxiety attacks before, and that this is what they feel like. I'll remind myself that I took my medicine that morning, and that I didn't forget. And then I breathe, inhaling and exhaling at my own pace to calm down. The not knowing is definitely the hardest part, but you're not alone. [info] Briviact 150mg [info] 1570507658 [info] valid
ConstipatedUnicorn [info] Can confirm, only place I go to for preventative care is my eye doctor.  And that's just once a year for updated prescriptions.  Only time anyone goes to the doctor around here is if something is already bothering them.  Our healthcare system is a bullshit scam.  But god forbid you mention anything even close to healthcare for everyone and suddenly everyone gets all bent out of shape because "socialism".  It amazes me how thoroughly brainwashed people are to think that what we have is a good system....When I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder several years ago it was due to a 5min ride in an ambulance my college called for me because I nearly fainted from a panic attack.  That ended up costing me 2000k.  I was 20.  What 20yr old college student has that kind of money?  I sure as hell didn't.  It took me nearly 2 years to pay that off. [info] None [info] 1555977242 [info] train
goldpanda23 [info] Hey guys so my story is below.. I am diagnosed with anxiety OCD and today I wanted to get something off my chest as well as relay a mistake and an actual accomplishment I made today. The sweet sixteen party was at 7pm and I was going bonkers about writing a speech that I didn't think was good enough. I couldn't get all the words on the paper and the thoughts were intrusive and coming in my mind were extremely irrational and annoying like "invite these kids from the park to party, maybe they are bad so actually just tell them to wait but in reality its that most of them appear bad.. Maybe they like having fun you know. Maybe the fact that they want to party with me is that they can use me for my money or maybe the fact they want to party with me is because the ring leader of there group wants to make money off of me. So many random thoughts and different fantasies start to get created in my head.Another weird thing is that back in high school there was a bully I had but I had called him out on instant messanger and he was apolgetic but in the back of my mind I wanted to clear the air out as well but I had a grudge because I took the pain of the verbal abuse he gave me for a while we were in our small classes everyday but I endured it. A year later all of a sudden I started to recall all of this that occurred and I was thinking of messages to send him. he did apologize and I appreciated that but than again in the back of our minds us humans have a tendancy to preconceive, be bias, and have the same perception about people from a long time ago especially if you haven't seen them in a while. So all of a suddden I was trying to write this speech and the overwhelming thought of me just saying these words to him over messanger" I dont want to be your friend anymore. Looks like I have moved on honestly and I have made new friends so thanks though for reaching out. have a nice life" It was a great message and my mind was cleared of this thought and right now I look at this thought I typed above and I am content about it whereas if it was a thing I was tensed about I wouldn't feel comfortable to share it with you redditors. Whatever ik lots of you are out to help each other and I am here to help everyone as well who goes through this. In conclusion there was a friend who wanted to come I invited him and last minute I said no. Why? because I thought I would have to introduce him and my mind was racing with overwhelming thoughts like "He is an F boy." "Hes just in it only for the girls and parties thats all" "this kid went to west point military academy, was peeed on and endured alot of trauma and whenever the fuck I hangout with him and one of my close friend's whom I introduced him too he would always talk like a negative person. Alaways down. Idk why? idk what its like to be peeed on. I told him last minute not to come and than later on after having so much freaking fun at my sister's event where I said hi to everyone in there, each and EVERY person out of the 400 people there I was a bit upset with myself. Because deep down we all know who the truly caring people are but our minds always tend to stray off well atleast mine and I tried to prove to my mind that I can be a strong indepedent person(attractive) but deep down inside these intrusive thoughts hit me and it may have cost my friendship between him and I. I told him to come but than negative thoughts came into my mind and I told him not too. So I will def look into CBT for sure. Also btw its 4am at 2:30 am along with some family friends who i enjoyed with at the party i told my close friend we would pick him up and also the other kid(Kevin lets say) Kevin he can come and we'll have fun and I WILL MAKE UP FOR MY MISTAKE FOR NOT INVITING HIM. So i did and he was just extremely negative and I felt the disdain and negative energy within him, I didn't understand I thought it would all be alright but little did I know he was infuriated and he had this tone where everysingle time I tried to make it up to him he would just say something negative like "Nah well I couldnt go." "Im a real good guy". I was so decent afterwards to drop both them off home at my close friend's home and when I do i still feel that coldness from him. My close friend and I have our inside joke where he says to me " Claire had an amazing time."(the girl we were both competing for) and so i didnt mind that from him well I did a little because it blew my self esteem but I was like whateer I shrugged it off. On the other hand his friend Kevin calls me than and starts talking about how he wants to hangout with my little sister, and how she is athletic and I get wierded out and tell him to fuck off.So today I messed up and I regret it. But i had a blast at the party, I was shaking before giving the speech and even shaking whilst writing it and I didnt have the focus to even finish it so my cousins helped and boy am I so grateful to thm. It was just an amazing day and just one bad aspect but when it comes down to it I am glad I wrote this. Took alot off my shoulders or chest and I would love to hear your guys feedback. Thanks [info] None [info] 1465632907 [info] train
_form_ [info] How do you manage to focus during your games? I cannot seem to and it's effecting my play. Hey guys!I am a Top lane main who plays mostly Riven, I enjoy playing her and currently am at silver 2. I have been bouncing around between Gold promos and Silver 2. I cannot seem to climb higher. I feel that when I play I am unable to focus. I try and try but it seems I always am in a daze. Anyone else have this problem or any tips on how to focus on your game?I have been diagnosed with anxiety but have done nothing about it really not sure if that could be a factor in anything. [info] None [info] 1475872592 [info] test
claireylouise [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety by an actual physician. [info] None [info] 1572468575 [info] train
ithinkimadragon [info] Just a genuine question So, this is a legitimate question I've had. Some may thing im trolling but im not. Why had god let almost everyone in my life abuse me (from a young age, 6/7, mainly verbal but some physical from friends and grandma, and eventually a girlfriend) and break me down mentally to the point where at 10 i was having thoughts of hurting myself and at 13 being put on antidepressants/now moodstablizers? If god loves me so much, why is he letting me suffer and why is he letting others do this to me? Litterally, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and (pretty much) BPD due to people being abusive to me. [info] None [info] 1580799954 [info] valid
DubbleB [info] I wonder if it is common to have all three? I am the same but I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues aswell. I hate my brain. [info] None [info] 1353664342 [info] train
epicfu [info] Can someone help me identify this? I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder years ago when I kept panicking like I’m on the verge of death. Quite recently though, it was not the feeling of dying, but a general nervousness and scared and a feeling of something’s wrong and it’ll last for 2 hours. I have not identified any triggers that could’ve caused this though as nothing came into my mind. I hope I’m not alone. [info] None [info] 1512661615 [info] train
lets_talk_aboutsplet [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety (not on Reddit) without any of those symptoms. [info] None [info] 1551927158 [info] train
takeitslowinnyc [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was previously on anti-anxiety meds. I go to weekly therapy and have made tremendous progress. A big problem I still have is always thinking ahead/looking to the future vs being present in the now. It's something I'm actively trying to work on, especially since I'm pregnant now (baby was a happy surprise) but it's HARD. I don't want to keep "wishing away the present" but I feel like I've just been so anxious for the next doc appt. Even getting my betas done twice, I was an anxious wreck. Last week we saw baby for the first time (it's doing well, yay) and already I'm counting down the days to our next ultrasound next month so I can make sure it's still there and ok. I grew up with an incredibly anxious - still anxious - mother and I refuse to pass that on to my child but shit this is difficult. [info] 26 | 8/12? | FTM [info] 1546282327 [info] train
CyberCrap [info] I'm so tired. I cant with my anxiety anymore.Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago I feel like it's been getting worse, I swear sometimes I feel as if I cant even breath right, I'm so scared to just even go to sleep cause I fear not waking up, I have to wait till I'm so tired that I can't even think to go to sleep. Recently just even throwing up from eating something that was bad makes me scared for my life even though I accept that it's nothing. Being alone scares the shit out me, at school my anxiety attacks would be cured by my friends but since moving that hasn't been an option and I'm not the best at making friends. Sometimes I think things are happening that really aren't. I try to distract my self but it only works for a bit, I just want to be able to live and fall asleep without worrying excessively, and be able to watch or read the news without having a panic attack because I think the world is ending. I just wanna be able to do things. And focus on school and my dreams. I haven't been to a therapist since I got diagnosed but I plan to see one as soon as school starts. tl:dr, my anxiety is really bad recently and I just wanna cry. [info] None [info] 1566792686 [info] train
unendinghiatus [info] Do toxic people know they're being toxic? I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I keep worrying that my behaviour might become toxic for my boyfriend and friend and family seeing as how I do require support sometimes. In the past I've come across people who were, as I was told later, toxic and manipulative. My question then, essentially is, do people choose to be that way and know that they're being manipulative or does it sometimes happen without them knowing and they won't know unless someone points it out? [info] None [info] 1544847874 [info] train
mathilda420 [info] I could have written this myself about 2 years ago. I didn't actually understand what death really meant until I was 24 - noone in my life had ever died. But in the space of a month my grandpa died, 2 of my friends' mothers both died and a guy who I used to volunteer with died too. All of them were sudden. I was already going through a lot and this totally messed me up. I was like you and unable to understand how people were able to live knowing they might die at any second. It was around this time I was diagnosed with anxiety (lot of other stuff happened at the same time.)Now though, the knowledge that I am going to die one day makes me feel peaceful. It gives my life more meaning than it had before and things are more beautiful and special than they were before. I'm just so happy that I'm alive. I make the most of my time.It didn't take me long to deal with it, a couple of months, but it was hard. But the thing that REALLY brought me peace was getting out amongst nature and the realisation that I am so insignificant in the grand scheme of things, but still a part of the world. I was standing by a river under this huge tree and all these birds were singing and there was so much life all around me. It was beautiful. And I thought "it doesn't matter if I die, all of this will still be the same. The tree will still be there, the water will still run by, the birds will still sing and the grass will still grow." It just really struck me, and I just felt so much better about death after that. I'm like you, in that I have a knack for science but also a very spiritual side. Getting out in the natural world really reconciles the two and gives you perspective.This might not be what helps you, everyone is different, but it's an example. I don't agree with people when they say "don't think about it and just ignore it." It's not helpful, and I think truly accepting and coming to terms with your own mortality really gives you a different, much better perspective of life! Ignoring that doesn't fix it. You are totally not alone in this, if you want to talk or anything, feel free to PM me. I know how scary it is, but it's amazing when you get out the other side. :)  [info] None [info] 1368207586 [info] test
shfiven [info] Hey, you, drink as much ginger tea as you can stomach for the next week! It did wonders for my chronically inflamed lungs. I was diagnosed with anxiety when it turns out the anxiety was a byproduct of the athsma. Ginger cleared up my lungs better than steroids and Albuterol combined. I read somewhere that it's being studied for use in inhalers because it has fewer side effects.  [info] None [info] 1526699062 [info] train
SwapMeetLouise [info] Dosage increase: what to expect? I’m currently taking Venlafaxine ER 75mg, for about 4 months. My doctor recommended this after I was diagnosed with anxiety. The first month was really rough dealing with the side effects, but I noticed pretty quickly that it calmed my anxiety. I’ve got an appointment tomorrow to talk with my doctor about episodes of anxiety that have been happening over the past few weeks. This is often triggered by things that are out of my control. (Running late because of a train, my son acting out in public, etc...) I anticipate that the doctor will increase my dosage, but I have a couple of questions for you all:What is the next dosage, from 75mg? I’m reading conflicting information on the internet. For those of you that increased your dosage, did you deal with additional side effects? If so, were they similar and as severe as when you first started the drug? I currently have a lot going on with my job, family, and two trips coming up this month, so I’m worried about juggling all of that while trying to adjust to an increase in dosage. Thanks in advance for your input. I really value this forum and reading everyone’s stories. [info] None [info] 1559525796 [info] valid
Renee1369 [info] Thank you. I've been to the e.r and a dr and my lungs are functioning great. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Taking buspar which I dont think helps. Haven't started my zoloft yet. Thanks for your info! [info] None [info] 1572478632 [info] train
Tigerbait2780 [info] Holy shit you're a sensitive little one aren't ya?  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, and I take stuff for the ADD.  I've almost certainly been depressed before but never talked to anyone about it.  Doesn't change anything about what I've said, and realizing that certainly hasn't "deepened my feelings of trauma and worthless uselessness".  Everytime this gets brought up someone says "well I think I'll trust the doctors over you", which is missing the argument entirely.And why would I ask about treatment before knowing what the issue is?  Seems like that's putting the cart before the horse. [info] None [info] 1520141630 [info] train
SnackRaptor [info] So I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues for the past 17 years here and tried just about every SSRI out there (most "pooped out" after a few months, didn't help, or the side effects were unbearable)... Effexor is the only one that's worked right for me (for 4 years now) and that didn't need to be increased (in fact we even decreased it a little and it still worked!). Everyone's different, and there's a lot of trial you may have to go through to find the right one(s) that work for you.  [info] None [info] 1524274068 [info] test
DiscombobulatedDesk7 [info] My mother was horrible My mother was a horrible human. She would beat me constantly while I was younger, not just a slap across the face like normal parents but with belts, bats and even slam my head into walls. I fucking hated her and always wondered how life would be if I could leave, I was under 10 when this happened. I remember this story vividly and it’s the earliest memory I have. One time when I was three or four I was playing with blocks and they fell and made a loud sound as they crashed on the floor my mom came and beat the living shit out of me I remember this vividly. I honestly thought beating was very normal until I went to school and my best mate who is still my best mate told me that his parents hardly beat him and if they did it was just a slap to keep him in line. Never did they use belts extension cords or just slam their heads.As I got older the abuse turned from physical to emotional.For example:I had gotten a girlfriend I was 15 years old and when she found out she was pissed. She took away my phone laptop and cut off the internet. She then continued to FUCKING GO OFF AT ME. I was told ill never get anywhere in life and she continued to torture me emotionally all night. I cried that night and was not able to conduct my exam. She embarrassed me at school by searching for her hunting the girl down following her through school. WHY couldn't she have just let this go. She continued to berate me over this relationship. You will never marry her, you won't be good enough for her. I never understood why as it was just a high school fling. I knew this was not going to lead anywhere I was just a curious young kid. She somehow never let this go.I was always a failure in her eyes. She convinced my dad to send me to therapy to see what was wrong with me. Once we went and my mother was there thinking the Dr was going to tell my father how messed up I was. The dr, however, had a chat with her for a while and then called us all in and explained that I did indeed needed therapy but not because I was a bad kid but because of how I was treated. He called my mum out.I cried then and there, this whole time I really thought there was something wrong with me. However, on the way back home, my STUPID FUCKING MOTHER said that the doctor knew nothing and should not be trusted basically saying she was not to blame for my behaviour.My mum told me that people would end up hating me my whole life because of my personality and till today there's a part of me that believes so. I am not good with women I have been diagnosed with anxiety and before I went to therapy I woke up in the middle of the night heart racing, I do believe she has fucked me up for good and I wonder if it's too late to become normal again.***I never understood why my father stayed with her, he always supported me and was a lot more understanding than I am. I guess he stayed because of my younger brother. I hated that he stayed with her.***But what I think what the most fucked up thing about this was how she would be in front of other people she would hug me and tell everyone we were close. In reality, though this was false it pained me to participate in this charade of hers. Despite her doing this she would always talk down about me to her friends and always tell them what a fuck-up I was. She destroyed friendships I had on purpose by calling out my friend's parents and telling them not to hang out with "HER SON" she always wanted me to be something I was not. Nothing was ever good enough for her and I was always constantly reminded of this. I used to hear her telling my dad I would never go anywhere in life.When I was 17 I made the decision to cut her out of my life. The last time we ever spoke, was when she was shouting at me and I just let all hell loose. I am scared to admit this but if my dad was not there I would've hurt her real bad. I wanted to as well I said everything I wanted to say for the last 17 years and HONESTLY WANTED TO PAY HER BACK. Thank god I didn't, I don't want to be her. I want to be good to people and be kind. But I will say ever since that day I've never been happier.In conclusion, today I am 20 years old and just finishing my first year of uni at one of the best universities in my country. I did this mostly on my own with help from my father and some friends who I now consider family. I know I have started university late but this is my path now. All I am looking forward to in life right now is to find a girl and have my own family, giving my children the childhood, I only saw others have. [info] None [info] 1566387768 [info] train
bosfton [info] Yeah, I definitely see where you’re coming from. I guess I feel like my friends don’t even offer help maybe that means my friendship isn’t worth much to them. I am very shy and hate public speaking too but I would do it for a friend.  I asked a bridesmaid if she could do the speech instead and she immediately said yes like “If you mean like gush about our friendship and what it means to me to be there then I can totally do that, I’ll write it up tonight”. That was more what I thought a normal friend would be like.   My MOH and I have been best friends for over 20 years, I am diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it as well I get that, but for me I’d view it as “well this is really scary and intimidating but this is my best friend we are talking about and it would make her happy so I’ll just say something brief”.  Hell I feel that way about the wedding ceremony and the first dance— I am shy and bad at dancing but my fiancé thought that a first dance would be sweet and they are commonly done at weddings so I sucked it the fuck up and learned even though I’m terrified. Part of life is forcing yourself outside of your comfort zone sometimes. I realize it’s not my place so that’s why I won’t force her to talk but it hurts she doesn’t wanna make any effort when I would have for her. Also I think she forgot about the speech because she said “I thought there wasn’t going to be toasts” and when I dug out the old chat log of her agreeing to give a toast she said “yeah I thought I could do it back when it was something in the future” and started saying stuff like “well a MOH speech isn’t required so it’s okay”.  It feels like she decided in her mind she wasn’t going to give a speech and then just never told me. [info] None [info] 1562286619 [info] valid
efarley1 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had the same feeling before as well. I think it may just be the relaxing effects of it kicking in. The CBD was from a reputable source, so there wasn't any concern with that. [info] None [info] 1552722310 [info] train
thatlittleging [info] That's what I try and do. I was diagnosed with anxiety but the medicine makes me feel wrong so I don't take it. It's to the point where almost everyone around me reminds me that I'm doing it [info]  [info] 1564592386 [info] test
sahariana [info] As others have said, get a doc evaluation. I struggled with this for years just thinking I was lazy or unmotivated. I was diagnosed with anxiety and while it’s not perfect, the meds are helping me get back on my feet. You’ve been in this mindset for so long it’s become normal. [info] None [info] 1573073845 [info] train
Casualjeeper [info] If you quit before your first day you're basically throwing away any shot you have at a job in the future. Think about how many people work for the postal service. You can do this. I was diagnosed with anxiety by my therapist and here I am 3 months later (as a CCA) freakin getting it done. I like to think this job has made me mentally stronger and better at handling stress. Now I look forward to work everyday, they have me working 6 days per week, it's tough but I'm just happy that money isn't an issue anymore. [info] CCA [info] 1566773705 [info] valid
psychotic_girlfriend [info] i made a post earlier on my experience with the psychiatrist who did in fact straight up lie. And just to clarify I have been diagnosed with several mood disorders, but since my psychiatrist is a liar I know that these diagnoses aren't accurate. For example, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I have literally no problems with anxiety, and I don't need a doctor to confirm my own experiences that I know are true [info] None [info] 1541279084 [info] train
LadyMorte [info] I'm tempted to check myself in somewhere... [Help] I have a lot going on.... not even sure where to start.  I don't even know if I can go into detail because I'm worried about all the judgment and everyone telling me how I should have done everything differently.Things have come to a head a couple of times recently and I'm scared I'm going to shut down.  I missed work once last week because I couldn't pull it together in time to go in.I am not sure what to do with myself anymore.*****************Background:I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago.  Been on Zoloft ever since and sometimes it helps and sometimes it doesn't.I got (unlawfully) fired from my main job and lost my home (my apartment was part of the job payment).  I had two weeks to move out over Christmas break.  I tried to appeal this to the board and they upheld the director's decision.  My boyfriend was fired at the same time and we both ended up homeless.There are several lawsuits pending over the firing - both on their end (for rent) and ours (unlawful discrimination, illegal payment practice, etc).I lost my lawsuit over the rent when my lawyer was suspended from the bar and didn't inform me... I had to attempt to defend myself and now the court has ruled I owe almost $2000.I was being paid $500/month for the job (yeah, it's becoming a real issue since I worked full time hours and was on call) and had no savings... I'm several thousand dollars in debt now from the unexpected move to a new apartment.  I've lived out of my car before and that terrified me worse than the debt.My boyfriend and I aren't getting along well... we are both under a lot of stress and I'm frustrated with the relationship.We both have new full time gigs but money is tight and he isn't as good at keeping up with spending as I am.We both got puppies to train as therapy dogs... I was careful to pick out the temperament I needed and I love her but I feel like I never have any time with her because of work. I'm afraid I'm not working with her enough and she won't be able to pass the Caning Good Citizen test.After a mishap where my boyfriend forgot to show me a bill for a deposit and we almost had the water cut off and I had to pull almost $200 out of thin air, I feel like I'm losing it completely.  I almost didn't make it into work tonight.  I can't keep functioning as an adult.  I'm 25 and in a worse position than I was 3 years ago.  I feel like any hope of a future is gone.  I'm not suicidal, but I'm not functional anymore either.  My plans to have a house and a real career are all so far out of reach again that I have no idea how to get them back.  I was doing something I loved and now I'm black listed from that profession... I'm afraid I'm going to lose my lawsuits and not be able to get back on my feet and back into that field.I'm drowning in the doubt and self hatred and I don't know how to get out of it.EDIT: My neighbor also called the cops yesterday morning because our dogs supposedly have barked the last three nights in a row from 10 pm-4 am... I am not handling this stress well either.  We both work nights and the last two nights we had been at work... the night before I was home all night and they NEVER made a peep.  We are recording them tonight to see if there is any barking... I'm terrified to go home in an hour because I am scared there will be another note on our door. [info] None [info] 1399863685 [info] valid
JoyBreaker [info] I dont know what's real or true anymore I some times find my self believing things that aren't necessarily true. For instance, i sometimes feel like im half aware ( dream like ) and then suddenly im disorientated and then hyper aware that say.... im someone or something else, or that i am somewhere i am not, or that im about to be propelled across space. Sometimes i feel like i have just lost my mind, i cant fathom or remember who i am, i feel run down and terrified. I often feel like im going to have a stroke or seizure because im so easily disorientated and i often feel tired/dizzy/fatigued, other times im just very afraid at nothing for no reason for a moment. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and depersonalization but my worry is that i am often believing these things, like i am not me, this person is trying to kill me or that i am somewhere else or reality is not real. I also dont want to bother my doctor with this because i feel like im wasting his time with all my 'worries' i often go to the doctors and leave feeling like i have made a fus over nothing. Also on another note i find it very hard to sleep, i just stay awake keeping my mind occupied on the internet until i inevitably pass out. It has been this way for over 2 years now, im 21 years old and i just want to learn my lesson from this and live my life with the rest of my friends without lagging behind them, always in there shadow being pulled back by this! [info] None [info] 1442009433 [info] train
WeAreTheCrazyMakers [info] I'm feeling really out of it on new anti-anxiety meds. Like a lot of us, I've got more than one thing going wrong for me: ADHD and anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety first, so I'm on Lexapro already. I met with a psych, and he's STILL not sure if I have ADHD even though a specialist diagnosed me. I feel like he did the right thing by upping my Lexapro dosage though. I'm usually afraid or uncomfortable with most things, but now, I feel really out of it. Instead of wanting to crawl out of my skin, I stare off and ramble to myself. It's as if everything is out of focus. I'm a bit more hyper. I have a meeting with my psych this week, so hopefully he'll give me some thing for the inattentiveness. [info] None [info] 1446575727 [info] valid
Mac987654 [info] The Chimp Paradox by Prof. Steve Peters I'd highly recommend this book for anyone struggling with anxiety or who needs a better understanding of their mind.The cover does look like your usual self-help, but it gives a lot of very practical advice on dealing with your emotions and feelings, or what he refers to as the 'chimp'.In the 8 or so years I've been diagnosed with anxiety, this is the first book I turn back to when I need a reminder on what's going on in my brain.'Why do I sometimes become so irrational in my thinking? It is not you thinking at all, but your chimp taking over and thinking for you. The solution therefore is to understand how your chimp thinks, recognise when it is taking over, and intervene.'Hope it helps! [info] None [info] 1549232403 [info] train
EvilAbed1 [info] How could an infection in my jaw bone be affecting my overall health? Hey, I'm 25 years old and male. 5 years ago a dentist told me I had an tooth abscess. I was broke and it didn't hurt so I did nothing. I went back today and will have the abscess treated in 2 weeks. They said it spread into my jaw bone. My question is how could this abscess have affected my overall health. I feel that you guys might be able to answer that better then the dentists reddit page. Over the last 2 years I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and chronic fatigue syndrome. Which I thought was stress related and it happened around the time I went sober. I read on the Internet that these infections can make people feel uneasy. I have also had super terrible sinus infections especially this year. The doctor today said that treating the abscess will help that clear up. Through out the day I have energy then I quickly become exhausted and then I'll get a burst of energy. Is that something that could be caused by a 5+ year old infection?Thank you [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1429134423 [info] train
ThisIsNotAConspiracy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a regular doctor and every psychiatrist accepted it as a real diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1486604150 [info] train
jacksepticeye_nt [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety reee [info] 15M [info] 1572907019 [info] train
bambinoebella [info] Help! Lack of Motivation / Don't Want to Leave the House So some background...I was diagnosed with anxiety with depressive symptoms last years. I took medication for about 10 months before making the decision (with my doctor) to wean myself off of it. Recently I haven't been feeling intensely anxious (this time last year, I was having frequent panic attacks), but I am having trouble sleeping, I don't seem to take pleasure in normal activities, I don't want to leave the house, and I just want to be at home. It's almost like I haven't been able to focus on things around the house; the house is crazy messy. I keep telling myself I am going to do things, but then my motivation just isn't there. It's not that I feel sad or scared, it's like I feel nothing. Any advice on what may be happening or strategies to fix it?All of my go to strategies are crisis response strategies... [info] None [info] 1500846399 [info] train
Chillie43 [info] Not true anxiety can be a diagnosisSource: I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a medical professional [info] None [info] 1574622344 [info] train
trexblue10 [info] Getting a job I am new to knowing what anxiety is or how to deal with it. I’ve had it my whole life and thought that’s just how people are. Until I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 20. I am now 22 and still learning. I have a really hard time with money troubles and always worrying I’ll never have enough to get by. Lately I find myself not being able to get a job and that has triggered me really badly. I can’t provide for me and my wife also while going to school and now it’s just going to school with no job because no matter how many places I apply or how many interviews I’ve been to. I never get a call back. Does anyone have advise for me? [info] None [info] 1571076808 [info] train
uselessat50 [info] Beta blockers instead of Xanax? I want to stop taking Xanax because I've given up opiates and alcohol and want to be clean. I was diagnosed with anxiety 20 years ago and started out with Valium and slowly worked my way up to 8 mg/day of Xanax. I'm currently down to .5 - 1 mg/day. I was at my doctors today and told him about my desire to stop and he suggested propranolol for my anxiety. Has anyone heard of this or should I find a new doctor?! [info] None [info] 1475540390 [info] valid
hp007 [info] Does anyone else obsess over going to the bathroom? Okay, I’m posting this just because I’m curious. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD in 2013 and the main way it manifests is going to the bathroom. I am always afraid that I’m basically about to pee on myself. I’m afraid of going on long car rides, I research new places I’m going to to make sure they have a bathroom there, if I see a bathroom I’m stopping to pee. I’ve been driving and had to find a store and literally ran so fast into the bathroom with my heart pounding that I was about to have an accident, only to sit down and barely have anything in me. Lately it’s progressed a little bit to pooping as well. I’m always afraid something I’ve eaten is going to upset my stomach and I’m going to have an accident. I have never heard of anyone with this compulsion, and I was curious if any of you have faced it. I’m feeling excited because I just finished breastfeeding and am about to go back on medication. I’m really hoping it will help me. I’m in a wedding in several months and I really don’t want to be standing up there just worried about having an accident so I really hope I find a good medical solution soon! Thanks for reading all about my weird OCD! [info] None [info] 1581206678 [info] train
atomsofttech [info] Ugh I know exactly how you feel. I've been through points in my life where I stood home for months just barely surviving. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Been living about 10 years with it and it does get managable but still if fucking horrible to have. I'm sorry to hear about relationship issue too. I left my ex wife about 3 years ago. Had 2 kids with her.. they are now 12 and 7. Boy and girl.Jumped right into another relationship right after and have a 5month old now. (Girl).Every single day I feel like something is bad is going to happen. Some how I'm not happy even tho I love her and don't want to leave her at all. I feel she doesn't understand me tho. Feels like I'm always doing something wrong. Feels like she hates my previous marriage kids and knows she doesn't trust me.I think about death but not in anyway wanting to die.. more of the opposite.. like ugh I don't want to die at all. I want to keep going.Life is freaking complex. Life isn't perfect and I fear it never will be but always remember.. it's your life. If you don't like it you have so much time to change things. If you fail.... Who cares.. your alive and have more time to try other things. Move... Start new relationships. One day you will cope better and will find someone who will treat you great or maybe you will make the mistake of cheating again and have to start over, but that's ur life. Do what ever you can to enjoy it.Try not to let the anxiety control you too much. Learn some breathing techniques and find a lil hobby or habbit.. like .. I choose music or reading or tapping my knee.. all help manage my anxiety.To be honest. I know u will hate hearing this like I do but just try and relax lol the world is full of people you can talk to if you need to. Sorry if this makes no sense but ugh.. anxiety makes it hard think.. also so does having 2 kids over for the weekend. :) [info] None [info] 1558200589 [info] train
roxychick4327 [info] I am on the verge of making a big move myself (although not quite as far) as well as starting a new job. I also have a 7 year old who is making this move with me and I fear repercussions of it not working out so much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know the feeling. Every day the move draws nearer I need to talk myself out of talking myself out of it all. For every negative, anxiety filled thought I remind myself of something in my current life I want to be different and how this move is going to help me accomplish that. I never let myself dwell in fear too long if I can help it. Sometimes I fail, but sometimes I succeed. Make a list of pros. Refer back to it when you get scared. Immediately following every scared thought with a small positive is something I've tried to train myself to do. Honestly, sometimes it's the little things like I think about how my new apartment has a fireplace and I've always wanted a fireplace. It sounds so juvenile, but it works. Think about how no real reward comes without risk. The discomfort of the move is only temporary. Your new definition of normal will set in. All of us have the ability to adapt. I would hate to think that you or I didn't succeed just because we were too scared to try. [info] None [info] 1452932222 [info] train
saddleshoes [info] [Help] Job searching is terrifying me. Hi, everyone. I'm a long-time subscriber and first time poster. I was diagnosed with anxiety NOS in the fall of 2007, and until last summer had been seeing a therapist at my university.I graduated last summer, and although my therapist has a private practice in addition to being on staff at the college, I haven't seen him since July. I've been thinking of going back because I'm having problems with job hunting.While I desperately want to get out of my retail job and know that I need to just keep looking up places and applying, I find the whole process terrifying. I didn't get an internship, and the industry that I'm in (broadcast) is very much connection based. Every time I go to Monster or LinkedIn to look at things, I feel nervous, and if there's something that looks promising, I will do an application and then fret until I don't hear from anyone. I've done about ten applications since I graduated and have heard nothing from anyone, and it's stressing me out and scaring me. What should I do? [info] None [info] 1400691618 [info] test
babygorilla90 [info] Thanks, makes sense since i am diagnosed with anxiety. Although i do have a very faint wheeze but it's getting better. [info] None [info] 1533587861
HappyLlamaSadLlamaa [info] I’m not OP, but I do this with my eyebrows only. My mom has a habit of running her hands through her hair obsessively. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know she would be too if she saw a doctor for it. I’m guessing that’s why the family does it, they all use this as a nervous habit.  [info] None [info] 1553977846 [info] train
disappointmentpanda1 [info] The midday zone-out OK, guys. I need your help.First, the backstory: I'm in my mid-40s. I was diagnosed with ADHD about three years ago. I take medication — and it helps. I've also been diagnosed with PTSD, which started to come on about six years ago (I had no idea what was happening for years). I grew up with an alcoholic father (now many decades sober and awesome) and a borderline mother (still borderlining!). Long before the PTSD surfaced I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder. There's more to the story behind the PTSD, of course, but we'll leave all that be for tonight.Despite all this I've accomplished a lot in my career, earned some accolades, made some dough, etc. Of course, under the surface has been — and remains — a ton of shame, all from endless talking-tos from bosses, performance reviews that point to my talents but plead with me to correct my poor work habits, authority figures exasperated with my inability to grasp the concept of time and my constant marching, despite my best efforts at the time, to the beat of my own punk band playing nonstop in my head, etc. You know the drill.In time, the PTSD totally derailed me. Job. Family life. Ability to enjoy anything. Basic... functioning as a human being. Full stop. I was in the blackest, darkest, loneliest place. It's indescribable. I never thought that could happen to a guy like me. I always knew something wasn't quite right. I never understood why I couldn't "get it together" and why I felt like I was always fumbling my way through life like a Steve Martin routine. Years ago, I wasn't sure if I believed ADHD existed and I *thought* I would never be able to identify with anyone experiencing "flashbacks" or "triggers." But it's real. It happened to me. I'm told I'm a textbook case. (Of course, we all know that trauma, anxiety disorders and all the rest run with ADHD like a pack of wild dogs. I'm one of those cases, and I'm super grateful to know what's going on on both the ADHD and the trauma fronts.)I spent a number of months in treatment for the PTSD. It's been a long, strange trip, as they say, with a fair number of dead ends and wrong turns. But it's getting better all the time. I was able to get a long run of TMS treatments, which were a miracle. I read. I pray. I try to get to the cushion and mediate (that part of the routine is a work in progress.) I'm getting back to my old self. It's amazing.I recently took a job as a delivery driver — a wide departure from my career path — and it's been awesome, because it's starting to show me just where my cognitive deficits surface and how they affect my day. It's like a lab where I can experiment with my ADHD, anxiety and assorted cognitive glitches. The driving gig lets me put all that under a microscope and see it do its thing. The gig is intense. 10 hours. House to house to apartment complex to office building. No time for lunch breaks. Where's the next address? Where's the package? How many packages are there? Go. Go. Go. I pee in a water jug in the back of the delivery van if necessary.The job forces me to focus just on what I'm doing no matter how boring — follow the GPS directions, find the private road in the countryside, turn the hulking beast of a delivery van around without rolling it into a ditch or hitting a mailbox. It's a challenge. Directions have always been hard for me. It's like my brain takes an extra beat to process what Google Maps (or any human being, come to think of it) is telling me. I often miss turns. (Again, more shame, the kind that comes in little doses and poisons your whole view of yourself.)That's my backstory. (Maybe unnecessary, for our purposes here. But what the hell — it's the ADHD sub and maybe one of you will spot something that speaks to the question at hand.)*So here's where I need your help tonight. No matter what job I'm working, white collar or blue, I've always  run into the same problem: Start the day in a bit of a fog (mornings aren't my thing), sprint from late morning into mid-afternoon (killing it!) and then, sometime around mid-to-late afternoon, my brain goes... I don't know how to say it... soft, foggy. It's like I run out of stamina. I have a lot more trouble focusing on what I'm doing, the words in front of me, what I need to do next, even if I've taken my meds. The little ADHD demon on my shoulder whispers, "You've got a bunch of more hours! You're good!" Somewhere in that haze I lose my sense of time.*And then suddenly I come to — maybe it's a jolt from the boss; maybe a glance at the clock. And now, panic. I'm racing to get the job done. I'm late. The boss is pissed. Some days I scrape by. Other days I get the same feedback I've gotten in every job I've ever worked. And then the shame and the feeling of defeat. I had been determined that this day was going to be different — I was going to get it done and feel great about myself at day's end. But again, not to be.The delivery driving job has brought this into stark relief (again, it's my ADHD lab) and I'm determined to stop this cycle. I don't expect to make it all go away forever, but just to work with it — win little victories and enjoy those victories. Little by little, I just want to have a workday like other folks, come home and know it's time to relax with the family, be of service to my wife and kids, and leave the stress of the workday behind. You know, normal.But I just haven't gotten there yet. And I'm so tired of getting chewed out by bosses, talked to like I'm... a kid (ugh!) and feeling less-than and not good enough all the time. It's a familiar tale, I know from reading this sub for several years.***My questions are these: Why do I go into that midday fog? How can I avoid it? How do you guys handle it and work with it? How did you find success in overcoming it, finding a workday rhythm. What did that look like at first and what does it look like now?***I'm grateful to all of you. I haven't chimed in much on this sub, but you've all been telling my story in your own way and it's been a great experience.Any suggestions are much, much appreciated.Thanks much.\[EDIT: Added a sentence I forgot to include.\] [info] None [info] 1564803002 [info] valid
CherryBlossom490 [info] Horrible, untrue thoughts pop into my head I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was very young. I had some challenges with it throughout my life. However, this has got to be my most anxiety inducing experiences yet. And I hadn’t told ANYONE until now.At random, I would get these horrible thoughts about me doing, saying, or being something I would ever DARE do/say/be. These thoughts want me to be very cruel to my friends or do something highly unethical and illegal. I want to be a kind and gentle person, not a cruel and nasty bitch! These thought seem to be trying to make me go against my very nature at heart.I always try to fight back with thoughts that say the opposite of what the bad thoughts tell me. And it’s getting harder and harder each time. Sometimes the anxiety is so bad that I feel like I can’t walk. Other times my head hurts from the stress.This has been going on for, I think, a few months now. And this is without telling anyone due to the fear of accidentally conveying the wrong message and damaging a lot of my relationships and my reputation. I’m sick of fighting this. I just want peace! [info] None [info] 1580901787 [info] test
TDJS95 [info] Jaw Clenching So when I seen my doctor she said my jaw clenching has to do with trauma and now I am going through trauma therapy for it. Is jaw clenching part of anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety and I really don't know too much about... Anyways, thanks! [info] None [info] 1530058102 [info] train
sfair039 [info] "Turrets-like" muscle spasms during anxiety attacks First time posting here, so I supposed a quick break down of my issues would make sense.I was diagnosed with anxiety in first year university. I am the only member of my family who had, at that point, attended a post secondary education. So that put way more pressure on me than I feel like some other first year uni students may have been dealt. (I am not saying that my life or condition was overall worse than everyone else's, I am simply trying to paint a quick picture of my situation for you all).I knew something was wrong with me when waking up even 5 minutes later than I planned before a class would send me in a complete melt down. I am talking hyperventilating, spazzing, and getting sick, even before fully waking up. Another big sign that made my family take me for a doctor's appointment was how I started developing social anxieties which made me become a hermit. Considering this was first year uni, the time most people are at their busiest socially / most adventurous, I actually missed out on a lot of 'staples' of being a freshman. It really became noticeable when I would panic at the sheer thought of walking past the front door.I had been put on Zolof, I can't remember the dosage, but had to stop taking it after 4 months or so. The reason for that was because though I did find that it helped with the 'lows' (the frequency and severity of my panic attacks; which I sometimes refer to as 'episodes'), it made me unable to feel any 'highs' as well, putting me a mental state that I referred to as "robotic me".My doctor then put me on Cipralex, which I really liked and was on for about a year, until suddenly my ability to keep a regular pill taking routine became impossible. I started getting anxious about taking the pill, because it was rarely on time and I was worried more for the sickening side effects rather than the curing properties of my meds. I think it is also poignant to know that I have a very weak immune system, and since starting first year of uni (I am now in my fifth, and last, year of school), I have had two dozen or so instances when something as simple as a regular flu bug has knocked me over for weeks at a time, developing weird symptoms such as skin discoloration (my whole body turned into off purple, leopard-print like spots, which the doctors had zero explication for). During the times where I would be sick, I would be violently ill, lose massive amounts of weight at a time, and having to stop attending school (which if you can remember, was the first thing that started my anxiety attacks). So currently, I am off my meds, which I know will be bashed by a few of you, but I felt that if I could try and find non-medical alternatives to my anxiety, I would lead a happier/healthier life. And since having met and moving in with my boyfriend, I have found that I have made some good steps in living with anxiety without being dependent on medications. What I am hoping reddit can help me with today is in regards to my body's horrible affliction with muscles spasms during anxiety attacks. Today I have been really sick (stomach bug) which made me have to cancel a shift at work, adding to the stress of trying to get better. During my peaks of episodes, my body starts developing twitches and spasms that for anyone who didn't know me, would assume I had turrets. If my legs are pinned or unable to swing around, I become more anxious and actually have to fight for breath, making horrible grunting noises that again, parallel what sounds I have heard come out of turret's patients. None of these twitches affect any other part of my body besides my legs and breathing. I was hoping that some of you out there have experienced similar tendencies, and could offer some support for a fellow Redditor. I apologize for any spelling or grammar mistakes, as I am writing this in a bit of a hurry. Looking forward to hearing any/all responses. SF [info] None [info] 1373937547 [info] valid
svkadm253 [info] I notice this too. Especially at work. I'm in IT and outages are no fun - not life threatening danger but people get pretty mad and $$ gets lost. Everyone panics but I'm like OK let's do this. I recently explained to my boss that I was diagnosed with anxiety and he was like 'what, but you're so calm'. Meanwhile 3 hours earlier I had to shut my office door and hide under my desk for a few minutes to try and calm down and nothing actually bad happened. [info] None [info] 1560667245 [info] train
GreatGateway [info] Assumed I had asthma until just this week - debilitating symptoms keeping me down. For the last 10 years or slightly more, I have suffered from unusual symptoms that have caused me to lose jobs, money and independence all around. Initially I was diagnosed with anxiety, and then asthma, however I'm finding none of the medication, including rescue inhalers, helps me. In some cases it actually worsens my symptoms!I feel very tight and squeezy in my chest, easily breathless, sometimes nauseous OR dizzy, and I get frequent headaches, vision problems and disturbed sleep. My legs can feel like they're swelling up even when they aren't and I may sometimes get pins and needles in my hands and face.To be honest I'm terrified of it being to do with my heart as it can get worse after some exercise, particularly sexual activity. I have a phobia of heart problems, even mentioning the word makes me anxious, so I beg and pray from the information provided that it isn't to do with that! [info] Patient [info] 1531932379 [info] train
moonbby33 [info] Nooo I have a Lilith in Libra. I don’t really understand the Lilith? Can you explain it? And alssoooo this is where I think mental health plays into things because you may be more balanced because I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since I was little and grew up in a very unhealthy/chaotic household. So you’re probably the more emotionally balanced version of me lol. Also i am sooo happy for you that your loved ones are proud of the impulsive Aries moon nature in you! Funny with the fool card - yep it stalks my readings! are you vocal with your emotions / feelings or do you hold those back? [info] ♑️☀️•♈️🌙•♋️⬆️ [info] 1565626479 [info] train
The_Zoinkster [info] I’m at the lowest point of my life right now because of this virus. Please read this whole thing to really understand how I’m feeling right now.I’ve never been so scared in my life honestly. I know darn well that I am probably the most likely to be fine in my family, but I still have that feeling of “what if i Don’t?” I also worry so much about my family. I don’t think I could ever move on if I lost someone in my family. We don’t have many people in our family that really care about us except my parents, my brother, and my grandparents. Everyone else in my family is a piece of shit to us. I don’t want to lose them.This whole thing is scary. I’m 18 and have never seen anything like this. Places are shutting down, roads are empty, finding food is hard, we’re barely surviving on the toilet paper that we have. I’m tired of being in this house quarantined. I don’t want to be trapped in here for a few months. It feels like a fucking apocalypse. I never saw anything like this with Ebola or other diseases. The number of cases just keep getting bigger and bigger. My state so far has 200 or so cases last I checked, and I’m afraid it’s not going to stop. What if the virus mutates and becomes more deadly? What if emit kills everyone else that I love? I’ve had such bad anxiety attacks. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders when I was younger and had meds and I’ve been off them for about 3 years now, but I need them again. But I don’t want to go out there in any buildings other than my own house. I have just broken down and cried a couple times this week because of everything that’s been going on. I barely get any sleep over this 5 hours a night if I’m lucky. I can’t even enjoy the things I love doing most like video games right now.I’m terrified, I don’t know what to do, I’m at the lowest point that I have ever been in life right now and I need help. [info] None [info] 1584682356 [info] train
thelibrarina [info] For about a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety, I slept on the sofa in the family room. I think it was because the bedroom felt too "closed off," and the family room was open to the rest of the house (it had a broad doorway instead of a door). It didn't do me any harm, and after a while I went back to sleeping in a bed.I talked with my counselor about it, and she basically said--sleep wherever you feel comfortable. It's much better than no sleep at all. :) [info] None [info] 1469062344 [info] train
squirrlythebish [info] I am at a loss... To preface my tale, I should mention that I have been diagnosed with anxiety. A friend and I stayed at a hotel last weekend. We put our stuff down (I had a small suitcase, which was standing upright on the floor), and we went to dinner. When we got back, we got into bed. Right away, she noticed some (3) bugs. They varied in size, but they resembled bed bugs. Either way, we weren't risking it. We immediately got out of there. We stayed at a nearby hotel for the night, and then, we headed to her home the next day. First thing we did when we got home was wash and dry on high heat our clothes.Didn't notice anything, but I now can't stop panicking. I've been obsessively Googling things, reading this sub, etc. I constantly feel itchy on random parts of my body, and now, I can't sleep.Tonight, I felt something crawling on me, and I freaked. My husband looked at it, and he said it looked like a stink bug. We had found a similar one the other day on our bedroom ceiling.Still, though, I don't know what to do. Am I going crazy? [info] None [info] 1507529532 [info] train
PastelCake491 [info] Am I ESFJ or ENFJ? Maybe even another type! Am I ENFJ Or ESFJ? Maybe Even Another Type!First of all, I am stuck in between these types because:•I relate both to Ni and Si, and notice myself using both, sometimes even at the same time!•In tests, I usually get ENFJ, but with sort of strong Si (and Ne), but in some of them I do get ESFJ, mainly in the shorter ones.•I have asked people, in a page of cognitive functions I made that I showed my family and friends (it was around 9 people) My parents: ENFJMy mom said Ni because since I was little, I liked to play with patterns and connections and I have always liked finding the deeper meaning of things. My dad said Ni over Si because “I grab things from the future, not from the past”.2 Friends: ESFJ1 Friend: ENFP 2 Friends: ENFJ (one of those is the one who I have told the most about MBTI, and she has this belief I am ENFJ, and doesn’t let it go)1 Of My Siblings: ESFJThat Makes: 1 ENFP3 ESFJs4 ENFJsThen, I showed my mom a picture which contrasts ESFJ vs ENFJ, cognitive wise, and she said ESFJ. I showed her Ni vs Si and she said Si.Now, I’m still young so my auxiliary function is just developing. But I will explain my Si and Ni! Using the 4 letters, I am an ENFP. Si:I’m not the biggest fan of change, it depends on the kind of change. I don’t prioritize tradition but bothmy dad and mom said I’m more of a detail oriented person rather than big picture, but I’m not sure. I am not a fan of routines, I would definitely get bored from doing the same thing all over again, which is why school days are boring. But, I do sometimes find myself giving advices based on my past experiences and even though I use a lot of metaphors, my day to day speaking doesn’t involve a lot of them. I don’t have the most detailed memory, but I do remember various things that happened to me when I was little and find myself using examples from both the past or imagination. I sometimes think about the past, usually things that had lead me to be insecure and I find myself thinking of what I could have done differently in certain situations. I don’t have the best short term memory but my long term one isn’t a mess. I do look up to past experiences, even though they’re not my top priority. Ni:Even though people don’t notice it, I can be very deep and arrive at insights, I analyze some things unconsciously so I suddenly have these random moments of realization. I am very future oriented. I was diagnosed with anxiety so I don’t know if this is just my anxiety, but I tend to get very paranoid and overthink stuff.I like getting to the deeper meanings of things and enjoy the abstract. I am creative but not good at brainstorming and prefer thinking and processing my ideas before letting them out, though I sometimes can be pretty random and say the first thins that come to my mind when I’m with people that make me feel comfortable. I use metaphors but don’t really include them that much. I enjoy abstract thinking and analyzing situations that lead me to maybe a theory. For example, while making theories, I usually just make one and stick to it. I have just one goal, and I enjoy working to get that one goal instead of having multiple ones. I usually think of one possible outcome, or idea, sometimes I think of more but usually stick to one. I am pretty abstract and usually have hunches that turn out to be true. (Like for example, one time I was playing a game and since the beginning I had this idea that I was going to win, and I did!) I usually just know things without really knowing how to explaining. But, I do have trouble deciding, and I’m usually just like “idk, what do you want?”, which could be a sign of trickster Ni, which means tertiary Ne, auxiliary Si. I don’t think about the long term future, I rather stick to daydreaming and thinking about the short term future.I hope you can help me if you want! And I hope this was not too long! :) [info] None [info] 1556991773 [info] train
smolbur [info] Thankyou, the OP is absolute cancer and so are a lot of the comments.I'm fucking sick of people glamourising mental illness.I was diagnosed with anxiety and it is a complete detachment from reality, it's about your mind cooking up nightmares of the immediate future and them scaring the shit out of you until you are paralyzed with fear.Mindfulness is the ONLY way out.People need to wake the fuck up. [info] None [info] 1542941179 [info] train
abduayoub_ [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and maybe that's why no girls are into me, not coz of my looks its coz of how weird I am :/ [info] 1 Day [info] 1490288259 [info] train
DinnerMilk [info] How can I properly deal with extreme anxiety that is affecting me both physically and mentally? I just got out of a horrific relationship of about 8 months a couple weeks ago. Initially I was just very upset and depressed that it ended in such chaos, but was just giving it time expecting to move past it and start feeling a bit better.As of the last week or so however, I am an absolute wreck. I've worked from home on the computer for the last decade and for the first time ever, I almost can't even sit still long enough to even do anything productive. It is very difficult to describe but it almost feels like I am exploding from the inside out. The longer I stay in place the more intense it becomes until I have to move. It has been the same with sleeping, I will lay there for hours moving around, kicking off covers, etc. until I guess I eventually pass out.I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but in comparison it was extremely mild. Prior to this my mind would just fixate on things and run wild but now its presenting in really problematic physical and mental issues.Alcohol has been the only relief I have had at all. A few drinks and I am able to calm down and feel alright, but I don't want to stay drunk. Is there anything I can do to address this in a more healthy manner? [info] None [info] 1440688201 [info] train
kaupa_lupa [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks just 2 weeks ago; and 2 days ago I found out I have a 1 inch tumor in my breast. [info] None [info] 1552233921 [info] valid
MainStreetGal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago (whew it feels weird to say that was so long ago lol), and I was having attacks like you were - therapy was a lifesaver for me. As someone who was in your shoes, it sounds like you would benefit from it. It was so helpful to vent about feelings which helped decrease episodes. Plus they taught me breathing techniques which still help to this day - I am in much healthier place at the moment, thanks to them.For the past year I've been experiencing anticipatory grief myself, and I plan to return to therapy once I get health insurance again. [info] None [info] 1557110746 [info] train
_robynn_ [info] :( I’m so sorry. I didn’t know I was being cruel or that I was hurting you. I just honestly thought that when you said appointment you actually meant an appointment. I didn’t know you didn’t mean what you said. I saw how you got angry and it really does scare me. I don’t feel safe when you’re mad. Sofia was also very scared when you were hitting things with the frying pan. She is too young to understand that you have problems and she blames herself for you being mad. I blame myself for you being mad too, but I know it is my fault. The reason I don’t like getting close to people is because you have convinced me that I’m a terrible person. I care too much about people to get close to them because I’m convinced that I’m a terrible person and no one would ever want to be my friend. You called me cruel for not understanding that when you said “appointment” you actually meant “performance.” I know it’s my fault so please stop yelling and hitting me. It really hurts. Even though I am diagnosed with anxiety you are convinced that I don’t have it so I stopped taking my medicine because if I don’t have it I wouldn’t need my medicine. My anxiety has gotten so much worse because I’m not taking my medicine but I know that I’m faking it so I’ll just deal with it. I’m a pathetic human. I’m sorry I’m not able to help you with shopping and I’m sorry I waste your time because you have to pick me up from school. I know that I’m a burden and that I would be better off dead, please stop reminding me. I know I deserve all of this for coming into your life and costing you a lot of medical bills. I know you want me to die but I’m too scared and selfish to go through another suicide attempt. I know that makes me pathetic. I know I’m worthless. Please please please please stop hurting me. [info] None [info] 1571710491 [info] train
Deadmanjustice [info] I'm extremely stressed out from many things this week, and something as fragile as CFW is not something I should be touching right now. I mean I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, unmedicated, and very stressed from  multitude of very serious things.When I calm down in a week or two I plan to update my CFW to A9LH+Luma, but for now I just wanna know if it's safe to update my emunand so I can play Dragon Quest. [info] None [info] 1473815799 [info] train
Daniaximehc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of days ago. What now? [info] None [info] 1548195120 [info] train
mechanon05 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in middle school.  It's a struggle but you'll get better and better at dealing with it.  I highly recommend reading Growth Mindset by Carol Dweck.  It really reduced my anxiety levels in a host of different situations.  Good luck, man.  [info] None [info] 1403221251 [info] valid
chipsahoyguru [info] I’m going through this right now and have one week to get my grade up before the class ends. It’s been so draining. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and emailed my professor when my panic attack’s were impacting my grade. He responded by saying, “I’m sorry for your personal problem.” And offered virtually no support. I’m really hopeful that I will pass, but it’s not looking great. How did you cope with failing?  [info] None [info] 1551438750 [info] train
Bloody_Insanity [info] 12 weeks and starting to genuinely fear everything. (Depression/worry rant?) Let me sound young. But im turning 19 in a month and im 12 weeks and i feel like i have no friends. I always get scared if "is this normal" "is this normal". All the normal fears that come with being pregnant and the journey to motherhood. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10+ years ago. Depression Shortly after that. So im getting overwhelmed feeling like i cant talk to anyone. Feeling like i have no friends. Feelig like theirs things wrong with me. Idk. [info] BabyBoy&lt;3 7/2/16 [info] 1450931126 [info] train
allthesnacks [info] Are misdiagnosis of Anxiety and OCD common for folks with ADHD? I have no diagnosis for ADHD myself although I display many of the symptoms which are identical to my brothers who actually was recently diagnosed with ADHD. However, when I went in displaying the same symptoms I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I'm 29/F and I'm wondering if others also had this experience. I'm on Zoloft which has helped with the anxiety but nothing else. I'll be going in for a second opinion soon. [info] None [info] 1506899125 [info] valid
kefern [info] &gt;I'm open to the idea that this is "just" anxiety. Never really been an anxious person though.Same here, but I was diagnosed with anxiety way before I have experienced these weird symptoms that made me even more worried as it could be some other underlying issue like you said which could potentially be something serious. Have you tried seeing a neurologist? I'm probably going to do that soon.Also, how are your ears? Apparently most issues with balance disorders are due to some infection or issue in the ear. However, I'm not a doctor but I don't see how an ear infection could have such a profound impact or relation on the heart. Secondly most ear infections presumably also cause actual vertigo, spinning or some sort of dizziness, which both of us do not have. It's truly puzzling. [info] None [info] 1522155411 [info] valid
Melania- [info] It's true. Even though I went to the psychiatrist and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, many people around me keep denying this. [info] None [info] 1563818628 [info] train
masscool [info] I'm on medication. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 9 years now, it just acts up worse sometimes [info] None [info] 1385238347 [info] train
AlexamariaK [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety... and was taking a very low dosage of medication to help with it but I quit cold turkey because I felt like it wasn't really doing anything but making me a very forgetful person.  [info] Female [info] 1471026563 [info] train
Waluwuigi [info] I’ve had tics for 8 years, I’m experiencing a mix of motor and vocal tics, OCD has been running in my family, and i show symptoms of it but i haven’t been diagnosed, same with ADHD. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have had it since i was 9, none of these are being treated. I want to know how long the wait is, what the process is, and how i’ll get diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1556081375 [info] train
rachiedoubt [info] I struggle with pretty severe anxiety. I have PTSD &amp; generalized anxiety and often experience panic attacks. One of the main symptoms for me is heart palpitations. They are such a normal part of my life now that I often just ignore them. I used to get scared to work out or get my heart rate up too high, because they were more likely to happen then, and having the palpitations would make me worry I was about to have a panic attack (because they often happened before or during a panic attack). I had to train my brain to understand that just because I have a heart palpitation here and there from anxiety doesn't mean I'm about to have a full blown attack. The more I can live my normal life through these things, the more my brain doesn't react in fear when I have these symptoms and other certain ones that usually signify anxiety.I went to a doctor and had an EKG when I first experienced these issues and they told me my heart was perfectly healthy. Later on I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm not saying that this will happen to you, there's no way to know until you speak to a doctor. But this has been my experience with heart palpitations. I know a handful of people who have had these symptoms and did have another issue that wasn't anxiety, but it can definitely be caused by anxiety and just simply stress as someone else mentioned. I hope you feel better soon. [info]  [info] 1466323720 [info] valid
shelzmike [info] OK. For starters, I do know exactly the type of experience you had and described. In fact, before my anxiety become a "disorder" I partied...A LOT. And I don't mean drinking bc I never really did that. I mean everything else. I had my first "breakdown", knock down, drug out panic attack and the only time I have ever been rushed to the hospital in an ambulance. That was almost half my life ago, am now 38. I am what one would consider a highly experienced anxiety having person :)Looking back, I have remembered different points where I had panic attacks or anxiety and didn't put 2 and 2 together. I always just chalked it up to being really messed up on [insert drug name here]. I believe my very first ever panic attack was when I was 19 and tripping on DXM. Had done it many times previously, but this time I was just sitting watching some cartoon, like you were, and suddenly became aware of my breathing and then got really hot and had to run outside and felt really crazy. Again, I was able to sort of brush it off as part of the effects of what I was on.Another one I did a lot of was LSD and there were plenty of times where I was just gone and never really had a "bad" trip (except one time after I was diagnosed which was the last time). Here is the thing...what you felt...SO MANY people feel when on LSD, so much so that it is quite normal. What isn't usually as normal is the anxiety continuing on afterward so intensely as you have described. Here are some facts that may help you better understand anxiety and panic attacks. For starters, every single person ever born and lived has had anxiety experiences and a lot have even had panic attacks (more have had panic attacks than have panic *disorder* if that makes sense). The reason why? It is because it is this is a very primal, inherently biological process our bodies go through - animals have these same processes as well and for very good reason...for survival. Problem is, as humans we do not need anxiety and adrenaline in this manner much any longer. We are not running from animals that are trying to kill us for lunch any longer, but we still have it. (Don't get me wrong, adrenaline is still a VERY good thing to have in many life situations).Many people can have anxiety symptoms and even panic attacks and move on from it and not really give it any further thought. There are some people, however, that have a propensity to develop a problem in their lifetime with anxiety. It usually develops in late teens and early 20s and most think they never had problems with it in the past.When you say that you have problems with roller coasters, small rooms, etc. those are signs of anxiety issues honestly. And it boils down to this and the story will come full circle...it comes down to control. Now, I don't mean we are control freaks, because that is not what I mean. What I do mean is that we do not like situations where there is a perception of being out of control of what happens which starts the "what if" thoughts. As anyone with anxiety what their triggers are and I guarantee it will center around things they don't feel in control of (and some of them we validly can't control). Examples are being stuck in traffic, health anxiety issues, elevators, being in the middle of a big crowd, etc. Most likely what caused your spiral is that when you were in the midst of your acid trip, you felt out of control. This starts the anxiety spiral and then panic attacks. Panic attacks suck, terribly. They never get "better", or rather I mean they are as intense when you first start having them  as they are 20 years later. Again, this is by design of our nervous system reactions. They would be less effective in that natural intended purpose if they were. They do, however, get a little easier to deal with since you have perspective. Here is where I see you at currently though. You are stuck in the "cycle" of fear (which is what anxiety really is). You had anxiety...that lead to a panic attack...which was frightening...you are scared of having another one..which causes anxiety...which causes, you guessed it, another panic attack. This constant cycle of fear is what keeps the fear and anxiety going! Whew...that was a lot to take in, I know. (And that is the short version!) Let me tell you this though, if it should help. Seeking knowledge on the subject is SO important. Additionally, seeking therapy, especially so early on in the problem, is very key. Thirdly, and this is just my experience and opinion...if you can possibly do it, refrain for jumping immediately on the SSRI train. They can be helpful for some, but most who have taken them and then stopped are very vocal about why. They are not a cure and should never be presented as such. They are merely a coping strategy that should be used only in conjunction with working with a therapist to learn to understand and cope with the anxiety. They certainly can dampen the feelings, but the side effects, again in my opinion, can make things unpleasant. The thought that you are going crazy? You are not (we all felt this was at one point or another and it simply is not true).Will you be like "this" forever. No, and sort of...what I mean is, this terrible impending doom fear cycle will not last forever. Having the propensity to deal with anxiety more than others...quite possible. I am not going to sugar coat that. Does that mean you will never amount to anything or live a terrible, shuttered, fearful life? Absolutely NOT! There is way more hope than that. My story is a long one, but I will fast forward to now. I am 28, been married for 13 years, raised 3 kids, (2 of whom are out on their own now, and my 9 year old daughter), own a home, three cars, worked my way up from a fast food restaurant job to where I am at now - 2 bachelors degrees later - as an IT Executive for a Global Fortune 500 company. Everything I ever have done meaningful to get to the point I am right now, I did AFTER I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks/agoraphobia/health anxiety. It was not easy, but life is not easy in general. I am here...and I deal with anxiety on a daily basis. But that is just it, I deal with it. You learn as you go and again, the best thing you can do is get as knowledgeable as you can and try everything you can to learn to live WITH it not live in fear of it. It will happen.Bottom line, my experienced thoughts can be summed up like this - anxiety is imagination used the wrong way. Anxiety is a *thinking* disorder mainly. Keep following through with your plans for talking with someone and it sounds like you will be just fine :)  [info] None [info] 1479619371 [info] train
Kotastraphe7568 [info] Hello, I'm having trouble with my left arm going numb as well as chest pain. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have a heart condition. I was born with Tricuspid Atresia. I'm have difficulty understanding if these symptoms are life threatening or just a result of my anxiety. I'm currently taking no meds for my anxiety and take Aspirin for my heart every day. Any legitimate advice would be helpful. Thank you. [info] User Not Verified [info] 1573746163 [info] test
edmazing [info] I've been lurking a little. Is it just me who starts to blush and feel a little anxiety reading the posts in this sub. I mean I totally relate to so many of these things. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so it is a thing for me but I consider it kinda weird just reading things would make me kinda cringe and feel sympathy pains.  Ordering a pizza and they end the call with "Enjoy" and you just reply "You too." And you end up thinking about it for the rest of the night and every time you see the pizza box. One love triangle and it ended in disaster of no one ever being friends again, it still haunts me... why's life so scary sometimes?   [info] None [info] 1464220474 [info] train
myparadog [info] I had a kinda similar experience with the ADHD episode but I have to give some background first. So this will be a long post. You can skip this middle part it just kinda explains how I used to think.I was diagnosed with ADHD when I was 12. Meds were thrown at me without any real explanation so I fought back hard. I’m very stubborn and strong willed. Something I’ve apparently inherited from my dad. For better or worse. I’m very logical in my thinking though. I have to have evidence and proof and then I’ll make up my own mind about things. I wasn’t given that and was told I had to take these pills. So I fought to the point of hiding and throwing away pills until my mom gave up trying to fight me. Nothing was ever explained as to why I had to take them. It was just said that it will make it easier to concentrate. That wasn’t a good enough reason for me. Then at 13 right before 8th grade I was taken to a psychologist or something. I don’t really remember. My grades were all over the place from 6th and 7th grade and my mom was concerned I would end up failing 8th because they changed the grading scale. They had actually changed it in my favor come to find out but that didn’t save me from being dragged quite angrily to this appointment, where my mom, dad, and I were told the same thing from the previous year. They gave me the same prescription but a stronger dose and sent me on my way. I was livid. That proscription never made it to the pharmacy. Later that day I went in my mom’s purse where the prescription was sticking out, I took it out and shoved it under the tree rack thingy. My mom confronted a few days later when she remembered about needing to drop off the prescription. She asked me if I threw it away. Which I told her I didn’t. Which wasn’t technically lying. She eventually let it go because she didn’t want to keep fighting and I put up a good front on trying to “help” her find it. I can be devious when I need to be. I waited months before actually throwing the prescription away. I had more trouble with school that year but mostly because of my previous teachers just being horrible. The 2 previous years I had very vindictive science teachers. One even shut a door in my face and later yelled at me because of something a “friend” said about another “friend”. Middle school was horrible! Between feuding friends, teachers yelling at me for no reason, and slamming doors in my face is a miracle I ever did pass.Now I’m about to be 30 at the end of this month. All that was back in 2001-2003. I’ve been through a lot since then that has opened my mind to all kinds of things but it wasn’t until I heard the ADHD episode where I was kinda able to diagnose myself (knowing I had already been professionally diagnosed) but it was explained in greater detail and firsthand experience was given. That had never been explained to me like that before. It was pushed on me as a reason I was failing classes. When in reality I don’t think that was everything. In all honesty I really do love my ADHD tendencies it’s very freeing and I can be super creative, the meds stopped that. Which I told them I didn’t like but I was a kid and ignored. I never thought they did enough investigation into what I was really going through. They just wanted a quick fix and I wasn’t going to get the fast food treatment. December 31, 2018  after 2 weeks of anxiety attacks every other day I was diagnosed with anxiety. The day previous I nearly lost my job over an anxiety attack caused by my manager. I’m on Prozac now and I’ve never felt better. I honestly think the anxiety had more of an effect on me than anything else I faced. Even as a kid it was crippling back then at times. I missed a lot of school because I couldn’t face being around people some days. To know what’s truly going on and able to put a name to it, not a label or excuse, but to really know there’s a way to help... I’ve also taken quiz prior to all this that say I show 66% OCD tendencies and after listening to Stuff You Should Know’s episode on Dyslexia, I have some of those symptoms as well. It’s a good episode and goes into detail about it and it not what most think it is because those with it have a hard time explaining exactly what’s going on and it effects everyone differently.I’ve always been smart and can be taught anything... as long as it’s taught in a way I understand. I am notorious for hearing or reading a sentence and can’t understand it unless it’s explained in a different way. But even if I don’t it’s still something worth looking into because it could lead to understanding something else about myself.Sorry for such a long post I totally did mean to write all that but I kept thinking of things to add. I say all that though because I totally understand how empowering it can be to really understand yourself. [info] None [info] 1552441715 [info] train
devp0ll [info] I’m with you. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2006 and I will say avoiding it the WORST thing you can do for it. Embrace it and attack it head on, and know the facts. Uncovering as many truths, for ME, has been the best medicine for my anxiety. .02 [info] Series 4 | LTE | 44mm | Space Grey Aluminium [info] 1560694805 [info] train
_smosbol_ [info] I have have severe health anxiety, and although declared healthy, I can't keep from checking my pulse all the time. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and chronic hyperventilation. I suffered from it a couple of years now, with ups and downs. Last summer I had an ongoing up, which was great. I felt stress free, I could do any kind of exercise i wanted, I ate and drank what wanted, etc.Since a couple of months I've hit rock bottom again. I don't sleep wel, I undereat, I lost a great deal of the stamina and energy I built up last summer. And above all, I'm afraid of my own pulse.I can't stop checking it often. I did notice that when I get anxious or when I'm breathing weird again, when I check my pulse in my neck it feels like my veins contract very hard and my heart also, which makes me really anxious.It's like my veins and heart are really squeezing together sometimes, and it really winds me up. It disables me from working out and getting into a better condition, although when I'm working out and breathing steadily it's not really contracting that hard but just going fast. An elevated heart rate also makes me anxious because I'm afraid it's going to stop at any given moment.I'm a total mess. It really prevents me from going full on during physical activities. Even drinking a beer can put me into a panic and give me palpitations and chest pain. I'm in my mid-twenties, I used to do loads of sports until 8 months ago, and doctors and cardiologists told me I'm fine, yet I continue to live this mentally destructive lifestyle.I just don't know what to do anymore. I tried counseling, but it's really, really hard to convince myself there is nothing wrong with me when I'm having this heavy contracting pulse, chest pain, arm pains etc. [info] None [info] 1436018959 [info] test
Ry-kage [info] Any tips for fast heartbeat and chest pain? So I was just diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and my main cause is my heart racing and chest pain in my left chest. EKG says I am good and I am on acid reflux meds, but I still find myself dwelling and getting anxious sometimes because of it. Any tips to help against it would be very much appreciated! [info] None [info] 1547088933 [info] train
xuchy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 10 years old. Just like Bill, I wish I could have known about mindfulness and had access to other methods back then aside from medication. My attacks were just as crippling as they were numerous - at one point causing me to miss several weeks of school in my senior year. Almost two decades later, I finally feel as though I'm regaining control of myself through daily meditation, exercise, cognitive therapy, and a better dosage of my meds. If you're in the same boat as Bill, myself, and many others in this thread: keep moving forward and remember you are not alone. You are so much more than just your thoughts and reactions. The past is behind you and the future can't be seen - but you have so much power to tap into in this very moment. Anchor yourself to the "gift" of the present. Stay strong, friend. You will get through this! [info] None [info] 1567395145 [info] valid
djeco [info] It really does consume your life.. But hang in there buddy. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and it was hell. The thing is I wasn't worried about things like social anxiety, but rather the fear it self. The heart beat, sufication, swetty palms, the feeling of lost. It always started in my legs and build itself out, that tingling sensation. After a time I was done with it. I remembered having a dream of me training, boxing and training MMA. Don't know why I dreamed it, never been into fighting myself, but I liked to watch it. For some reason I woke up happy, happier that I've been for many months. I looked myself in the mirror that day and wanted to take control, like really bad, to a sensation that even got me mad at myself. I started researching, read other stories, tried out things that worked, other things didn't work, started training a little bit, worked on my breathing techniques, etc. When the therapist said that I didn't had to go to therapy anymore because I was healthy was like removing the  biggest chains in my life. I even got to a fuck it, I don't care anymore. You build yourself into this cage, and the only person that can unlock it is you.  [info] None [info] 1547969012 [info] train
IRageAlot [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take Xanax 0.5-1mg as needed, and 20mg propranalol twice a day. =)As far as the OCD, i've been discussing it with a psychologist. I am extremely particular, ritualized, but I don't think it is to an unhealthy point. The closest thing I think that falls into that range, which some people seem to make fun of for some reason but is actually quite a miserable thing is penile insecurity. It's absolutely compulsive. By the numbers my measurements should be something flattering. My wifes friends started calling me Big-Kyle out of the blue and she admitted she had told them some personal details about me, but mentally I break down when I think about it for some reason... The compulsive part is the totally unreasonable anxiety over it, and having to use various enlargement techniques that have had limited success to find relief. It has driven me to lose 60 lbs and drop my body fat percentage from 37%(estimated) down to 14%(bioimpedance); so there has been some good come from it. My psychologist has made comparisons to OCD-like behavior but mostly he compares it to anorexia and having a fucked-up and unrealistic body-image that is never satisfied.TL;DR -- You're right =) [info] None [info] 1316614849 [info] train
td_bot2 [info] Is it just me, or does Sean Spicer strike you as an empathetic being with a big heart? I hope this is the right place for this post. I apologize in advance for the length of this, and also for the possible grammatical errors.The following is my own opinion:It seems as if Sean Spicer's position does not suite him well (his suits don't fit him well either lol (pun intended)). Anyway, when I watch him speak, I can easily see that he is tense and also speaks with a defensive tone. However, watching him speak for the past few months has made me wonder a few things, and I would like to know your personal opinions about Sean.I believe that in real life, he is a person with a very big heart, and has the ability to feel empathy. Which is very different from the rest of Trump's cabinet, and others close to Trump (as far as I can tell, but I could be very wrong). Right off the bat, I noticed he was very different.In my own life, I was diagnosed with anxiety (Generalized Anxiety Disorder) at age 8, and have been living with it, embracing it, and have helped others with it. Due to this, I am usually very good at sensing when people are experiencing even the slightest of anxiety. To me, Sean Spicer gives off this vibe, yet at the same time I feel that he really tries to do his best. Although, more recently I feel he is becoming fed up with his job. Trump has been in office for over 50 days so far, and it sure has been a hell of a roller coaster ride, so I could understand if Sean is fed up with it all.I see the bracelet he wears (the rainbow colored one) which says "DAD" in the middle of it. According to what I have read online, his children made this bracelet for him. The fact that he wears this everywhere (especially the fact that he is not afraid of being seen with rainbow colors, which for some I assume could be misleading if they didn't notice the "DAD" on the bracelet) is extremely heartwarming and comforting. He is genuine in this way. He also may not spending nearly as much time with his children as he did before the Trump era. He probably misses them very much, and the bracelet is a piece of their heart he wears. In regards to what he has said during press conferences, do you believe his statements to be his true opinions and feelings? Or do you feel that he is only protecting the presidents credibility because he fears losing his job? I can't help but think of the saying "don't kill the messenger", for he gives off the vibe that he would love to say that to the press. I have this funny feeling there is a whole other side to Sean that we do not see. For my last comment, the fact that he was once the "White House Easter Bunny" is pretty awesome, and I'm hoping he does it again this year (99% sure it won't happen though lol).I know that the above may not be entirely true, for most of what I wrote is my own opinion. Please correct me with sources, if necessary. Again, I apologize for the length of this and thank you for reading :)TL;DR: Sean Spicer may actually be a kind-hearted individual who may have had no idea what he was walking into when accepting his position as the White House press secretary and communications director. [info] BAN ME BITCHES [info] 1490127933 [info] valid
bcxx143 [info] I was treated for PTSD, Depression, Bipolar disorder as a teenager and I've been off meds for like 6 years. Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and it's really bad, so back to therapy and medication I go. So, yes. [info] None [info] 1473809377 [info] train
ohmygoditsbeautiful [info] Nausea/Vomiting? Anyone else experience this? Hello everybodyI was diagnosed with anxiety recently (should have been a lottttttttt earlier, but anyway) and some of the worst symptoms are nausea, induced vomiting, and decreased appetite. Together, these are so not fun and fairly chronic. The nausea/vomiting usually happens before anxiety attacks and, at this point, after a lot of meals (big or small, even snacks sometimes). Does anyone have any advice to help with these symptoms? I throw up between 3-5 times a week, feel nauseous way more than that and it is a real struggle to finish any food. It is really starting to negatively affect my health :( [info] None [info] 1571095118 [info] train
theyseem [info] I hit a semi head on on the interstate in 2011. I have the same feeling to the point that if one day I was told by a randon stranger "you're dead. You've been dead." I wouldn't doubt it for a second and I wouldn'tfreak out.I feel like I'm dead because my life has gone far too well. Also people just disappear for years at a time, even if I remember them. Im kinda just rolling with it and enjoying my life as best as I can.I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I've never told my doctor I feel like I'm dead. I've never told anyone except my ex husband who was in the accident with me and he said he had the same feeling. [info] None [info] 1547410883 [info] train
poor_icarus [info] I choose happiness. So I bought the game Fran Bow on steam last Halloween, but I have only finished playing it recently. For those of you who don't know, the plot of the game revolves around Fran, a child who is mentally ill. Her parents are murdered, and she is set on finding who did it. SPOILER ALERT: For almost the whole duration of the game, you can alternate between realities, which means there are several version of what really happened. It really is open to interpretation. It's a very trippy game,  playing it feels like you're taking LSD. Anyway, in the end, despite all the bad shit that happened to Fran, she says that she chooses to be happy, and she goes on to live with her friends that she acquired while on her adventure. It's just a game, but it made me realize that I have the gift of choice. Happiness is an option, not something elusive that is earned. Happiness is already here, I just need to accept it. I identify with Fran a lot, I feel like I can relate to her. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I was on meds for some time, although I keep it a secret. ~~Sometimes~~ Most of the times I see reality through a distorted lens. Through my eyes, everything is usually bigger and scarier than in reality. There are days when I feel the crushing weight of life on my shoulders. Days when it's just hard to even get out of bed and brush my teeth. But all in all, life is not bad. My life is far from perfect, but that is alright. It's fine with me. I can deal with this. I accept all the flaws in my story. I win some, lose some. That's just how it is. You can't have everything. The Buddhists say that happiness is a fleeting moment. And that is true to me. [info] None [info] 1486854620 [info] train
a_mich21 [info] Should i tell my s/o about my past physical and emotional abuse from my parents? Growing up, my mom was insane. She was both physically and mentally abusive. Dads an unreliable alcoholic. I've been in therapy on and off for two years. They all tell me i'm resilient and have good coping skills. Eventually I just ran out of things to say to my therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago (he knows that). I'm almost fine but i just have major issues trusting people, and i'm always scared people are secretly angry at me so i ask him a lot if he is. He doesn't understand why, and he get's offended that i don't trust him. We've only been together for two months. It doesn't feel right to tell him, but at the same time, i want him to understand why i act the way i do sometimes. [info] None [info] 1553812770 [info] train
germanshredder [info] I am very new to all of this and don't understand much. Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took meds and did the therapy. Now I take Ativan just as needed and learned to manage to anxiety most days. I am so confused since being diagnosed with ADHD. A lot of the symptoms for adhd, I feel like go for anxiety. I felt like a lot of my issues were caused by misunderstanding my triggers. Now I feel like I'm starting over again. I didn't really believe I had adhd until my Dr (he is amazing) prescribed adderall and I took it to see if it would help anything. I took it as directed and it hit me like a ton of bricks. What I thought were anxious thoughts all went quiet and I feel calm enough to sleep for days. I did actually have to go lay down for a bit because of it. I'm hoping that part evens out. I'm still sorting through all of the info so any advice, experiences, or general words of wisdom would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1469165729 [info] train
Kmaun_Lee [info] Everything was insanely different. A minute felt like an hour. I was watching the clock and just waiting for the second hand to turn. My friend was cooking. One second he'd be in slow motion and the next he'd be going really fast. I was running around screaming. I could feel the sensation of the wind blowing and my feet touching the floor, but the room didn't even move. When it did, everything got big and I got small, and then vice versa. I could see the chair towering over me. I was looking for the potion that would bring me back to normal size like Alice in Wonderland. Time and space were far from me. I was in a different realm, but it was as if they were trying to take me by the feet and drag me down back to earth. I could hear voices whispering. I hit my head and noticed I was unable to feel pain. After that realization, I tried killing myself by hitting my head over and over. Thank god my boyfriend was there. He grabbed me and just held me, telling me everything would be okay. He layed me down and I just cried for hours. The trip lasted all day. For months after I had terrible paranoia (I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder as it is.)  [info] None [info] 1342977645 [info] train
cloutangelkay [info] horrible adderall experience (ER visit) in november i was prescribed adderall xr to help me focus on my school work, i couldn’t ever focus and would always have time taking information in and remembering it, so my doctor prescribed me the 10mg capsules without looking into it too much. for the first 4-6 hours of ingesting it, i felt on top of the world, super talkative, euphoric nothing to complain about at all, as i started to come down slowly. i had these super painful chest pains, feeling like i was gonna faint. i felt so shitty, even after the feeling of euphoria died down. it ended up keeping me awake for THREE days straight, i tried to sleep, to finally have this feeling be over, the anxiety and paranoia. on the second and third day of being awake i started to hallucinate and i was convinced that i was actually going crazy, and losing touch with reality and my body. i tried taking my prescribed xanax to help me sleep but it did absolutely nothing i started to become even more paranoid, thinking i was being watched or that my food was poisoned by the government. after the third day of being awake i had finally crashed, and the next few days were filled with chest tightness, pains, dizziness, anxiety suicidal though etc. i ended up going to the ER for an EKG, they did the EKG and did a x ray, they told me that everything looked fine but gave me a iv of tramadol for the chest pains i was having. i am still curious to why i had this reaction, i am diagnosed with anxiety so maybe it had gotten the best of me? [info] None [info] 1549565426 [info] train
Yuio6789 [info] I never even told my parents about my BPD diagnosis. They're pretty hardcore narcissists and even when I was diagnosed with anxiety they told me it wasn't a real disorder. That everyone gets anxiety. They thought my panic attacks were episodes from drug use. Then when I actually did turn to drugs years later because I couldn't cope - they caught me and they never even asked if I was okay. All they could do was tell me how embarrassing it was to be the parent of a drug addict and how I should have considered how it made them feel and look to other people when I decided to do drugs specifically to hurt their feelings. They basically turn any conversation about my problems into their problems. I only talk to them about really basic things now. Like clothes or the weather or something. I've given up trying to be close to them. [info] None [info] 1518653642 [info] train
davidh219 [info] I smoke weed pretty much every day. I also took prescription benzos off and on for a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm too afraid of having a bad trip to try some of the harder stuff, tbh. Like I love the idea of LSD in theory, but I'll never have the balls to do it. Even weed gives me panic attacks sometimes if I smoke too much, but at least I'm used to weed and can very easily bring myself down from a weed induced panic attack. I feel like a panic attack induced by any other drug would be just like going back in time to before I knew I had anxiety and thought I was actually dying every time I had a panic attack and I never want to be in that place again. Nowadays panic attacks are pretty much just involuntary physical sensations I have to endure and let run their course but they don't actually scare me anymore.  [info] None [info] 1513763289 [info] train
Atypical-life [info] That's 90% of my interactions with the public every day &amp; the reason I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1425619599 [info] valid
elrabb22 [info] Yes in the past definitely. It got pretty bad again a few weeks ago. I experimented with visualization to see what it looked like that was disturbing my morning. I settled on a heart meditation and could visually “see” all of these attacks and negative thoughts that were just below the surface. So each day I imagined calling it dish and tending to my invisible wounds. After one month I woke up without any stress or anxiety. It took quite a bit of work I don’t want to lie to you. Full disclosure I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and used to suffer full blown panic attacks. I really hope this helps, feel free to dm me. [info] None [info] 1559158733 [info] test
WarKittyKat [info] Unfortunately, it's also not a great idea when you're still in a relationship with an abusive person.  I think for me CBT was trying to dismantle something that was on some level still keeping me safe, without necessarily looking if there was anything I needed to be kept safe from.  Therapy seemed to proceed based on the idea that everything was safe for me then, when it was not.  And there wasn't any real check, just the fact that I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed CBT because that's the therapy for anxiety. [info] None [info] 1566609034 [info] valid
EgaoNoGenki-III [info] What jobs have the least stress, and may even RELIEVE stress in the line of work? I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues, so you know any job in the military isn't the answer.If you can help me find any of the *least* stressful jobs out there, and whose jobs could even *relieve* stress, I'll get you Reddit Gold through the pay I earn in that job if I get in it.I wish I was blessed in the gene pool with a better stress tolerance. [info] None [info] 1388727526 [info] test
raccooncityangel [info] I think neurosis is more of one specific thing or grouping of things. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so that makes me a bit weird, and i see and experience the world differently than most people i know.  [info] None [info] 1353049406 [info] train
HollowTpzXtendedClpz [info] Not really.  I can go days without it just fine. Amd I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders amd had many rx benzos in the past [info] None [info] 1552026324 [info] train
mythrowaway23231 [info] Before final grades are posted, my professor wants to talk to me about my lack of participation in class. I was diagnosed with anxiety, looking for advice whether I should mention this tomorrow. [info] None [info] 1450323758 [info] train
disillusionwander [info] This might be drifting off a bit, because it doesn't answer why advil doesn't work for mental pain, but I think it is interesting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I think the difference comes down to being able to relate. If I break my leg, you have a leg, too (probably). You can probably relate (in some way) the amount of pain that breaking it could result it. It's much different for mental diseases. I can't really explain, as well as I'd like, why leaving shampoo/conditioner/body wash bottles on the floor of the shower bothers me to the point where it makes me deeply upset and uncomfortable. [info] None [info] 1448670231 [info] test
tiny_venus [info] Do you perhaps have anxiety? I used to get freaked out in the same way and then I’d get more freaked out wondering if it was normal. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago and talked this over with my counsellor who said it was a totally normal trait of anxiety. I’d just suggest to try not to get too wrapped up into it- you don’t want to start feeling paranoid and wrapped up thinking ‘oh he acted like this maybe he’s going to break up with me!’ Because that might strain the relationship. Things sound pretty good between you, so just ride it out and enjoy life with him. [info] None [info] 1524436136 [info] valid
Jokker_is_the_name [info] Ooh I feel like I can actually answer this one!I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had daily panic attacks for about a year (luckily they are less rare now)As far as I know, and please correct me if im wrong, it has to do with your primitive brain. There are people whos brain isnt always too sure whether they are in a real danger or not. The panic attack is often set off by an event or thought. For example someone says someting offensive, or maybe even a little weird. Then the brain gets confused, it thinks whatever a person said is dangerous for you.Most peoples brains know what is in fact actually dangerous, but some people dont. These people get panic attacks.After your brain starts to think you are in danger, you get the classic "fight-or-flight" situation. Adrenaline will be released. And your heart starts pumping faster.So, in short, you primitive brain thinks a tiger is going to attack you, while in actuality someone just said something about your shoes. You think you are in danger and either start to flight, or fight. [info] None [info] 1543140858 [info] train
catmomof4 [info] Reading this gave me some comfort. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues 3 years ago. It's been about that long that I've experienced an off-balance feeling. The best way I could describe it to my doctor was that I felt like I was walking on a boat, that it was like a floating sensation and I felt like I was constantly moving. So far I've had my hearing and inner ear checked, and of course everything is fine. They want me to see a neurologist now. But after reading your post I'd rather talk to my doctor about anxiety as the cause. I weaned myself off Lexapro last fall and have done great without it except for this balance issue. And it's incredibly difficult to push through it at work. I'm a service advisor so I'm constantly on my feet, running back to the shop, pulling cars around, etc. Some days I have to lock myself in a bathroom stall and just sit still for a moment to collect myself.  Until today I've never read where anyone else with anxiety has experienced this. [info] None [info] 1531357221 [info] train
KitsuneExistISwear [info] I don’t know how I survived until now... I was a small anxious bean as a child. Always concerned with routines and had very specific definitions of clean. I was diagnosed with anxiety with OCD when I was 7. It’s held fairly true but a lot of therapy helped me manage it.I always prided myself on rarely getting sick. The worst I would get would be strep every couple years for a day or two. Or a head cold. This past February I managed to get the stomach flu for the first time in fifteen years. I HATE vomiting. It honestly didn’t even hit that hard and I was back to work after 2.5 days, but I hated it. I made myself get up and clean everything I could the day before I went back to work, but after that I felt okay about everything.Then 2 months ago my coworkers girlfriend got hit with food poisoning, but we didn’t know that at the time. He tried to call out 15 minutes prior to his shift because she would be home alone and he didn’t want to leave her home sick. My boss told him he can’t leave us high and dry like that and to come in, and my stomach twisted itself into knots. Cue the start of my misery.I now have to leave the house with almost all my skin covered, all clothes immediately go into the hamper upon arrival back home and I scrub my arms to the elbows just in case. I no longer want to go on dates or go out at all after work because I feel so anxious and uncomfortable. I only want to go out on my days off. I sanitize everything at work as best I can at the end of the day. Logically, I know that getting sick is a part of life and even despite my lesser standard of clean I somehow managed to avoid it for the past 15 years. Logically, I know that if I just wash my hands before I eat with soap and water avoid touching my face and use hand sanitizer if I touch something gross I’ll be okay. I know this. But my head doesn’t. Everything is dirty. People are dirty and disgusting until proven otherwise. Things are loath to be touched. I hate it. I hate that this is my life now.I just started therapy but it took a while because my insurance is an asshole. I just had my first session this week and I’m so frustrated. I know it’s not reasonable for me to expect major change because we JUST started working together, but I’m so ready to be DONE. This is exhausting. The low level of stress that can get rocketed up at the drop of the hat sucks. The fact that my coworker can just describe that they have a stomachache and I immediately panic to the point that I’m sent home is AWFUL. I feel out of control and I just want to sob.I just want to cry. I’m tired. I’m done. I don’t know how I managed to live before this. I don’t know how I can go on. I know it will get better because it has to. But I feel like I need it to be now because I don’t know how else I’m gonna live through the rest of the year. TL; DR: I’m tired. I’m done. Therapy is a start, but I’m ready to just become a hermit. [info] None [info] 1560396268 [info] train
Sekoshiba [info] Sleep, water, food, are all really important. Unfortunately I never figured out what caused my migraines, I just sort of "grew out of them". Stress could be a factor though, I suppose, as I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and migraines at the same time. [info] None [info] 1474236142 [info] valid
Cumberblep [info] Just remember you're not alone and not to be ashamed to get help. I spent a lot of angst filled time in my teens and twenties feeling ashamed and helpless. I've posted some more information below. Everyone always thinks of binge purge or not eating at all as an eating disorder. Sometimes you just binge. There are also a lot of connections between eating disorders and OCD.https://iocdf.org/expert-opinions/expert-opinion-eating-disorders-and-ocd/https://www.nationaleatingdisorders.org/learn/by-eating-disorder/bedI've been diagnosed with anxiety by previous physicians but none of them tied it to OCD. So I have some OCD behaviors related to finishing things. For example, I would stay at work for 36 hours straight to finish basic work. I would not sleep during  finals week of college because I was so worried I wasn't ready because I didn't know every bit of everything. So like 4 days, no sleep. So lots of sleepless nights. Lots of worrying about things not being  done. So if started eating something I couldn't stop until it was finished. Sometimes to the point where it made me physically Ill. I would wait until I didn't feel bad and then eat some more.  It's hard to explain now. Especially now that the meds and counseling have me disconnected from those feelings. I also became emotionally connected to food. Like good times called for some crazy over eating and then bad times called for the same. Binge eating disorder (BED) is a severe, life-threatening, and treatable eating disorder characterized by recurrent episodes of eating large quantities of food (often very quickly and to the point of discomfort); a feeling of a loss of control during the binge; experiencing shame, distress or guilt afterwards; and not regularly using unhealthy compensatory measures (e.g., purging) to counter the binge eating. It is the most common eating disorder in the United States.Numerous studies have now shown that those with eating disorders have statistically higher rates of OCD (11% – 69%), and vice versa (10% – 17%). As recently as 2004, Kaye, et al., reported that 64% of individuals with eating disorders also possess at least one anxiety disorder, and 41% of these individuals have OCD in particular.   [info] None [info] 1551631741 [info] train
whytofly [info] What my anxiety feels like... &gt;Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I used to explain to my friend that I was in constant battle with my body. He said that he had no idea what I was talking about and asked me to describe it, below is the explanation of what it feels/felt like for me to live every day. *What I feel every day:** Every morning you wake up feeling like you just **drank three cups of coffee**. Your nerves are **humming** and you feel awake to the point where you are *almost* dizzy. * I want you to take a deep breath in your chest, breathe half out, then another one in that is deeper, the half out again, then in even deeper, then half out again. Now, breathe out all the way and before breathing regularly again, feel what your lungs feel like. They should **feel slightly strained** and maybe you are now more conscious of your heart. You should find it **hard to relax**, like you just ran a short sprint. This is what it feels like for me to breathe **every day**. * Do you remember how your stomach felt when you ate something that **disagreed with you** (or how it felt when you were sick). That's what my stomach feels like every time I eat **anything**. * Now I want you to think of that thing you did the other day or week that you are not proud of. Perhaps you yelled at someone you loved when they didn't deserve it, maybe you accidentally hit a car, reacted without thinking, perhaps you simply forgot to do your homework or made a mistake on a test. Think about what you did. **Keep thinking about it, running it over and over in your head.** If the event was strong enough, you should be feeling some sort of **guilt, shame, or general "bad" feeling about yourself.** Now try to stop thinking about it. If you are having trouble stopping, because of that feeling you are having, that is what I experience **every day**, except the feeling is there without any known cause. *Think about how confusing your world would be to **feel shame** most of the time **without knowing why**.** Finally, you need to be constantly terrified of losing control. **Terrified of the fear**. Afraid that you will get a panic attack again.  Each twitch of your body out of the ordinary scares you because it means that you *might* be panicking. Sometimes you'll hold your breath and wish it goes away, and that just makes it worse. Your **fear of your fear** creates a panic attack, and you sit there helpless watching your body and mind spiral out of control.&gt;If you want to share how anxiety feels for you every day I would love to hear it. Or if you have a better way of describing it to people, because one thing I think most people don't understand is that we aren't making this up. We aren't just "imagining" pain: it actually hurts. [info] None [info] 1314582323 [info] train
madheadjosh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago when I was little as I had it quite bad. But Its never affected me when I got older (adult hood). I am 21 now and have never experienced a panic attack nor had anxiety attacks as far as I know.Edit: I also have heart palpitation if that makes any difference but my doctor has said it only just means that I am more aware of my heart beat. [info] None [info] 1566402274 [info] train
little_kid13 [info] What is life like with schizo? I saw a psychiatrist due to some of my symptoms were similar to schizophrenia, but it turned out that I was diagnosed with anxiety, and now I take meds for anxiety and feel alot better. But a part of me worries that I might get it when I'm older, (like those schizophrenia stories about a normal college kid that experiences a sudden onset of psychosis and schizo) and I worry that may happen to me. I keep telling myself that it's probably my anxiety just acting up, but then I thought, if I do get schizo when I'm older, how would I live well? I wouldn't be able to attend school, college, uni or work and then I won't be able to do well or sustain my job, then I'll  become a hobo and die early. But for you guys, how do you live with schizo? How do you keep your job and how do you do in school etc? Don't you worry about it? About missing out and losing everything? I know some of you might live with your families, but what if my family dies or becomes poor too? I wonder how you guys cope with it, you guys are awesome [info] None [info] 1519769181 [info] train
PossibleAssHat [info] Okay, well now you have an angle to approach him, really. And I don't mean in a hostile way at all. Do you think you could have a conversation with him reasonably and express your concerns? I'm sure he's probably worried about what will happen when his parents pass anyway.His parents ARE enabling his behavior, and that's shitty. Probably not out of lack of love but just because they don't know what else to do. You said you don't speak to him much? Is he a complete jerk? I'm asking because if he's not, he might really need a friend.It's nice to know when someone cares. I had a good friend that was patient with me, but also helped me out of my shell, really. She is one of the best people I have ever met and I will always hold her in very high regard. Woman changed my life.That being said, don't do anything for this guy that would be a drain on you, but maybe he does really need a friend. It does sound familiar. It sounds very familiar to me. Not exactly the same circumstances, but I felt a bit like I was reading about myself and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. I could relate to what you described. [info] None [info] 1430412962 [info] test
thisisappropriate [info] Also UK, took nearly a month off of my weekend job having to call in on Saturday with assorted sickness/headaches every week until I was diagnosed with anxiety and given two more weeks off. Mine said "anxiety state" typed into the section, I just told everyone it was the stress of uni when I went back, handed in my notice and made a few counselors appointments, the pay was nice, but not worth it. [info] None [info] 1395702072 [info] train
anonomie [info] I definitely do not lack empathy. And you're wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. You're flipping this onto ME, when this is about YOU. This shows an extreme lack of maturity.  [info] None [info] 1479056480
antuerpia [info] Moving across the country Hey, folks, first time posting here, so bear with me.   I currently live in Brazil and recently received a job offer that would require me to permanently move across the country (I assume most of you are not familiar with brazilian geography, but the distance is similar to moving from NY to LA). It will be my first actual job and the salary is pretty decent for a first job (I'm 25).  I'm super excited for this opportunity, since I will be working in the field in which I want to invest my career (Research in Petroleum Engineering) and, as I mentioned before, it would be my first proper job and the money is not bad. I'm currently in the final year of my master's degree, which I still plan to finish, although with some delay.  At the same time, since I got the job offer a couple days ago, I have been, of course, very excited, but also feeling this sort of fear mixed with anguish, to the point that I have to hide in the bathroom to cry (happened twice). This feeling I have is mostly triggered whenever I think of having to leave my grandmother and my girlfriend here. I have been living only with grandmother since I was 6 and my parents divorced. My grandfather passed away a long time ago, so I have been keeping her company for all these years. She's 78 and her health is not great, and this has been a big concern for me. As for my girlfriend, we have been together for "only" 3 years, but we are really tight and have been considering marriage. However, her financial situation and her job prevent her from moving with me for the near future.  The feeling I previously described has occured to me every time I started a new chapter in my life: starting high school and college, when I went to the USA for a year as a exchange student (shoutout KU), etc. It feels like I'm in a dangerous place and cannot find anyone that could help me. I am diagnosed with anxiety and have been on medicine and therapy for almost a year and it has worked for the most part, but this situation has got me a bit shaken.  Every one I tell about the job is very happy and supportive, and this has been my main tool to try to defuse these bad feelings. I'm also taking solace in the fact that I can always take a plane and visit home during holidays.  I imagine some of you have been through similar experiences. How do you folks coped with it? What were the main takeways from these situations for you? Sorry if this is too long/silly, but the simple act of writing this post has me feeling a bit better about the whole thing, Thanks for keeping up this awesome place where we can help each other out.  TL;DR: I am moving across the country for work and also kinda freaking out about it. [info] None [info] 1536199157 [info] train
qieran29 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.since 2015..or rather health anxiety...jus 3days ago i had a Severe full blown Panic Attack..wout what so ever reason...thus perhaps my body was constantly stressing dat i have chest pain..pass few weeks...however during dat full blown panic attack occured 3days ago...i was calm..n yet it still happened...my left rib was painin as hell...dat v moment i thought it was a heart attack...went 2 ER..i tol them.pain is bad..thy injected me som morphin 2 ease me down...took my blood samples...ECG twice all were fine ezcept i had som bronkitis...which may have worsen the pain..I knw its hard 2 divert ur attention when ur body feels numb aching or painin...i do watch TREY JONEs on u tube...his videos are good perhps u try chck it out Take care  [info] None [info] 1552762652 [info] test
HappyFawn836131 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and add at the same time, I’ve never had any actual problems before this. My doctor prescribed be strattera. Me and my mom did a ton of research all over the internet to find out about this drug. And we both firmly decided we didn’t want it. My mom and doctor then came to the consluison of a script of 60x 10mg adderal irs. She encouraged us to mess with the dosage and tweak it just right and such (Mom held the bottle, I didn’t get the chance). They both believed that my anxiety stemmed from my add, therefore causing me to get anxious. 2 months later and not a drip of anxiety left in my body... I don’t know what do tell you man, but the best explanation in my opinion would be that everyone’s body is built differently, and no drug will effect anyone exactly the same way... [info] None [info] 1522061476 [info] valid
lovesadventures32 [info] Hi sorry for not clarifying.... yeah I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wondered if this was part of it [info] None [info] 1575132195 [info] test
LogOutOfLife [info] Idk man, you can think what you want. I cant really stop you. You're right, I do have deeper problems. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd. My therapist thinks I may have some ptsd as well. I was just describing a time when I did not have meds. It's not roleplaying, maybe it's just the mix of all these thing together that gives me those symptoms. Idk how to convince you. [info] None [info] 1544835000 [info] train
pixelated_dreamer [info] Vain Vicky and Controlling Charlie in: How To Set Your Kid Up For Failure Hi all, it's finals season for this sad college gay and that brought up an old memory. Vain Vicky and Controlling Charlie are my very JNParents who are obsessed with appearances and enjoy controlling me, respectively. I have a bad habit of not asking for help when I need it. This has a slight tendency to blow up in my face and lead to screaming fits from CC. During one of them, CC screamed "Why do you always have to be so independent?!" So I decided to do an investigative trip down memory lane.I suck at math. It just isn't my strong suit; anything beyond the basic makes my head spin. So in high school I would do kind of poorly in math classes. CC and VV were having none of this. They're both engineers. They were told they'd make smart babies, dammit! So they set to work "fixing" me.They forced me to stay after school with the math teacher every day for extra help. Really I'd just put my headphones on and do my homework. It was an exercise in futility, but I didn't complain too much because she gave out candy. So whatever, kept me out of that hell house and got me free candy. But ot wasn't enough. I didn't miraculously get straight A+'s in math, so CC decided to do more. He would go online and print out hundreds of extra problems and hover over my shoulder as I did them, screaming at me for every mistake. Fun fact, I have been diagnosed with anxiety. So you can imagine this just made me mess up more, which made him yell more.... it was a vicious cycle. If I recall I made it through that year somewhere in the B range (no thanks to CC's "help"). So CC, deciding to get ahead of things that summer, bought me some math book FOR GIRLS! (because everything needs to be excessively gendered for CC... I want to say it was called "Girls Love Curves!" or something equally vom worthy) And instructed me to spend my summer studying it. Needless to say I did not.This lovely cycle would repeat itself ad infinitum until I finished math classes. I now HATE math. Can't stand it. And I think we've arrived at the answer to CC's screamed question! When you use something as punishment, your damn kid will not actively seek it out! Thanks for deeply breaking me, guys. Real useful in my life. [info] None [info] 1557129920 [info] train
Nimbleturtles [info] I didn't leave my city for a year when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I'll visit friend every month hours away because of medication. [info] None [info] 1502299389 [info] valid
veraloe [info] I’m still fighting this concept and I have been diagnosed with anxiety/OCD now for almost 10 years. I’ve gone to a psychologist but never stuck with it. I’m on medication/seek help from my doctor - but I just find it really hard to seek a psychologist.  This is for a few reasons:- I can’t really afford it at the moment - as soon as I feel slightly better, I feel I don’t need it anymore- I’m not willing to change my habits yet (I have strict compulsions that my psychologist tries to change, and I feel as if I’m just not ready)I know I need help and I know help would do wonders for me... but I recommend seeking help ASAP so you can get back on the right track :) [info] None [info] 1532312560 [info] train
Lionflower13 [info] Me.But, it's getting better since I have started taking ADD meds. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and given medication to help with it. I was still getting overwhelmed because I couldn't tell when I was taking on too many things in my life (inability to regulate).And, transitions kicked my ass. Always. I could go to the gym for six solid weeks, get sick for 5 days, and never go back to the gym because my groove was thrown off. And, forget going from writing instructions to suddenly being interrupted for an emergency meeting. All that did was put me in a foul mood because I liked my hyperfocusing.After being diagnosed with ADD and placed on the appropriate meds, I am better able to adapt to transitions and uncomfortable environment, but it's taking longer than I thought to get to a point where I no longer need the anxiety meds. It has been 6 months, and I keep making progress, but it's baby steps. [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1366666500 [info] test
GaugeH [info] Script help?  This might be a stupid question, but how tf do you get a script. I know I need it or at least some sort of pain med; and benzos work best cuz opiates cause more urinary problems. I am diagnosed with anxiety but previous drug addict and I think that is on my PCP's transcripts lol that I was a speed user at least       Anyways, I got prostate issues, balls swollen, shit sux ok. I need pain meds but US docs are A-holes about narcotics rn. I've been doing like 4 day a week, sometimes 5, trying to keep wd to minimal. I have contacted several docs, and they always tell me ibuprofen and blahblahblah. I do make the mistake of often saying I need medication? Should I avoid mentioning it at all? Bcz self tapering and medicating sux balls bro, nothing like WDing at work on a weekend after school -,- I just want someone to manage my fucking drugs god damnit [info] None [info] 1493748871 [info] train
kvng967 [info] this is very true. the difference between stress and anxiety is that stress is temporary (maybe it last for a week or two or until a specific situation that's stressing you out it resolved) and usually doesn't disrupt your life this much. I was diagnosed with anxiety when i was in middle school and these are also the symptoms I had. you should try to see a therapist or even the school counselor could greatly help [info] None [info] 1550758956 [info] test
cheekyuptowngirl [info] Thank you soooo much!!!! I just had my LO on 7/23....but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, panic disorder and major depressive disorder. I have been on so many meds and combinations of meds and we finally found one that worked. Then I got pregnant....I wanted to do the right thing and stop taking my meds and was advised by the psychiatrist on how to ween off of them. Well, I ended up going through withdrawl during my first tri and was in the hospital to get IV fluids because I was so dehydrated.  It was decided in concert between three different Dr's that I would stay on my meds as the benefits outweighed the risks for me.  I got a bunch of unwanted flack from people about continuing my meds and that I was hurting my child. It made me angry...I should have kept it to myself, but I wear my heart on my sleeve.  You are so brave.....you are empowering other women who are pregnant or may become pregnant by letting them know that it's ok to get depressed, it's ok to ask for help and it's ok to take the meds if the benefits outweigh the risks! Thank you, thank you, thank you!  [info] ~*Ruby Fae 7/23/15*~ [info] 1439680331 [info] valid
dogfins25 [info] I had this problem for many years.  This was actually a symptom I had before I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I went thru a bunch of tests to see if it was a physical issue and it wasn't until I started high school and my anxiety got worse that I got help. First I wouldn't recommend wearing a maxi pad. If you do it once it may become a habit. I did this for years and I had to "wean" myself off them, I would wear the thick heavy flow ones daily because I was afraid of having an accident. I would also tie a sweater around my waist. I would go to the bathroom, clean up and then sit down again because "Oh! I still have to go a little bit" so that became a nasty cycle and I would spend a long time in the bathroom. I always had to know where the toilet was and if I didn't have access to one... I hated school assemblys because I felt trapped.  I was terrified of school trips because the bus didn't have a bathroom. You know what though, I NEVER HAD AN ACCIDENT. Ever. If you can distract yourself on the bus that may help, read a book, listen to music, talk to someone on the phone. You can PM me if you want. It will be OK.  [info] None [info] 1461821469 [info] train
swingerofbirch [info] I've heard of ADHD being misdiagnosed as GAD because the lack of focus causes frustration/anxiety and a feeling of being out of control. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14 and then at 18 my psychiatrist tried me on Adderall for a week and it seemed to make my anxiety better than years of benzos/SSRIs but it made me shake physically so I was scared of it. I always wonder whether I was misdiagnosed and should have stayed with it. Anyhow, very difficult to know how the psychiatrist would respond unfortunately because of it being a controlled substance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1572850214 [info] train
aliencheese555 [info] If you're female, that's LITERALLY the norm for the way adhd presents itself. I should know XDI did fine/pretty well in school, Bs and As. But HOO BOY did I have trouble with remembering shit and doing homework and organization. AND I was diagnosed with anxiety. So I feel ya. But, take a look at [this](https://www.researchgate.net/publication/242642028_ADHD_SELF-RATING_SCALE_FOR_GIRLS). It might help you a bit in convincing doctors. Kathleen nadeau is the bees kneesAlso, if you can, find a new psychiatrist.  [info] None [info] 1553705883 [info] train
crazynekosama [info] Never to both. I will, on very rare occasions have the odd drink but I think it's been well over a year since my last one. I used to drink all the time and then I was diagnosed with anxiety and I started taking meds and I found drinking on my meds wasn't the same (it just made me feel tired) and my doctor warned me that because alcohol is a depressent it can effect my anxiety. So I decided to not bother and I honestly don't miss it.   [info] ♀ [info] 1522463089 [info] train
annie_M4E [info] It's stupid but here it is:1. I've been diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago and it costed me a friendship (long story but it still hurts)2. I have lost 3 people I loved and admired and my dog who was my baby boy in less than 3 years3. Me and my ex broke up about a month ago but remained friends. He texted me one day and the convo went like this (I copy/pasted)Him "I think we would be better off as friends for now"Me: "Why?"Him: "Bc it's for the best"Me: "Okay we'll talk about it tonight Okay?"Him: "I'd rather not"Me: "Maybe it is for the best"Him: "Okay we can still be friends"Me: "Yes id like that. Can you make an effort for me and communicate a bit Please?"Him: "Sure"Now to be clear I only agreed bc I thought it was what he wanted and because I want him to do what makes him happy but for the past month hes been putting the blame for the breakup on me because I agreed with him and then when we explained to each other our sides of the story I asked him if he ever wanted to get back with me he said 'never" and it hurts. He always acts as if it was my decision when it was his and keeps doing and saying stuff as if he wants me back and then he just breaks my heart again and I am sick of it. [info]  [info] 1551586678 [info] valid
Cabbage_Patch_Itch [info] NAH Is it possible to try the party for a few minutes? I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. I absolutely do not live in your skin, but for me there are outings that were not nearly as bad as the buildup to the event.  Having more time to panic and hype up the event makes me more anxious.  Do you use any coping skills? Your anxiety sound pretty debilitating and that does make you a non-Asshole! But whenever you are ready to look into some permanent solutions, I recommend you should. Groups and mindfulness work for me. Maybe you can find things that can help you too! I know what you are going through.  Sorry my reply got out of hand. [info] Partassipant [2] [info] 1558660373 [info] test
theglassduchess [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in kindergarten and ADHD in 3rd grade. I COMPLETELY understand!! [info] None [info] 1558583985 [info] train
Grape72 [info] If it helps any I was let down because I was diagnosed with anxiety but I was not taking medication for it at the time. The Army only lets you in with anxiety if you are taking medication, which I refused to do at the time.  [info] None [info] 1506989140 [info] train
Water_Poles [info] Massive space outs In the past few weeks I've noticed that I've been "spacing out" for lack of a better term a couple times a day. I'll be sitting, watching a YouTube video or something when my mind will go essentially blank, and twenty minutes later I'll realize that the video has ended.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, maybe this has something to do with that? I'm not on any medication. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1430390485 [info] train
sheriff1980 [info] Hey bud, I was diagnosed with anxiety a little over a year ago. I started having the same symptoms you are describing about 2 weeks ago. Through CBT training, I kinda told myself that it was all in my head, I started drinking GALLONS of water a day, peeing every 45 minutes or so. I went to the doc today and got tested, and sure enough I am diabetic. Don't let your anxiety diagnose you (or not diagnose you) go get checked. I am 37 years old and scared about what is happening to me. But at least I know it isn't all in my head.  [info] T2 / 2017 / PILLS  [info] 1496191296 [info] train
triagonalmeb [info] I thought it was an allergic reaction to eating cup noodles for the first time and never ate it again. I felt nauseous but for some reason I was terrified of throwing up. I had no idea why, it was never an issue, but it was like suddenly vomiting was my worst fear. And that made me terrified. I would start shivering hard, get palpitations, cold hands, cry a lot and run to my mom. Sometimes I couldn't sleep because of it and had to go to school super tired. Years later someone mentioned panic attacks and it clicked. Even more years later I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1522096163 [info] train
Ownfir [info] Up until I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago I honestly thought that all people thought the same way I did, with this much worry. (I'm a guy.) My mind is similar to this but with more future concerns and less present concerns. To think that someone just has like a blank empty mind is almost impossible for me to comprehend because my mind is *always* thinking.  [info] None [info] 1454214832 [info] test
Krankdatsmash [info] Anyone else here get sore arms and fingers from anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety recently and around that same time I noticed arm and hand pains. Anyone else have these kind of things? [info] None [info] 1486650418 [info] train
fsuchin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year which is a big no no if i wanted to pursue a career in actuarial science. I have IBS too so that makes things even worse. The thing that’s helping me right now is trying out a whole practice exam in 3-hours and getting a good score. That usually boosts my self-esteem. I realize that I get more anxious when I know that I’m not making progress so I try to make “small victories”. I would take custom quizzes on ADAPT when I find myself in a rut before taking another practice exam. I suggest finding your “trigger”. I know now that when I see that the numbers on the screen are not what i want, I try to not let it get to me otherwise I get into a depressed state, and once I’m out of it, I realize I just wasted a bunch of time being sad, and anxiety comes bustin’ at my door. So instead of whining, I put the difficulty slightly lower and work my way up. I know this requires you having ADAPT but maybe try doing this for the SOA test bank. Set a goal like finish 10 questions in 50 minutes or less. If you don’t do it, don’t let it bum you out. Lighten the load and don’t forget to take a breather!  [info] None [info] 1533542998 [info] train
violent_amethyst_13 [info] 1. i've cut my leg from my hip to my knee before 2. i'm diagnosed with anxiety 3. i haven't self-harmed in the past 4 months  [info] None [info] 1511457840 [info] test
Rollins10 [info] Big feels out to you man, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder years ago and have been taking Zoloft for almost a decade now. I've learned (still learning) you just have to take life one day at a time. [info] All your base are belong to us [info] 1453298351 [info] train
foxmom2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for years and only this year did I get a diagnosis of PVCs.  Not anything worrisome, unless you're in the midst of an episode in which case you become convinced this is the end. ;) [info] None [info] 1544399989 [info] train
mrpookie27 [info] Please help me 24. Male. Am in pretty decent shape.I have been to the doctor 4 times since last November (once was for my yearly physical). I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on meds but hasn’t really helped.Symptoms: -I initially went to the doctor because I had been seeing a decent amount of blood when I wipe (Dr said this is hemorrhoids. I do believe him on this one because a few years ago I had an external one go come and go) - stomach bloating ( I have been feeling bloated on and off since November, (Dr said he couldn’t find  any enlarged organs or anything out of the ordinary when doing a physical exam of my stomach)- pale colored stools (this has only happened a couple of time)-not sure if they are fatty stools but I can see some undigested foods. - awful indigestion and heartburn (Dr gave me some medicine I take everyday for this and it has worked wonders)   - no weight loss or jaundice    I have been terrified I had colon cancer at the beginning and he reassured that I was fine. I didn’t get a colonoscopy but he did do a CEA blood test and it came back well within the normal range. Now I’m terrified something is wrong with my pancreas. My doctor said the bloating was muscle cramps in my stomach because it comes and goes but I’m still really worried. My complete blood test was normal (all bilirubin levels were normal, the only thing that was high was my cholesterol and not by much). Should I go see a different doctor to get a second opinion, or go back to mine and push for more tests? I’m definitely looking into therapy right now. [info] None [info] 1557634268 [info] test
FHRITP69er [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety. I had no idea what it was like before. I just thought people were nervous like a test. At least for me that just mild. It's more like if I'm going to live the next day because something must be wrong with me. It doesn't make sense that I can just sit innocently on my couch, watching a movie, eating dinner, and all of a sudden I look at my girlfriend and tell her I think i'm going to die.I sustained a leg injury from a back injury (sciatica maybe) and it just got so bad. Slept for maybe 1-2 hours total for 2 weeks when my leg issue started. Then randomly, I remember just talking to my physio therapist to help my sciatica and just before we even started, I remember a huge ringing in my ear, and then my head got super cloudy and almost felt dense. I just felt like life was leaving my body and told her I think my heart stopped. She laid me down seconds away from passing out. That was the first time. The second time, on the couch, and my heart was minimum 100bpm for no reason. And I remember panicking as fuck. Telling her not to let me die. Telling her to call my mom. What do I do. Do I call 911? I called my mom. Voice was shaking uncontrollably, trying to be as calm as possible. Fiancé instructing me to breathe as she rubs my back. I can't stop telling her I love her. Mom says go to the hospital now. I say I can't make it. I get off the phone. Call 911. Ambulance is at my house in 4 minutes. I'm laying on the couch now. I'm hooked up to their EKG, and they were insanely calm. Told me I'm going to be okay and I'm not having a heart attack. I'm not going to die. They administered my prescribed/Rx Lorazepam and swallowed. Heart rate went down... They said they don't need to take me to the hospital because it's not life threatening, so I signed my waiver and took their word for it.Since then, I caved and made a large post on social media for anyone on my friends list. I barely use Facebook but I creep alot just to stay up to date. This was a 3:30 in the morning because I couldn't sleep. Any time I try to sleep is my nightmare because that's when my walls come down. Idle hands and mind are the devils playground. So all day, all night I just wonder if I'm gonna make it. So so so many people reached out to me, and told me that I'm okay. And that they too have never told anyone they have been dealing with it for years. They thought they were alone. I thought I was alone. I cried for the first time in maybe 5 years. I cried hard. I just want to live. I'm crying as I type this.It made me so humble. I held my fiancé closer. I just celebrated my 5 year anniversary together with her and she's my rock. I think i'm going to be okay. Every day is a struggle. I'm going to be okay.I just love everything and anyone.Thank you for listening. This is extremely unlike me. [info] None [info] 1561582603 [info] train
LushEnough [info] Hey! Me and my partner used to only trip together, but I’ve been solo tripping for a year now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since elementary school. I won’t lie to you I’ve had a few trips where I got a little uneasy at times but it’s nothing a good distraction won’t fix lol. Find yourself some good shit to watch on tv, or get some various arts and crafts to do, music is also a must. Solo tripping is very rewarding. You’ll be fine :-) I took 200ug about 20 minutes ago so here I go again! [info] None [info] 1561086866 [info] test
missjulia928 [info] It wasn't really a tantrum. I'd just cry uncontrollably and try to run away from the situation. When you are 6 and have an anxiety attack, you have zero idea how to cope with it. It's scary enough for an adult most of the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 10 and finally started to learn coping methods through therapy.  [info] None [info] 1426478174 [info] test
stebbiv [info] I had this issue constantly since the equivalent of junior high and I ended up dropping out of college. - Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety, that has been causing all sorts of serious issues.So yeah. Find a clynical psychologist to help you out. Maybe your school can help you out. I literally lost years because of this and now I'm 28 and just getting back on track. (Or so I think.) [info]  [info] 1411947844 [info] train
onawall [info] I do encourage him to stand up for himself, and he does tell them to stop, but they dont. And before Jake had said that to me, I thought of him very highly. We had gone to a fair and he had been teasing us because we were fresh in the relationship and were anxious. When we were going home, in the car, Jake had said something about us holding hands. And so we did. After that we stopped being anxious and that led to the next level of our relationship. I thought he was really cool until he said that about me. And I'm not insecure, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and when I hear people are saying things about me it triggers my anxiety. I just want to be on the down low. [info] None [info] 1555358973 [info] train
bewareoftheaussie [info] I was officially diagnosed just a month ago, and I felt the same way you did. It made all of the health problems I've ever had since early childhood make complete sense. Like you also, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and for years my doctors just said it was stress causing all these health issues. I hope, like me, you can find some answers and coping methods in this diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1453871834 [info] test
ChiknNuget [info] Can ARFID be triggered by a some-what traumatic childhood event? Howdy! Firstly, I think it’s important to let you guys know I haven’t been professionally diagnosed yet. I feel I match up perfectly well and really hope to get a formal diagnosis in the future! I was wondering if ARFID can be triggered by some type of semi-traumatic event in childhood? Long story short; when I was about two I ended up in hospital for a week or two with salmonella and a few other nasty digestive/stomach bugs. I threw up basically anything I ate and cried a whole lot. Before that, I was the least fussiest kid a kid could be. I would try anything. However, when I was in hospital I stopped eating anything except for chicken nuggets and chips (fries). I’m not sure if that was the only food I could keep down or not. But after I was released from the hospital, I stayed extremely restrictive on my chicken nugget and chips. I would completely freak out and hyperventilate over any other food going near me. This lasted around 8 more years until I slowly added a few more things into my diet. I expanded to other chicken (tenders, burgers with just the meat and bun) etc, beef (sausages, sausage rolls) etc and stuck with potato. Everything else was filled in with cereal and other sugary stuff. For a really long time growing up, I was underweight and short. Now I’m turning 18 this year and have added a few more things to my diet including shrimp, nachos (just the beef and cheese of course 😛) and a few other close “branches” of those foods. I’m now on the ender side of the “ideal weight” chart but I’m still really short. Which isn’t fun since now I’m in uni, I’m still misunderstood as a kid who’s lost haha (but on the plus side, no one questions me if I order off the kids menu). I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that plays a huge role in trying new food. I am absolutely petrified of trying anything new. It mostly has to do with me being afraid of texture than taste, but taste has a huge role in any food being considered to be “tried”. I am honestly tired of living like this and would give up and arm or a leg to have a normal diet. I’m lacking in so many vitamins like B12 and I’m constantly tired. I want to get help but the thought of having someone push me to try new foods makes me avoid it even more. I was wondering if being sick as a kid caused this? As some type of traumatic (defiantly not as traumatic as most things) event? I’m not so much scared of throwing up the food now, but I know deep down, the fear of trying new food is because of early childhood troubles with it (the salmonella and the other virus). I’d love your guys thoughts. I’m so thankful to have found this sub. Although not diagnosed, I do consider myself to have ARFID and will try my best to get a proper diagnosis. I’m just so glad to know I’m not the only one :) [info] None [info] 1523455073 [info] test
BrentBlend [info] Items for sale.Gold PAX 3Newvape pusher/lid comboNewvape screenInterplanetary Super Weapon II + new screens x5 (+1 barely used in the swII, 6 total)ID Pollen PressID baggiesID silicone 2ml containers x4I used the swII maybe two times, the PAX once. I was diagnosed with anxiety, thinking this may help with medicating. It still gives me anxiety so I have no use for any of it. Everything is in like new condition. [info] None [info] 1505356437 [info] train
stanstanstanLM [info] So, I'm not sure I understand all the details (or if I really want to) of your situation, what I can say is that it sounds like you're unhappy the way things are. If you're at a point where you're considering ending friendships over this, then that's all you really need. You don't need to justify yourself or your actions to anyone. It may annoy them, or confuse people, but you don't owe them closure or justification. If ending the friendships results in a better, less stressful, and far healthier, situation for yourself, you should. You are responsible for yourself, your health, and your feelings and to uphold those responsibilities to yourself social obligations are less relevant. If, however, there are those who you want to remain friends with, you need to talk to them. Friendships are a lot of work, and properly telling someone your feelings is the only way they can continue. If that means over text, or a letter, or face to face, then so be it. Many people don't see text as seriously as face to face, since you can't hear tone or see body language, so it is difficult to discern feelings, so that is something you should keep in mind as well. In these kind of situations though... I would say have as open and as blunt of a conversation as you can. Try to put aside being hurt at what you hear, until digesting everything that's been said. People can be emotional, and say things that hurt or things they don't really mean, especially when confronted with the faults you see in them. If you have the patience to do that with any of these girls, then that says you care about your friendship with them and perhaps they're worth a shot. All in all, what I'm saying is, think carefully about each and every one of them before making your choice. If you feel like 3 of them are worth trying for, then do it. If none of them are then don't. If you want to explain to them, than do. If you don't want to explain anything, then don't. Something you should consider though, is some of the things you've mentioned they've said about you seem... well extremely valid for them to be upset about. Being jealous about 3 friends hanging out, constantly doubting their feelings, and never trusting them, while leaning on them emotionally, are just some I'm picking out from your text. See, the problem is, it really seems like these feelings are a constant for you. Pulling from my own life, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it's to the point where I believe that strangers harbor malicious and evil intentions for me. Lady walking in the park? My brain tells me that she's there to murder me, obviously. Guy walking past my house everyday? Well he must want to break in and steal all my things, right? But you see, that lady likely just wants to walk on her lunch break. And that guy? Probably is going to school or work. You see, what I have learned is that the narrative my sick brain writes for others is not the truth, and moreover this is a 'me' responsibility. It is your responsibility to deal with your emotions, and I would strongly suggest seeking therapy. It is not your friends or peers responsibility to be your therapist. It is not a responsibility of a friend to constantly have to reassure their friend over everything. And frankly it is exhausting. It's not healthy to not be able to trust people, or feel jealous that friends hang out with each other without you, or feeling overly controlling or possessive. The more out of control feelings become the more you rely on others and at some point that is also not healthy, especially if that means that they're being backed into a place where your emotions are forcing them to go on a rant. Honestly, G here sounds like someone who cares about you a lot, and certainly sticks out from the others that you mentioned. If I was in your position, (and as a fellow over thinking who can be a debbie downer) I'd fight tooth and nail for someone who had the balls to call me out on my shit right to my face. Respect. And another personal feel too, is these friends who are 'talking behind your back' or 'snitching' could be doing so with the best of intentions. Perhaps someone told F things but intended to try to fix the relationship and it blew up in their face? And talking with each other about you doesn't mean it's full of malice, they could be concerned and as far ad they see it, you're all friends and these friends may be concerned about you too.Tl;drYou're not nessicarily wrong, do as you please, though regardless of ehat you do think about therapy for yourself because some of the things you are expressing here is not indicative of, (or an environment that would lead to,) good mental health.Also r/relationship_advice would be a good place to post if you want a more empathetic(?) Normal(?) approach to dealing with these friends, I'd suggest asking there as well. [info] None [info] 1572163846 [info] train
dankodogi [info] He [M, 15] likes other people. I'm [F, 15] He just said he has feelings for someone else and I'm stressed. I feel like complete and total shit and don't know what to do. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and this isn't helping it. Please help [info] None [info] 1506229972 [info] train
phorensic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder 7 or 8 years ago. I used to have panic attacks while driving to work. I had a big one that sent me to the ER while I was walking in the parking lot. Complete tunnel vision and total disorientation. I had no idea who I even was at that point, let alone have the ability to drive. I can imagine a scenario when having a panic attack you get to the point of passing out, which would be potentially lethal to you, passengers, and other people on the road. So yes, it would be the same as having one in a plane, the same potential consequences. Is one life worth less than 100+ on a plane? It has the same weight in my view. You might have been able to pull over "safely" while having a panic attack, but can others?? You should think a little harder about this. [info] None [info] 1540493143 [info] valid
Raiz3r74 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and take a beta blocker for that and a mitral valve prolapse that I have. I don't smoke or drink. But I'm over weight. Eat like shit and dont exercise. And I'm 44 yrs old. Sigh... 6ft 245lbs. Like to get down to 180.  [info] None [info] 1548381063 [info] train
TalkOfSexualPleasure [info] Personally I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  I'm very particular with who I tell that to (barring Reddit because of the anonymity) because if I feel like people are patronizing me it makes my anxiety worse.  There are some people who push the envelope for no other reason than attention, but grouping all of us into that category really hurts the ones of us who suffer silently to ourselves.  I personally have the fear of telling someone about my condition and being told they know better than my doctor's or told I'm out right lying, because my symptoms aren't visible, but personally my symptoms don't come out around anyone, they're clawing at the back of my mind, but in front of people my mind goes into go mode and decides no one can see how dysfunctional I am.  The muscles in my back will clench to the point of pain, my shoulders will cramp, and I can be all but having panic attack and yet I won't break.  The second I'm by myself, I can't breath, I can't think, I'm pacing, yanking at my hair, screaming, crying, and even praying to a god I don't believe in to make it stop.  And it never stops, it never goes away, it gets better, smaller, for at least a little while, but it never ever goes away. [info] None [info] 1552359370 [info] valid
SevenHeadedCrow [info] Anxiety and Partying I (19M) always tell myself I'm not the kinda person who likes to party, but my roommate has some people over and I kinda want to join. I was diagnosed with anxiety and just popped some meds. Something has me worried about how they will think about me and i geuss I'm just to much of a fucking wuss. What can i do when i act like an antisocial semi-arrogant asshole who wants no friends almost all the time. I can't hide from my weaknesses and problems anymore but i dont want ro change and try new* things. Maybe i just want to lose my virginity or feel accepted but i thought i was past these things. Oh well thanks for reading if you did [info] None [info] 1546760043 [info] valid
diamonds_diamonds [info] Anti- Social behavior with extreme irritability normal towards end of deployment??? I'm not sure if this is normal, or maybe deployment behavior.I'm pretty sure I'm that percentage my unit thinks where I'm gonna throw myself off a building when we get back. These last few months have been HARD, when talking to family and loved ones. I don't want to talk with anyone really and the only person I can tolerate BARELY is my Best Friend back home.Not my mother. Not my father. Not my sister.It takes insane effort just to get through conversations with my fiancé and when I do I'm irritated BEYOND belief. It's almost as if every other thing he says makes a tick go off in my head. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know extreme irritability is something that surfaces for me with it, but I can't seem to KNOW what I'm having anxiety about. It just seems that people in general are just ANNOYING. Maybe I'm just worried about integrating back into civilian life?No matter what National Guard says, THEY DO NOT LOOK OUT FOR YOU. Will leave you high and dry. I know my Unit isn't worth shit when it comes to solider's wellbeing. Maybe that's what it is??I hold on by a thread with people at work. They can start to tell the smiles are fake. Anytime possible, any free time I have I try and lock myself away so I don't have to interact with people. When I get back, I don't even plan on contacting anyone honestly and just keep to myself for a few weeks.I let my line leader know already what to expect just so no one from my section goes calling the police or putting out some missing persons report. But my head feels like it's about to explode. [info] None [info] 1562367096 [info] valid
squamuglia [info] Not a metaphysical distinction, a causative one. When I was in college, I was diagnosed with anxiety mediated reflux. My GI Doctor basically told me there was nothing he could do for me and to seek out therapy. That was a very really somatic pain I was experiencing (vomiting daily for a year) and the correct intervention was psychological. I think this debate is a partially based out of a misunderstanding because you're referring to chronic pain like fibromyalgia, but there are lots of instances where perceptual pain should not be treated with narcotics because it would be treating the symptoms with a very real cost to the patient. As in the case of my hypochondriac friend who needs CBT for her anxiety, not an analgesic. [info] None [info] 1463335825 [info] test
JohnLockeN7 [info] If I could just EFing sleep... I just spent ANOTHER 9 hours laying in bed, not sleeping for a single SECOND. No half sleeping or finally falling asleep for a measly 3 hours of sleep. NOT ONE DAMN SECOND.For whatever reason, all I can do is worry before work. The job isn't even really stressful. But for some ungodly reason, simply needing to be at work on time with all my equipment just makes me worry endlessly.I've been diagnosed with anxiety for the abuse I suffered as a kid. I've been through the Army and all that. Been in burning buildings. All that shit. None of what should ACTUALLY be stressful is stressful. Just stupid ass shit like what people think of me or something. It's MADDENING. WHY CAN'T I JUST SLEEP. Being fucking ultra sleep deprived makes everything so much WORSE. [info] None [info] 1548677716 [info] test
boredwoman [info] Today I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. 5 minutes after I got out of the doctor, I discovered that I accidentally shared a man I'm currently crushing ons spotify playlist. I don't even follow him. Great day. [info] None [info] 1527267464 [info] train
gotskott [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and migraines, so it's hard to get taken seriously sometimes ("Oh, that's just you're anxiety causing that.")  I have a weird pain that seems to come from near where I had a root canal or close to my sinus cavity.  Dentist said it's probably a sinus infection.  Doctor said it's probably a dental issue.  Eventually, was given antibiotics, and the pain has gone, but I have no energy and my knees hurt like the bugger.  I feel like an old man walking around the house.Going to see my primary again today, as he said my symptoms show that something else is at work here.  But it's Kaiser, so I'm not holding my breath. [info] None [info] 1443467865 [info] train
refugefirstmate [info] First, call the number on the back of your insurance card to see whether you need a referral from your doctor or not.  Generally with psychiatric care, you don't.Next: County mental health center. Make an appointment.  They charge on a sliding scale, they take insurance, and there are lots of different practitioners in one place. And they have seen everything more than once, believe me, so don't feel weird about needing therapy at all.  IME the problem with goign to a private practitioner is that it's a crapshoot, and some of the therapists out there need help themselves.  (As I left an intial session with one after telling her we weren't a good fit, she sadly called out "But I *like* you!"  uh no)You'll have an intake interview to find out what your treatment goals are and the kind of therapist you think would be a good fit.  Then you'll get an appointment with a therapist.After a couple therapist meetings you'll see a psychiatrist, who reviews the therapist's notes and talks to you and makes a recommendation for what anxiety meds might be useful to you. You choose to take them, or not.Then you continue to see the therapist, learning new ways of thinking, usually once a week, and the psychiatrist after another month to see how the meds are working or if the type of dosage needs tweaking (it usually does).  Once you're on a satisfactory med schedule, you see the psychiatrist only every 3 months or so.  Your therapy can continue until you decide you've achieved what you want, which means it can be half a dozen sessions or a couple years.If you don't click with the first therapist, you can always discuss switching to another one so that your sessions will be more productive.Remember:  Therapy is only as good as you make it.  It's *hard work*. Don't just show up, unload or passively sit there, and then go back to your old thinking as soon as you leave.  Really make those sessions count.I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 50. Yeah, I waited that long.  Good on you for not being me.  Let me tell you, it is eminently fixable and boy when you do get a handle on things you feel like the king of the universe. [info] None [info] 1569701423 [info] train
frankg677 [info] I can get 8 walking miles in at work with pulling, pushing and lifting shit. I was diagnosed with anxiety and haven't taken my meds in months. Do you take anything for it? That shit has me worried a bit [info] None [info] 1553129535 [info] train
Colonel-Rosa [info] I was treated badly for mental illness in the UK. Some GPs are far better than others though. The first one I visited suggested I move 100 miles away to start a new job while knowing I was depressed. During that time away I almost committed suicide because I couldn't deal with the pressure of missing my family and work. Came back home, got a new GP and got referred to a counsellor where I was treated properly. I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and perfectionism in the end.PS. I am fully recovered now. [info] None [info] 1342682143 [info] train
oodles420 [info] Is it just me, or does Sean Spicer strike you as an empathetic being with a big heart? I hope this is the right place for this post. I apologize in advance for the length of this, and also for the possible grammatical errors.The following is my own opinion:It seems as if Sean Spicer's position does not suite him well (his suits don't fit him well either lol (pun intended)). Anyway, when I watch him speak, I can easily see that he is tense and also speaks with a defensive tone. However, watching him speak for the past few months has made me wonder a few things, and I would like to know your personal opinions about Sean.I believe that in real life, he is a person with a very big heart, and has the ability to feel empathy. Which is very different from the rest of Trump's cabinet, and others close to Trump (as far as I can tell, but I could be very wrong). Right off the bat, I noticed he was very different.In my own life, I was diagnosed with anxiety (Generalized Anxiety Disorder) at age 8, and have been living with it, embracing it, and have helped others with it. Due to this, I am usually very good at sensing when people are experiencing even the slightest of anxiety. To me, Sean Spicer gives off this vibe, yet at the same time I feel that he really tries to do his best. Although, more recently I feel he is becoming fed up with his job. Trump has been in office for over 50 days so far, and it sure has been a hell of a roller coaster ride, so I could understand if Sean is fed up with it all.I see the bracelet he wears (the rainbow colored one) which says "DAD" in the middle of it. According to what I have read online, his children made this bracelet for him. The fact that he wears this everywhere (especially the fact that he is not afraid of being seen with rainbow colors, which for some I assume could be misleading if they didn't notice the "DAD" on the bracelet) is extremely heartwarming and comforting. He is genuine in this way. He also may not spending nearly as much time with his children as he did before the Trump era. He probably misses them very much, and the bracelet is a piece of their heart he wears. In regards to what he has said during press conferences, do you believe his statements to be his true opinions and feelings? Or do you feel that he is only protecting the presidents credibility because he fears losing his job? I can't help but think of the saying "don't kill the messenger", for he gives off the vibe that he would love to say that to the press. I have this funny feeling there is a whole other side to Sean that we do not see. For my last comment, the fact that he was once the "White House Easter Bunny" is pretty awesome, and I'm hoping he does it again this year (99% sure it won't happen though lol).I know that the above may not be entirely true, for most of what I wrote is my own opinion. Please correct me with sources, if necessary. Again, I apologize for the length of this and thank you for reading :)TL;DR: Sean Spicer may actually be a kind-hearted individual who may have had no idea what he was walking into when accepting his position as the White House press secretary and communications director. Edit: I posted this with absolutely no incentive to bash the Trump presidency. This post is meant to be ONLY in regards to Sean Spicer. [info] None [info] 1490127930 [info] valid
Barneysparky [info] I'm not going to compare notes but I can give you some insights on what you might go through. I'm 50 and ran away from a good home when I was 12. I saw things and had things done to me. Until I was about 35 I was in complete denial that I couldn't just suck it up. Even though I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder before it was a thing. That came at about nineteen. On the outside I was doing well, owned my own business with no help,  had three kids married. I was too stubborn to get help. Don't be me. I do have a great life but I know I did it the hard way.  [info] None [info] 1481439299 [info] test
OnlyLewbert [info] Can someone help explain what this feeling is?? I was diagnosed with anxiety months ago however I never think I experience “anxiety attacks” however the other day I was sat at my computer and in a split second my mood just switched to what I can only describe as a severe sad feeling, my stomach just dropped, and I just felt horribly sad about I guess life in general, I just felt like suddenly crying. Is this an anxiety attack or is it something else? [info] None [info] 1557962461 [info] train
MrSwanson2UMN [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and apparently I've had it for a very long time. I go to therapy and have both a psychologist and a psychiatrist working for me to dose medications and work on long lasting methods. Honestly, the second I started taking Zoloft in combination with therapy and meditation I just don't care about what people think as long as I think I am doing the right thing and being a decent person.   [info] None [info] 1431504343 [info] train
VictoriousssBIG23 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety, borderline personality disorder, and PTSD. While I still struggle when I'm sober, I find that weed helps me be more in touch with the emotions of other people and how my actions affect theirs and vice versa. It also helps keep me calm because the BPD causes rapid mood swings including periods of intense anger or sadness, but stoned me is always happy and go-with-the-flow. It also helps me with PTSD related nightmares because I don't dream when I smoke before bed. I don't have the urge to self-injure when I smoke. However, I've been experiencing more anxiety and paranoia lately when I smoke. For years, it was the opposite. I was always relaxed and calm, but lately, my anxiety's gotten bad and idk what it is, really. I think part of it has to do with the legal status. It's not legal in my state yet so I get scared that someone in the hallway of my apartment building will smell it and report me for it or if I'm at home, I'm afraid that my parents will catch me with it. But I also experience anxiety sometimes even if there's good vibes around so idk. This didn't start happening until around this time last year so maybe my body chemistry changed? I still very much enjoy weed and the positive benefits I get from it. The anxiety is just an inconvenience at this point that I hope gets resolved.  [info] None [info] 1515398264 [info] test
jamiewoodson [info] My dad keeps bringing up my weight and I'm starting to hate myself So pretty much everything my dad says my brain believes for some stupid reason, if he says I'm good at something I think in good at it. If he says I'm going to gain weight and become unhealthy, I will believe it. I have an extremely high metabolism, I have to eat a lot or I get really hungry and angry. But he always brings up weight. And that annoys me so much because it really shows he doesnt care about my mental health. For 2 years I've been diagnosed with anxiety, he just thinks it's my phone and non existent bullies. My wide face from my bone structure is already my biggest insecurity and now you're telling me I'm going to get fatter and unhealthier. He also hates being told he's wrong and loves to push me around. I cant keep dealing with a dad that tells me I'm fat all the time, I'm even starting to believe it when I'm pretty much completely bone already [info] None [info] 1583086703 [info] train
jbug8 [info] I had a miscarriage in November, recently I was diagnosed with anxiety associated with ttc again. sometimes I feel like a can’t breathe, it’s not easy and I hope your able to take care of yourself in this journey too ♥️ [info] None [info] 1550987248 [info] train
TotesNotYourStalker [info] Medicated for Anxiety, but I still can't force myself to do certain things. How do I change that? I was diagnosed with anxiety probably 10 years ago. I've been on lexapro for probably 6ish years now, taking 20mg a day (recently upped from 10mg). My general anxiety is alright, I don't get as stressed when I have lots of homework, I have been in a more chipper mood, and I haven't had a panic attack since I started taking my medicine years ago. However, there are still some things I just can't get past:1. I get terrified to answer the phone when almost anyone calls. I'll make exceptions for my immediately family, sometimes dr's, but otherwise, I let it go to VM every other time.2. I almost panic when someone knocks on my door during the day, when my husband is working and my daughter is in school. I still sneak around to see who it is, but still hide until they leave, unless it's immediately family.3. My 7 year old daughter desperately wants to have friends over to play with her toys but I can't fathom the idea of being responsible for someone elses kid for that long. It's stupid though because I babysit my brothers kid, and best friends baby, all the time.How do I get past stuff like this? Is it an anxiety issue I'm dealing with or something totally different here? I feel crazy getting so anxious about someone knocking on my door or wanting to play with my kid. It's exhausting.Help! [info] None [info] 1573354023 [info] train
Oghurz [info] Photography as a Treatment or Therapy for Anxiety Hello everyone,  Awhile ago I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  As I was seeing what I could do to relax, I found out many people took photography as their own healing tool and I decided to give it a go since I already own the gear.  So I am going out lately based on a schedule in the sake of being out walking, relaxing and seeing the outside world from another perspective as many others.  Has anyone tried this for themselves?  If you did, do you have any suggestions or what helped you the most?In addition, my partner suggested me to share the photos I took each weekend on an Instagram account to engage with people thinking it might help or make me feel better.  However I am not an expert on growth etc as you can imagine.  Main aim is not to get (n)K followers or anything but I would like to engage with people better let's say. Does anyone have suggestions that I can follow? Any good reads, materials etc?  Also what do you think about sharing your photos on Reddit for asking criticism or appraisal?Cheers! [info] None [info] 1583334063 [info] train
JstAnotherNormie [info] newbie advice I've only had 2 classes in no gi fundamentals, but my problem is that I will watch and listen to my instructors direction, but when it's time to actually do it and get down I go blank and totally forget everything I watched/heard. Is this normal when you start doing bjj/any tips? I was diagnosed with anxiety and it reminds me of being back in high school math where I would listen, but would instantly forget what I had just learned when it came to actually doing math problems, this happened until I started medication (which im still on at a high dose). [info] None [info] 1552097674 [info] test
12KMMRPRO [info] I used to read books before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder; but ever since I went to university I stopped. I thought going back to reading would help but the brain fog I am in makes it impossible to understand atleast 50% of what I’m readong [info] None [info] 1544541717 [info] train
Trusty_Sidekick [info] Some people are born blind, or with heart defects, or with any other of the slew of biological short-comings out there. Do many of those people still survive? Absolutely. But do we at least recognize that their abnormal condition is exactly that? Yes. If you had to send two human beings to another ELP to propagate the human race, would you send two homosexual men, or one heterosexual woman and one heterosexual man? There's a biological reason for that. Do I have a problem with non-heterosexual people in society? Absolutely not! I have a handful of gay friends, my fiance is bi-sexual, and a cousin of mine is transgender. I am totally accepting of all of them. But to argue that heterosexuality should not be classified as "normal biological function" is stupid. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am on medication for those. Should I be offended if people tell me that those aren't "normal" functions of the brain? Nope, and I don't. I embrace it as a part of who I am. [info] None [info] 1424901227 [info] test
Lady_borg [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things, but nothing huge in particular that happens in the mornings. yes I have a toddler but even when he isn't causing me any stress it still happens. I am thinking this wave of anxiety is very tightly connected to my anxiety in general but not sure how to combat this.  [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1411991560 [info] train
MakeMammaProud [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. My parents took me out of therapy really quick though because my therapist called child protective services on them once she asked me what was going on at home. I just learned to deal with it on my own. It’s been two years since, and I’m much better now. My religion really helped me get through this time, but that’s just from my own personal experience, so I’m not recommending relying on religion for mental health [info] 18 [info] 1555224411 [info] train
multifoiled [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a couple of years but have been dealing with it since I was a very small child. Radiohead helps me codify it and examine it in a way almost no other band does.  [info] (No no no no no no no no) [info] 1464904355 [info] test
replicagaming [info] I'm starting college soon... Hi, this is my first time posting here so I apologize if I broke any rules. I'm starting college in a couple days and I'm absolutely freaking out about everything. I'm terrified of missing my bus and messing up my projects and just in general not doing well in my program. I know many people go through this type of transition but this has been causing my anxiety for nearly 2 months. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 3 months ago. I just thought since many people go through this type of change I'd be able to get some sort of advice to help me calm down just a bit, I don't any friends I like opening up to and none of them are very understanding of anxiety. Thank you to anybody who's willing to help :). [info] None [info] 1504485774 [info] train
HowdoIreddittellme [info] It depends on a number of factors: age, comprehension of what they are being told, belief that such abnormalities make someone "weak" or "broken". In my personal life, I was diagnosed with ADHD and Anxiety at 9 and 13 respectively. When I was diagnosed with ADHD at 9, it didn't mean much to me, I was nine, I wanted to watch TV and play. However at 13, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was somewhat crushing. I thought it meant I couldn't cope with life, and that I needed help that other kids didn't, that I couldn't keep up.If someone who received the news that they had some kind of mental condition or abnormality was raised in a family that taught that mental illness wasn't to a thing to be ashamed of, that it was ok, they might react like they would if they were told they had a physical disease. However, if you were raised to believe that mental illness meant you were weak, it might be a death blow to self esteem. [info] None [info] 1497444580 [info] train
UKGriff [info] It's hard to decide for me. Career wise I'm a winner, I'm 22 and a software engineer for a very good company (at least I think so). However when you look at my social/relationship part of life I seem to fail in every aspect, therefore I'm a loser in that area. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I don't like to claim that's the reason, because if it was then my career would suffer as well, but it hasn't so I just think it's me. I just suck and it eats away at me everyday.  [info] None [info] 1545971540 [info] train
LizzyLemonade [info] I hate that. I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year and I'm just getting used to recognizing the symptoms. It's awesome that you caught it quickly! [info]  [info] 1472583127 [info] test
S0urDrop [info] My Anxiety Story I've been wanting to post about this for awhile, but I'm afraid it'll just sound like I'm whining for attention/ Reddit crypto currency, but I just feel like I need to tell someone, even if it's just Reddit, so here it goes.Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I went to family therapy. See, my older sister has a cocktail of mental illnesses + some sort of sensory illness &amp; that shit isn't the easiest thing to live with. My parents (mostly my mother) had to focus on her to make sure she didn't hurt herself/ anyone else in one of her tantrums. While this was happening the seed of introvertedness was growing inside me. I had trouble standing up for myself, I didn't like talking to people much &amp; I was afraid to ask questions in class. I hated school because not only was I bullied, but my kindergarten teacher was a fucking child hating witch! Why she worked with small children I will never know, but it fucked me up for life. (Thanks Mrs. Beradyl) for half of my life a suffered in my social life &amp; in my academics. Anything would make me anxious, even saying hello to someone. I finally found solace in the Internet &amp; my cats (no regrets there)   I could just lay in bed &amp; relax while the world went on. In 6th grade I was diagnosed with ADD (Or ADHAD whatever it's called) ive been taking med for my many disorders for 3-ish years now &amp; it's kinda getting better. (I still prefer Netflix over people a little) I might continue this later, but momma needs some comfort food &amp; some tv! [info] None [info] 1543885706 [info] train
ksavage1986 [info] You are certainly not alone.  It's true though, there are people that make it all seem so easy, and it's frustrating.  Sort of like, "Damnit, why can't I just do it like they did?"My boss is someone like that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety after I had gone to the doctor with hamstring tendonitis and was convinced I had MS or ALS, only to have him say I showed no signs of either. (99% of my brian believes him, but I struggle to convert the other 1%).  So health anxiety has been my thing, but looking back, I realize all the times I was anxious and thought it was just normal (as I alluded to earlier, I would check the trash can in my bathroom for tampon wrappers when I knew it was my wife's time of the month--not normal behavior).  Anyways, back to my boss.  When he was around my age, a bit older, he decided to buy a boat.  He wound up sailing around the world for 17 years.  He said some nights during a storm, he would go beneath deck and just say, "I'm going to sleep now, hopefully I wake up tomorrow."  He was just able to look an uncertain situation in the face and have faith that it would work out.That's probably a pipe dream for people like you and I, but there's some real truth there.  Even if you have a kid, you'll be able to figure it out.  You are well-educated, and being an anxious person, you'll find the motivation to make your situation okay.  Again, I'm really sorry about your mom.  Did she have anxiety problems?  When I went to my parents and brother about my anxiety problems, I was comforted by the fact that they all had anxiety disorders at some point in their lives, and that I came by my feelings honestly. [info] None [info] 1424893752 [info] train
rowrowyothrowaway [info] Yes. Go to the doctor. Or maybe even better, go to a therapist. You *do not* have to live this way. Medical professionals can help you understand what's going on in your body and give you coping methods. That doesn't mean they'll *cure* it, but they can absolutely help. I would recommend *not* talking to your parents about it until you know what to talk to them about. Lots of times, if you say "I feel worried all the time," people will tell you to just not worry. They don't mean to be hurtful, but it is! It will be better if you can go to them and tell them what you need to be well. Say, "I was diagnosed with anxiety. Here's what that means. Here's what makes me worried, if anything. Here's how you can help me."  [info] None [info] 1525275992 [info] test
zebrapaad [info] Are symptoms of ADHD symptoms of anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it, but I seem to check a lot of ADHD boxes. Is it more likely that this is just part of anxiety? Or should I bring this up next time I go to a doctor? Another thing, I was raised in a family that considered things like ADHD and anxiety to be just a lack of self control, so I sometimes have a hard time gauging whether I'm just being lazy and resistant or whether I actually do have an issue with concentration. It was for the same reason I refused to consider medical treatment for anxiety for a really long time. So for that reason I'm worried about bringing this kind of thing up at the doctor because I don't want to get diagnosed with something I don't actually have because I know that this is a real thing. I guess what I'm saying is that I think I might just be an imposter. [info] None [info] 1575699361 [info] train
MikeStidham [info] THAT was what led me to go to the doctor in the first place, at which time I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  Some 20 years after that, my wife decided to seek a divorce.  As bad as those first panic attacks were, going through the divorce was 30 times worse.  I'd get this odd sensation in my chest like I'd just drank boiling water, then a hot flash all over me, then my legs would turn to jelly.  It's the weirdest thing I'd ever experienced. [info] None [info] 1574057371 [info] train
inalotofemotions [info] Why does my boyfriend have such difficulty with words, memory, and language? Note: I'm not asking this in a "my boyfriend is broken and needs to be fixed" sort of way. It's something that bothers him and he wants to work on, when I wonder if it's just part of his personality, or temperament. I'm just interested in having a non-judgemental conversation about it.So everyone will have those occasional moments when they forget a word mid-sentence, have to substitute a synonym, or ask for the word - those moments when it feels like your brain's recall system just isn't working a little. If I had to guess, I'd say it happens to me about once per week? Maybe less? It happens to me more often if I'm having a conversation with a stranger and worried about being judged or anxious, but it still doesn't happen to often.It happens to my boyfriend multiple times per conversation, even when he's not anxious. He's also much more forgetful than I am, and tends to misplace things quite frequently - at least once per week, he'll tell me he can't find some object that he uses most days (keys, wallet, etc). I misplace things like that quite rarely - when I do misplace them, it's due to some disruption in my regular routine.I think both these things are sort of parts of our personalities? For my whole life, I've liked to do things slowly, deliberately, methodically. I don't tend to talk a lot because I'm a bit on the shy side, though extraverted and comfortable around non-strangers. I'm sort of reserved, but I purposefully do things when I want to do them. I HATE being hurried and rushed - one boundary I had to set with my BF early on is that he needs to let me SLOWLY enjoy things sometimes (especially my mornings). I am this way because I've always been quite anxious (to the point where I've been diagnosed with anxiety), and I feel best when I slow down and act very deliberately. I pay lots of attention to my environment due to the amxiety as well - I almost never get "tunnel-vision".My boyfriend is basically an excited and passionate introvert! And I absolutely love that about him. He latches on to things he likes or wants to do and dives right in - he doesn't seem to worry about failure when trying new things. He's confident and self-assured in a way I'm not, which I think leads him to be more comfortable without needing to slow down and be deliberate in the way I need to - and I think this is why he misplaces objects and words more than I do.We're both the sort of people who try to practice mindful meditation, so that's not it, I don't think. I don't think it's solely anxiety because I'm typically much more anxious than him. I might be completely off-base with this guess - maybe it doesn't have to do with personality at all? That's why I'm curious to talk about it.Do you forget words or misplace things often? What's your personality like? What do you think is the reason for something like this? [info] None [info] 1568990490 [info] valid
Wannabe_Iceman [info] Anxiety causing anger towards close friends (17 M) So I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago. Occasionally I start listing all these things that my best friend does that makes me mad. She's a girl and I'm a guy and I feel like she's my best friend. Unfortunately when I say these things it really hurts her feelings and makes her want to stop talking to me. Is there anything I can do to calm myself so I don't go off on one of my rants? I really value our friendship and don't want to lose her [info] None [info] 1463499600 [info] train
kolpinoc [info] a sign of PPD/postpartum anxiety? MIL issues? WALL OF TEXT SORRY :( I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder recently - I've been this way my whole life but it was nice to have the medical community acknowledge it finally. I had Logan on the 8th of this month and have found myself getting... angry lately. Not angry at him, no. Angry when he's away from me. It started during our 2nd day in the hospital. He had to spend some time in their nursery and I asked to have him brought back to my room. They took their time doing so and I was starting to get heated. It's gotten worse since then. SO's mother wanted to hold Logan and in my mind it felt like an hour (it had been maybe 15 minutes) and I demanded him back into my arms. If he isn't within a few feet of me at all times I can feel my pulse quicken and breathing becomes rapid. Has anyone else experienced anything like this? Am I just becoming an extreme Mama Bear?I've had issues with my other two children and SO's family. It felt like I birthed my daughter's FOR his family. They overstepped all kinds of boundaries before I grew a backbone - but now the girls have a tight bond with SO's Mom because I was a pussy. Maybe I'm just trying to prevent that from happening to my last child and only son. I guess I want a Mama's Boy, not a Nana's Boy. During our first night home she came to visit. She asked my oldest, "is this your baby or my baby?" to which I pointed at SO and said, "sorry, THAT'S your baby."It's stuff like that. Overbearing, possessive, passive aggressive. I feel like this is my time to do it "right", I guess - show his family how strong my backbone is. [info] None [info] 1473782899 [info] train
WardenessoftheNorth2 [info] This lady who claimed to be a psychic &amp; I believe she truly was. She has since passed away but she just knew everything about me. It was scary even though she was really friendly. She told me my life would change when I turned 24. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder that year, my guy proposed to me &amp; I got my first short story published.  [info] None [info] 1521911233 [info] train
captainwhiskeytits [info] Mystery diagnosis - recurrent fevers edition Hello all,This past year, I have been dealing with episodes of fevers and fatigue. What it looks like -Notice I feel kinda chilly and off.  This progresses within an hour to a temperature between 99.5-100.5.  Body aches.  If I take ibuprofen, this takes care of the fever, and they have rarely lasted more than a day.  A few have persisted for 2 or 3 days.I regularly experience joint pain (wrists, shoulders, hips), and overall just a dull ache in my body.  I have a good deal of back/neck pain intermittently, but I think that's just because I'm out of alignment.  I noticed with a few of the fever episodes that they happened after my back got out of whack.  I do have some slight difficulties with swallowing, get choked up on water occasionally.Overall, I just feel low energy and tired, but I do have periods of weeks where I feel pretty okay.  I notice that my memory is less sharp.Identified triggers - stress, messed up sleep schedules, potentially back problems.  I don't drink often, but I happened to drink moderately a few times this past week and I'm currently experiencing fever/fatigue.  I am diagnosed with anxiety.I have found that when I partake in a sacred green plant intermittently (1x a week, small dose), that I tend to be pain free and don't have fevers.  I had to stop partaking because of a job search and everything came back.Consults so far - endocrinology (elevated thyroid antibodies), rheumatology (not able to identify anything).  Rheumatology said he's not convinced that I have lupus, but he's not entirely convinced I don't.  Offered to trial a drug that may help, but since I had been feeling well for a month decided to monitor.Negative for scleroderma, celiac's, vitamin B deficiency, thyroid levels are currently normal.  No hepatitis, no Lyme disease, no TB, no AIDS.  Bloodwork during a bad flare was a bit fucky, but my cell counts are back to normal now.Any ideas of what else I may have?  Overall I still function pretty well, but I'm afraid of long-term implications of this on my body and well-being.Edit: 27 y.o, female, no significant medical history, no significant international travel (Canada count?  lol), grew up in the country and have always had dogs.labs done - all normalTSH, T4 FREE, T3, ANA SCREEN RF LATEX QUALITATIVE, CCP ANTIBODY, NUCLEAR ANTIGEN ANTIBODY,NUCLEAR ANTIGEN ANTIBODY, VITAMIN B-12, CREATINE, MB FRACTION, ANTI HISTONE (done during a time when I was asymptomatic).  Did have a positive ANA in July, but it was borderline.Chest X-ray findings: Visualized osseous structures, heart, mediastinum and the lungs appear normal. There is a calcified granuloma in the left lower lobe as well as superior segment of right lower lobe. No focal infiltrates, pleural effusions, pulmonary edema or pneumothorax.I was taking birth control until a month ago, but quit.Edit 3 - more labsSMITH (SM) ANTIBODY - normal rangeRNP IGG - normalCK-MB - normalCCP IGG - normal [info] None [info] 1506354289 [info] train
chelbren [info] Yes, yes, yes. I always thought I was just a massive bitch, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made so much sense. It's honestly the most frustrating part of anxiety for me. I wish I could just brush small stuff off, but it's not that easy. [info] None [info] 1519134527 [info] test
